1000
970,bread, that was taken from before the LORD, to put hot bread in the day when it was taken away. 
Now a certain man of the servants of Saul was there that day, detained before the LORD; and his name was Doeg, an Edomite, the chiefest of the herdmen that belonged to Saul. 
And David said unto Ahimelech, And is there not here under thine hand spear or sword? for I have neither brought my sword nor my weapons with me, because the king's business required haste. 
And the priest said, The sword of Goliath the Philistine, whom thou slewest in the valley of Elah, behold, it is here wrapped in a cloth behind the ephod: if thou wilt take that, take it: for there is no other save that here. And David said, There is none like that; give it me. 
And David arose and fled that day for fear of Saul, and went to Achish the king of Gath. 
And the servants of Achish said unto him, Is not this David the king of the land? did they not sing one to another of him in dances, sayi
820,t seest thou? And I said, I see a seething pot; and the face thereof is toward the north. 
Then the LORD said unto me, Out of the north an evil shall break forth upon all the inhabitants of the land. 
For, lo, I will call all the families of the kingdoms of the north, saith the LORD; and they shall come, and they shall set every one his throne at the entering of the gates of Jerusalem, and against all the walls thereof round about, and against all the cities of Judah. 
And I will utter my judgments against them touching all their wickedness, who have forsaken me, and have burned incense unto other gods, and worshipped the works of their own hands. 
Thou therefore gird up thy loins, and arise, and speak unto them all that I command thee: be not dismayed at their faces, lest I confound thee before them. 
For, b
795,e, 
The likeness of any beast that is on the earth, the likeness of any winged fowl that flieth in the air, 
The likeness of any thing that creepeth on the ground, the likeness of any fish that is in the waters beneath the earth: 
And lest thou lift up thine eyes unto heaven, and when thou seest the sun, and the moon, and the stars, even all the host of heaven, shouldest be driven to worship them, and serve them, which the LORD thy God hath divided unto all nations under the whole heaven. 
But the LORD hath taken you, and brought you forth out of the iron furnace, even out of Egypt, to be unto him a people of inheritance, as ye are this day. 
Furthermore the LORD was angry with me for your sakes, and sware that I should not go over Jordan, and that I should not go in unto that good la
976,
Paul, and Silvanus, and Timotheus, unto the church of the Thessalonians in God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ: 
Grace unto you, and peace, from God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ. 
We are bound to thank God always for you, brethren, as it is meet, because that your faith groweth exceedingly, and the charity of every one of you all toward each other aboundeth; 
So that we ourselves glory in you in the churches of God for your patience and faith in all your persecutions and tribulations that ye endure: 
Which is a manifest token of the righteous judgment of God, that ye may be counted worthy of the kingdom of God, for which ye also suffer: 
Seeing it is a righteous thing with God to recompense tribulation to them that trouble you; 
And to you who are troubled rest with us, when the Lord Jesus shall be revealed from heaven with his mighty angels, 
In flaming fire taking vengeance on them that know not God, and that obey not the gospel of our Lord Jesus
782,eliverance as this; 
Should we again break thy commandments, and join in affinity with the people of these abominations? wouldest not thou be angry with us till thou hadst consumed us, so that there should be no remnant nor escaping? 
O LORD God of Israel, thou art righteous: for we remain yet escaped, as it is this day: behold, we are before thee in our trespasses: for we cannot stand before thee because of this. 
Now when Ezra had prayed, and when he had confessed, weeping and casting himself down before the house of God, there assembled unto him out of Israel a very great congregation of men and women and children: for the people wept very sore. 
And Shechaniah the son of Jehiel, one of the sons of Elam, answered and said unto Ezra, We have trespassed against our God, 
776,: and every one that loveth him that begat loveth him also that is begotten of him. 
By this we know that we love the children of God, when we love God, and keep his commandments. 
For this is the love of God, that we keep his commandments: and his commandments are not grievous. 
For whatsoever is born of God overcometh the world: and this is the victory that overcometh the world, even our faith. 
Who is he that overcometh the world, but he that believeth that Jesus is the Son of God? 
This is he that came by water and blood, even Jesus Christ; not by water only, but by water and blood. And it is the Spirit that beareth witness, because the Spirit is truth. 
For there are three that bear record in heaven, the Father, the Word, and the Holy Ghost: and these three are
758, hundred and twenty and three years old when he died in mount Hor. 
And king Arad the Canaanite, which dwelt in the south in the land of Canaan, heard of the coming of the children of Israel. 
And they departed from mount Hor, and pitched in Zalmonah. 
And they departed from Zalmonah, and pitched in Punon. 
And they departed from Punon, and pitched in Oboth. 
And they departed from Oboth, and pitched in Ijeabarim, in the border of Moab. 
And they departed from Iim, and pitched in Dibongad. 
And they removed from Dibongad, and encamped in Almondiblathaim. 
And they removed from Almondiblathaim, and pitched in the mountains of Abarim, before Nebo. 
And they departed from the mountains of Abarim, and pitched in the plains of Moab by Jordan near Jerich
796,ss, when Solomon was old, that his wives turned away his heart after other gods: and his heart was not perfect with the LORD his God, as was the heart of David his father. 
For Solomon went after Ashtoreth the goddess of the Zidonians, and after Milcom the abomination of the Ammonites. 
And Solomon did evil in the sight of the LORD, and went not fully after the LORD, as did David his father. 
Then did Solomon build an high place for Chemosh, the abomination of Moab, in the hill that is before Jerusalem, and for Molech, the abomination of the children of Ammon. 
And likewise did he for all his strange wives, which burnt incense and sacrificed unto their gods. 
And the LORD was angry with Solomon, because his heart was turned from the LORD God of Israel, which had appeared unto him twice
768,leaveth to the loins of a man, so have I caused to cleave unto me the whole house of Israel and the whole house of Judah, saith the LORD; that they might be unto me for a people, and for a name, and for a praise, and for a glory: but they would not hear. 
Therefore thou shalt speak unto them this word; Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Every bottle shall be filled with wine: and they shall say unto thee, Do we not certainly know that every bottle shall be filled with wine? 
Then shalt thou say unto them, Thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will fill all the inhabitants of this land, even the kings that sit upon David's throne, and the priests, and the prophets, and all the inhabitants of Jerusalem, with drunkenness. 
And I will dash them one against another, eve
759,ned him, saying, Abide with us: for it is toward evening, and the day is far spent. And he went in to tarry with them. 
And it came to pass, as he sat at meat with them, he took bread, and blessed it, and brake, and gave to them. 
And their eyes were opened, and they knew him; and he vanished out of their sight. 
And they said one to another, Did not our heart burn within us, while he talked with us by the way, and while he opened to us the scriptures? 
And they rose up the same hour, and returned to Jerusalem, and found the eleven gathered together, and them that were with them, 
Saying, The Lord is risen indeed, and hath appeared to Simon. 
And they told what things were done in the way, and how he was known of them in breaking of bread. 
And as t
1056,ification of life. 
For as by one man's disobedience many were made sinners, so by the obedience of one shall many be made righteous. 
Moreover the law entered, that the offence might abound. But where sin abounded, grace did much more abound: 
That as sin hath reigned unto death, even so might grace reign through righteousness unto eternal life by Jesus Christ our Lord. 
What shall we say then? Shall we continue in sin, that grace may abound? 
God forbid. How shall we, that are dead to sin, live any longer therein? 
Know ye not, that so many of us as were baptized into Jesus Christ were baptized into his death? 
Therefore we are buried with him by baptism into death: that like as Christ was raised up from the dead by the glory of the Father, even so we also should walk in newness of life. 
For if we have been planted together in the likeness of his death, we shall be also in the likeness of his resurrection: 
Knowing this, that our old man is crucified with him, that the body of sin might be destroyed, that henceforth we should not serve s
929, me these three times: unless she had turned from me, surely now also I had slain thee, and saved her alive. 
And Balaam said unto the angel of the LORD, I have sinned; for I knew not that thou stoodest in the way against me: now therefore, if it displease thee, I will get me back again. 
And the angel of the LORD said unto Balaam, Go with the men: but only the word that I shall speak unto thee, that thou shalt speak. So Balaam went with the princes of Balak. 
And when Balak heard that Balaam was come, he went out to meet him unto a city of Moab, which is in the border of Arnon, which is in the utmost coast. 
And Balak said unto Balaam, Did I not earnestly send unto thee to call thee? wherefore camest thou not unto me? am I not able indeed to promote thee to honour? 
And Balaam said unto Balak, Lo, I am come unto thee: have I now any power at all to say any thing? the word that God putteth in my mouth, that shall I 
745,lty of death. 
And some began to spit on him, and to cover his face, and to buffet him, and to say unto him, Prophesy: and the servants did strike him with the palms of their hands. 
And as Peter was beneath in the palace, there cometh one of the maids of the high priest: 
And when she saw Peter warming himself, she looked upon him, and said, And thou also wast with Jesus of Nazareth. 
But he denied, saying, I know not, neither understand I what thou sayest. And he went out into the porch; and the cock crew. 
And a maid saw him again, and began to say to them that stood by, This is one of them. 
And he denied it again. And a little after, they that stood by said again to Peter, Surely thou art one of them: for thou art a Galilaean, and
1030,nt away the people. 
And when he had sent them away, he departed into a mountain to pray. 
And when even was come, the ship was in the midst of the sea, and he alone on the land. 
And he saw them toiling in rowing; for the wind was contrary unto them: and about the fourth watch of the night he cometh unto them, walking upon the sea, and would have passed by them. 
But when they saw him walking upon the sea, they supposed it had been a spirit, and cried out: 
For they all saw him, and were troubled. And immediately he talked with them, and saith unto them, Be of good cheer: it is I; be not afraid. 
And he went up unto them into the ship; and the wind ceased: and they were sore amazed in themselves beyond measure, and wondered. 
For they considered not the miracle of the loaves: for their heart was hardened. 
And when they had passed over, they came into the land of Gennesaret, and drew to the shore. 
And when they were come out of the ship, straightway they knew him, 
And ran through that whole region round about, a
902,e brother of James, and Judas Iscariot, which also was the traitor. 
And he came down with them, and stood in the plain, and the company of his disciples, and a great multitude of people out of all Judaea and Jerusalem, and from the sea coast of Tyre and Sidon, which came to hear him, and to be healed of their diseases; 
And they that were vexed with unclean spirits: and they were healed. 
And the whole multitude sought to touch him: for there went virtue out of him, and healed them all. 
And he lifted up his eyes on his disciples, and said, Blessed be ye poor: for yours is the kingdom of God. 
Blessed are ye that hunger now: for ye shall be filled. Blessed are ye that weep now: for ye shall laugh. 
Blessed are ye, when men shall hate you, and when they shall separate you from their company, and shall reproach you, and cast out your name as evil, for the Son of man's sake. 
Rejoice ye in t
974,ation of the mighty; he judgeth among the gods. 
How long will ye judge unjustly, and accept the persons of the wicked? Selah. 
Defend the poor and fatherless: do justice to the afflicted and needy. 
Deliver the poor and needy: rid them out of the hand of the wicked. 
They know not, neither will they understand; they walk on in darkness: all the foundations of the earth are out of course. 
I have said, Ye are gods; and all of you are children of the most High. 
But ye shall die like men, and fall like one of the princes. 
Arise, O God, judge the earth: for thou shalt inherit all nations. 
Keep not thou silence, O God: hold not thy peace, and be not still, O God. 
For, lo, thine enemies make a tumult: and they that hate thee have lifted up the head. 
They have taken crafty counsel against thy people, and consulted against thy hidden ones. 
They have said, Come, and let us cut them off from being a nation; that the name of Israel may be no more in remembrance. 

968,ul in their mouth. 
Therefore also will I make thee sick in smiting thee, in making thee desolate because of thy sins. 
Thou shalt eat, but not be satisfied; and thy casting down shall be in the midst of thee; and thou shalt take hold, but shalt not deliver; and that which thou deliverest will I give up to the sword. 
Thou shalt sow, but thou shalt not reap; thou shalt tread the olives, but thou shalt not anoint thee with oil; and sweet wine, but shalt not drink wine. 
For the statutes of Omri are kept, and all the works of the house of Ahab, and ye walk in their counsels; that I should make thee a desolation, and the inhabitants thereof an hissing: therefore ye shall bear the reproach of my people. 
Woe is me! for I am as when they have gathered the summer fruits, as the grapegleanings of the vintage: there is no cluster to eat: my soul desired the firstripe fruit. 
The good man is perished out of the earth: and there is none upright among men: they all
1049,a meat offering, mingled with oil, and one log of oil. 
And the priest that maketh him clean shall present the man that is to be made clean, and those things, before the LORD, at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation: 
And the priest shall take one he lamb, and offer him for a trespass offering, and the log of oil, and wave them for a wave offering before the LORD: 
And he shall slay the lamb in the place where he shall kill the sin offering and the burnt offering, in the holy place: for as the sin offering is the priest's, so is the trespass offering: it is most holy: 
And the priest shall take some of the blood of the trespass offering, and the priest shall put it upon the tip of the right ear of him that is to be cleansed, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot: 
And the priest shall take some of the log of oil, and pour it into the palm of his own left hand: 
And the priest shall dip his right finger in the oil that is in his left hand, and shall sprinkle of the oil with his finger
727, apparel, and there come in also a poor man in vile raiment; 
And ye have respect to him that weareth the gay clothing, and say unto him, Sit thou here in a good place; and say to the poor, Stand thou there, or sit here under my footstool: 
Are ye not then partial in yourselves, and are become judges of evil thoughts? 
Hearken, my beloved brethren, Hath not God chosen the poor of this world rich in faith, and heirs of the kingdom which he hath promised to them that love him? 
But ye have despised the poor. Do not rich men oppress you, and draw you before the judgment seats? 
Do not they blaspheme that worthy name by the which ye are called? 
If ye fulfil the royal law according to the scripture, Thou shalt love thy ne
840,e to her like a river, and the glory of the Gentiles like a flowing stream: then shall ye suck, ye shall be borne upon her sides, and be dandled upon her knees. 
As one whom his mother comforteth, so will I comfort you; and ye shall be comforted in Jerusalem. 
And when ye see this, your heart shall rejoice, and your bones shall flourish like an herb: and the hand of the LORD shall be known toward his servants, and his indignation toward his enemies. 
For, behold, the LORD will come with fire, and with his chariots like a whirlwind, to render his anger with fury, and his rebuke with flames of fire. 
For by fire and by his sword will the LORD plead with all flesh: and the slain of the LORD shall be many. 
They that sanctify themselves, and purify themselves in the gardens behind one tree in the midst, eating swine's flesh, and the
881, which he had being yet uncircumcised. 
For the promise, that he should be the heir of the world, was not to Abraham, or to his seed, through the law, but through the righteousness of faith. 
For if they which are of the law be heirs, faith is made void, and the promise made of none effect: 
Because the law worketh wrath: for where no law is, there is no transgression. 
Therefore it is of faith, that it might be by grace; to the end the promise might be sure to all the seed; not to that only which is of the law, but to that also which is of the faith of Abraham; who is the father of us all, 
(As it is written, I have made thee a father of many nations,) before him whom he believed, even God, who quickeneth the dead, and calleth those things which be not as though they were. 
Who against hope believed in hope, that he might become the father of many nations, according t
747,ure oil olive beaten for the light, to cause the lamps to burn continually. 
Without the vail of the testimony, in the tabernacle of the congregation, shall Aaron order it from the evening unto the morning before the LORD continually: it shall be a statute for ever in your generations. 
He shall order the lamps upon the pure candlestick before the LORD continually. 
And thou shalt take fine flour, and bake twelve cakes thereof: two tenth deals shall be in one cake. 
And thou shalt set them in two rows, six on a row, upon the pure table before the LORD. 
And thou shalt put pure frankincense upon each row, that it may be on the bread for a memorial, even an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
Every sabbath he shall set it in order before
986,arth to forgive sins, (he said unto the sick of the palsy,) I say unto thee, Arise, and take up thy couch, and go into thine house. 
And immediately he rose up before them, and took up that whereon he lay, and departed to his own house, glorifying God. 
And they were all amazed, and they glorified God, and were filled with fear, saying, We have seen strange things to day. 
And after these things he went forth, and saw a publican, named Levi, sitting at the receipt of custom: and he said unto him, Follow me. 
And he left all, rose up, and followed him. 
And Levi made him a great feast in his own house: and there was a great company of publicans and of others that sat down with them. 
But their scribes and Pharisees murmured against his disciples, saying, Why do ye eat and drink with publicans and sinners? 
And Jesus answering said unto them, They that are whole need not a physician; but they that are sick. 
I came not to call the righteous, but sinners to repentance. 
And 
893, to them, that they may help me. But they were the ruin of him, and of all Israel. 
And Ahaz gathered together the vessels of the house of God, and cut in pieces the vessels of the house of God, and shut up the doors of the house of the LORD, and he made him altars in every corner of Jerusalem. 
And in every several city of Judah he made high places to burn incense unto other gods, and provoked to anger the LORD God of his fathers. 
Now the rest of his acts and of all his ways, first and last, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Judah and Israel. 
And Ahaz slept with his fathers, and they buried him in the city, even in Jerusalem: but they brought him not into the sepulchres of the kings of Israel: and Hezekiah his son reigned in his stead. 
Hezekiah began to reign when he was five and twenty years old, and he reigned nine and twenty years in Jerusalem. And his mo
793,end them, and shall pray unto the LORD toward the city which thou hast chosen, and toward the house that I have built for thy name: 
Then hear thou in heaven their prayer and their supplication, and maintain their cause. 
If they sin against thee, (for there is no man that sinneth not,) and thou be angry with them, and deliver them to the enemy, so that they carry them away captives unto the land of the enemy, far or near; 
Yet if they shall bethink themselves in the land whither they were carried captives, and repent, and make supplication unto thee in the land of them that carried them captives, saying, We have sinned, and have done perversely, we have committed wickedness; 
And so return unto thee with all their heart, and with all their soul, in the land of their enemies, which 
935,; and commanded that they which could swim should cast themselves first into the sea, and get to land: 
And the rest, some on boards, and some on broken pieces of the ship. And so it came to pass, that they escaped all safe to land. 
And when they were escaped, then they knew that the island was called Melita. 
And the barbarous people shewed us no little kindness: for they kindled a fire, and received us every one, because of the present rain, and because of the cold. 
And when Paul had gathered a bundle of sticks, and laid them on the fire, there came a viper out of the heat, and fastened on his hand. 
And when the barbarians saw the venomous beast hang on his hand, they said among themselves, No doubt this man is a murderer, whom, though he hath escaped the sea, yet vengeance suffereth not to live. 
And he shook off the beast into the fire, and felt no harm. 
Howbeit they looked when he should have swollen, or fallen d
998,r than the skin; it is a leprosy broken out of the burning: wherefore the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is the plague of leprosy. 
But if the priest look on it, and, behold, there be no white hair in the bright spot, and it be no lower than the other skin, but be somewhat dark; then the priest shall shut him up seven days: 
And the priest shall look upon him the seventh day: and if it be spread much abroad in the skin, then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is the plague of leprosy. 
And if the bright spot stay in his place, and spread not in the skin, but it be somewhat dark; it is a rising of the burning, and the priest shall pronounce him clean: for it is an inflammation of the burning. 
If a man or woman have a plague upon the head or the beard; 
Then the priest shall see the plague: and, behold, if it be in sight deeper than the skin; and there be in it a yellow thin hair; then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is a dry scall, even a leprosy upon the h
826,d unto Ahimelech the priest, The king hath commanded me a business, and hath said unto me, Let no man know any thing of the business whereabout I send thee, and what I have commanded thee: and I have appointed my servants to such and such a place. 
Now therefore what is under thine hand? give me five loaves of bread in mine hand, or what there is present. 
And the priest answered David, and said, There is no common bread under mine hand, but there is hallowed bread; if the young men have kept themselves at least from women. 
And David answered the priest, and said unto him, Of a truth women have been kept from us about these three days, since I came out, and the vessels of the young men are holy, and the bread is in a manner common, yea, though it were sanctified this day in the vessel. 
So the priest gave him hall
784, forgiven thee; or to say, Rise up and walk? 
But that ye may know that the Son of man hath power upon earth to forgive sins, (he said unto the sick of the palsy,) I say unto thee, Arise, and take up thy couch, and go into thine house. 
And immediately he rose up before them, and took up that whereon he lay, and departed to his own house, glorifying God. 
And they were all amazed, and they glorified God, and were filled with fear, saying, We have seen strange things to day. 
And after these things he went forth, and saw a publican, named Levi, sitting at the receipt of custom: and he said unto him, Follow me. 
And he left all, rose up, and followed him. 
And Levi made him a great feast in his own house: and there was a great company of publicans and of others that sat down 
1035,right ear. 
And Jesus answered and said, Suffer ye thus far. And he touched his ear, and healed him. 
Then Jesus said unto the chief priests, and captains of the temple, and the elders, which were come to him, Be ye come out, as against a thief, with swords and staves? 
When I was daily with you in the temple, ye stretched forth no hands against me: but this is your hour, and the power of darkness. 
Then took they him, and led him, and brought him into the high priest's house. And Peter followed afar off. 
And when they had kindled a fire in the midst of the hall, and were set down together, Peter sat down among them. 
But a certain maid beheld him as he sat by the fire, and earnestly looked upon him, and said, This man was also with him. 
And he denied him, saying, Woman, I know him not. 
And after a little while another saw him, and said, Thou art also of them. And Peter said, Man, I am not. 
And about the space of one hour after another confidently affirmed, saying, Of a truth this fellow also was with him: for he is
798,he Holy Ghost since ye believed? And they said unto him, We have not so much as heard whether there be any Holy Ghost. 
And he said unto them, Unto what then were ye baptized? And they said, Unto John's baptism. 
Then said Paul, John verily baptized with the baptism of repentance, saying unto the people, that they should believe on him which should come after him, that is, on Christ Jesus. 
When they heard this, they were baptized in the name of the Lord Jesus. 
And when Paul had laid his hands upon them, the Holy Ghost came on them; and they spake with tongues, and prophesied. 
And all the men were about twelve. 
And he went into the synagogue, and spake boldly for the space of three months, disputing and persuading the things concerning the kingdom of God. 
But when divers were hardene
977,and of Egypt for Pharaoh; for the Egyptians sold every man his field, because the famine prevailed over them: so the land became Pharaoh's. 
And as for the people, he removed them to cities from one end of the borders of Egypt even to the other end thereof. 
Only the land of the priests bought he not; for the priests had a portion assigned them of Pharaoh, and did eat their portion which Pharaoh gave them: wherefore they sold not their lands. 
Then Joseph said unto the people, Behold, I have bought you this day and your land for Pharaoh: lo, here is seed for you, and ye shall sow the land. 
And it shall come to pass in the increase, that ye shall give the fifth part unto Pharaoh, and four parts shall be your own, for seed of the field, and for your food, and for them of your households, and for food for your little ones. 
And they said, Thou hast saved our lives: let us find grace in the sight of my lord, and we will be Pharaoh's servants. 
And Joseph made it a l
922,of the Philistines; and now he is fled out of the land for Absalom. 
And Absalom, whom we anointed over us, is dead in battle. Now therefore why speak ye not a word of bringing the king back? 
And king David sent to Zadok and to Abiathar the priests, saying, Speak unto the elders of Judah, saying, Why are ye the last to bring the king back to his house? seeing the speech of all Israel is come to the king, even to his house. 
Ye are my brethren, ye are my bones and my flesh: wherefore then are ye the last to bring back the king? 
And say ye to Amasa, Art thou not of my bone, and of my flesh? God do so to me, and more also, if thou be not captain of the host before me continually in the room of Joab. 
And he bowed the heart of all the men of Judah, even as the heart of one man; so that they sent this word unto the king, Return thou, and all thy servants. 
So the king returned, and came to Jordan. And Judah came
890,t the first he lightly afflicted the land of Zebulun and the land of Naphtali, and afterward did more grievously afflict her by the way of the sea, beyond Jordan, in Galilee of the nations. 
The people that walked in darkness have seen a great light: they that dwell in the land of the shadow of death, upon them hath the light shined. 
Thou hast multiplied the nation, and not increased the joy: they joy before thee according to the joy in harvest, and as men rejoice when they divide the spoil. 
For thou hast broken the yoke of his burden, and the staff of his shoulder, the rod of his oppressor, as in the day of Midian. 
For every battle of the warrior is with confused noise, and garments rolled in blood; but this shall be with burning and fuel of fire. 
For unto us a child is born, unto us a son is given: and the government shall be upon his shoulder: and his name shall be calle
1049, thine house, O LORD, for ever. 
O Lord God, to whom vengeance belongeth; O God, to whom vengeance belongeth, shew thyself. 
Lift up thyself, thou judge of the earth: render a reward to the proud. 
LORD, how long shall the wicked, how long shall the wicked triumph? 
How long shall they utter and speak hard things? and all the workers of iniquity boast themselves? 
They break in pieces thy people, O LORD, and afflict thine heritage. 
They slay the widow and the stranger, and murder the fatherless. 
Yet they say, The LORD shall not see, neither shall the God of Jacob regard it. 
Understand, ye brutish among the people: and ye fools, when will ye be wise? 
He that planted the ear, shall he not hear? he that formed the eye, shall he not see? 
He that chastiseth the heathen, shall not he correct? he that teacheth man knowledge, shall not he know? 
The LORD knoweth the thoughts of man, that they are vanity. 
Blessed is the man whom thou chastenest, O LORD, and teachest him out of thy law; 
That thou mayest give him rest from the days of ad
999,land of the living. 
There is Elam and all her multitude round about her grave, all of them slain, fallen by the sword, which are gone down uncircumcised into the nether parts of the earth, which caused their terror in the land of the living; yet have they borne their shame with them that go down to the pit. 
They have set her a bed in the midst of the slain with all her multitude: her graves are round about him: all of them uncircumcised, slain by the sword: though their terror was caused in the land of the living, yet have they borne their shame with them that go down to the pit: he is put in the midst of them that be slain. 
There is Meshech, Tubal, and all her multitude: her graves are round about him: all of them uncircumcised, slain by the sword, though they caused their terror in the land of the living. 
And they shall not lie with the mighty that are fallen of the uncircumcised, which are gone down to hell with their weapons of war: and they have laid their swords under their 
1067,n, which was the father of Ziph; and the sons of Mareshah the father of Hebron. 
And the sons of Hebron; Korah, and Tappuah, and Rekem, and Shema. 
And Shema begat Raham, the father of Jorkoam: and Rekem begat Shammai. 
And the son of Shammai was Maon: and Maon was the father of Bethzur. 
And Ephah, Caleb's concubine, bare Haran, and Moza, and Gazez: and Haran begat Gazez. 
And the sons of Jahdai; Regem, and Jotham, and Gesham, and Pelet, and Ephah, and Shaaph. 
Maachah, Caleb's concubine, bare Sheber, and Tirhanah. 
She bare also Shaaph the father of Madmannah, Sheva the father of Machbenah, and the father of Gibea: and the daughter of Caleb was Achsa. 
These were the sons of Caleb the son of Hur, the firstborn of Ephratah; Shobal the father of Kirjathjearim. 
Salma the father of Bethlehem, Hareph the father of Bethgader. 
And Shobal the father of Kirjathjearim had sons; Haroeh, and half of the Manahethites. 
And the families of Kirjathjearim; the Ithrites, and the Puhites, and the Shumathites, and the Mishraites; of them came the Zareathites, and th
929,s of the children of Israel: speak unto them, saying, At even ye shall eat flesh, and in the morning ye shall be filled with bread; and ye shall know that I am the LORD your God. 
And it came to pass, that at even the quails came up, and covered the camp: and in the morning the dew lay round about the host. 
And when the dew that lay was gone up, behold, upon the face of the wilderness there lay a small round thing, as small as the hoar frost on the ground. 
And when the children of Israel saw it, they said one to another, It is manna: for they wist not what it was. And Moses said unto them, This is the bread which the LORD hath given you to eat. 
This is the thing which the LORD hath commanded, Gather of it every man according to his eating, an omer for every man, according to the number of your persons; take ye every man for them which are in his tents. 
And the children of Israel did so, and gathered, some more, 
1070,Thou hast ravished my heart, my sister, my spouse; thou hast ravished my heart with one of thine eyes, with one chain of thy neck. 
How fair is thy love, my sister, my spouse! how much better is thy love than wine! and the smell of thine ointments than all spices! 
Thy lips, O my spouse, drop as the honeycomb: honey and milk are under thy tongue; and the smell of thy garments is like the smell of Lebanon. 
A garden inclosed is my sister, my spouse; a spring shut up, a fountain sealed. 
Thy plants are an orchard of pomegranates, with pleasant fruits; camphire, with spikenard, 
Spikenard and saffron; calamus and cinnamon, with all trees of frankincense; myrrh and aloes, with all the chief spices: 
A fountain of gardens, a well of living waters, and streams from Lebanon. 
Awake, O north wind; and come, thou south; blow upon my garden, that the spices thereof may flow out. Let my beloved come into his garden, and eat his pleasant fruits. 
I am come into my garden, my sister, my spouse: I have gathered my myrrh with my spice; I have eaten my honeycomb with my
745,ay abide with you for ever; 
Even the Spirit of truth; whom the world cannot receive, because it seeth him not, neither knoweth him: but ye know him; for he dwelleth with you, and shall be in you. 
I will not leave you comfortless: I will come to you. 
Yet a little while, and the world seeth me no more; but ye see me: because I live, ye shall live also. 
At that day ye shall know that I am in my Father, and ye in me, and I in you. 
He that hath my commandments, and keepeth them, he it is that loveth me: and he that loveth me shall be loved of my Father, and I will love him, and will manifest myself to him. 
Judas saith unto him, not Iscariot, Lord, how is it that thou wilt manifest thyself unto us, and not unto the world? 
Jesus answer
894,at I may discern between good and bad: for who is able to judge this thy so great a people? 
And the speech pleased the LORD, that Solomon had asked this thing. 
And God said unto him, Because thou hast asked this thing, and hast not asked for thyself long life; neither hast asked riches for thyself, nor hast asked the life of thine enemies; but hast asked for thyself understanding to discern judgment; 
Behold, I have done according to thy words: lo, I have given thee a wise and an understanding heart; so that there was none like thee before thee, neither after thee shall any arise like unto thee. 
And I have also given thee that which thou hast not asked, both riches, and honour: so that there shall not be any among the kings like unto thee all thy days. 
And if thou wilt walk in my ways, to keep my statutes and my commandments, as thy father David did walk, then I will lengthen t
1072,gments are as the light that goeth forth. 
For I desired mercy, and not sacrifice; and the knowledge of God more than burnt offerings. 
But they like men have transgressed the covenant: there have they dealt treacherously against me. 
Gilead is a city of them that work iniquity, and is polluted with blood. 
And as troops of robbers wait for a man, so the company of priests murder in the way by consent: for they commit lewdness. 
I have seen an horrible thing in the house of Israel: there is the whoredom of Ephraim, Israel is defiled. 
Also, O Judah, he hath set an harvest for thee, when I returned the captivity of my people. 
When I would have healed Israel, then the iniquity of Ephraim was discovered, and the wickedness of Samaria: for they commit falsehood; and the thief cometh in, and the troop of robbers spoileth without. 
And they consider not in their hearts that I remember all their wickedness: now their own doings have beset them about; they are before my face. 
They make the king glad with their wickedness, and the princes with their lies. 
They a
963,, and would not hear. 
Yet many years didst thou forbear them, and testifiedst against them by thy spirit in thy prophets: yet would they not give ear: therefore gavest thou them into the hand of the people of the lands. 
Nevertheless for thy great mercies' sake thou didst not utterly consume them, nor forsake them; for thou art a gracious and merciful God. 
Now therefore, our God, the great, the mighty, and the terrible God, who keepest covenant and mercy, let not all the trouble seem little before thee, that hath come upon us, on our kings, on our princes, and on our priests, and on our prophets, and on our fathers, and on all thy people, since the time of the kings of Assyria unto this day. 
Howbeit thou art just in all that is brought upon us; for thou hast done right, but we have done wickedly: 
Neither have our kings, our princes, our priests, nor our fathers, kept thy law, nor hearkened unto thy commandments and thy testimonies, wherewith tho
995,f the Spirit, ye are not under the law. 
Now the works of the flesh are manifest, which are these; Adultery, fornication, uncleanness, lasciviousness, 
Idolatry, witchcraft, hatred, variance, emulations, wrath, strife, seditions, heresies, 
Envyings, murders, drunkenness, revellings, and such like: of the which I tell you before, as I have also told you in time past, that they which do such things shall not inherit the kingdom of God. 
But the fruit of the Spirit is love, joy, peace, longsuffering, gentleness, goodness, faith, 
Meekness, temperance: against such there is no law. 
And they that are Christ's have crucified the flesh with the affections and lusts. 
If we live in the Spirit, let us also walk in the Spirit. 
Let us not be desirous of vain glory, provoking one another, envying one another. 
Brethren, if a man be overtaken in a fault, ye which are spiritual, restore such an one in the spirit of meekness; considering thyself, lest thou also be tempted. 
Bear ye one anothe
753,ch is broken in pieces; her idols are confounded, her images are broken in pieces. 
For out of the north there cometh up a nation against her, which shall make her land desolate, and none shall dwell therein: they shall remove, they shall depart, both man and beast. 
In those days, and in that time, saith the LORD, the children of Israel shall come, they and the children of Judah together, going and weeping: they shall go, and seek the LORD their God. 
They shall ask the way to Zion with their faces thitherward, saying, Come, and let us join ourselves to the LORD in a perpetual covenant that shall not be forgotten. 
My people hath been lost sheep: their shepherds have caused them to go astray, they have turned them away on the mountains: they 
852,. 
The LORD shall smite thee in the knees, and in the legs, with a sore botch that cannot be healed, from the sole of thy foot unto the top of thy head. 
The LORD shall bring thee, and thy king which thou shalt set over thee, unto a nation which neither thou nor thy fathers have known; and there shalt thou serve other gods, wood and stone. 
And thou shalt become an astonishment, a proverb, and a byword, among all nations whither the LORD shall lead thee. 
Thou shalt carry much seed out into the field, and shalt gather but little in; for the locust shall consume it. 
Thou shalt plant vineyards, and dress them, but shalt neither drink of the wine, nor gather the grapes; for the worms shall eat them. 
Thou shalt have olive trees throughout all thy coasts, but thou shalt not anoint thyself with the oil; for thine olive shall cast his fruit. 
Th
796,y blood that thou hast shed; and hast defiled thyself in thine idols which thou hast made; and thou hast caused thy days to draw near, and art come even unto thy years: therefore have I made thee a reproach unto the heathen, and a mocking to all countries. 
Those that be near, and those that be far from thee, shall mock thee, which art infamous and much vexed. 
Behold, the princes of Israel, every one were in thee to their power to shed blood. 
In thee have they set light by father and mother: in the midst of thee have they dealt by oppression with the stranger: in thee have they vexed the fatherless and the widow. 
Thou hast despised mine holy things, and hast profaned my sabbaths. 
In thee are men that carry tales to shed blood: and in thee they eat upon the mountains: in the midst o
978,ng forth fruit in old age; they shall be fat and flourishing; 
To shew that the LORD is upright: he is my rock, and there is no unrighteousness in him. 
The LORD reigneth, he is clothed with majesty; the LORD is clothed with strength, wherewith he hath girded himself: the world also is stablished, that it cannot be moved. 
Thy throne is established of old: thou art from everlasting. 
The floods have lifted up, O LORD, the floods have lifted up their voice; the floods lift up their waves. 
The LORD on high is mightier than the noise of many waters, yea, than the mighty waves of the sea. 
Thy testimonies are very sure: holiness becometh thine house, O LORD, for ever. 
O Lord God, to whom vengeance belongeth; O God, to whom vengeance belongeth, shew thyself. 
Lift up thyself, thou judge of the earth: render a reward to the proud. 
LORD, how long shall the wicked, how long shall the wicked triumph? 
How long shall they utter and speak hard things? and all the workers 
913,ds together. and let the sword be doubled the third time, the sword of the slain: it is the sword of the great men that are slain, which entereth into their privy chambers. 
I have set the point of the sword against all their gates, that their heart may faint, and their ruins be multiplied: ah! it is made bright, it is wrapped up for the slaughter. 
Go thee one way or other, either on the right hand, or on the left, whithersoever thy face is set. 
I will also smite mine hands together, and I will cause my fury to rest: I the LORD have said it. 
The word of the LORD came unto me again, saying, 
Also, thou son of man, appoint thee two ways, that the sword of the king of Babylon may come: both twain shall come forth out of one land: and choose thou a place, choose it at the head of the way to the city. 
Appoint a way, that the sword may come to Rabbath of the Ammonites, and to Judah in Jerusalem the def
727,oise of the kingdoms of nations gathered together: the LORD of hosts mustereth the host of the battle. 
They come from a far country, from the end of heaven, even the LORD, and the weapons of his indignation, to destroy the whole land. 
Howl ye; for the day of the LORD is at hand; it shall come as a destruction from the Almighty. 
Therefore shall all hands be faint, and every man's heart shall melt: 
And they shall be afraid: pangs and sorrows shall take hold of them; they shall be in pain as a woman that travaileth: they shall be amazed one at another; their faces shall be as flames. 
Behold, the day of the LORD cometh, cruel both with wrath and fierce anger, to lay the land desolate: and he shall destroy the sinners
958,, that is, Be opened. 
And straightway his ears were opened, and the string of his tongue was loosed, and he spake plain. 
And he charged them that they should tell no man: but the more he charged them, so much the more a great deal they published it; 
And were beyond measure astonished, saying, He hath done all things well: he maketh both the deaf to hear, and the dumb to speak. 
In those days the multitude being very great, and having nothing to eat, Jesus called his disciples unto him, and saith unto them, 
I have compassion on the multitude, because they have now been with me three days, and have nothing to eat: 
And if I send them away fasting to their own houses, they will faint by the way: for divers of them came from far. 
And his disciples answered him, From whence can a man satisfy these men with bread here in the wilderness? 
And he asked them, How many loaves have ye? And they said, Seven. 
And he commanded the people to sit down on
890,ere is hope; yea, thou shalt dig about thee, and thou shalt take thy rest in safety. 
Also thou shalt lie down, and none shall make thee afraid; yea, many shall make suit unto thee. 
But the eyes of the wicked shall fail, and they shall not escape, and their hope shall be as the giving up of the ghost. 
And Job answered and said, 
No doubt but ye are the people, and wisdom shall die with you. 
But I have understanding as well as you; I am not inferior to you: yea, who knoweth not such things as these? 
I am as one mocked of his neighbour, who calleth upon God, and he answereth him: the just upright man is laughed to scorn. 
He that is ready to slip with his feet is as a lamp despised in the thought of him that is at ease. 
The tabernacles of robbers prosper, and they that provoke God are secure; into whose hand God bringeth abundantly. 
But ask now the beasts, and they shall te
832,n the chamber of Elishama the scribe, and told all the words in the ears of the king. 
So the king sent Jehudi to fetch the roll: and he took it out of Elishama the scribe's chamber. And Jehudi read it in the ears of the king, and in the ears of all the princes which stood beside the king. 
Now the king sat in the winterhouse in the ninth month: and there was a fire on the hearth burning before him. 
And it came to pass, that when Jehudi had read three or four leaves, he cut it with the penknife, and cast it into the fire that was on the hearth, until all the roll was consumed in the fire that was on the hearth. 
Yet they were not afraid, nor rent their garments, neither the king, nor any of his servants that heard all these words. 
Nevertheless Elnathan and Delaiah and Gemariah had made intercession to the king that he 
1076,ation that obeyeth not the voice of the LORD their God, nor receiveth correction: truth is perished, and is cut off from their mouth. 
Cut off thine hair, O Jerusalem, and cast it away, and take up a lamentation on high places; for the LORD hath rejected and forsaken the generation of his wrath. 
For the children of Judah have done evil in my sight, saith the LORD: they have set their abominations in the house which is called by my name, to pollute it. 
And they have built the high places of Tophet, which is in the valley of the son of Hinnom, to burn their sons and their daughters in the fire; which I commanded them not, neither came it into my heart. 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that it shall no more be called Tophet, nor the valley of the son of Hinnom, but the valley of slaughter: for they shall bury in Tophet, till there be no place. 
And the carcases of this people shall be meat for the fowls of the heaven, and for the beasts of the earth; and none shall fray them away. 
Then will I cause to cease from the cities of Judah, and from 
761, the house of the forest. 
Ye have seen also the breaches of the city of David, that they are many: and ye gathered together the waters of the lower pool. 
And ye have numbered the houses of Jerusalem, and the houses have ye broken down to fortify the wall. 
Ye made also a ditch between the two walls for the water of the old pool: but ye have not looked unto the maker thereof, neither had respect unto him that fashioned it long ago. 
And in that day did the Lord GOD of hosts call to weeping, and to mourning, and to baldness, and to girding with sackcloth: 
And behold joy and gladness, slaying oxen, and killing sheep, eating flesh, and drinking wine: let us eat and drink; for to morrow we shall die. 
And it was revealed in mine ears by the LORD of host
764,him. 
And Tamar his daughter in law bore him Pharez and Zerah. All the sons of Judah were five. 
The sons of Pharez; Hezron, and Hamul. 
And the sons of Zerah; Zimri, and Ethan, and Heman, and Calcol, and Dara: five of them in all. 
And the sons of Carmi; Achar, the troubler of Israel, who transgressed in the thing accursed. 
And the sons of Ethan; Azariah. 
The sons also of Hezron, that were born unto him; Jerahmeel, and Ram, and Chelubai. 
And Ram begat Amminadab; and Amminadab begat Nahshon, prince of the children of Judah; 
And Nahshon begat Salma, and Salma begat Boaz, 
And Boaz begat Obed, and Obed begat Jesse, 
And Jesse begat his firstborn Eliab, and Abinadab the second, and Shimma the third, 
Nethaneel the fourth, Raddai the fifth, 
Ozem the six
920,d. 
Jesus answered them, Have not I chosen you twelve, and one of you is a devil? 
He spake of Judas Iscariot the son of Simon: for he it was that should betray him, being one of the twelve. 
After these things Jesus walked in Galilee: for he would not walk in Jewry, because the Jews sought to kill him. 
Now the Jew's feast of tabernacles was at hand. 
His brethren therefore said unto him, Depart hence, and go into Judaea, that thy disciples also may see the works that thou doest. 
For there is no man that doeth any thing in secret, and he himself seeketh to be known openly. If thou do these things, shew thyself to the world. 
For neither did his brethren believe in him. 
Then Jesus said unto them, My time is not yet come: but your time is alway ready. 
The world cannot hate you; but me it hateth, because I testify of it, that the works thereof are evil. 
Go ye up unto this feast: I go not up yet unto this 
967,and let us go up at noon. Woe unto us! for the day goeth away, for the shadows of the evening are stretched out. 
Arise, and let us go by night, and let us destroy her palaces. 
For thus hath the LORD of hosts said, Hew ye down trees, and cast a mount against Jerusalem: this is the city to be visited; she is wholly oppression in the midst of her. 
As a fountain casteth out her waters, so she casteth out her wickedness: violence and spoil is heard in her; before me continually is grief and wounds. 
Be thou instructed, O Jerusalem, lest my soul depart from thee; lest I make thee desolate, a land not inhabited. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, They shall throughly glean the remnant of Israel as a vine: turn back thine hand as a grapegatherer into the baskets. 
To whom shall I speak, and give warning, that they may hear? behold, their ear is uncircumcised, and they cannot hearken: behold, the word of the LORD is unto them a reproach; they have no delight in i
733,when all the Jews that were in Moab, and among the Ammonites, and in Edom, and that were in all the countries, heard that the king of Babylon had left a remnant of Judah, and that he had set over them Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan; 
Even all the Jews returned out of all places whither they were driven, and came to the land of Judah, to Gedaliah, unto Mizpah, and gathered wine and summer fruits very much. 
Moreover Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces that were in the fields, came to Gedaliah to Mizpah, 
And said unto him, Dost thou certainly know that Baalis the king of the Ammonites hath sent Ishmael the son of Nethaniah to slay thee? But Gedaliah the son of Ahikam believed them not
1049, in the audience of all the people he said unto his disciples, 
Beware of the scribes, which desire to walk in long robes, and love greetings in the markets, and the highest seats in the synagogues, and the chief rooms at feasts; 
Which devour widows' houses, and for a shew make long prayers: the same shall receive greater damnation. 
And he looked up, and saw the rich men casting their gifts into the treasury. 
And he saw also a certain poor widow casting in thither two mites. 
And he said, Of a truth I say unto you, that this poor widow hath cast in more than they all: 
For all these have of their abundance cast in unto the offerings of God: but she of her penury hath cast in all the living that she had. 
And as some spake of the temple, how it was adorned with goodly stones and gifts, he said, 
As for these things which ye behold, the days will come, in the which there shall not be left one stone upon another, that shall not be thrown down. 
And they asked him, saying, Master, but when shall these things be? and what sign will the
1050,ouls. 
And when they had eaten enough, they lightened the ship, and cast out the wheat into the sea. 
And when it was day, they knew not the land: but they discovered a certain creek with a shore, into the which they were minded, if it were possible, to thrust in the ship. 
And when they had taken up the anchors, they committed themselves unto the sea, and loosed the rudder bands, and hoised up the mainsail to the wind, and made toward shore. 
And falling into a place where two seas met, they ran the ship aground; and the forepart stuck fast, and remained unmoveable, but the hinder part was broken with the violence of the waves. 
And the soldiers' counsel was to kill the prisoners, lest any of them should swim out, and escape. 
But the centurion, willing to save Paul, kept them from their purpose; and commanded that they which could swim should cast themselves first into the sea, and get to land: 
And the rest, some on boards, and some on broken pieces of the ship. And so it came to pass, that they escaped all safe to land. 
And when 
1058,f death. 
For dogs have compassed me: the assembly of the wicked have inclosed me: they pierced my hands and my feet. 
I may tell all my bones: they look and stare upon me. 
They part my garments among them, and cast lots upon my vesture. 
But be not thou far from me, O LORD: O my strength, haste thee to help me. 
Deliver my soul from the sword; my darling from the power of the dog. 
Save me from the lion's mouth: for thou hast heard me from the horns of the unicorns. 
I will declare thy name unto my brethren: in the midst of the congregation will I praise thee. 
Ye that fear the LORD, praise him; all ye the seed of Jacob, glorify him; and fear him, all ye the seed of Israel. 
For he hath not despised nor abhorred the affliction of the afflicted; neither hath he hid his face from him; but when he cried unto him, he heard. 
My praise shall be of thee in the great congregation: I will pay my vows before them that fear him. 
The meek shall eat and be satisfied: they shall praise the LORD that seek him: your heart shall live for ever. 
All the en
848,elieveth on me shall never thirst. 
But I said unto you, That ye also have seen me, and believe not. 
All that the Father giveth me shall come to me; and him that cometh to me I will in no wise cast out. 
For I came down from heaven, not to do mine own will, but the will of him that sent me. 
And this is the Father's will which hath sent me, that of all which he hath given me I should lose nothing, but should raise it up again at the last day. 
And this is the will of him that sent me, that every one which seeth the Son, and believeth on him, may have everlasting life: and I will raise him up at the last day. 
The Jews then murmured at him, because he said, I am the bread which came down from heaven. 
And they said, Is not this Jesus, the son of Joseph, whose father and mother we know? how is it then that he saith, I came down from heav
924,els in white sitting, the one at the head, and the other at the feet, where the body of Jesus had lain. 
And they say unto her, Woman, why weepest thou? She saith unto them, Because they have taken away my LORD, and I know not where they have laid him. 
And when she had thus said, she turned herself back, and saw Jesus standing, and knew not that it was Jesus. 
Jesus saith unto her, Woman, why weepest thou? whom seekest thou? She, supposing him to be the gardener, saith unto him, Sir, if thou have borne him hence, tell me where thou hast laid him, and I will take him away. 
Jesus saith unto her, Mary. She turned herself, and saith unto him, Rabboni; which is to say, Master. 
Jesus saith unto her, Touch me not; for I am not yet ascended to my Father: but go to my brethren, and say unto them, I ascend unto my Father, and your Father; and to my God, and your God. 
Mary Magdalene came and told the disciples that sh
963,thou knowest it not: 
And he hath slain oxen and fat cattle and sheep in abundance, and hath called all the sons of the king, and Abiathar the priest, and Joab the captain of the host: but Solomon thy servant hath he not called. 
And thou, my lord, O king, the eyes of all Israel are upon thee, that thou shouldest tell them who shall sit on the throne of my lord the king after him. 
Otherwise it shall come to pass, when my lord the king shall sleep with his fathers, that I and my son Solomon shall be counted offenders. 
And, lo, while she yet talked with the king, Nathan the prophet also came in. 
And they told the king, saying, Behold Nathan the prophet. And when he was come in before the king, he bowed himself before the king with his face to the ground. 
And Nathan said, My lord, O king, hast thou said, Adonijah shall reign after me, and he shall sit upon my throne? 
For he is gone down this day, and hath slain oxen and fat cattle and sheep in abu
1022,my righteousness to be revealed. 
Blessed is the man that doeth this, and the son of man that layeth hold on it; that keepeth the sabbath from polluting it, and keepeth his hand from doing any evil. 
Neither let the son of the stranger, that hath joined himself to the LORD, speak, saying, The LORD hath utterly separated me from his people: neither let the eunuch say, Behold, I am a dry tree. 
For thus saith the LORD unto the eunuchs that keep my sabbaths, and choose the things that please me, and take hold of my covenant; 
Even unto them will I give in mine house and within my walls a place and a name better than of sons and of daughters: I will give them an everlasting name, that shall not be cut off. 
Also the sons of the stranger, that join themselves to the LORD, to serve him, and to love the name of the LORD, to be his servants, every one that keepeth the sabbath from polluting it, and taketh hold of my covenant; 
Even them will I bring to my holy mountain, and make them joyful in my house of prayer: t
796, was the first altar that he built unto the LORD. 
And Saul said, Let us go down after the Philistines by night, and spoil them until the morning light, and let us not leave a man of them. And they said, Do whatsoever seemeth good unto thee. Then said the priest, Let us draw near hither unto God. 
And Saul asked counsel of God, Shall I go down after the Philistines? wilt thou deliver them into the hand of Israel? But he answered him not that day. 
And Saul said, Draw ye near hither, all the chief of the people: and know and see wherein this sin hath been this day. 
For, as the LORD liveth, which saveth Israel, though it be in Jonathan my son, he shall surely die. But there was not a man among all the people that answered him. 
Then said he unto all Israel, Be ye on one side, and I and 
944,they shall be driven to darkness. 
Nevertheless the dimness shall not be such as was in her vexation, when at the first he lightly afflicted the land of Zebulun and the land of Naphtali, and afterward did more grievously afflict her by the way of the sea, beyond Jordan, in Galilee of the nations. 
The people that walked in darkness have seen a great light: they that dwell in the land of the shadow of death, upon them hath the light shined. 
Thou hast multiplied the nation, and not increased the joy: they joy before thee according to the joy in harvest, and as men rejoice when they divide the spoil. 
For thou hast broken the yoke of his burden, and the staff of his shoulder, the rod of his oppressor, as in the day of Midian. 
For every battle of the warrior is with confused noise, and garments rolled in blood; but this shall be with burning and fuel of fire. 
For unto us a child is born, unto us a son is given: and the government s
790,that ye allow the deeds of your fathers: for they indeed killed them, and ye build their sepulchres. 
Therefore also said the wisdom of God, I will send them prophets and apostles, and some of them they shall slay and persecute: 
That the blood of all the prophets, which was shed from the foundation of the world, may be required of this generation; 
From the blood of Abel unto the blood of Zacharias which perished between the altar and the temple: verily I say unto you, It shall be required of this generation. 
Woe unto you, lawyers! for ye have taken away the key of knowledge: ye entered not in yourselves, and them that were entering in ye hindered. 
And as he said these things unto them, the scribes and the Pharisees began to urge him vehemently, and to provoke him to speak of 
891,bring again the captivity of Jacob, and have mercy upon the whole house of Israel, and will be jealous for my holy name; 
After that they have borne their shame, and all their trespasses whereby they have trespassed against me, when they dwelt safely in their land, and none made them afraid. 
When I have brought them again from the people, and gathered them out of their enemies' lands, and am sanctified in them in the sight of many nations; 
Then shall they know that I am the LORD their God, which caused them to be led into captivity among the heathen: but I have gathered them unto their own land, and have left none of them any more there. 
Neither will I hide my face any more from them: for I have poured out my spirit upon the house of Israel, saith the Lord GOD. 
In the five and twentieth year of our captivity, in the beginning of the year, in the tenth day of the month, in th
839,l be according to their works. 
I say again, let no man think me a fool; if otherwise, yet as a fool receive me, that I may boast myself a little. 
That which I speak, I speak it not after the Lord, but as it were foolishly, in this confidence of boasting. 
Seeing that many glory after the flesh, I will glory also. 
For ye suffer fools gladly, seeing ye yourselves are wise. 
For ye suffer, if a man bring you into bondage, if a man devour you, if a man take of you, if a man exalt himself, if a man smite you on the face. 
I speak as concerning reproach, as though we had been weak. Howbeit whereinsoever any is bold, (I speak foolishly,) I am bold also. 
Are they Hebrews? so am I. Are they Israelites? so am I. Are they the seed of Abraham? so am I. 
Are they ministers of Christ? (I speak as a fool) I am more; in labours more abunda
927,st, the man that executeth my counsel from a far country: yea, I have spoken it, I will also bring it to pass; I have purposed it, I will also do it. 
Hearken unto me, ye stouthearted, that are far from righteousness: 
I bring near my righteousness; it shall not be far off, and my salvation shall not tarry: and I will place salvation in Zion for Israel my glory. 
Come down, and sit in the dust, O virgin daughter of Babylon, sit on the ground: there is no throne, O daughter of the Chaldeans: for thou shalt no more be called tender and delicate. 
Take the millstones, and grind meal: uncover thy locks, make bare the leg, uncover the thigh, pass over the rivers. 
Thy nakedness shall be uncovered, yea, thy shame shall be seen: I will take vengeance, and I will not meet thee as a man. 
As for our redeemer, the LORD of hosts is his name, the Holy One of Israel. 
Sit thou silent, and get thee into darkness, O daughter of 
851, kingdom shall be plucked up, even for others beside those. 
And the king of the south shall be strong, and one of his princes; and he shall be strong above him, and have dominion; his dominion shall be a great dominion. 
And in the end of years they shall join themselves together; for the king's daughter of the south shall come to the king of the north to make an agreement: but she shall not retain the power of the arm; neither shall he stand, nor his arm: but she shall be given up, and they that brought her, and he that begat her, and he that strengthened her in these times. 
But out of a branch of her roots shall one stand up in his estate, which shall come with an army, and shall enter into the fortress of the king of the north, and shall deal against them, and shall prevail: 
And shall also carry captives into Egypt their gods, with t
1001, thousand. 
The seventh captain for the seventh month was Helez the Pelonite, of the children of Ephraim: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The eighth captain for the eighth month was Sibbecai the Hushathite, of the Zarhites: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The ninth captain for the ninth month was Abiezer the Anetothite, of the Benjamites: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The tenth captain for the tenth month was Maharai the Netophathite, of the Zarhites: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The eleventh captain for the eleventh month was Benaiah the Pirathonite, of the children of Ephraim: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The twelfth captain for the twelfth month was Heldai the Netophathite, of Othniel: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
Furthermore over the tribes of Israel: the ruler of the Reubenites was Eliezer the son of Zichri: of the Simeonites, Shephatiah the son of Maachah: 
Of the
914,be in thy presence. 
Then said Absalom to Ahithophel, Give counsel among you what we shall do. 
And Ahithophel said unto Absalom, Go in unto thy father's concubines, which he hath left to keep the house; and all Israel shall hear that thou art abhorred of thy father: then shall the hands of all that are with thee be strong. 
So they spread Absalom a tent upon the top of the house; and Absalom went in unto his father's concubines in the sight of all Israel. 
And the counsel of Ahithophel, which he counselled in those days, was as if a man had enquired at the oracle of God: so was all the counsel of Ahithophel both with David and with Absalom. 
Moreover Ahithophel said unto Absalom, Let me now choose out twelve thousand men, and I will arise and pursue after David this night: 
And I will come upon him while he is weary and weak handed, and will make him afraid: and all the people that are with him shall
730,ab, her will I give thee to wife: only be thou valiant for me, and fight the LORD's battles. For Saul said, Let not mine hand be upon him, but let the hand of the Philistines be upon him. 
And David said unto Saul, Who am I? and what is my life, or my father's family in Israel, that I should be son in law to the king? 
But it came to pass at the time when Merab Saul's daughter should have been given to David, that she was given unto Adriel the Meholathite to wife. 
And Michal Saul's daughter loved David: and they told Saul, and the thing pleased him. 
And Saul said, I will give him her, that she may be a snare to him, and that the hand of the Philistines may be against him. Wherefore Saul said to David, Thou shalt this d
1069, worthy for whom he should do this: 
For he loveth our nation, and he hath built us a synagogue. 
Then Jesus went with them. And when he was now not far from the house, the centurion sent friends to him, saying unto him, Lord, trouble not thyself: for I am not worthy that thou shouldest enter under my roof: 
Wherefore neither thought I myself worthy to come unto thee: but say in a word, and my servant shall be healed. 
For I also am a man set under authority, having under me soldiers, and I say unto one, Go, and he goeth; and to another, Come, and he cometh; and to my servant, Do this, and he doeth it. 
When Jesus heard these things, he marvelled at him, and turned him about, and said unto the people that followed him, I say unto you, I have not found so great faith, no, not in Israel. 
And they that were sent, returning to the house, found the servant whole that had been sick. 
And it came to pass the day after, that he went into a city called Nain; and many of his disciples went with him, and much people. 
Now when he came nigh to the gate of the city
808,Egypt, and captains over every one of them. 
And the LORD hardened the heart of Pharaoh king of Egypt, and he pursued after the children of Israel: and the children of Israel went out with an high hand. 
But the Egyptians pursued after them, all the horses and chariots of Pharaoh, and his horsemen, and his army, and overtook them encamping by the sea, beside Pihahiroth, before Baalzephon. 
And when Pharaoh drew nigh, the children of Israel lifted up their eyes, and, behold, the Egyptians marched after them; and they were sore afraid: and the children of Israel cried out unto the LORD. 
And they said unto Moses, Because there were no graves in Egypt, hast thou taken us away to die in the wilderness? wherefore hast thou dealt thus with us, to carry us forth out of Egypt? 
Is not this the word that w
883, See, I have accepted thee concerning this thing also, that I will not overthrow this city, for the which thou hast spoken. 
Haste thee, escape thither; for I cannot do anything till thou be come thither. Therefore the name of the city was called Zoar. 
The sun was risen upon the earth when Lot entered into Zoar. 
Then the LORD rained upon Sodom and upon Gomorrah brimstone and fire from the LORD out of heaven; 
And he overthrew those cities, and all the plain, and all the inhabitants of the cities, and that which grew upon the ground. 
But his wife looked back from behind him, and she became a pillar of salt. 
And Abraham gat up early in the morning to the place where he stood before the LORD: 
And he looked toward Sodom and Gomorrah, and toward all the land of the plain, and beheld, and, lo, the smoke of the country went up as the smoke of a furnace. 
And it came to pas
977,d his raiment became shining, exceeding white as snow; so as no fuller on earth can white them. 
And there appeared unto them Elias with Moses: and they were talking with Jesus. 
And Peter answered and said to Jesus, Master, it is good for us to be here: and let us make three tabernacles; one for thee, and one for Moses, and one for Elias. 
For he wist not what to say; for they were sore afraid. 
And there was a cloud that overshadowed them: and a voice came out of the cloud, saying, This is my beloved Son: hear him. 
And suddenly, when they had looked round about, they saw no man any more, save Jesus only with themselves. 
And as they came down from the mountain, he charged them that they should tell no man what things they had seen, till the Son of man were risen from the dead. 
And they kept that saying with themselves, questioning one with another what the rising from the dead should mean. 
And they asked him, saying, Why say the scribes that Elias must first
802,Saul in Gibeah of Benjamin looked; and, behold, the multitude melted away, and they went on beating down one another. 
Then said Saul unto the people that were with him, Number now, and see who is gone from us. And when they had numbered, behold, Jonathan and his armourbearer were not there. 
And Saul said unto Ahiah, Bring hither the ark of God. For the ark of God was at that time with the children of Israel. 
And it came to pass, while Saul talked unto the priest, that the noise that was in the host of the Philistines went on and increased: and Saul said unto the priest, Withdraw thine hand. 
And Saul and all the people that were with him assembled themselves, and they came to the battle: and, behold, every man's sword was against his fellow, and there was a very great discomfiture. 
Moreo
826, heaven, and the fatness of the earth, and plenty of corn and wine: 
Let people serve thee, and nations bow down to thee: be lord over thy brethren, and let thy mother's sons bow down to thee: cursed be every one that curseth thee, and blessed be he that blesseth thee. 
And it came to pass, as soon as Isaac had made an end of blessing Jacob, and Jacob was yet scarce gone out from the presence of Isaac his father, that Esau his brother came in from his hunting. 
And he also had made savoury meat, and brought it unto his father, and said unto his father, Let my father arise, and eat of his son's venison, that thy soul may bless me. 
And Isaac his father said unto him, Who art thou? And he said, I am thy son, thy firstborn Esau. 
And Isaac trembled very exceedingly, and said, Who? where is he that hath taken venison, 
910,ill. 
The same hour was the thing fulfilled upon Nebuchadnezzar: and he was driven from men, and did eat grass as oxen, and his body was wet with the dew of heaven, till his hairs were grown like eagles' feathers, and his nails like birds' claws. 
And at the end of the days I Nebuchadnezzar lifted up mine eyes unto heaven, and mine understanding returned unto me, and I blessed the most High, and I praised and honoured him that liveth for ever, whose dominion is an everlasting dominion, and his kingdom is from generation to generation: 
And all the inhabitants of the earth are reputed as nothing: and he doeth according to his will in the army of heaven, and among the inhabitants of the earth: and none can stay his hand, or say unto him, What doest thou? 
At the same time my reason returned unto me; and for the glory of my kingdom, mine honour and brightness returned unto me; and my counsellors and 
948,e side, and a cubit on the other side of that which remaineth in the length of the curtains of the tent, it shall hang over the sides of the tabernacle on this side and on that side, to cover it. 
And thou shalt make a covering for the tent of rams' skins dyed red, and a covering above of badgers' skins. 
And thou shalt make boards for the tabernacle of shittim wood standing up. 
Ten cubits shall be the length of a board, and a cubit and a half shall be the breadth of one board. 
Two tenons shall there be in one board, set in order one against another: thus shalt thou make for all the boards of the tabernacle. 
And thou shalt make the boards for the tabernacle, twenty boards on the south side southward. 
And thou shalt make forty sockets of silver under the twenty boards; two sockets under one board for his two tenons, and two sockets under another board for his two tenons. 
And for the second side of the tabernacle on the north side 
789,f it. And Joseph said unto them, Do not interpretations belong to God? tell me them, I pray you. 
And the chief butler told his dream to Joseph, and said to him, In my dream, behold, a vine was before me; 
And in the vine were three branches: and it was as though it budded, and her blossoms shot forth; and the clusters thereof brought forth ripe grapes: 
And Pharaoh's cup was in my hand: and I took the grapes, and pressed them into Pharaoh's cup, and I gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand. 
And Joseph said unto him, This is the interpretation of it: The three branches are three days: 
Yet within three days shall Pharaoh lift up thine head, and restore thee unto thy place: and thou shalt deliver Pharaoh's cup into his hand, after the former manner when thou wast his butler. 
But thin
1032,ed up the ark of the LORD, and brought it into the house of Abinadab in the hill, and sanctified Eleazar his son to keep the ark of the LORD. 
And it came to pass, while the ark abode in Kirjathjearim, that the time was long; for it was twenty years: and all the house of Israel lamented after the LORD. 
And Samuel spake unto all the house of Israel, saying, If ye do return unto the LORD with all your hearts, then put away the strange gods and Ashtaroth from among you, and prepare your hearts unto the LORD, and serve him only: and he will deliver you out of the hand of the Philistines. 
Then the children of Israel did put away Baalim and Ashtaroth, and served the LORD only. 
And Samuel said, Gather all Israel to Mizpeh, and I will pray for you unto the LORD. 
And they gathered together to Mizpeh, and drew water, and poured it out before the LORD, and fasted on that day, and said there, We have sinned against the LORD. And Samuel judged the children of Israel in Mizpeh. 
And when the Philistines heard that the children
853,in decay with thee; then thou shalt relieve him: yea, though he be a stranger, or a sojourner; that he may live with thee. 
Take thou no usury of him, or increase: but fear thy God; that thy brother may live with thee. 
Thou shalt not give him thy money upon usury, nor lend him thy victuals for increase. 
I am the LORD your God, which brought you forth out of the land of Egypt, to give you the land of Canaan, and to be your God. 
And if thy brother that dwelleth by thee be waxen poor, and be sold unto thee; thou shalt not compel him to serve as a bondservant: 
But as an hired servant, and as a sojourner, he shall be with thee, and shall serve thee unto the year of jubile. 
And then shall he depart from thee, both he and his children with him, and shall return unto his own family, and unto the possession of his fathers shall he return. 
For t
747,ing to our doings, so hath he dealt with us. 
Upon the four and twentieth day of the eleventh month, which is the month Sebat, in the second year of Darius, came the word of the LORD unto Zechariah, the son of Berechiah, the son of Iddo the prophet, saying, 
I saw by night, and behold a man riding upon a red horse, and he stood among the myrtle trees that were in the bottom; and behind him were there red horses, speckled, and white. 
Then said I, O my lord, what are these? And the angel that talked with me said unto me, I will shew thee what these be. 
And the man that stood among the myrtle trees answered and said, These are they whom the LORD hath sent to walk to and fro through the earth. 
And they answered the angel of the LORD that 
911,wenty days. 
And Joab gave up the sum of the number of the people unto the king: and there were in Israel eight hundred thousand valiant men that drew the sword; and the men of Judah were five hundred thousand men. 
And David's heart smote him after that he had numbered the people. And David said unto the LORD, I have sinned greatly in that I have done: and now, I beseech thee, O LORD, take away the iniquity of thy servant; for I have done very foolishly. 
For when David was up in the morning, the word of the LORD came unto the prophet Gad, David's seer, saying, 
Go and say unto David, Thus saith the LORD, I offer thee three things; choose thee one of them, that I may do it unto thee. 
So Gad came to David, and told him, and said unto him, Shall seven years of famine come unto thee in thy land? or wilt thou flee three months before thine enemies, while they pursue thee? or that there be three days'
1068,' skins, and put to the staves of it. 
And when Aaron and his sons have made an end of covering the sanctuary, and all the vessels of the sanctuary, as the camp is to set forward; after that, the sons of Kohath shall come to bear it: but they shall not touch any holy thing, lest they die. These things are the burden of the sons of Kohath in the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And to the office of Eleazar the son of Aaron the priest pertaineth the oil for the light, and the sweet incense, and the daily meat offering, and the anointing oil, and the oversight of all the tabernacle, and of all that therein is, in the sanctuary, and in the vessels thereof. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron saying, 
Cut ye not off the tribe of the families of the Kohathites from among the Levites: 
But thus do unto them, that they may live, and not die, when they approach unto the most holy things: Aaron and his sons shall go in, and appoint them every one to his service and to his burden: 
But they shall not go in to see when the holy things are covered, lest t
857,d always on your behalf, for the grace of God which is given you by Jesus Christ; 
That in every thing ye are enriched by him, in all utterance, and in all knowledge; 
Even as the testimony of Christ was confirmed in you: 
So that ye come behind in no gift; waiting for the coming of our Lord Jesus Christ: 
Who shall also confirm you unto the end, that ye may be blameless in the day of our Lord Jesus Christ. 
God is faithful, by whom ye were called unto the fellowship of his Son Jesus Christ our Lord. 
Now I beseech you, brethren, by the name of our Lord Jesus Christ, that ye all speak the same thing, and that there be no divisions among you; but that ye be perfectly joined together in the same mind and in the same judgment. 
For it hath been declared unto me of you, my brethren, by them which are of the house of Chloe, that there are contentions
847,people, and after the division of the families of the Levites. 
So kill the passover, and sanctify yourselves, and prepare your brethren, that they may do according to the word of the LORD by the hand of Moses. 
And Josiah gave to the people, of the flock, lambs and kids, all for the passover offerings, for all that were present, to the number of thirty thousand, and three thousand bullocks: these were of the king's substance. 
And his princes gave willingly unto the people, to the priests, and to the Levites: Hilkiah and Zechariah and Jehiel, rulers of the house of God, gave unto the priests for the passover offerings two thousand and six hundred small cattle and three hundred oxen. 
Conaniah also, and Shemaiah and Nethaneel, his brethren, and Hashabiah and Jeiel and Jozabad, chief of the Levites, gave unto the Levites for passover of
1006,illed the prophecy of Esaias, which saith, By hearing ye shall hear, and shall not understand; and seeing ye shall see, and shall not perceive: 
For this people's heart is waxed gross, and their ears are dull of hearing, and their eyes they have closed; lest at any time they should see with their eyes and hear with their ears, and should understand with their heart, and should be converted, and I should heal them. 
But blessed are your eyes, for they see: and your ears, for they hear. 
For verily I say unto you, That many prophets and righteous men have desired to see those things which ye see, and have not seen them; and to hear those things which ye hear, and have not heard them. 
Hear ye therefore the parable of the sower. 
When any one heareth the word of the kingdom, and understandeth it not, then cometh the wicked one, and catcheth away that which was sown in his heart. This is he which received seed by the way side. 
But he that received the seed into stony places, the same is he that
782,eart and bitter wailing. 
And in their wailing they shall take up a lamentation for thee, and lament over thee, saying, What city is like Tyrus, like the destroyed in the midst of the sea? 
When thy wares went forth out of the seas, thou filledst many people; thou didst enrich the kings of the earth with the multitude of thy riches and of thy merchandise. 
In the time when thou shalt be broken by the seas in the depths of the waters thy merchandise and all thy company in the midst of thee shall fall. 
All the inhabitants of the isles shall be astonished at thee, and their kings shall be sore afraid, they shall be troubled in their countenance. 
The merchants among the people shall hiss at thee; thou shalt be a terror, and never shalt be any more. 
The word of the LORD cam
807,ery goodly man; and his mother bare him after Absalom. 
And he conferred with Joab the son of Zeruiah, and with Abiathar the priest: and they following Adonijah helped him. 
But Zadok the priest, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and Nathan the prophet, and Shimei, and Rei, and the mighty men which belonged to David, were not with Adonijah. 
And Adonijah slew sheep and oxen and fat cattle by the stone of Zoheleth, which is by Enrogel, and called all his brethren the king's sons, and all the men of Judah the king's servants: 
But Nathan the prophet, and Benaiah, and the mighty men, and Solomon his brother, he called not. 
Wherefore Nathan spake unto Bathsheba the mother of Solomon, saying, Hast thou not heard that Adonijah the son of Haggith doth reign, and David our lord knoweth it not? 
Now there
794, lamb out of the flock, out of two hundred, out of the fat pastures of Israel; for a meat offering, and for a burnt offering, and for peace offerings, to make reconciliation for them, saith the Lord GOD. 
All the people of the land shall give this oblation for the prince in Israel. 
And it shall be the prince's part to give burnt offerings, and meat offerings, and drink offerings, in the feasts, and in the new moons, and in the sabbaths, in all solemnities of the house of Israel: he shall prepare the sin offering, and the meat offering, and the burnt offering, and the peace offerings, to make reconciliation for the house of Israel. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; In the first month, in the first day of the month, thou shalt take a young bullock without blemish, and cleanse the sanctuary: 

757,me round. 
They gaped upon me with their mouths, as a ravening and a roaring lion. 
I am poured out like water, and all my bones are out of joint: my heart is like wax; it is melted in the midst of my bowels. 
My strength is dried up like a potsherd; and my tongue cleaveth to my jaws; and thou hast brought me into the dust of death. 
For dogs have compassed me: the assembly of the wicked have inclosed me: they pierced my hands and my feet. 
I may tell all my bones: they look and stare upon me. 
They part my garments among them, and cast lots upon my vesture. 
But be not thou far from me, O LORD: O my strength, haste thee to help me. 
Deliver my soul from the sword; my darling from the power of the dog. 
Save me from the lion's mouth: for thou hast
928,ut him, and about his house, and about all that he hath on every side? thou hast blessed the work of his hands, and his substance is increased in the land. 
But put forth thine hand now, and touch all that he hath, and he will curse thee to thy face. 
And the LORD said unto Satan, Behold, all that he hath is in thy power; only upon himself put not forth thine hand. So Satan went forth from the presence of the LORD. 
And there was a day when his sons and his daughters were eating and drinking wine in their eldest brother's house: 
And there came a messenger unto Job, and said, The oxen were plowing, and the asses feeding beside them: 
And the Sabeans fell upon them, and took them away; yea, they have slain the servants with the edge of the sword; and I only am escaped alone to tell thee. 
While he was yet speaking, there came also another, and said, The fire of God is fallen from heaven, and hath burned up the sheep
751,landers. 
And they will deceive every one his neighbour, and will not speak the truth: they have taught their tongue to speak lies, and weary themselves to commit iniquity. 
Thine habitation is in the midst of deceit; through deceit they refuse to know me, saith the LORD. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts, Behold, I will melt them, and try them; for how shall I do for the daughter of my people? 
Their tongue is as an arrow shot out; it speaketh deceit: one speaketh peaceably to his neighbour with his mouth, but in heart he layeth his wait. 
Shall I not visit them for these things? saith the LORD: shall not my soul be avenged on such a nation as this? 
For the mountains will I take up a weeping and wailing, and for the habitations of th
787, in the camel's furniture, and sat upon them. And Laban searched all the tent, but found them not. 
And she said to her father, Let it not displease my lord that I cannot rise up before thee; for the custom of women is upon me. And he searched but found not the images. 
And Jacob was wroth, and chode with Laban: and Jacob answered and said to Laban, What is my trespass? what is my sin, that thou hast so hotly pursued after me? 
Whereas thou hast searched all my stuff, what hast thou found of all thy household stuff? set it here before my brethren and thy brethren, that they may judge betwixt us both. 
This twenty years have I been with thee; thy ewes and thy she goats have not cast their young, and the rams of thy flock have I not eaten. 
That which was torn of beasts I brough
1074, receive something of them. 
Then Peter said, Silver and gold have I none; but such as I have give I thee: In the name of Jesus Christ of Nazareth rise up and walk. 
And he took him by the right hand, and lifted him up: and immediately his feet and ankle bones received strength. 
And he leaping up stood, and walked, and entered with them into the temple, walking, and leaping, and praising God. 
And all the people saw him walking and praising God: 
And they knew that it was he which sat for alms at the Beautiful gate of the temple: and they were filled with wonder and amazement at that which had happened unto him. 
And as the lame man which was healed held Peter and John, all the people ran together unto them in the porch that is called Solomon's, greatly wondering. 
And when Peter saw it, he answered unto the people, Ye men of Israel, why marvel ye at this? or why look ye so earnestly on us, as though by our own power or holiness we had made this man to walk? 
The God of Abraham, and of Isaac, and of Jacob, the God of our fathers, hath glorified his Son Jesu
829, sea, and concerning the bases, and concerning the residue of the vessels that remain in this city. 
Which Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon took not, when he carried away captive Jeconiah the son of Jehoiakim king of Judah from Jerusalem to Babylon, and all the nobles of Judah and Jerusalem; 
Yea, thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, concerning the vessels that remain in the house of the LORD, and in the house of the king of Judah and of Jerusalem; 
They shall be carried to Babylon, and there shall they be until the day that I visit them, saith the LORD; then will I bring them up, and restore them to this place. 
And it came to pass the same year, in the beginning of the reign of Zedekiah king of Judah, in the fourth year, and in the fifth month, that Hananiah the son of Azur the prophet, which was of Gibeon
776, letter concerning this matter. 
The copy of the letter that Tatnai, governor on this side the river, and Shetharboznai and his companions the Apharsachites, which were on this side the river, sent unto Darius the king: 
They sent a letter unto him, wherein was written thus; Unto Darius the king, all peace. 
Be it known unto the king, that we went into the province of Judea, to the house of the great God, which is builded with great stones, and timber is laid in the walls, and this work goeth fast on, and prospereth in their hands. 
Then asked we those elders, and said unto them thus, Who commanded you to build this house, and to make up these walls? 
We asked their names also, to certify thee, that we might write the names of the men that were the chief of them. 
A
1051, killeth the poor and needy, and in the night is as a thief. 
The eye also of the adulterer waiteth for the twilight, saying, No eye shall see me: and disguiseth his face. 
In the dark they dig through houses, which they had marked for themselves in the daytime: they know not the light. 
For the morning is to them even as the shadow of death: if one know them, they are in the terrors of the shadow of death. 
He is swift as the waters; their portion is cursed in the earth: he beholdeth not the way of the vineyards. 
Drought and heat consume the snow waters: so doth the grave those which have sinned. 
The womb shall forget him; the worm shall feed sweetly on him; he shall be no more remembered; and wickedness shall be broken as a tree. 
He evil entreateth the barren that beareth not: and doeth not good to the widow. 
He draweth also the mighty with his power: he riseth up, and no man is sure of life. 
Though it be given him to be in safety, whereon he resteth; yet his eyes are upon their ways. 
They are exalted for a little while, but ar
745, it shall be seven days under the dam; and from the eighth day and thenceforth it shall be accepted for an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And whether it be cow, or ewe, ye shall not kill it and her young both in one day. 
And when ye will offer a sacrifice of thanksgiving unto the LORD, offer it at your own will. 
On the same day it shall be eaten up; ye shall leave none of it until the morrow: I am the LORD. 
Therefore shall ye keep my commandments, and do them: I am the LORD. 
Neither shall ye profane my holy name; but I will be hallowed among the children of Israel: I am the LORD which hallow you, 
That brought you out of the land of Egypt, to be your God: I am the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the
931,elp those women which laboured with me in the gospel, with Clement also, and with other my fellowlabourers, whose names are in the book of life. 
Rejoice in the Lord alway: and again I say, Rejoice. 
Let your moderation be known unto all men. The Lord is at hand. 
Be careful for nothing; but in every thing by prayer and supplication with thanksgiving let your requests be made known unto God. 
And the peace of God, which passeth all understanding, shall keep your hearts and minds through Christ Jesus. 
Finally, brethren, whatsoever things are true, whatsoever things are honest, whatsoever things are just, whatsoever things are pure, whatsoever things are lovely, whatsoever things are of good report; if there be any virtue, and if there be any praise, think on these things. 
Those things, which ye have both learned, and received, and heard, and seen in me, do: and the God of peace shall be with you. 
But I rejoiced in t
916,st, Ahimelech's son, I pray thee, bring me hither the ephod. And Abiathar brought thither the ephod to David. 
And David enquired at the LORD, saying, Shall I pursue after this troop? shall I overtake them? And he answered him, Pursue: for thou shalt surely overtake them, and without fail recover all. 
So David went, he and the six hundred men that were with him, and came to the brook Besor, where those that were left behind stayed. 
But David pursued, he and four hundred men: for two hundred abode behind, which were so faint that they could not go over the brook Besor. 
And they found an Egyptian in the field, and brought him to David, and gave him bread, and he did eat; and they made him drink water; 
And they gave him a piece of a cake of figs, and two clusters of raisins: and when he had eaten, his spirit came again to him: for he had eaten no bread, nor drunk any water, three days and three nights.
948, to prove you, and that his fear may be before your faces, that ye sin not. 
And the people stood afar off, and Moses drew near unto the thick darkness where God was. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Thus thou shalt say unto the children of Israel, Ye have seen that I have talked with you from heaven. 
Ye shall not make with me gods of silver, neither shall ye make unto you gods of gold. 
An altar of earth thou shalt make unto me, and shalt sacrifice thereon thy burnt offerings, and thy peace offerings, thy sheep, and thine oxen: in all places where I record my name I will come unto thee, and I will bless thee. 
And if thou wilt make me an altar of stone, thou shalt not build it of hewn stone: for if thou lift up thy tool upon it, thou hast polluted it. 
Neither shalt thou go up by steps unto mine altar, that thy nakedness be not discovered thereon. 
Now these are the judgments which thou shalt set before them. 
If thou buy an Hebrew se
792,h year shall be a sabbath of rest unto the land, a sabbath for the LORD: thou shalt neither sow thy field, nor prune thy vineyard. 
That which groweth of its own accord of thy harvest thou shalt not reap, neither gather the grapes of thy vine undressed: for it is a year of rest unto the land. 
And the sabbath of the land shall be meat for you; for thee, and for thy servant, and for thy maid, and for thy hired servant, and for thy stranger that sojourneth with thee. 
And for thy cattle, and for the beast that are in thy land, shall all the increase thereof be meat. 
And thou shalt number seven sabbaths of years unto thee, seven times seven years; and the space of the seven sabbaths of years shall be unto thee forty and nine years. 
Then shalt thou cause the trumpet of the jubile to 
870,ncrease of the threshingfloor, and as the increase of the winepress. 
And ye shall eat it in every place, ye and your households: for it is your reward for your service in the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And ye shall bear no sin by reason of it, when ye have heaved from it the best of it: neither shall ye pollute the holy things of the children of Israel, lest ye die. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
This is the ordinance of the law which the LORD hath commanded, saying, Speak unto the children of Israel, that they bring thee a red heifer without spot, wherein is no blemish, and upon which never came yoke: 
And ye shall give her unto Eleazar the priest, that he may bring her forth without the camp, and one shall slay her before his face: 
And Eleazar the priest shall take of her blood with his finger, and sprinkle of her blood dir
910, feast: for they also went unto the feast. 
So Jesus came again into Cana of Galilee, where he made the water wine. And there was a certain nobleman, whose son was sick at Capernaum. 
When he heard that Jesus was come out of Judaea into Galilee, he went unto him, and besought him that he would come down, and heal his son: for he was at the point of death. 
Then said Jesus unto him, Except ye see signs and wonders, ye will not believe. 
The nobleman saith unto him, Sir, come down ere my child die. 
Jesus saith unto him, Go thy way; thy son liveth. And the man believed the word that Jesus had spoken unto him, and he went his way. 
And as he was now going down, his servants met him, and told him, saying, Thy son liveth. 
Then enquired he of them the hour when he began to amend. And they said unto him, Yesterday at the seventh hour the fever left him. 
So the father knew that it was at the same hour, 
929,ad, Hadad said to Pharaoh, Let me depart, that I may go to mine own country. 
Then Pharaoh said unto him, But what hast thou lacked with me, that, behold, thou seekest to go to thine own country? And he answered, Nothing: howbeit let me go in any wise. 
And God stirred him up another adversary, Rezon the son of Eliadah, which fled from his lord Hadadezer king of Zobah: 
And he gathered men unto him, and became captain over a band, when David slew them of Zobah: and they went to Damascus, and dwelt therein, and reigned in Damascus. 
And he was an adversary to Israel all the days of Solomon, beside the mischief that Hadad did: and he abhorred Israel, and reigned over Syria. 
And Jeroboam the son of Nebat, an Ephrathite of Zereda, Solomon's servant, whose mother's name was Zeruah, a widow woman, even he lifted up his hand against the king. 
And this was the cause that he lifted up his hand against the king: Solomon bui
1005, evil, that good may come? whose damnation is just. 
What then? are we better than they? No, in no wise: for we have before proved both Jews and Gentiles, that they are all under sin; 
As it is written, There is none righteous, no, not one: 
There is none that understandeth, there is none that seeketh after God. 
They are all gone out of the way, they are together become unprofitable; there is none that doeth good, no, not one. 
Their throat is an open sepulchre; with their tongues they have used deceit; the poison of asps is under their lips: 
Whose mouth is full of cursing and bitterness: 
Their feet are swift to shed blood: 
Destruction and misery are in their ways: 
And the way of peace have they not known: 
There is no fear of God before their eyes. 
Now we know that what things soever the law saith, it saith to them who are under the law: that every mouth may be stopped, and all the world may become guilty before God. 
Therefore by the deeds of the law there shall no flesh be justifie
754,ey may seek thy name, O LORD. 
Let them be confounded and troubled for ever; yea, let them be put to shame, and perish: 
That men may know that thou, whose name alone is JEHOVAH, art the most high over all the earth. 
How amiable are thy tabernacles, O LORD of hosts! 
My soul longeth, yea, even fainteth for the courts of the LORD: my heart and my flesh crieth out for the living God. 
Yea, the sparrow hath found an house, and the swallow a nest for herself, where she may lay her young, even thine altars, O LORD of hosts, my King, and my God. 
Blessed are they that dwell in thy house: they will be still praising thee. Selah. 
Blessed is the man whose strength is in thee; in whose heart are the ways of them. 
Who passing through the valley of Baca
1033,ter, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me more than these? He saith unto him, Yea, Lord; thou knowest that I love thee. He saith unto him, Feed my lambs. 
He saith to him again the second time, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me? He saith unto him, Yea, Lord; thou knowest that I love thee. He saith unto him, Feed my sheep. 
He saith unto him the third time, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me? Peter was grieved because he said unto him the third time, Lovest thou me? And he said unto him, Lord, thou knowest all things; thou knowest that I love thee. Jesus saith unto him, Feed my sheep. 
Verily, verily, I say unto thee, When thou wast young, thou girdest thyself, and walkedst whither thou wouldest: but when thou shalt be old, thou shalt stretch forth thy hands, and another shall gird thee, and carry thee whither thou wouldest not. 
This spake he, signifying by what death he should glorify God. And when he had spoken this, he saith unto him, Follow me. 
Then Peter, turning about, seeth the disciple whom Jesus loved foll
1017, the righteous, but sinners to repentance. 
Then came to him the disciples of John, saying, Why do we and the Pharisees fast oft, but thy disciples fast not? 
And Jesus said unto them, Can the children of the bridechamber mourn, as long as the bridegroom is with them? but the days will come, when the bridegroom shall be taken from them, and then shall they fast. 
No man putteth a piece of new cloth unto an old garment, for that which is put in to fill it up taketh from the garment, and the rent is made worse. 
Neither do men put new wine into old bottles: else the bottles break, and the wine runneth out, and the bottles perish: but they put new wine into new bottles, and both are preserved. 
While he spake these things unto them, behold, there came a certain ruler, and worshipped him, saying, My daughter is even now dead: but come and lay thy hand upon her, and she shall live. 
And Jesus arose, and followed him, and so did his disciples. 
And, behold, a woman, which was diseased with an issue of blood 
1080,e thing that I long for! 
Even that it would please God to destroy me; that he would let loose his hand, and cut me off! 
Then should I yet have comfort; yea, I would harden myself in sorrow: let him not spare; for I have not concealed the words of the Holy One. 
What is my strength, that I should hope? and what is mine end, that I should prolong my life? 
Is my strength the strength of stones? or is my flesh of brass? 
Is not my help in me? and is wisdom driven quite from me? 
To him that is afflicted pity should be shewed from his friend; but he forsaketh the fear of the Almighty. 
My brethren have dealt deceitfully as a brook, and as the stream of brooks they pass away; 
Which are blackish by reason of the ice, and wherein the snow is hid: 
What time they wax warm, they vanish: when it is hot, they are consumed out of their place. 
The paths of their way are turned aside; they go to nothing, and perish. 
The troops of Tema looked, the companies of Sheba waited for them. 
They were confounded because they had hoped; they came thither, and were ashamed. 
For now 
1033,ph went out from the presence of Pharaoh, and went throughout all the land of Egypt. 
And in the seven plenteous years the earth brought forth by handfuls. 
And he gathered up all the food of the seven years, which were in the land of Egypt, and laid up the food in the cities: the food of the field, which was round about every city, laid he up in the same. 
And Joseph gathered corn as the sand of the sea, very much, until he left numbering; for it was without number. 
And unto Joseph were born two sons before the years of famine came, which Asenath the daughter of Potipherah priest of On bare unto him. 
And Joseph called the name of the firstborn Manasseh: For God, said he, hath made me forget all my toil, and all my father's house. 
And the name of the second called he Ephraim: For God hath caused me to be fruitful in the land of my affliction. 
And the seven years of plenteousness, that was in the land of Egypt, were ended. 
And the seven years of dearth began to come, according as Joseph had said: and the dearth wa
842,
And the king of Israel said unto Jehoshaphat, I will disguise myself, and I will go to the battle; but put thou on thy robes. So the king of Israel disguised himself; and they went to the battle. 
Now the king of Syria had commanded the captains of the chariots that were with him, saying, Fight ye not with small or great, save only with the king of Israel. 
And it came to pass, when the captains of the chariots saw Jehoshaphat, that they said, It is the king of Israel. Therefore they compassed about him to fight: but Jehoshaphat cried out, and the LORD helped him; and God moved them to depart from him. 
For it came to pass, that, when the captains of the chariots perceived that it was not the king of Israel, they turned back again from pursuing him. 
And a certain man drew a bow at a venture, and smote the king of Israel between 
962, so thou shalt put away evil from among you. 
But if a man find a betrothed damsel in the field, and the man force her, and lie with her: then the man only that lay with her shall die. 
But unto the damsel thou shalt do nothing; there is in the damsel no sin worthy of death: for as when a man riseth against his neighbour, and slayeth him, even so is this matter: 
For he found her in the field, and the betrothed damsel cried, and there was none to save her. 
If a man find a damsel that is a virgin, which is not betrothed, and lay hold on her, and lie with her, and they be found; 
Then the man that lay with her shall give unto the damsel's father fifty shekels of silver, and she shall be his wife; because he hath humbled her, he may not put her away all his days. 
A man shall not take his father's wife, nor discover his father's skirt. 
He that is wounded in the stones, or hath his privy member cut off, shall not enter into the congregation of the LO
902,laces: whosoever would, he consecrated him, and he became one of the priests of the high places. 
And this thing became sin unto the house of Jeroboam, even to cut it off, and to destroy it from off the face of the earth. 
At that time Abijah the son of Jeroboam fell sick. 
And Jeroboam said to his wife, Arise, I pray thee, and disguise thyself, that thou be not known to be the wife of Jeroboam; and get thee to Shiloh: behold, there is Ahijah the prophet, which told me that I should be king over this people. 
And take with thee ten loaves, and cracknels, and a cruse of honey, and go to him: he shall tell thee what shall become of the child. 
And Jeroboam's wife did so, and arose, and went to Shiloh, and came to the house of Ahijah. But Ahijah could not see; for his eyes were set by reason of his age. 
And the LORD said unto Ahijah, Behold, the wife of Jeroboam cometh to ask a thing of thee
970,esus passed by, he saw a man which was blind from his birth. 
And his disciples asked him, saying, Master, who did sin, this man, or his parents, that he was born blind? 
Jesus answered, Neither hath this man sinned, nor his parents: but that the works of God should be made manifest in him. 
I must work the works of him that sent me, while it is day: the night cometh, when no man can work. 
As long as I am in the world, I am the light of the world. 
When he had thus spoken, he spat on the ground, and made clay of the spittle, and he anointed the eyes of the blind man with the clay, 
And said unto him, Go, wash in the pool of Siloam, (which is by interpretation, Sent.) He went his way therefore, and washed, and came seeing. 
The neighbours therefore, and they which before had seen him that he was blind, said, Is not this he that sat and begged? 
Some said, This is he: others said, He is like him: but he said, I am he. 
Therefore said they unto him, How were
1030, fame spread abroad throughout all the region round about Galilee. 
And forthwith, when they were come out of the synagogue, they entered into the house of Simon and Andrew, with James and John. 
But Simon's wife's mother lay sick of a fever, and anon they tell him of her. 
And he came and took her by the hand, and lifted her up; and immediately the fever left her, and she ministered unto them. 
And at even, when the sun did set, they brought unto him all that were diseased, and them that were possessed with devils. 
And all the city was gathered together at the door. 
And he healed many that were sick of divers diseases, and cast out many devils; and suffered not the devils to speak, because they knew him. 
And in the morning, rising up a great while before day, he went out, and departed into a solitary place, and there prayed. 
And Simon and they that were with him followed after him. 
And when they had found him, they said unto him, All men seek for thee. 
And he said unto them, Let us go into the next towns, th
739,e axes, and to sharpen the goads. 
So it came to pass in the day of battle, that there was neither sword nor spear found in the hand of any of the people that were with Saul and Jonathan: but with Saul and with Jonathan his son was there found. 
And the garrison of the Philistines went out to the passage of Michmash. 
Now it came to pass upon a day, that Jonathan the son of Saul said unto the young man that bare his armour, Come, and let us go over to the Philistines' garrison, that is on the other side. But he told not his father. 
And Saul tarried in the uttermost part of Gibeah under a pomegranate tree which is in Migron: and the people that were with him were about six hundred men; 
And Ahiah, the son of Ahitub, Ichabod's bro
1068, pillars of fire: 
And he had in his hand a little book open: and he set his right foot upon the sea, and his left foot on the earth, 
And cried with a loud voice, as when a lion roareth: and when he had cried, seven thunders uttered their voices. 
And when the seven thunders had uttered their voices, I was about to write: and I heard a voice from heaven saying unto me, Seal up those things which the seven thunders uttered, and write them not. 
And the angel which I saw stand upon the sea and upon the earth lifted up his hand to heaven, 
And sware by him that liveth for ever and ever, who created heaven, and the things that therein are, and the earth, and the things that therein are, and the sea, and the things which are therein, that there should be time no longer: 
But in the days of the voice of the seventh angel, when he shall begin to sound, the mystery of God should be finished, as he hath declared to his servants the prophets. 
And the voice which I heard from heaven spake unto me again, and said, Go and take the little book which is open in the
781, you through the Lord, that ye will be none otherwise minded: but he that troubleth you shall bear his judgment, whosoever he be. 
And I, brethren, if I yet preach circumcision, why do I yet suffer persecution? then is the offence of the cross ceased. 
I would they were even cut off which trouble you. 
For, brethren, ye have been called unto liberty; only use not liberty for an occasion to the flesh, but by love serve one another. 
For all the law is fulfilled in one word, even in this; Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself. 
But if ye bite and devour one another, take heed that ye be not consumed one of another. 
This I say then, Walk in the Spirit, and ye shall not fulfil the lust of the flesh. 
For the flesh lusteth against the Spirit, and the Spirit against the fl
993,ed? and I will not give my glory unto another. 
Hearken unto me, O Jacob and Israel, my called; I am he; I am the first, I also am the last. 
Mine hand also hath laid the foundation of the earth, and my right hand hath spanned the heavens: when I call unto them, they stand up together. 
All ye, assemble yourselves, and hear; which among them hath declared these things? The LORD hath loved him: he will do his pleasure on Babylon, and his arm shall be on the Chaldeans. 
I, even I, have spoken; yea, I have called him: I have brought him, and he shall make his way prosperous. 
Come ye near unto me, hear ye this; I have not spoken in secret from the beginning; from the time that it was, there am I: and now the Lord GOD, and his Spirit, hath sent me. 
Thus saith the LORD, thy Redeemer, the Holy One of Israel; I am the LORD thy God which teacheth thee to profit, which leadeth thee by the way that thou shouldest go. 
O that thou hadst hearkened to my commandments! then had thy peace bee
1005,k, which is the border of the children of Ammon; 
The plain also, and Jordan, and the coast thereof, from Chinnereth even unto the sea of the plain, even the salt sea, under Ashdothpisgah eastward. 
And I commanded you at that time, saying, The LORD your God hath given you this land to possess it: ye shall pass over armed before your brethren the children of Israel, all that are meet for the war. 
But your wives, and your little ones, and your cattle, (for I know that ye have much cattle,) shall abide in your cities which I have given you; 
Until the LORD have given rest unto your brethren, as well as unto you, and until they also possess the land which the LORD your God hath given them beyond Jordan: and then shall ye return every man unto his possession, which I have given you. 
And I commanded Joshua at that time, saying, Thine eyes have seen all that the LORD your God hath done unto these two kings: so shall the LORD do unto all the kingdoms whither thou passest. 
Ye shall not fear them
866,ok a yoke of oxen, and slew them, and boiled their flesh with the instruments of the oxen, and gave unto the people, and they did eat. Then he arose, and went after Elijah, and ministered unto him. 
And Benhadad the king of Syria gathered all his host together: and there were thirty and two kings with him, and horses, and chariots; and he went up and besieged Samaria, and warred against it. 
And he sent messengers to Ahab king of Israel into the city, and said unto him, Thus saith Benhadad, 
Thy silver and thy gold is mine; thy wives also and thy children, even the goodliest, are mine. 
And the king of Israel answered and said, My lord, O king, according to thy saying, I am thine, and all that I have. 
And the messengers came again, and said, Thus speaketh Benhadad, saying, Although I have sent unto thee, saying, Thou shalt deliver me thy silver, and thy
813,gs; and by liberal things shall he stand. 
Rise up, ye women that are at ease; hear my voice, ye careless daughters; give ear unto my speech. 
Many days and years shall ye be troubled, ye careless women: for the vintage shall fail, the gathering shall not come. 
Tremble, ye women that are at ease; be troubled, ye careless ones: strip you, and make you bare, and gird sackcloth upon your loins. 
They shall lament for the teats, for the pleasant fields, for the fruitful vine. 
Upon the land of my people shall come up thorns and briers; yea, upon all the houses of joy in the joyous city: 
Because the palaces shall be forsaken; the multitude of the city shall be left; the forts and towers shall be for dens for ever, a joy of wild asses, a pasture of flocks; 
Until the spirit be poured upon us from on high, 
1020,defile it, as it spued out the nations that were before you. 
For whosoever shall commit any of these abominations, even the souls that commit them shall be cut off from among their people. 
Therefore shall ye keep mine ordinance, that ye commit not any one of these abominable customs, which were committed before you, and that ye defile not yourselves therein: I am the LORD your God. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto all the congregation of the children of Israel, and say unto them, Ye shall be holy: for I the LORD your God am holy. 
Ye shall fear every man his mother, and his father, and keep my sabbaths: I am the LORD your God. 
Turn ye not unto idols, nor make to yourselves molten gods: I am the LORD your God. 
And if ye offer a sacrifice of peace offerings unto the LORD, ye shall offer it at your own will. 
It shall be eaten the same day ye offer it, and on the morrow: and if ought remain until the third day, it shall be burnt in the fire. 
And if it be eaten at all on the third day,
1005,ye have dealt with the dead, and with me. 
The LORD grant you that ye may find rest, each of you in the house of her husband. Then she kissed them; and they lifted up their voice, and wept. 
And they said unto her, Surely we will return with thee unto thy people. 
And Naomi said, Turn again, my daughters: why will ye go with me? are there yet any more sons in my womb, that they may be your husbands? 
Turn again, my daughters, go your way; for I am too old to have an husband. If I should say, I have hope, if I should have an husband also to night, and should also bear sons; 
Would ye tarry for them till they were grown? would ye stay for them from having husbands? nay, my daughters; for it grieveth me much for your sakes that the hand of the LORD is gone out against me. 
And they lifted up their voice, and wept again: and Orpah kissed her mother in law; but Ruth clave unto her. 
And she said, Behold, thy sister in law is gone back unto her people, and unto her gods: return thou after thy sis
735,nd said, Arise and eat; because the journey is too great for thee. 
And he arose, and did eat and drink, and went in the strength of that meat forty days and forty nights unto Horeb the mount of God. 
And he came thither unto a cave, and lodged there; and, behold, the word of the LORD came to him, and he said unto him, What doest thou here, Elijah? 
And he said, I have been very jealous for the LORD God of hosts: for the children of Israel have forsaken thy covenant, thrown down thine altars, and slain thy prophets with the sword; and I, even I only, am left; and they seek my life, to take it away. 
And he said, Go forth, and stand upon the mount before the LORD. And, behold, the LORD passed by, and a great and strong wind re
1014,t ephah, and a just bath. 
The ephah and the bath shall be of one measure, that the bath may contain the tenth part of an homer, and the ephah the tenth part of an homer: the measure thereof shall be after the homer. 
And the shekel shall be twenty gerahs: twenty shekels, five and twenty shekels, fifteen shekels, shall be your maneh. 
This is the oblation that ye shall offer; the sixth part of an ephah of an homer of wheat, and ye shall give the sixth part of an ephah of an homer of barley: 
Concerning the ordinance of oil, the bath of oil, ye shall offer the tenth part of a bath out of the cor, which is an homer of ten baths; for ten baths are an homer: 
And one lamb out of the flock, out of two hundred, out of the fat pastures of Israel; for a meat offering, and for a burnt offering, and for peace offerings, to make reconciliation for them, saith the Lord GOD. 
All the people of the land shall give this oblation for the prince in Israel. 
And it shall be the prince's part to give burnt offerings, 
880,ut for war, take them alive. 
So these young men of the princes of the provinces came out of the city, and the army which followed them. 
And they slew every one his man: and the Syrians fled; and Israel pursued them: and Benhadad the king of Syria escaped on an horse with the horsemen. 
And the king of Israel went out, and smote the horses and chariots, and slew the Syrians with a great slaughter. 
And the prophet came to the king of Israel, and said unto him, Go, strengthen thyself, and mark, and see what thou doest: for at the return of the year the king of Syria will come up against thee. 
And the servants of the king of Syria said unto him, Their gods are gods of the hills; therefore they were stronger than we; but let us fight against them in the plain, and surely we shall be stronger than they. 
And do this thing, Take the kings away, every man out of his place
945,n that day, that a man shall nourish a young cow, and two sheep; 
And it shall come to pass, for the abundance of milk that they shall give he shall eat butter: for butter and honey shall every one eat that is left in the land. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that every place shall be, where there were a thousand vines at a thousand silverlings, it shall even be for briers and thorns. 
With arrows and with bows shall men come thither; because all the land shall become briers and thorns. 
And on all hills that shall be digged with the mattock, there shall not come thither the fear of briers and thorns: but it shall be for the sending forth of oxen, and for the treading of lesser cattle. 
Moreover the LORD said unto me, Take thee a great roll, and write in it with a man's pen concerning Mahershalalhashbaz. 
And I took unto me faithful witnesses to record, Uriah the priest, and Zechariah the son of Jeberechiah. 
And I went unt
867, my people: and walk ye in all the ways that I have commanded you, that it may be well unto you. 
But they hearkened not, nor inclined their ear, but walked in the counsels and in the imagination of their evil heart, and went backward, and not forward. 
Since the day that your fathers came forth out of the land of Egypt unto this day I have even sent unto you all my servants the prophets, daily rising up early and sending them: 
Yet they hearkened not unto me, nor inclined their ear, but hardened their neck: they did worse than their fathers. 
Therefore thou shalt speak all these words unto them; but they will not hearken to thee: thou shalt also call unto them; but they will not answer thee. 
But thou shalt say unto them, This is a nation that obeyeth not the voice of the LORD their God, nor receiveth correction: truth is perished, and is cut off from th
900,d said, It was necessary that the word of God should first have been spoken to you: but seeing ye put it from you, and judge yourselves unworthy of everlasting life, lo, we turn to the Gentiles. 
For so hath the Lord commanded us, saying, I have set thee to be a light of the Gentiles, that thou shouldest be for salvation unto the ends of the earth. 
And when the Gentiles heard this, they were glad, and glorified the word of the Lord: and as many as were ordained to eternal life believed. 
And the word of the Lord was published throughout all the region. 
But the Jews stirred up the devout and honourable women, and the chief men of the city, and raised persecution against Paul and Barnabas, and expelled them out of their coasts. 
But they shook off the dust of their feet against them, and came unto Iconium. 
And the disciples were filled with joy, and with the Holy Ghost. 
And it came to 
891,thou and thy people, by the sword, by the famine, and by the pestilence, as the LORD hath spoken against the nation that will not serve the king of Babylon? 
Therefore hearken not unto the words of the prophets that speak unto you, saying, Ye shall not serve the king of Babylon: for they prophesy a lie unto you. 
For I have not sent them, saith the LORD, yet they prophesy a lie in my name; that I might drive you out, and that ye might perish, ye, and the prophets that prophesy unto you. 
Also I spake to the priests and to all this people, saying, Thus saith the LORD; Hearken not to the words of your prophets that prophesy unto you, saying, Behold, the vessels of the LORD's house shall now shortly be brought again from Babylon: for they prophesy a lie unto you. 
Hearken not unto them; serve the king of Babylon, and live: wherefore should this city be laid waste? 
But if they be p
777,y Ghost, and Philip, and Prochorus, and Nicanor, and Timon, and Parmenas, and Nicolas a proselyte of Antioch: 
Whom they set before the apostles: and when they had prayed, they laid their hands on them. 
And the word of God increased; and the number of the disciples multiplied in Jerusalem greatly; and a great company of the priests were obedient to the faith. 
And Stephen, full of faith and power, did great wonders and miracles among the people. 
Then there arose certain of the synagogue, which is called the synagogue of the Libertines, and Cyrenians, and Alexandrians, and of them of Cilicia and of Asia, disputing with Stephen. 
And they were not able to resist the wisdom and the spirit by which he spake. 
Then they suborned men, which said, We have heard him speak 
968,re, and get thee down, and go with them, doubting nothing: for I have sent them. 
Then Peter went down to the men which were sent unto him from Cornelius; and said, Behold, I am he whom ye seek: what is the cause wherefore ye are come? 
And they said, Cornelius the centurion, a just man, and one that feareth God, and of good report among all the nation of the Jews, was warned from God by an holy angel to send for thee into his house, and to hear words of thee. 
Then called he them in, and lodged them. And on the morrow Peter went away with them, and certain brethren from Joppa accompanied him. 
And the morrow after they entered into Caesarea. And Cornelius waited for them, and he had called together his kinsmen and near friends. 
And as Peter was coming in, Cornelius met him, and fell down at his feet, and worshipped him. 
But Peter took him up, saying, Stand up; I myself also am a man. 
And as he talked with him, he went in, and found many that were com
936,as the eagle; for they are gone into captivity from thee. 
Woe to them that devise iniquity, and work evil upon their beds! when the morning is light, they practise it, because it is in the power of their hand. 
And they covet fields, and take them by violence; and houses, and take them away: so they oppress a man and his house, even a man and his heritage. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Behold, against this family do I devise an evil, from which ye shall not remove your necks; neither shall ye go haughtily: for this time is evil. 
In that day shall one take up a parable against you, and lament with a doleful lamentation, and say, We be utterly spoiled: he hath changed the portion of my people: how hath he removed it from me! turning away he hath divided our fields. 
Therefore thou shalt have none that shall cast a cord by lot in the congregation of the LORD. 
Prophesy ye not, say they to them that prophesy: they shall no
928,ll be the vision concerning the daily sacrifice, and the transgression of desolation, to give both the sanctuary and the host to be trodden under foot? 
And he said unto me, Unto two thousand and three hundred days; then shall the sanctuary be cleansed. 
And it came to pass, when I, even I Daniel, had seen the vision, and sought for the meaning, then, behold, there stood before me as the appearance of a man. 
And I heard a man's voice between the banks of Ulai, which called, and said, Gabriel, make this man to understand the vision. 
So he came near where I stood: and when he came, I was afraid, and fell upon my face: but he said unto me, Understand, O son of man: for at the time of the end shall be the vision. 
Now as he was speaking with me, I was in a deep sleep on my face toward the ground: but he touched me, and set me upright. 
And he said, Behold, I will make thee know what shall be in the last end of the in
1018,toward heaven. 
Eat thou not the bread of him that hath an evil eye, neither desire thou his dainty meats: 
For as he thinketh in his heart, so is he: Eat and drink, saith he to thee; but his heart is not with thee. 
The morsel which thou hast eaten shalt thou vomit up, and lose thy sweet words. 
Speak not in the ears of a fool: for he will despise the wisdom of thy words. 
Remove not the old landmark; and enter not into the fields of the fatherless: 
For their redeemer is mighty; he shall plead their cause with thee. 
Apply thine heart unto instruction, and thine ears to the words of knowledge. 
Withhold not correction from the child: for if thou beatest him with the rod, he shall not die. 
Thou shalt beat him with the rod, and shalt deliver his soul from hell. 
My son, if thine heart be wise, my heart shall rejoice, even mine. 
Yea, my reins shall rejoice, when thy lips speak right things. 
Let not thine heart envy sinners: but be thou in the fear of the LORD all the day long. 
For surely there is an 
999,unt to receive the tables of stone, even the tables of the covenant which the LORD made with you, then I abode in the mount forty days and forty nights, I neither did eat bread nor drink water: 
And the LORD delivered unto me two tables of stone written with the finger of God; and on them was written according to all the words, which the LORD spake with you in the mount out of the midst of the fire in the day of the assembly. 
And it came to pass at the end of forty days and forty nights, that the LORD gave me the two tables of stone, even the tables of the covenant. 
And the LORD said unto me, Arise, get thee down quickly from hence; for thy people which thou hast brought forth out of Egypt have corrupted themselves; they are quickly turned aside out of the way which I commanded them; they have made them a molten image. 
Furthermore the LORD spake unto me, saying, I have seen this people, and, behold, it is a stiffnecked people: 
Let me alone, that I may destroy them, and blot out th
752,have given them thy word; and the world hath hated them, because they are not of the world, even as I am not of the world. 
I pray not that thou shouldest take them out of the world, but that thou shouldest keep them from the evil. 
They are not of the world, even as I am not of the world. 
Sanctify them through thy truth: thy word is truth. 
As thou hast sent me into the world, even so have I also sent them into the world. 
And for their sakes I sanctify myself, that they also might be sanctified through the truth. 
Neither pray I for these alone, but for them also which shall believe on me through their word; 
That they all may be one; as thou, Father, art in me, and I in thee, that they also may be one in us: that the world may believe tha
720,all not be called any more Jacob, but Israel shall be thy name: and he called his name Israel. 
And God said unto him, I am God Almighty: be fruitful and multiply; a nation and a company of nations shall be of thee, and kings shall come out of thy loins; 
And the land which I gave Abraham and Isaac, to thee I will give it, and to thy seed after thee will I give the land. 
And God went up from him in the place where he talked with him. 
And Jacob set up a pillar in the place where he talked with him, even a pillar of stone: and he poured a drink offering thereon, and he poured oil thereon. 
And Jacob called the name of the place where God spake with him, Bethel. 
And they journeyed from Bethel; and there was but
756,erself seven days, and after that she shall be clean. 
And on the eighth day she shall take unto her two turtles, or two young pigeons, and bring them unto the priest, to the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And the priest shall offer the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering; and the priest shall make an atonement for her before the LORD for the issue of her uncleanness. 
Thus shall ye separate the children of Israel from their uncleanness; that they die not in their uncleanness, when they defile my tabernacle that is among them. 
This is the law of him that hath an issue, and of him whose seed goeth from him, and is defiled therewith; 
And of her that is sick of her flowers, and of him that hath an issue, of the
854,the Lord GOD, I have no pleasure in the death of the wicked; but that the wicked turn from his way and live: turn ye, turn ye from your evil ways; for why will ye die, O house of Israel? 
Therefore, thou son of man, say unto the children of thy people, The righteousness of the righteous shall not deliver him in the day of his transgression: as for the wickedness of the wicked, he shall not fall thereby in the day that he turneth from his wickedness; neither shall the righteous be able to live for his righteousness in the day that he sinneth. 
When I shall say to the righteous, that he shall surely live; if he trust to his own righteousness, and commit iniquity, all his righteousnesses shall not be remembered; but for his iniquity that he hath committed, he shall die for it. 
Again, when I say unto the wicked, Thou shalt surely die; if he turn
753, gold, and the vessels, even the offering of the house of our God, which the king, and his counsellors, and his lords, and all Israel there present, had offered: 
I even weighed unto their hand six hundred and fifty talents of silver, and silver vessels an hundred talents, and of gold an hundred talents; 
Also twenty basons of gold, of a thousand drams; and two vessels of fine copper, precious as gold. 
And I said unto them, Ye are holy unto the LORD; the vessels are holy also; and the silver and the gold are a freewill offering unto the LORD God of your fathers. 
Watch ye, and keep them, until ye weigh them before the chief of the priests and the Levites, and chief of the fathers of Israel, at Jerusalem, in the chambers of the house of the LO
744,avid arose, and he passed over with the six hundred men that were with him unto Achish, the son of Maoch, king of Gath. 
And David dwelt with Achish at Gath, he and his men, every man with his household, even David with his two wives, Ahinoam the Jezreelitess, and Abigail the Carmelitess, Nabal's wife. 
And it was told Saul that David was fled to Gath: and he sought no more again for him. 
And David said unto Achish, If I have now found grace in thine eyes, let them give me a place in some town in the country, that I may dwell there: for why should thy servant dwell in the royal city with thee? 
Then Achish gave him Ziklag that day: wherefore Ziklag pertaineth unto the kings of Judah unto this day. 
And the time that David dwelt in th
876,ed him, so did he. 
And the LORD said unto Noah, Come thou and all thy house into the ark; for thee have I seen righteous before me in this generation. 
Of every clean beast thou shalt take to thee by sevens, the male and his female: and of beasts that are not clean by two, the male and his female. 
Of fowls also of the air by sevens, the male and the female; to keep seed alive upon the face of all the earth. 
For yet seven days, and I will cause it to rain upon the earth forty days and forty nights; and every living substance that I have made will I destroy from off the face of the earth. 
And Noah did according unto all that the LORD commanded him. 
And Noah was six hundred years old when the flood of waters was upon the earth. 
And Noah went in, and his sons, and his wife, and his sons' wives with him, into the ark, because of the waters of the flood. 
Of clean
731,d: but now once in the end of the world hath he appeared to put away sin by the sacrifice of himself. 
And as it is appointed unto men once to die, but after this the judgment: 
So Christ was once offered to bear the sins of many; and unto them that look for him shall he appear the second time without sin unto salvation. 
For the law having a shadow of good things to come, and not the very image of the things, can never with those sacrifices which they offered year by year continually make the comers thereunto perfect. 
For then would they not have ceased to be offered? because that the worshippers once purged should have had no more conscience of sins. 
But in those sacrifices there is a remembrance again made of sins ev
987, and my salvation shall not tarry: and I will place salvation in Zion for Israel my glory. 
Come down, and sit in the dust, O virgin daughter of Babylon, sit on the ground: there is no throne, O daughter of the Chaldeans: for thou shalt no more be called tender and delicate. 
Take the millstones, and grind meal: uncover thy locks, make bare the leg, uncover the thigh, pass over the rivers. 
Thy nakedness shall be uncovered, yea, thy shame shall be seen: I will take vengeance, and I will not meet thee as a man. 
As for our redeemer, the LORD of hosts is his name, the Holy One of Israel. 
Sit thou silent, and get thee into darkness, O daughter of the Chaldeans: for thou shalt no more be called, The lady of kingdoms. 
I was wroth with my people, I have polluted mine inheritance, and given them into thine hand: thou didst shew them no mercy; upon the ancient hast thou very heavily laid thy yoke. 
And thou saidst, I shall be a lady for ever: so that thou didst not lay these thi
834,red him, Go, and prosper: for the LORD shall deliver it into the hand of the king. 
And the king said unto him, How many times shall I adjure thee that thou tell me nothing but that which is true in the name of the LORD? 
And he said, I saw all Israel scattered upon the hills, as sheep that have not a shepherd: and the LORD said, These have no master: let them return every man to his house in peace. 
And the king of Israel said unto Jehoshaphat, Did I not tell thee that he would prophesy no good concerning me, but evil? 
And he said, Hear thou therefore the word of the LORD: I saw the LORD sitting on his throne, and all the host of heaven standing by him on his right hand and on his left. 
And the LORD said, Who shall persuade Ahab, that he may go up and fall at Ramothgilead? And one said on this manner, and another said o
1001,y ye here, and watch. 
And he went forward a little, and fell on the ground, and prayed that, if it were possible, the hour might pass from him. 
And he said, Abba, Father, all things are possible unto thee; take away this cup from me: nevertheless not what I will, but what thou wilt. 
And he cometh, and findeth them sleeping, and saith unto Peter, Simon, sleepest thou? couldest not thou watch one hour? 
Watch ye and pray, lest ye enter into temptation. The spirit truly is ready, but the flesh is weak. 
And again he went away, and prayed, and spake the same words. 
And when he returned, he found them asleep again, (for their eyes were heavy,) neither wist they what to answer him. 
And he cometh the third time, and saith unto them, Sleep on now, and take your rest: it is enough, the hour is come; behold, the Son of man is betrayed into the hands of sinners. 
Rise up, let us go; lo, he that betrayeth me is at hand. 
And immediately, while he yet spake, cometh Judas, one of the twelve, and
983,h thereon. But let every man take heed how he buildeth thereupon. 
For other foundation can no man lay than that is laid, which is Jesus Christ. 
Now if any man build upon this foundation gold, silver, precious stones, wood, hay, stubble; 
Every man's work shall be made manifest: for the day shall declare it, because it shall be revealed by fire; and the fire shall try every man's work of what sort it is. 
If any man's work abide which he hath built thereupon, he shall receive a reward. 
If any man's work shall be burned, he shall suffer loss: but he himself shall be saved; yet so as by fire. 
Know ye not that ye are the temple of God, and that the Spirit of God dwelleth in you? 
If any man defile the temple of God, him shall God destroy; for the temple of God is holy, which temple ye are. 
Let no man deceive himself. If any man among you seemeth to be wise in this world, let him become a fool, that he may be wise. 
For the wisdom of this world is foolishness with God.
881,vants, Lo, ye see the man is mad: wherefore then have ye brought him to me? 
Have I need of mad men, that ye have brought this fellow to play the mad man in my presence? shall this fellow come into my house? 
David therefore departed thence, and escaped to the cave Adullam: and when his brethren and all his father's house heard it, they went down thither to him. 
And every one that was in distress, and every one that was in debt, and every one that was discontented, gathered themselves unto him; and he became a captain over them: and there were with him about four hundred men. 
And David went thence to Mizpeh of Moab: and he said unto the king of Moab, Let my father and my mother, I pray thee, come forth, and be with you, till I know what God will do for me. 
And he brought them before the king of Moab: and they dwelt with him all the while that David was in the hold. 
877,rd of Joseph's house, and they communed with him at the door of the house, 
And said, O sir, we came indeed down at the first time to buy food: 
And it came to pass, when we came to the inn, that we opened our sacks, and, behold, every man's money was in the mouth of his sack, our money in full weight: and we have brought it again in our hand. 
And other money have we brought down in our hands to buy food: we cannot tell who put our money in our sacks. 
And he said, Peace be to you, fear not: your God, and the God of your father, hath given you treasure in your sacks: I had your money. And he brought Simeon out unto them. 
And the man brought the men into Joseph's house, and gave them water, and they washed their feet; and he gave their asses provender. 
And they made ready the present against Joseph came at noon: for they heard that they should eat bread there. 
A
765,before him: and he loved him greatly; and he became his armourbearer. 
And Saul sent to Jesse, saying, Let David, I pray thee, stand before me; for he hath found favour in my sight. 
And it came to pass, when the evil spirit from God was upon Saul, that David took an harp, and played with his hand: so Saul was refreshed, and was well, and the evil spirit departed from him. 
Now the Philistines gathered together their armies to battle, and were gathered together at Shochoh, which belongeth to Judah, and pitched between Shochoh and Azekah, in Ephesdammim. 
And Saul and the men of Israel were gathered together, and pitched by the valley of Elah, and set the battle in array against the Philistines. 
And the Philistines stood on a mountain on the one side, and
790,r up the pillars of it. Selah. 
I said unto the fools, Deal not foolishly: and to the wicked, Lift not up the horn: 
Lift not up your horn on high: speak not with a stiff neck. 
For promotion cometh neither from the east, nor from the west, nor from the south. 
But God is the judge: he putteth down one, and setteth up another. 
For in the hand of the LORD there is a cup, and the wine is red; it is full of mixture; and he poureth out of the same: but the dregs thereof, all the wicked of the earth shall wring them out, and drink them. 
But I will declare for ever; I will sing praises to the God of Jacob. 
All the horns of the wicked also will I cut off; but the horns of the righteous shall be exalted. 
In Judah is God known: his name is great in Israel. 
In Salem also is his tabern
954, as thyself. 
On these two commandments hang all the law and the prophets. 
While the Pharisees were gathered together, Jesus asked them, 
Saying, What think ye of Christ? whose son is he? They say unto him, The son of David. 
He saith unto them, How then doth David in spirit call him Lord, saying, 
The LORD said unto my Lord, Sit thou on my right hand, till I make thine enemies thy footstool? 
If David then call him Lord, how is he his son? 
And no man was able to answer him a word, neither durst any man from that day forth ask him any more questions. 
Then spake Jesus to the multitude, and to his disciples, 
Saying The scribes and the Pharisees sit in Moses' seat: 
All therefore whatsoever they bid you observe, that observe and do; but do not ye after their works: for they say, and do not. 
For they bind heavy burdens and grievous to be borne, and lay them on men's shoulders; but they themselves will not move them with one of their finger
1055,s shall fear thee. 
For thou hast been a strength to the poor, a strength to the needy in his distress, a refuge from the storm, a shadow from the heat, when the blast of the terrible ones is as a storm against the wall. 
Thou shalt bring down the noise of strangers, as the heat in a dry place; even the heat with the shadow of a cloud: the branch of the terrible ones shall be brought low. 
And in this mountain shall the LORD of hosts make unto all people a feast of fat things, a feast of wines on the lees, of fat things full of marrow, of wines on the lees well refined. 
And he will destroy in this mountain the face of the covering cast over all people, and the vail that is spread over all nations. 
He will swallow up death in victory; and the Lord GOD will wipe away tears from off all faces; and the rebuke of his people shall he take away from off all the earth: for the LORD hath spoken it. 
And it shall be said in that day, Lo, this is our God; we have waited for him, and he will save us: this is the LORD; we have waited for him, we will
987,ereof two hundred. 
Thou that dwellest in the gardens, the companions hearken to thy voice: cause me to hear it. 
Make haste, my beloved, and be thou like to a roe or to a young hart upon the mountains of spices. 
The vision of Isaiah the son of Amoz, which he saw concerning Judah and Jerusalem in the days of Uzziah, Jotham, Ahaz, and Hezekiah, kings of Judah. 
Hear, O heavens, and give ear, O earth: for the LORD hath spoken, I have nourished and brought up children, and they have rebelled against me. 
The ox knoweth his owner, and the ass his master's crib: but Israel doth not know, my people doth not consider. 
Ah sinful nation, a people laden with iniquity, a seed of evildoers, children that are corrupters: they have forsaken the LORD, they have provoked the Holy One of Israel unto anger, they are gone away backward. 
Why should ye be stricken any more? ye will revolt more and more: the whole head is sick, and the whole heart faint. 
From the sole of the foot even unto 
840,ould not hearken unto her voice: but, being stronger than she, forced her, and lay with her. 
Then Amnon hated her exceedingly; so that the hatred wherewith he hated her was greater than the love wherewith he had loved her. And Amnon said unto her, Arise, be gone. 
And she said unto him, There is no cause: this evil in sending me away is greater than the other that thou didst unto me. But he would not hearken unto her. 
Then he called his servant that ministered unto him, and said, Put now this woman out from me, and bolt the door after her. 
And she had a garment of divers colours upon her: for with such robes were the king's daughters that were virgins apparelled. Then his servant brought her out, and bolted the door after her. 
And Tamar put ashes on her head, and rent her garment of divers colours that was on her, and laid h
1062, Thou shalt not go forth: for if we flee away, they will not care for us; neither if half of us die, will they care for us: but now thou art worth ten thousand of us: therefore now it is better that thou succour us out of the city. 
And the king said unto them, What seemeth you best I will do. And the king stood by the gate side, and all the people came out by hundreds and by thousands. 
And the king commanded Joab and Abishai and Ittai, saying, Deal gently for my sake with the young man, even with Absalom. And all the people heard when the king gave all the captains charge concerning Absalom. 
So the people went out into the field against Israel: and the battle was in the wood of Ephraim; 
Where the people of Israel were slain before the servants of David, and there was there a great slaughter that day of twenty thousand men. 
For the battle was there scattered over the face of all the country: and the wood devoured more people that day than the sword devoured. 
And Absalom met the servants of David. And Absalom rode upon a mule, and the mule we
917,hy dross, and take away all thy tin: 
And I will restore thy judges as at the first, and thy counsellors as at the beginning: afterward thou shalt be called, The city of righteousness, the faithful city. 
Zion shall be redeemed with judgment, and her converts with righteousness. 
And the destruction of the transgressors and of the sinners shall be together, and they that forsake the LORD shall be consumed. 
For they shall be ashamed of the oaks which ye have desired, and ye shall be confounded for the gardens that ye have chosen. 
For ye shall be as an oak whose leaf fadeth, and as a garden that hath no water. 
And the strong shall be as tow, and the maker of it as a spark, and they shall both burn together, and none shall quench them. 
The word that Isaiah the son of Amoz saw concerning Judah and Jerusalem. 
And it shall come to pass in the last days, that the mountain of the LORD's house shall be estab
976,hraim and Benjamin and Manasseh stir up thy strength, and come and save us. 
Turn us again, O God, and cause thy face to shine; and we shall be saved. 
O LORD God of hosts, how long wilt thou be angry against the prayer of thy people? 
Thou feedest them with the bread of tears; and givest them tears to drink in great measure. 
Thou makest us a strife unto our neighbours: and our enemies laugh among themselves. 
Turn us again, O God of hosts, and cause thy face to shine; and we shall be saved. 
Thou hast brought a vine out of Egypt: thou hast cast out the heathen, and planted it. 
Thou preparedst room before it, and didst cause it to take deep root, and it filled the land. 
The hills were covered with the shadow of it, and the boughs thereof were like the goodly cedars. 
She sent out her boughs unto the sea, and her branches unto the river. 
Why hast thou then broken down her hedges, so that all they which pass by the way do pluck her? 
The boar out of the wood d
772,D. 
The LORD is my light and my salvation; whom shall I fear? the LORD is the strength of my life; of whom shall I be afraid? 
When the wicked, even mine enemies and my foes, came upon me to eat up my flesh, they stumbled and fell. 
Though an host should encamp against me, my heart shall not fear: though war should rise against me, in this will I be confident. 
One thing have I desired of the LORD, that will I seek after; that I may dwell in the house of the LORD all the days of my life, to behold the beauty of the LORD, and to enquire in his temple. 
For in the time of trouble he shall hide me in his pavilion: in the secret of his tabernacle shall he hide me; he shall set me up upon a rock. 
And now shall mine head be lifted up above mine enemies round about me
1050,ess as the eagle; for they are gone into captivity from thee. 
Woe to them that devise iniquity, and work evil upon their beds! when the morning is light, they practise it, because it is in the power of their hand. 
And they covet fields, and take them by violence; and houses, and take them away: so they oppress a man and his house, even a man and his heritage. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Behold, against this family do I devise an evil, from which ye shall not remove your necks; neither shall ye go haughtily: for this time is evil. 
In that day shall one take up a parable against you, and lament with a doleful lamentation, and say, We be utterly spoiled: he hath changed the portion of my people: how hath he removed it from me! turning away he hath divided our fields. 
Therefore thou shalt have none that shall cast a cord by lot in the congregation of the LORD. 
Prophesy ye not, say they to them that prophesy: they shall not prophesy to them, that they shall not take shame. 
O thou that art named the house of Jacob, is the spirit o
727, then the priest shall pronounce him clean: and he shall wash his clothes, and be clean. 
But if the scall spread much in the skin after his cleansing; 
Then the priest shall look on him: and, behold, if the scall be spread in the skin, the priest shall not seek for yellow hair; he is unclean. 
But if the scall be in his sight at a stay, and that there is black hair grown up therein; the scall is healed, he is clean: and the priest shall pronounce him clean. 
If a man also or a woman have in the skin of their flesh bright spots, even white bright spots; 
Then the priest shall look: and, behold, if the bright spots in the skin of their flesh be darkish white; it is a freckled spot that groweth in the skin; he is clean.
887, 
Preach the word; be instant in season, out of season; reprove, rebuke, exhort with all long suffering and doctrine. 
For the time will come when they will not endure sound doctrine; but after their own lusts shall they heap to themselves teachers, having itching ears; 
And they shall turn away their ears from the truth, and shall be turned unto fables. 
But watch thou in all things, endure afflictions, do the work of an evangelist, make full proof of thy ministry. 
For I am now ready to be offered, and the time of my departure is at hand. 
I have fought a good fight, I have finished my course, I have kept the faith: 
Henceforth there is laid up for me a crown of righteousness, which the Lord, the righteous judge, shall give me at that day: and not to me only, but unto all them also that love his appearing. 
Do thy diligence to come shortly unto me: 
For Demas hath forsaken
1048,t he did not that which was right in the sight of the LORD, like David his father: 
For he walked in the ways of the kings of Israel, and made also molten images for Baalim. 
Moreover he burnt incense in the valley of the son of Hinnom, and burnt his children in the fire, after the abominations of the heathen whom the LORD had cast out before the children of Israel. 
He sacrificed also and burnt incense in the high places, and on the hills, and under every green tree. 
Wherefore the LORD his God delivered him into the hand of the king of Syria; and they smote him, and carried away a great multitude of them captives, and brought them to Damascus. And he was also delivered into the hand of the king of Israel, who smote him with a great slaughter. 
For Pekah the son of Remaliah slew in Judah an hundred and twenty thousand in one day, which were all valiant men; because they had forsaken the LORD God of their fathers. 
And Zichri, a mighty man of Ephraim, slew Maaseiah the king's son, and Azrikam the governor of the house, and Elkanah t
1041,laces: and her time is near to come, and her days shall not be prolonged. 
For the LORD will have mercy on Jacob, and will yet choose Israel, and set them in their own land: and the strangers shall be joined with them, and they shall cleave to the house of Jacob. 
And the people shall take them, and bring them to their place: and the house of Israel shall possess them in the land of the LORD for servants and handmaids: and they shall take them captives, whose captives they were; and they shall rule over their oppressors. 
And it shall come to pass in the day that the LORD shall give thee rest from thy sorrow, and from thy fear, and from the hard bondage wherein thou wast made to serve, 
That thou shalt take up this proverb against the king of Babylon, and say, How hath the oppressor ceased! the golden city ceased! 
The LORD hath broken the staff of the wicked, and the sceptre of the rulers. 
He who smote the people in wrath with a continual stroke, he that ruled the nations in anger, is persecuted, and none hindereth. 
The wh
1028,And their brethren the sons of Merari stood on the left hand: Ethan the son of Kishi, the son of Abdi, the son of Malluch, 
The son of Hashabiah, the son of Amaziah, the son of Hilkiah, 
The son of Amzi, the son of Bani, the son of Shamer, 
The son of Mahli, the son of Mushi, the son of Merari, the son of Levi. 
Their brethren also the Levites were appointed unto all manner of service of the tabernacle of the house of God. 
But Aaron and his sons offered upon the altar of the burnt offering, and on the altar of incense, and were appointed for all the work of the place most holy, and to make an atonement for Israel, according to all that Moses the servant of God had commanded. 
And these are the sons of Aaron; Eleazar his son, Phinehas his son, Abishua his son, 
Bukki his son, Uzzi his son, Zerahiah his son, 
Meraioth his son, Amariah his son, Ahitub his son, 
Zadok his son, Ahimaaz his son. 
Now these are their dwelling places throughout their castles in their coasts, of the sons of Aaron, of the families of the 
860, men, yet have I made myself servant unto all, that I might gain the more. 
And unto the Jews I became as a Jew, that I might gain the Jews; to them that are under the law, as under the law, that I might gain them that are under the law; 
To them that are without law, as without law, (being not without law to God, but under the law to Christ,) that I might gain them that are without law. 
To the weak became I as weak, that I might gain the weak: I am made all things to all men, that I might by all means save some. 
And this I do for the gospel's sake, that I might be partaker thereof with you. 
Know ye not that they which run in a race run all, but one receiveth the prize? So run, that ye may obtain. 
And every man that striveth for the mastery is temperate in all things. Now they do it to obtain a corruptible crown; but we an incorruptible. 
I the
743,and spoil them until the morning light, and let us not leave a man of them. And they said, Do whatsoever seemeth good unto thee. Then said the priest, Let us draw near hither unto God. 
And Saul asked counsel of God, Shall I go down after the Philistines? wilt thou deliver them into the hand of Israel? But he answered him not that day. 
And Saul said, Draw ye near hither, all the chief of the people: and know and see wherein this sin hath been this day. 
For, as the LORD liveth, which saveth Israel, though it be in Jonathan my son, he shall surely die. But there was not a man among all the people that answered him. 
Then said he unto all Israel, Be ye on one side, and I and Jonathan my son will be on the other side. And the people sa
988,pon his sons; and the Philistines slew Jonathan, and Abinadab, and Melchishua, Saul's sons. 
And the battle went sore against Saul, and the archers hit him; and he was sore wounded of the archers. 
Then said Saul unto his armourbearer, Draw thy sword, and thrust me through therewith; lest these uncircumcised come and thrust me through, and abuse me. But his armourbearer would not; for he was sore afraid. Therefore Saul took a sword, and fell upon it. 
And when his armourbearer saw that Saul was dead, he fell likewise upon his sword, and died with him. 
So Saul died, and his three sons, and his armourbearer, and all his men, that same day together. 
And when the men of Israel that were on the other side of the valley, and they that were on the other side Jordan, saw that the men of Israel fled, and that Saul and his sons were dead, they forsook the cities, and fled; and the Philistines came and dwelt in them. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, when the Philistines came to s
885,nces as Zebah, and as Zalmunna: 
Who said, Let us take to ourselves the houses of God in possession. 
O my God, make them like a wheel; as the stubble before the wind. 
As the fire burneth a wood, and as the flame setteth the mountains on fire; 
So persecute them with thy tempest, and make them afraid with thy storm. 
Fill their faces with shame; that they may seek thy name, O LORD. 
Let them be confounded and troubled for ever; yea, let them be put to shame, and perish: 
That men may know that thou, whose name alone is JEHOVAH, art the most high over all the earth. 
How amiable are thy tabernacles, O LORD of hosts! 
My soul longeth, yea, even fainteth for the courts of the LORD: my heart and my flesh crieth out for the living God. 
Yea, the sparrow hath found an house, and the swallow a nest for herself, where she may lay her young, even thine altars, O LORD of hosts, my 
765,Shimei his brother was the next. 
And Jehiel, and Azaziah, and Nahath, and Asahel, and Jerimoth, and Jozabad, and Eliel, and Ismachiah, and Mahath, and Benaiah, were overseers under the hand of Cononiah and Shimei his brother, at the commandment of Hezekiah the king, and Azariah the ruler of the house of God. 
And Kore the son of Imnah the Levite, the porter toward the east, was over the freewill offerings of God, to distribute the oblations of the LORD, and the most holy things. 
And next him were Eden, and Miniamin, and Jeshua, and Shemaiah, Amariah, and Shecaniah, in the cities of the priests, in their set office, to give to their brethren by courses, as well to the great as to the small: 
Beside their genealogy of males, from three years old and upwar
773, also was Jecoliah of Jerusalem. 
And he did that which was right in the sight of the LORD, according to all that his father Amaziah did. 
And he sought God in the days of Zechariah, who had understanding in the visions of God: and as long as he sought the LORD, God made him to prosper. 
And he went forth and warred against the Philistines, and brake down the wall of Gath, and the wall of Jabneh, and the wall of Ashdod, and built cities about Ashdod, and among the Philistines. 
And God helped him against the Philistines, and against the Arabians that dwelt in Gurbaal, and the Mehunims. 
And the Ammonites gave gifts to Uzziah: and his name spread abroad even to the entering in of Egypt; for he strengthened himself exceedingly. 
Moreover Uzziah built towers in Jeru
729,n the midst of the sea: for I have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD: and it shall become a spoil to the nations. 
And her daughters which are in the field shall be slain by the sword; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will bring upon Tyrus Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, a king of kings, from the north, with horses, and with chariots, and with horsemen, and companies, and much people. 
He shall slay with the sword thy daughters in the field: and he shall make a fort against thee, and cast a mount against thee, and lift up the buckler against thee. 
And he shall set engines of war against thy walls, and with his axes he shall break down thy towers. 
By reason of the abundance of
824,ther knoweth. 
And they two made a covenant before the LORD: and David abode in the wood, and Jonathan went to his house. 
Then came up the Ziphites to Saul to Gibeah, saying, Doth not David hide himself with us in strong holds in the wood, in the hill of Hachilah, which is on the south of Jeshimon? 
Now therefore, O king, come down according to all the desire of thy soul to come down; and our part shall be to deliver him into the king's hand. 
And Saul said, Blessed be ye of the LORD; for ye have compassion on me. 
Go, I pray you, prepare yet, and know and see his place where his haunt is, and who hath seen him there: for it is told me that he dealeth very subtilly. 
See therefore, and take knowledge of all the lurking places where he hideth himself, and come ye again to me with the certainty, and I will go with
1058,en, and their sockets ten. 
And the breadth of the court on the east side eastward shall be fifty cubits. 
The hangings of one side of the gate shall be fifteen cubits: their pillars three, and their sockets three. 
And on the other side shall be hangings fifteen cubits: their pillars three, and their sockets three. 
And for the gate of the court shall be an hanging of twenty cubits, of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen, wrought with needlework: and their pillars shall be four, and their sockets four. 
All the pillars round about the court shall be filleted with silver; their hooks shall be of silver, and their sockets of brass. 
The length of the court shall be an hundred cubits, and the breadth fifty every where, and the height five cubits of fine twined linen, and their sockets of brass. 
All the vessels of the tabernacle in all the service thereof, and all the pins thereof, and all the pins of the court, shall be of brass. 
And thou shalt command the children of Israel, that they bring thee pure oil olive beaten for the
728, came into the city, and found as he had said unto them: and they made ready the passover. 
And in the evening he cometh with the twelve. 
And as they sat and did eat, Jesus said, Verily I say unto you, One of you which eateth with me shall betray me. 
And they began to be sorrowful, and to say unto him one by one, Is it I? and another said, Is it I? 
And he answered and said unto them, It is one of the twelve, that dippeth with me in the dish. 
The Son of man indeed goeth, as it is written of him: but woe to that man by whom the Son of man is betrayed! good were it for that man if he had never been born. 
And as they did eat, Jesus took bread, and blessed, and brake it, and gave to them, and said, Take, eat: this is m
983,for my comfort, according to thy word unto thy servant. 
Let thy tender mercies come unto me, that I may live: for thy law is my delight. 
Let the proud be ashamed; for they dealt perversely with me without a cause: but I will meditate in thy precepts. 
Let those that fear thee turn unto me, and those that have known thy testimonies. 
Let my heart be sound in thy statutes; that I be not ashamed. 
My soul fainteth for thy salvation: but I hope in thy word. 
Mine eyes fail for thy word, saying, When wilt thou comfort me? 
For I am become like a bottle in the smoke; yet do I not forget thy statutes. 
How many are the days of thy servant? when wilt thou execute judgment on them that persecute me? 
The proud have digged pits for me, which are not after thy law. 
All thy commandments are faithful: they persecute me wrongfully; help thou me. 
They had almost consumed me upon earth; but I forsook not thy precepts. 
Quicken me after thy lovingkindness; so shall I keep the testi
858,ery one of them, shall go into captivity; and they that spoil thee shall be a spoil, and all that prey upon thee will I give for a prey. 
For I will restore health unto thee, and I will heal thee of thy wounds, saith the LORD; because they called thee an Outcast, saying, This is Zion, whom no man seeketh after. 
Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will bring again the captivity of Jacob's tents, and have mercy on his dwellingplaces; and the city shall be builded upon her own heap, and the palace shall remain after the manner thereof. 
And out of them shall proceed thanksgiving and the voice of them that make merry: and I will multiply them, and they shall not be few; I will also glorify them, and they shall not be small. 
Their children also shall be as aforetime, and their congregation shall be established before me, and I will punish all that oppres
885,s: 
Who by the mouth of thy servant David hast said, Why did the heathen rage, and the people imagine vain things? 
The kings of the earth stood up, and the rulers were gathered together against the Lord, and against his Christ. 
For of a truth against thy holy child Jesus, whom thou hast anointed, both Herod, and Pontius Pilate, with the Gentiles, and the people of Israel, were gathered together, 
For to do whatsoever thy hand and thy counsel determined before to be done. 
And now, Lord, behold their threatenings: and grant unto thy servants, that with all boldness they may speak thy word, 
By stretching forth thine hand to heal; and that signs and wonders may be done by the name of thy holy child Jesus. 
And when they had prayed, the place was shaken where they were assembled together; and they were all filled with the Holy Ghost, and they spake the word of God with bold
938,God hath said, Ye shall not eat of it, neither shall ye touch it, lest ye die. 
And the serpent said unto the woman, Ye shall not surely die: 
For God doth know that in the day ye eat thereof, then your eyes shall be opened, and ye shall be as gods, knowing good and evil. 
And when the woman saw that the tree was good for food, and that it was pleasant to the eyes, and a tree to be desired to make one wise, she took of the fruit thereof, and did eat, and gave also unto her husband with her; and he did eat. 
And the eyes of them both were opened, and they knew that they were naked; and they sewed fig leaves together, and made themselves aprons. 
And they heard the voice of the LORD God walking in the garden in the cool of the day: and Adam and his wife hid themselves from the presence of the LORD God amongst the trees of the garden. 
And the LORD God called unto Adam, and said unto him, Where art thou? 
And he said, I heard t
829,ebulun. 
And afterwards she bare a daughter, and called her name Dinah. 
And God remembered Rachel, and God hearkened to her, and opened her womb. 
And she conceived, and bare a son; and said, God hath taken away my reproach: 
And she called his name Joseph; and said, The LORD shall add to me another son. 
And it came to pass, when Rachel had born Joseph, that Jacob said unto Laban, Send me away, that I may go unto mine own place, and to my country. 
Give me my wives and my children, for whom I have served thee, and let me go: for thou knowest my service which I have done thee. 
And Laban said unto him, I pray thee, if I have found favour in thine eyes, tarry: for I have learned by experience that the LORD hath blessed me for thy sake. 
And he said, Appoint me thy wages, and I will give it. 
And he said unto him, Thou
791,eived me. 
I charge you, O ye daughters of Jerusalem, by the roes, and by the hinds of the field, that ye stir not up, nor awake my love, till he please. 
Who is this that cometh out of the wilderness like pillars of smoke, perfumed with myrrh and frankincense, with all powders of the merchant? 
Behold his bed, which is Solomon's; threescore valiant men are about it, of the valiant of Israel. 
They all hold swords, being expert in war: every man hath his sword upon his thigh because of fear in the night. 
King Solomon made himself a chariot of the wood of Lebanon. 
He made the pillars thereof of silver, the bottom thereof of gold, the covering of it of purple, the midst thereof being paved with love, for the daughters of Jerusalem. 
Go forth, O ye daughters of Zion, and behold kin
722,y, what do ye more than others? do not even the publicans so? 
Be ye therefore perfect, even as your Father which is in heaven is perfect. 
Take heed that ye do not your alms before men, to be seen of them: otherwise ye have no reward of your Father which is in heaven. 
Therefore when thou doest thine alms, do not sound a trumpet before thee, as the hypocrites do in the synagogues and in the streets, that they may have glory of men. Verily I say unto you, They have their reward. 
But when thou doest alms, let not thy left hand know what thy right hand doeth: 
That thine alms may be in secret: and thy Father which seeth in secret himself shall reward thee openly. 
And when thou prayest, thou shalt not be as the hy
804,h open mouth. For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still. 
For the people turneth not unto him that smiteth them, neither do they seek the LORD of hosts. 
Therefore the LORD will cut off from Israel head and tail, branch and rush, in one day. 
The ancient and honourable, he is the head; and the prophet that teacheth lies, he is the tail. 
For the leaders of this people cause them to err; and they that are led of them are destroyed. 
Therefore the LORD shall have no joy in their young men, neither shall have mercy on their fatherless and widows: for every one is an hypocrite and an evildoer, and every mouth speaketh folly. For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still. 
For wickedness burneth as the fire: it shall devour the b
1052, son of Saul, and twelve of the servants of David. 
And they caught every one his fellow by the head, and thrust his sword in his fellow's side; so they fell down together: wherefore that place was called Helkathhazzurim, which is in Gibeon. 
And there was a very sore battle that day; and Abner was beaten, and the men of Israel, before the servants of David. 
And there were three sons of Zeruiah there, Joab, and Abishai, and Asahel: and Asahel was as light of foot as a wild roe. 
And Asahel pursued after Abner; and in going he turned not to the right hand nor to the left from following Abner. 
Then Abner looked behind him, and said, Art thou Asahel? And he answered, I am. 
And Abner said to him, Turn thee aside to thy right hand or to thy left, and lay thee hold on one of the young men, and take thee his armour. But Asahel would not turn aside from following of him. 
And Abner said again to Asahel, Turn thee aside from following me: wherefore should I smite thee to the ground? how then should I hold up my face to Joab thy brother? 
Howb
1045,ere be a controversy between men, and they come unto judgment, that the judges may judge them; then they shall justify the righteous, and condemn the wicked. 
And it shall be, if the wicked man be worthy to be beaten, that the judge shall cause him to lie down, and to be beaten before his face, according to his fault, by a certain number. 
Forty stripes he may give him, and not exceed: lest, if he should exceed, and beat him above these with many stripes, then thy brother should seem vile unto thee. 
Thou shalt not muzzle the ox when he treadeth out the corn. 
If brethren dwell together, and one of them die, and have no child, the wife of the dead shall not marry without unto a stranger: her husband's brother shall go in unto her, and take her to him to wife, and perform the duty of an husband's brother unto her. 
And it shall be, that the firstborn which she beareth shall succeed in the name of his brother which is dead, that his name be not put out of Israel. 
And if the man like not to take his brother's wife, then let his bro
773, angels into Abraham's bosom: the rich man also died, and was buried; 
And in hell he lift up his eyes, being in torments, and seeth Abraham afar off, and Lazarus in his bosom. 
And he cried and said, Father Abraham, have mercy on me, and send Lazarus, that he may dip the tip of his finger in water, and cool my tongue; for I am tormented in this flame. 
But Abraham said, Son, remember that thou in thy lifetime receivedst thy good things, and likewise Lazarus evil things: but now he is comforted, and thou art tormented. 
And beside all this, between us and you there is a great gulf fixed: so that they which would pass from hence to you cannot; neither can they pass to us, that would come from thence. 
Then he said, I pray thee therefore, father, that thou wouldest
1004,thgilead: and the Syrians smote Joram. 
And he returned to be healed in Jezreel because of the wounds which were given him at Ramah, when he fought with Hazael king of Syria. And Azariah the son of Jehoram king of Judah went down to see Jehoram the son of Ahab at Jezreel, because he was sick. 
And the destruction of Ahaziah was of God by coming to Joram: for when he was come, he went out with Jehoram against Jehu the son of Nimshi, whom the LORD had anointed to cut off the house of Ahab. 
And it came to pass, that, when Jehu was executing judgment upon the house of Ahab, and found the princes of Judah, and the sons of the brethren of Ahaziah, that ministered to Ahaziah, he slew them. 
And he sought Ahaziah: and they caught him, (for he was hid in Samaria,) and brought him to Jehu: and when they had slain him, they buried him: Because, said they, he is the son of Jehoshaphat, who sought the LORD with all his heart. So the house of Ahaziah had no power to keep still the kingdom. 
But when At
928,re all filled: and there was taken up of fragments that remained to them twelve baskets. 
And it came to pass, as he was alone praying, his disciples were with him: and he asked them, saying, Whom say the people that I am? 
They answering said, John the Baptist; but some say, Elias; and others say, that one of the old prophets is risen again. 
He said unto them, But whom say ye that I am? Peter answering said, The Christ of God. 
And he straitly charged them, and commanded them to tell no man that thing; 
Saying, The Son of man must suffer many things, and be rejected of the elders and chief priests and scribes, and be slain, and be raised the third day. 
And he said to them all, If any man will come after me, let him deny himself, and take up his cross daily, and follow me. 
For whosoever will save his life shall lose it: but whosoever will lose his life for my sake, the same shall save it. 
For what is a man adva
989,re the place for the fifty righteous that are therein? 
That be far from thee to do after this manner, to slay the righteous with the wicked: and that the righteous should be as the wicked, that be far from thee: Shall not the Judge of all the earth do right? 
And the LORD said, If I find in Sodom fifty righteous within the city, then I will spare all the place for their sakes. 
And Abraham answered and said, Behold now, I have taken upon me to speak unto the LORD, which am but dust and ashes: 
Peradventure there shall lack five of the fifty righteous: wilt thou destroy all the city for lack of five? And he said, If I find there forty and five, I will not destroy it. 
And he spake unto him yet again, and said, Peradventure there shall be forty found there. And he said, I will not do it for forty's sake. 
And he said unto him, Oh let not the LORD be angry, and I will speak: Peradventure there shall thirty be found there. And he said, I will not do it, if I find thirty there. 
783,, whatsoever sickness there be; 
What prayer and supplication soever be made by any man, or by all thy people Israel, which shall know every man the plague of his own heart, and spread forth his hands toward this house: 
Then hear thou in heaven thy dwelling place, and forgive, and do, and give to every man according to his ways, whose heart thou knowest; (for thou, even thou only, knowest the hearts of all the children of men;) 
That they may fear thee all the days that they live in the land which thou gavest unto our fathers. 
Moreover concerning a stranger, that is not of thy people Israel, but cometh out of a far country for thy name's sake; 
(For they shall hear of thy great name, and of thy strong hand, and of thy stretched out arm;) when he shall come and pray towar
793, 
I am Alpha and Omega, the beginning and the ending, saith the Lord, which is, and which was, and which is to come, the Almighty. 
I John, who also am your brother, and companion in tribulation, and in the kingdom and patience of Jesus Christ, was in the isle that is called Patmos, for the word of God, and for the testimony of Jesus Christ. 
I was in the Spirit on the Lord's day, and heard behind me a great voice, as of a trumpet, 
Saying, I am Alpha and Omega, the first and the last: and, What thou seest, write in a book, and send it unto the seven churches which are in Asia; unto Ephesus, and unto Smyrna, and unto Pergamos, and unto Thyatira, and unto Sardis, and unto Philadelphia, and unto Laodicea. 
And I turned to see the voice that spake with me. And being turned, I saw seven
892,gh these three men were in it, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, they shall deliver neither sons nor daughters; they only shall be delivered, but the land shall be desolate. 
Or if I bring a sword upon that land, and say, Sword, go through the land; so that I cut off man and beast from it: 
Though these three men were in it, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, they shall deliver neither sons nor daughters, but they only shall be delivered themselves. 
Or if I send a pestilence into that land, and pour out my fury upon it in blood, to cut off from it man and beast: 
Though Noah, Daniel, and Job were in it, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, they shall deliver neither son nor daughter; they shall but deliver their own souls by their righteousness. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; How much more when I send my four sore judgments upon Jerusalem, the sword, and the famine, and the noisome beast, and
936,he trumpet? 
For my people is foolish, they have not known me; they are sottish children, and they have none understanding: they are wise to do evil, but to do good they have no knowledge. 
I beheld the earth, and, lo, it was without form, and void; and the heavens, and they had no light. 
I beheld the mountains, and, lo, they trembled, and all the hills moved lightly. 
I beheld, and, lo, there was no man, and all the birds of the heavens were fled. 
I beheld, and, lo, the fruitful place was a wilderness, and all the cities thereof were broken down at the presence of the LORD, and by his fierce anger. 
For thus hath the LORD said, The whole land shall be desolate; yet will I not make a full end. 
For this shall the earth mourn, and the heavens above be black; because I have spoken it, I have purposed it, and will not repent, neither will I turn back from it. 
The whole city shall flee for the noise of the horsemen and bowm
916,ing lips a prince. 
A gift is as a precious stone in the eyes of him that hath it: whithersoever it turneth, it prospereth. 
He that covereth a transgression seeketh love; but he that repeateth a matter separateth very friends. 
A reproof entereth more into a wise man than an hundred stripes into a fool. 
An evil man seeketh only rebellion: therefore a cruel messenger shall be sent against him. 
Let a bear robbed of her whelps meet a man, rather than a fool in his folly. 
Whoso rewardeth evil for good, evil shall not depart from his house. 
The beginning of strife is as when one letteth out water: therefore leave off contention, before it be meddled with. 
He that justifieth the wicked, and he that condemneth the just, even they both are abomination to the LORD. 
Wherefore is there a price in the hand of a fool to get wisdom, seeing he hath no heart to it? 
A friend loveth at all times, and a brother is
1063,n Amalekite. 
He said unto me again, Stand, I pray thee, upon me, and slay me: for anguish is come upon me, because my life is yet whole in me. 
So I stood upon him, and slew him, because I was sure that he could not live after that he was fallen: and I took the crown that was upon his head, and the bracelet that was on his arm, and have brought them hither unto my lord. 
Then David took hold on his clothes, and rent them; and likewise all the men that were with him: 
And they mourned, and wept, and fasted until even, for Saul, and for Jonathan his son, and for the people of the LORD, and for the house of Israel; because they were fallen by the sword. 
And David said unto the young man that told him, Whence art thou? And he answered, I am the son of a stranger, an Amalekite. 
And David said unto him, How wast thou not afraid to stretch forth thine hand to destroy the LORD's anointed? 
And David called one of the young men, and said, Go near, and fall upon him. And he smote him that he died. 
And David said unto him, Thy blood be upon thy head; for
839,ndled. 
And he sent messengers unto Abimelech privily, saying, Behold, Gaal the son of Ebed and his brethren be come to Shechem; and, behold, they fortify the city against thee. 
Now therefore up by night, thou and the people that is with thee, and lie in wait in the field: 
And it shall be, that in the morning, as soon as the sun is up, thou shalt rise early, and set upon the city: and, behold, when he and the people that is with him come out against thee, then mayest thou do to them as thou shalt find occasion. 
And Abimelech rose up, and all the people that were with him, by night, and they laid wait against Shechem in four companies. 
And Gaal the son of Ebed went out, and stood in the entering of the gate of the city: and Abimelech rose up, and the people that were with him, from lying in wait. 
And when Gaal saw the peopl
734,ereto, thou shalt kill the woman, and the beast: they shall surely be put to death; their blood shall be upon them. 
And if a man shall take his sister, his father's daughter, or his mother's daughter, and see her nakedness, and she see his nakedness; it is a wicked thing; and they shall be cut off in the sight of their people: he hath uncovered his sister's nakedness; he shall bear his iniquity. 
And if a man shall lie with a woman having her sickness, and shall uncover her nakedness; he hath discovered her fountain, and she hath uncovered the fountain of her blood: and both of them shall be cut off from among their people. 
And thou shalt not uncover the nakedness of thy mother's sister, nor of thy father's sister: for he 
748,e shall shut; and he shall shut, and none shall open. 
And I will fasten him as a nail in a sure place; and he shall be for a glorious throne to his father's house. 
And they shall hang upon him all the glory of his father's house, the offspring and the issue, all vessels of small quantity, from the vessels of cups, even to all the vessels of flagons. 
In that day, saith the LORD of hosts, shall the nail that is fastened in the sure place be removed, and be cut down, and fall; and the burden that was upon it shall be cut off: for the LORD hath spoken it. 
The burden of Tyre. Howl, ye ships of Tarshish; for it is laid waste, so that there is no house, no entering in: from the land of Chittim it is revealed to them. 
Be still, ye inhabitant
992,d, blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen. 
And they did beat the gold into thin plates, and cut it into wires, to work it in the blue, and in the purple, and in the scarlet, and in the fine linen, with cunning work. 
They made shoulderpieces for it, to couple it together: by the two edges was it coupled together. 
And the curious girdle of his ephod, that was upon it, was of the same, according to the work thereof; of gold, blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And they wrought onyx stones inclosed in ouches of gold, graven, as signets are graven, with the names of the children of Israel. 
And he put them on the shoulders of the ephod, that they should be stones for a memorial to the children of Israel; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he made the breastplate of cunning work, like the work of the ephod; of gold, blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen. 
It was foursquare; they made the breastplate double
947,for the corn is wasted: the new wine is dried up, the oil languisheth. 
Be ye ashamed, O ye husbandmen; howl, O ye vinedressers, for the wheat and for the barley; because the harvest of the field is perished. 
The vine is dried up, and the fig tree languisheth; the pomegranate tree, the palm tree also, and the apple tree, even all the trees of the field, are withered: because joy is withered away from the sons of men. 
Gird yourselves, and lament, ye priests: howl, ye ministers of the altar: come, lie all night in sackcloth, ye ministers of my God: for the meat offering and the drink offering is withholden from the house of your God. 
Sanctify ye a fast, call a solemn assembly, gather the elders and all the inhabitants of the land into the house of the LORD your God, and cry unto the LORD, 
Alas for the day! for the day of the LORD is at hand, and as a destruction from the Almighty shall it come. 
Is not the meat cut off before our e
977,med great unto me: 
There was a little city, and few men within it; and there came a great king against it, and besieged it, and built great bulwarks against it: 
Now there was found in it a poor wise man, and he by his wisdom delivered the city; yet no man remembered that same poor man. 
Then said I, Wisdom is better than strength: nevertheless the poor man's wisdom is despised, and his words are not heard. 
The words of wise men are heard in quiet more than the cry of him that ruleth among fools. 
Wisdom is better than weapons of war: but one sinner destroyeth much good. 
Dead flies cause the ointment of the apothecary to send forth a stinking savour: so doth a little folly him that is in reputation for wisdom and honour. 
A wise man's heart is at his right hand; but a fool's heart at his left. 
Yea also, when he that is a fool walketh by the way, his wisdom faileth him, and he saith to every one that he is a fool. 
If the spirit of the ruler rise up against th
915,othes, and he shall bathe his flesh in water, and afterward he shall come into the camp, and the priest shall be unclean until the even. 
And he that burneth her shall wash his clothes in water, and bathe his flesh in water, and shall be unclean until the even. 
And a man that is clean shall gather up the ashes of the heifer, and lay them up without the camp in a clean place, and it shall be kept for the congregation of the children of Israel for a water of separation: it is a purification for sin. 
And he that gathereth the ashes of the heifer shall wash his clothes, and be unclean until the even: and it shall be unto the children of Israel, and unto the stranger that sojourneth among them, for a statute for ever. 
He that toucheth the dead body of any man shall be unclean seven days. 
He shall purify himself with it on the third day, and on the seventh day he shall be clean: but if he purify not hims
1004,lled upon Nebuchadnezzar: and he was driven from men, and did eat grass as oxen, and his body was wet with the dew of heaven, till his hairs were grown like eagles' feathers, and his nails like birds' claws. 
And at the end of the days I Nebuchadnezzar lifted up mine eyes unto heaven, and mine understanding returned unto me, and I blessed the most High, and I praised and honoured him that liveth for ever, whose dominion is an everlasting dominion, and his kingdom is from generation to generation: 
And all the inhabitants of the earth are reputed as nothing: and he doeth according to his will in the army of heaven, and among the inhabitants of the earth: and none can stay his hand, or say unto him, What doest thou? 
At the same time my reason returned unto me; and for the glory of my kingdom, mine honour and brightness returned unto me; and my counsellors and my lords sought unto me; and I was established in my kingdom, and excellent majesty was added unto me. 
Now I Nebuchadnezzar praise a
867,in thy truth. 
I have not sat with vain persons, neither will I go in with dissemblers. 
I have hated the congregation of evil doers; and will not sit with the wicked. 
I will wash mine hands in innocency: so will I compass thine altar, O LORD: 
That I may publish with the voice of thanksgiving, and tell of all thy wondrous works. 
LORD, I have loved the habitation of thy house, and the place where thine honour dwelleth. 
Gather not my soul with sinners, nor my life with bloody men: 
In whose hands is mischief, and their right hand is full of bribes. 
But as for me, I will walk in mine integrity: redeem me, and be merciful unto me. 
My foot standeth in an even place: in the congregations will I bless the LORD. 
The LORD is my light and my salvation; whom shall I fear? the LORD is the strength of my life; of whom shall I be afraid? 
When the wicked, even m
828,n ye be come over Jordan into the land of Canaan; 
Then ye shall appoint you cities to be cities of refuge for you; that the slayer may flee thither, which killeth any person at unawares. 
And they shall be unto you cities for refuge from the avenger; that the manslayer die not, until he stand before the congregation in judgment. 
And of these cities which ye shall give six cities shall ye have for refuge. 
Ye shall give three cities on this side Jordan, and three cities shall ye give in the land of Canaan, which shall be cities of refuge. 
These six cities shall be a refuge, both for the children of Israel, and for the stranger, and for the sojourner among them: that every one that killeth any person unawares may flee thither. 
And if he smite him with an instrument of iron, so that he die, he is a murderer: the mur
1069, Gilead: of Gilead come the family of the Gileadites. 
These are the sons of Gilead: of Jeezer, the family of the Jeezerites: of Helek, the family of the Helekites: 
And of Asriel, the family of the Asrielites: and of Shechem, the family of the Shechemites: 
And of Shemida, the family of the Shemidaites: and of Hepher, the family of the Hepherites. 
And Zelophehad the son of Hepher had no sons, but daughters: and the names of the daughters of Zelophehad were Mahlah, and Noah, Hoglah, Milcah, and Tirzah. 
These are the families of Manasseh, and those that were numbered of them, fifty and two thousand and seven hundred. 
These are the sons of Ephraim after their families: of Shuthelah, the family of the Shuthalhites: of Becher, the family of the Bachrites: of Tahan, the family of the Tahanites. 
And these are the sons of Shuthelah: of Eran, the family of the Eranites. 
These are the families of the sons of Ephraim according to those that were numbered of them, thirty and two thousand and five hundred. These are the sons of Joseph after their families. 
Th
776,ye, stand fast in the faith, quit you like men, be strong. 
Let all your things be done with charity. 
I beseech you, brethren, (ye know the house of Stephanas, that it is the firstfruits of Achaia, and that they have addicted themselves to the ministry of the saints,) 
That ye submit yourselves unto such, and to every one that helpeth with us, and laboureth. 
I am glad of the coming of Stephanas and Fortunatus and Achaicus: for that which was lacking on your part they have supplied. 
For they have refreshed my spirit and your's: therefore acknowledge ye them that are such. 
The churches of Asia salute you. Aquila and Priscilla salute you much in the Lord, with the church that is in their house. 
All the brethren greet you. Greet ye one another with an holy kiss. 
T
992, cubits was the length thereof, and five cubits the breadth thereof; it was foursquare; and three cubits the height thereof. 
And he made the horns thereof on the four corners of it; the horns thereof were of the same: and he overlaid it with brass. 
And he made all the vessels of the altar, the pots, and the shovels, and the basons, and the fleshhooks, and the firepans: all the vessels thereof made he of brass. 
And he made for the altar a brasen grate of network under the compass thereof beneath unto the midst of it. 
And he cast four rings for the four ends of the grate of brass, to be places for the staves. 
And he made the staves of shittim wood, and overlaid them with brass. 
And he put the staves into the rings on the sides of the altar, to bear it withal; he made the altar hollow with boards. 
And he made the laver of brass, and the foot of it of brass, of the lookingglasses of the women assembling, which assembled at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And
736,ll the nations whither I have driven them: 
Because they have not hearkened to my words, saith the LORD, which I sent unto them by my servants the prophets, rising up early and sending them; but ye would not hear, saith the LORD. 
Hear ye therefore the word of the LORD, all ye of the captivity, whom I have sent from Jerusalem to Babylon: 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, of Ahab the son of Kolaiah, and of Zedekiah the son of Maaseiah, which prophesy a lie unto you in my name; Behold, I will deliver them into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon; and he shall slay them before your eyes; 
And of them shall be taken up a curse by all the captivity of Judah which are in Babylon, saying, The LORD make thee lik
1006,u? 
If God will not withdraw his anger, the proud helpers do stoop under him. 
How much less shall I answer him, and choose out my words to reason with him? 
Whom, though I were righteous, yet would I not answer, but I would make supplication to my judge. 
If I had called, and he had answered me; yet would I not believe that he had hearkened unto my voice. 
For he breaketh me with a tempest, and multiplieth my wounds without cause. 
He will not suffer me to take my breath, but filleth me with bitterness. 
If I speak of strength, lo, he is strong: and if of judgment, who shall set me a time to plead? 
If I justify myself, mine own mouth shall condemn me: if I say, I am perfect, it shall also prove me perverse. 
Though I were perfect, yet would I not know my soul: I would despise my life. 
This is one thing, therefore I said it, He destroyeth the perfect and the wicked. 
If the scourge slay suddenly, he will laugh at the trial of the innocent. 
The earth is given into the hand of the wicked: h
1013,d thy lips from speaking guile. 
Depart from evil, and do good; seek peace, and pursue it. 
The eyes of the LORD are upon the righteous, and his ears are open unto their cry. 
The face of the LORD is against them that do evil, to cut off the remembrance of them from the earth. 
The righteous cry, and the LORD heareth, and delivereth them out of all their troubles. 
The LORD is nigh unto them that are of a broken heart; and saveth such as be of a contrite spirit. 
Many are the afflictions of the righteous: but the LORD delivereth him out of them all. 
He keepeth all his bones: not one of them is broken. 
Evil shall slay the wicked: and they that hate the righteous shall be desolate. 
The LORD redeemeth the soul of his servants: and none of them that trust in him shall be desolate. 
Plead my cause, O LORD, with them that strive with me: fight against them that fight against me. 
Take hold of shield and buckler, and stand up for mine help. 
Draw out also the spear, and stop the way against them that p
1014,ce upon her; as she hath done, do unto her. 
Cut off the sower from Babylon, and him that handleth the sickle in the time of harvest: for fear of the oppressing sword they shall turn every one to his people, and they shall flee every one to his own land. 
Israel is a scattered sheep; the lions have driven him away: first the king of Assyria hath devoured him; and last this Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon hath broken his bones. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will punish the king of Babylon and his land, as I have punished the king of Assyria. 
And I will bring Israel again to his habitation, and he shall feed on Carmel and Bashan, and his soul shall be satisfied upon mount Ephraim and Gilead. 
In those days, and in that time, saith the LORD, the iniquity of Israel shall be sought for, and there shall be none; and the sins of Judah, and they shall not be found: for I will pardon them whom I reserve. 
Go up against the land of Merathaim, even against it, and agains
765,south, Hear the word of the LORD; Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will kindle a fire in thee, and it shall devour every green tree in thee, and every dry tree: the flaming flame shall not be quenched, and all faces from the south to the north shall be burned therein. 
And all flesh shall see that I the LORD have kindled it: it shall not be quenched. 
Then said I, Ah Lord GOD! they say of me, Doth he not speak parables? 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face toward Jerusalem, and drop thy word toward the holy places, and prophesy against the land of Israel, 
And say to the land of Israel, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I am against thee, and will draw forth my sword out of his sheath, and will cut off from thee the right
1006, washed away the filth of the daughters of Zion, and shall have purged the blood of Jerusalem from the midst thereof by the spirit of judgment, and by the spirit of burning. 
And the LORD will create upon every dwelling place of mount Zion, and upon her assemblies, a cloud and smoke by day, and the shining of a flaming fire by night: for upon all the glory shall be a defence. 
And there shall be a tabernacle for a shadow in the day time from the heat, and for a place of refuge, and for a covert from storm and from rain. 
Now will I sing to my wellbeloved a song of my beloved touching his vineyard. My wellbeloved hath a vineyard in a very fruitful hill: 
And he fenced it, and gathered out the stones thereof, and planted it with the choicest vine, and built a tower in the midst of it, and also made a winepress therein: and he looked that it should bring forth grapes, and it brought forth wild grapes. 
And now, O inhabitants of Jerusalem, and men of Judah, judge, I pray you, betwixt me and my v
982,es: and it shall be one tabernacle. 
And thou shalt make curtains of goats' hair to be a covering upon the tabernacle: eleven curtains shalt thou make. 
The length of one curtain shall be thirty cubits, and the breadth of one curtain four cubits: and the eleven curtains shall be all of one measure. 
And thou shalt couple five curtains by themselves, and six curtains by themselves, and shalt double the sixth curtain in the forefront of the tabernacle. 
And thou shalt make fifty loops on the edge of the one curtain that is outmost in the coupling, and fifty loops in the edge of the curtain which coupleth the second. 
And thou shalt make fifty taches of brass, and put the taches into the loops, and couple the tent together, that it may be one. 
And the remnant that remaineth of the curtains of the tent, the half curtain that remaineth, shall hang over the backside of the tabernacle. 
And a cubit on the one side, and a cubit on the other side of that which remaineth in th
854,e is convinced of all, he is judged of all: 
And thus are the secrets of his heart made manifest; and so falling down on his face he will worship God, and report that God is in you of a truth. 
How is it then, brethren? when ye come together, every one of you hath a psalm, hath a doctrine, hath a tongue, hath a revelation, hath an interpretation. Let all things be done unto edifying. 
If any man speak in an unknown tongue, let it be by two, or at the most by three, and that by course; and let one interpret. 
But if there be no interpreter, let him keep silence in the church; and let him speak to himself, and to God. 
Let the prophets speak two or three, and let the other judge. 
If any thing be revealed to another that sitteth by, let the first hold his peace. 
For ye may all prophesy one by one, that all may learn, and all may be comforted. 
732,ee God: 
Whom I shall see for myself, and mine eyes shall behold, and not another; though my reins be consumed within me. 
But ye should say, Why persecute we him, seeing the root of the matter is found in me? 
Be ye afraid of the sword: for wrath bringeth the punishments of the sword, that ye may know there is a judgment. 
Then answered Zophar the Naamathite, and said, 
Therefore do my thoughts cause me to answer, and for this I make haste. 
I have heard the check of my reproach, and the spirit of my understanding causeth me to answer. 
Knowest thou not this of old, since man was placed upon earth, 
That the triumphing of the wicked is short, and the joy of the hypocrite but for a moment? 
Though his excellency mount up t
999,ng. 
And the children of Israel, the priests, and the Levites, and the rest of the children of the captivity, kept the dedication of this house of God with joy. 
And offered at the dedication of this house of God an hundred bullocks, two hundred rams, four hundred lambs; and for a sin offering for all Israel, twelve he goats, according to the number of the tribes of Israel. 
And they set the priests in their divisions, and the Levites in their courses, for the service of God, which is at Jerusalem; as it is written in the book of Moses. 
And the children of the captivity kept the passover upon the fourteenth day of the first month. 
For the priests and the Levites were purified together, all of them were pure, and killed the passover for all the children of the captivity, and for their brethren the priests, and for themselves. 
And the children of Israel, which were come again out of captivity, and all such as had separated themselves unto them from the filthiness of the heathen of th
971,oram his son reigned in his stead. 
Ahaziah the son of Ahab began to reign over Israel in Samaria the seventeenth year of Jehoshaphat king of Judah, and reigned two years over Israel. 
And he did evil in the sight of the LORD, and walked in the way of his father, and in the way of his mother, and in the way of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, who made Israel to sin: 
For he served Baal, and worshipped him, and provoked to anger the LORD God of Israel, according to all that his father had done. 
Adam, Sheth, Enosh, 
Kenan, Mahalaleel, Jered, 
Henoch, Methuselah, Lamech, 
Noah, Shem, Ham, and Japheth. 
The sons of Japheth; Gomer, and Magog, and Madai, and Javan, and Tubal, and Meshech, and Tiras. 
And the sons of Gomer; Ashchenaz, and Riphath, and Togarmah. 
And the sons of Javan; Elishah, and Tarshish, Kittim, and Dodanim. 
The sons of Ham; Cush, and Mizraim, Put, and Canaan. 
And the sons of Cush; Seba, and Havilah, and Sabta, and Raamah, and Sabtecha. And the so
727,: 
Come now therefore, I pray thee, curse me this people; for they are too mighty for me: peradventure I shall prevail, that we may smite them, and that I may drive them out of the land: for I wot that he whom thou blessest is blessed, and he whom thou cursest is cursed. 
And the elders of Moab and the elders of Midian departed with the rewards of divination in their hand; and they came unto Balaam, and spake unto him the words of Balak. 
And he said unto them, Lodge here this night, and I will bring you word again, as the LORD shall speak unto me: and the princes of Moab abode with Balaam. 
And God came unto Balaam, and said, What men are these with thee? 
And Balaam said unto God, Balak the son of Zippor, king of Mo
877,h were spoken before of the apostles of our Lord Jesus Christ; 
How that they told you there should be mockers in the last time, who should walk after their own ungodly lusts. 
These be they who separate themselves, sensual, having not the Spirit. 
But ye, beloved, building up yourselves on your most holy faith, praying in the Holy Ghost, 
Keep yourselves in the love of God, looking for the mercy of our Lord Jesus Christ unto eternal life. 
And of some have compassion, making a difference: 
And others save with fear, pulling them out of the fire; hating even the garment spotted by the flesh. 
Now unto him that is able to keep you from falling, and to present you faultless before the presence of his glory with exceeding joy, 
To the only wise God our Saviour, be glory and majesty, dominion and power, both now and ever. Amen. 
The Revelation of Jesus Christ, which Go
840,heir looks, though they be a rebellious house. 
Moreover he said unto me, Son of man, all my words that I shall speak unto thee receive in thine heart, and hear with thine ears. 
And go, get thee to them of the captivity, unto the children of thy people, and speak unto them, and tell them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; whether they will hear, or whether they will forbear. 
Then the spirit took me up, and I heard behind me a voice of a great rushing, saying, Blessed be the glory of the LORD from his place. 
I heard also the noise of the wings of the living creatures that touched one another, and the noise of the wheels over against them, and a noise of a great rushing. 
So the spirit lifted me up, and took me away, and I went in bitterness, in the heat of my spirit; but the hand of the LORD was strong upon me. 
Then I came to them of 
1056,vials full of the seven last plagues, and talked with me, saying, Come hither, I will shew thee the bride, the Lamb's wife. 
And he carried me away in the spirit to a great and high mountain, and shewed me that great city, the holy Jerusalem, descending out of heaven from God, 
Having the glory of God: and her light was like unto a stone most precious, even like a jasper stone, clear as crystal; 
And had a wall great and high, and had twelve gates, and at the gates twelve angels, and names written thereon, which are the names of the twelve tribes of the children of Israel: 
On the east three gates; on the north three gates; on the south three gates; and on the west three gates. 
And the wall of the city had twelve foundations, and in them the names of the twelve apostles of the Lamb. 
And he that talked with me had a golden reed to measure the city, and the gates thereof, and the wall thereof. 
And the city lieth foursquare, and the length is as large as the breadth: and he measured the city with the reed, twelve thousand furlongs. The leng
785,ittle for the lamb, let him and his neighbour next unto his house take it according to the number of the souls; every man according to his eating shall make your count for the lamb. 
Your lamb shall be without blemish, a male of the first year: ye shall take it out from the sheep, or from the goats: 
And ye shall keep it up until the fourteenth day of the same month: and the whole assembly of the congregation of Israel shall kill it in the evening. 
And they shall take of the blood, and strike it on the two side posts and on the upper door post of the houses, wherein they shall eat it. 
And they shall eat the flesh in that night, roast with fire, and unleavened bread; and with bitter herbs they shall eat it. 
Eat not of it raw, nor sodden at all with water, but roast with fi
739,who also hath given unto us the earnest of the Spirit. 
Therefore we are always confident, knowing that, whilst we are at home in the body, we are absent from the Lord: 
(For we walk by faith, not by sight:) 
We are confident, I say, and willing rather to be absent from the body, and to be present with the Lord. 
Wherefore we labour, that, whether present or absent, we may be accepted of him. 
For we must all appear before the judgment seat of Christ; that every one may receive the things done in his body, according to that he hath done, whether it be good or bad. 
Knowing therefore the terror of the Lord, we persuade men; but we are made manifest unto God; and I trust also are made manifest in your consciences. 
For we commend n
952,gregation, saying, 
Ataroth, and Dibon, and Jazer, and Nimrah, and Heshbon, and Elealeh, and Shebam, and Nebo, and Beon, 
Even the country which the LORD smote before the congregation of Israel, is a land for cattle, and thy servants have cattle: 
Wherefore, said they, if we have found grace in thy sight, let this land be given unto thy servants for a possession, and bring us not over Jordan. 
And Moses said unto the children of Gad and to the children of Reuben, Shall your brethren go to war, and shall ye sit here? 
And wherefore discourage ye the heart of the children of Israel from going over into the land which the LORD hath given them? 
Thus did your fathers, when I sent them from Kadeshbarnea to see the land. 
For when they went up unto the valley of Eshcol, and saw the land, they discouraged the heart of the children of Israel, that they should not go into the land which the LORD had given them. 
And the LORD'S anger was kindled th
935,emn feast unto the LORD thy God in the place which the LORD shall choose: because the LORD thy God shall bless thee in all thine increase, and in all the works of thine hands, therefore thou shalt surely rejoice. 
Three times in a year shall all thy males appear before the LORD thy God in the place which he shall choose; in the feast of unleavened bread, and in the feast of weeks, and in the feast of tabernacles: and they shall not appear before the LORD empty: 
Every man shall give as he is able, according to the blessing of the LORD thy God which he hath given thee. 
Judges and officers shalt thou make thee in all thy gates, which the LORD thy God giveth thee, throughout thy tribes: and they shall judge the people with just judgment. 
Thou shalt not wrest judgment; thou shalt not respect persons, neither take a gift: for a gift doth blind the eyes of the wise, and pervert the words of the righteous. 
That which is altog
919,ts of David. 
And there were three sons of Zeruiah there, Joab, and Abishai, and Asahel: and Asahel was as light of foot as a wild roe. 
And Asahel pursued after Abner; and in going he turned not to the right hand nor to the left from following Abner. 
Then Abner looked behind him, and said, Art thou Asahel? And he answered, I am. 
And Abner said to him, Turn thee aside to thy right hand or to thy left, and lay thee hold on one of the young men, and take thee his armour. But Asahel would not turn aside from following of him. 
And Abner said again to Asahel, Turn thee aside from following me: wherefore should I smite thee to the ground? how then should I hold up my face to Joab thy brother? 
Howbeit he refused to turn aside: wherefore Abner with the hinder end of the spear smote him under the fifth rib, that the spear came out behind him; and he fell down there, and died in the same place: and it came to pa
786,es; and now he is fled out of the land for Absalom. 
And Absalom, whom we anointed over us, is dead in battle. Now therefore why speak ye not a word of bringing the king back? 
And king David sent to Zadok and to Abiathar the priests, saying, Speak unto the elders of Judah, saying, Why are ye the last to bring the king back to his house? seeing the speech of all Israel is come to the king, even to his house. 
Ye are my brethren, ye are my bones and my flesh: wherefore then are ye the last to bring back the king? 
And say ye to Amasa, Art thou not of my bone, and of my flesh? God do so to me, and more also, if thou be not captain of the host before me continually in the room of Joab. 
And he bowed the heart of all the men of Judah, even as the heart of one man; so that they se
877,hee, Come up hither; than that thou shouldest be put lower in the presence of the prince whom thine eyes have seen. 
Go not forth hastily to strive, lest thou know not what to do in the end thereof, when thy neighbour hath put thee to shame. 
Debate thy cause with thy neighbour himself; and discover not a secret to another: 
Lest he that heareth it put thee to shame, and thine infamy turn not away. 
A word fitly spoken is like apples of gold in pictures of silver. 
As an earring of gold, and an ornament of fine gold, so is a wise reprover upon an obedient ear. 
As the cold of snow in the time of harvest, so is a faithful messenger to them that send him: for he refresheth the soul of his masters. 
Whoso boasteth himself of a false gift is like clouds and wind without rain. 
By long forbearing is a prince persuaded, and a soft tongue breaketh the bone. 
Hast thou fou
876,n of Shallum, the son of Zadok, the son of Ahitub, 
The son of Amariah, the son of Azariah, the son of Meraioth, 
The son of Zerahiah, the son of Uzzi, the son of Bukki, 
The son of Abishua, the son of Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, the son of Aaron the chief priest: 
This Ezra went up from Babylon; and he was a ready scribe in the law of Moses, which the LORD God of Israel had given: and the king granted him all his request, according to the hand of the LORD his God upon him. 
And there went up some of the children of Israel, and of the priests, and the Levites, and the singers, and the porters, and the Nethinims, unto Jerusalem, in the seventh year of Artaxerxes the king. 
And he came to Jerusalem in the fifth month, which was in the seventh year of the king. 
For upon the first day of the first month began he to go up from Babylon, and on the first day of the fi
1028,uted? and I will not give my glory unto another. 
Hearken unto me, O Jacob and Israel, my called; I am he; I am the first, I also am the last. 
Mine hand also hath laid the foundation of the earth, and my right hand hath spanned the heavens: when I call unto them, they stand up together. 
All ye, assemble yourselves, and hear; which among them hath declared these things? The LORD hath loved him: he will do his pleasure on Babylon, and his arm shall be on the Chaldeans. 
I, even I, have spoken; yea, I have called him: I have brought him, and he shall make his way prosperous. 
Come ye near unto me, hear ye this; I have not spoken in secret from the beginning; from the time that it was, there am I: and now the Lord GOD, and his Spirit, hath sent me. 
Thus saith the LORD, thy Redeemer, the Holy One of Israel; I am the LORD thy God which teacheth thee to profit, which leadeth thee by the way that thou shouldest go. 
O that thou hadst hearkened to my commandments! then had thy peace been as a river, and thy righteousne
859,nd wise steward, whom his lord shall make ruler over his household, to give them their portion of meat in due season? 
Blessed is that servant, whom his lord when he cometh shall find so doing. 
Of a truth I say unto you, that he will make him ruler over all that he hath. 
But and if that servant say in his heart, My lord delayeth his coming; and shall begin to beat the menservants and maidens, and to eat and drink, and to be drunken; 
The lord of that servant will come in a day when he looketh not for him, and at an hour when he is not aware, and will cut him in sunder, and will appoint him his portion with the unbelievers. 
And that servant, which knew his lord's will, and prepared not himself, neither did according to his will, shall be beaten with many stripes. 
But he that knew not, and did commit things worthy of stripes, shall be beaten wit
764,f the pillars; seven for the one chapiter, and seven for the other chapiter. 
And he made the pillars, and two rows round about upon the one network, to cover the chapiters that were upon the top, with pomegranates: and so did he for the other chapiter. 
And the chapiters that were upon the top of the pillars were of lily work in the porch, four cubits. 
And the chapiters upon the two pillars had pomegranates also above, over against the belly which was by the network: and the pomegranates were two hundred in rows round about upon the other chapiter. 
And he set up the pillars in the porch of the temple: and he set up the right pillar, and called the name thereof Jachin: and he set up the left pillar, and called the name thereof Boaz. 
And upon the top o
952,en the children of Esau, which dwell in Seir; and they shall be afraid of you: take ye good heed unto yourselves therefore: 
Meddle not with them; for I will not give you of their land, no, not so much as a foot breadth; because I have given mount Seir unto Esau for a possession. 
Ye shall buy meat of them for money, that ye may eat; and ye shall also buy water of them for money, that ye may drink. 
For the LORD thy God hath blessed thee in all the works of thy hand: he knoweth thy walking through this great wilderness: these forty years the LORD thy God hath been with thee; thou hast lacked nothing. 
And when we passed by from our brethren the children of Esau, which dwelt in Seir, through the way of the plain from Elath, and from Eziongaber, we turned and passed by the way of the wilderness of Moab. 
And the LORD said unto me, Distress not the Moabites, neither contend with them in battle: for I will not give thee of their land for a po
990,ld, and lo a black horse; and he that sat on him had a pair of balances in his hand. 
And I heard a voice in the midst of the four beasts say, A measure of wheat for a penny, and three measures of barley for a penny; and see thou hurt not the oil and the wine. 
And when he had opened the fourth seal, I heard the voice of the fourth beast say, Come and see. 
And I looked, and behold a pale horse: and his name that sat on him was Death, and Hell followed with him. And power was given unto them over the fourth part of the earth, to kill with sword, and with hunger, and with death, and with the beasts of the earth. 
And when he had opened the fifth seal, I saw under the altar the souls of them that were slain for the word of God, and for the testimony which they held: 
And they cried with a loud voice, saying, How long, O Lord, holy and true, dost thou not judge and avenge our blood on them that dwell on the earth? 
And white robes were given unto every one of them; and it was sa
1008,ive: 
And I will lay sinews upon you, and will bring up flesh upon you, and cover you with skin, and put breath in you, and ye shall live; and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
So I prophesied as I was commanded: and as I prophesied, there was a noise, and behold a shaking, and the bones came together, bone to his bone. 
And when I beheld, lo, the sinews and the flesh came up upon them, and the skin covered them above: but there was no breath in them. 
Then said he unto me, Prophesy unto the wind, prophesy, son of man, and say to the wind, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Come from the four winds, O breath, and breathe upon these slain, that they may live. 
So I prophesied as he commanded me, and the breath came into them, and they lived, and stood up upon their feet, an exceeding great army. 
Then he said unto me, Son of man, these bones are the whole house of Israel: behold, they say, Our bones are dried, and our hope is lost: we are cut off for our parts. 
Therefore prophesy and say unto them, Thu
902,ll thy lovers, and hirest them, that they may come unto thee on every side for thy whoredom. 
And the contrary is in thee from other women in thy whoredoms, whereas none followeth thee to commit whoredoms: and in that thou givest a reward, and no reward is given unto thee, therefore thou art contrary. 
Wherefore, O harlot, hear the word of the LORD: 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thy filthiness was poured out, and thy nakedness discovered through thy whoredoms with thy lovers, and with all the idols of thy abominations, and by the blood of thy children, which thou didst give unto them; 
Behold, therefore I will gather all thy lovers, with whom thou hast taken pleasure, and all them that thou hast loved, with all them that thou hast hated; I will even gather them round about against thee, and will discover thy nakedness unto them, that they may see all thy nakedness. 
And I will judge th
1022, the lake of fire. 
And I saw a new heaven and a new earth: for the first heaven and the first earth were passed away; and there was no more sea. 
And I John saw the holy city, new Jerusalem, coming down from God out of heaven, prepared as a bride adorned for her husband. 
And I heard a great voice out of heaven saying, Behold, the tabernacle of God is with men, and he will dwell with them, and they shall be his people, and God himself shall be with them, and be their God. 
And God shall wipe away all tears from their eyes; and there shall be no more death, neither sorrow, nor crying, neither shall there be any more pain: for the former things are passed away. 
And he that sat upon the throne said, Behold, I make all things new. And he said unto me, Write: for these words are true and faithful. 
And he said unto me, It is done. I am Alpha and Omega, the beginning and the end. I will give unto him that is athirst of the fountain of the water of life freely. 
He that overcometh shall inherit all things; and I
856,n the hill Gareb, and shall compass about to Goath. 
And the whole valley of the dead bodies, and of the ashes, and all the fields unto the brook of Kidron, unto the corner of the horse gate toward the east, shall be holy unto the LORD; it shall not be plucked up, nor thrown down any more for ever. 
The word that came to Jeremiah from the LORD in the tenth year of Zedekiah king of Judah, which was the eighteenth year of Nebuchadrezzar. 
For then the king of Babylon's army besieged Jerusalem: and Jeremiah the prophet was shut up in the court of the prison, which was in the king of Judah's house. 
For Zedekiah king of Judah had shut him up, saying, Wherefore dost thou prophesy, and say, Thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will give this city into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall take it; 
And Zedekiah king of Judah shall not escape out of
777,for an inheritance by lot in Shiloh before the LORD, at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. So they made an end of dividing the country. 
The LORD also spake unto Joshua, saying, 
Speak to the children of Israel, saying, Appoint out for you cities of refuge, whereof I spake unto you by the hand of Moses: 
That the slayer that killeth any person unawares and unwittingly may flee thither: and they shall be your refuge from the avenger of blood. 
And when he that doth flee unto one of those cities shall stand at the entering of the gate of the city, and shall declare his cause in the ears of the elders of that city, they shall take him into the city unto them, and give him a place, that he may dwell among them. 
And if the avenger of blood pursue after him, 
993,gs in heavenly places in Christ: 
According as he hath chosen us in him before the foundation of the world, that we should be holy and without blame before him in love: 
Having predestinated us unto the adoption of children by Jesus Christ to himself, according to the good pleasure of his will, 
To the praise of the glory of his grace, wherein he hath made us accepted in the beloved. 
In whom we have redemption through his blood, the forgiveness of sins, according to the riches of his grace; 
Wherein he hath abounded toward us in all wisdom and prudence; 
Having made known unto us the mystery of his will, according to his good pleasure which he hath purposed in himself: 
That in the dispensation of the fulness of times he might gather together in one all things in Christ, both which are in heaven, and which are on earth; even in him: 
In whom also we have obtained an inheritance, being predestinated according to the purpose of him who worketh all things after the counsel of his 
832,t affliction: and our fathers found no sustenance. 
But when Jacob heard that there was corn in Egypt, he sent out our fathers first. 
And at the second time Joseph was made known to his brethren; and Joseph's kindred was made known unto Pharaoh. 
Then sent Joseph, and called his father Jacob to him, and all his kindred, threescore and fifteen souls. 
So Jacob went down into Egypt, and died, he, and our fathers, 
And were carried over into Sychem, and laid in the sepulchre that Abraham bought for a sum of money of the sons of Emmor the father of Sychem. 
But when the time of the promise drew nigh, which God had sworn to Abraham, the people grew and multiplied in Egypt, 
Till another king arose, which knew not Joseph. 
The same dealt subtilly with our kindred, and evil entreated our fathers, so that they cast out their yo
831,ce of the LORD our God any more, then we shall die. 
For who is there of all flesh, that hath heard the voice of the living God speaking out of the midst of the fire, as we have, and lived? 
Go thou near, and hear all that the LORD our God shall say: and speak thou unto us all that the LORD our God shall speak unto thee; and we will hear it, and do it. 
And the LORD heard the voice of your words, when ye spake unto me; and the LORD said unto me, I have heard the voice of the words of this people, which they have spoken unto thee: they have well said all that they have spoken. 
O that there were such an heart in them, that they would fear me, and keep all my commandments always, that it might be well with them, and with their children for ever! 
Go say to them, Get you into your tents again. 
But as for thee, stand thou 
775,tterness. 
Her adversaries are the chief, her enemies prosper; for the LORD hath afflicted her for the multitude of her transgressions: her children are gone into captivity before the enemy. 
And from the daughter of Zion all her beauty is departed: her princes are become like harts that find no pasture, and they are gone without strength before the pursuer. 
Jerusalem remembered in the days of her affliction and of her miseries all her pleasant things that she had in the days of old, when her people fell into the hand of the enemy, and none did help her: the adversaries saw her, and did mock at her sabbaths. 
Jerusalem hath grievously sinned; therefore she is removed: all that honoured her despise her, because they have seen her nakedness: yea, she sigheth, and tu
1047,he LORD heard the voice of your words, when ye spake unto me; and the LORD said unto me, I have heard the voice of the words of this people, which they have spoken unto thee: they have well said all that they have spoken. 
O that there were such an heart in them, that they would fear me, and keep all my commandments always, that it might be well with them, and with their children for ever! 
Go say to them, Get you into your tents again. 
But as for thee, stand thou here by me, and I will speak unto thee all the commandments, and the statutes, and the judgments, which thou shalt teach them, that they may do them in the land which I give them to possess it. 
Ye shall observe to do therefore as the LORD your God hath commanded you: ye shall not turn aside to the right hand or to the left. 
Ye shall walk in all the ways which the LORD your God hath commanded you, that ye may live, and that it may be well with you, and that ye may prolong your days in the land which ye shall possess. 
Now these are the commandments, the statutes, and th
799,here thieves do not break through nor steal: 
For where your treasure is, there will your heart be also. 
The light of the body is the eye: if therefore thine eye be single, thy whole body shall be full of light. 
But if thine eye be evil, thy whole body shall be full of darkness. If therefore the light that is in thee be darkness, how great is that darkness! 
No man can serve two masters: for either he will hate the one, and love the other; or else he will hold to the one, and despise the other. Ye cannot serve God and mammon. 
Therefore I say unto you, Take no thought for your life, what ye shall eat, or what ye shall drink; nor yet for your body, what ye shall put on. Is not the life more than meat, and the body than raiment? 
Behold the fowls of the air: for they sow not, neither do t
740,rings, for meat offerings, or for sacrifices, beside the altar of the LORD our God that is before his tabernacle. 
And when Phinehas the priest, and the princes of the congregation and heads of the thousands of Israel which were with him, heard the words that the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the children of Manasseh spake, it pleased them. 
And Phinehas the son of Eleazar the priest said unto the children of Reuben, and to the children of Gad, and to the children of Manasseh, This day we perceive that the LORD is among us, because ye have not committed this trespass against the LORD: now ye have delivered the children of Israel out of the hand of the LORD. 
And Phinehas the son of Eleazar the priest, and the prin
800,ld and nine, when he was circumcised in the flesh of his foreskin. 
And Ishmael his son was thirteen years old, when he was circumcised in the flesh of his foreskin. 
In the selfsame day was Abraham circumcised, and Ishmael his son. 
And all the men of his house, born in the house, and bought with money of the stranger, were circumcised with him. 
And the LORD appeared unto him in the plains of Mamre: and he sat in the tent door in the heat of the day; 
And he lift up his eyes and looked, and, lo, three men stood by him: and when he saw them, he ran to meet them from the tent door, and bowed himself toward the ground, 
And said, My LORD, if now I have found favour in thy sight, pass not away, I pray thee, from thy servant: 
Let a little water, I pray you, be fetched, and wash your feet, an
849,s the heart of Asa was perfect all his days. 
And he brought into the house of God the things that his father had dedicated, and that he himself had dedicated, silver, and gold, and vessels. 
And there was no more war unto the five and thirtieth year of the reign of Asa. 
In the six and thirtieth year of the reign of Asa Baasha king of Israel came up against Judah, and built Ramah, to the intent that he might let none go out or come in to Asa king of Judah. 
Then Asa brought out silver and gold out of the treasures of the house of the LORD and of the king's house, and sent to Benhadad king of Syria, that dwelt at Damascus, saying, 
There is a league between me and thee, as there was between my father and thy father: behold, I have sent thee silver and gold; go, break thy league with Baasha king of Israel, that he may depart from me. 
And
1017,filed my sanctuary with all thy detestable things, and with all thine abominations, therefore will I also diminish thee; neither shall mine eye spare, neither will I have any pity. 
A third part of thee shall die with the pestilence, and with famine shall they be consumed in the midst of thee: and a third part shall fall by the sword round about thee; and I will scatter a third part into all the winds, and I will draw out a sword after them. 
Thus shall mine anger be accomplished, and I will cause my fury to rest upon them, and I will be comforted: and they shall know that I the LORD have spoken it in my zeal, when I have accomplished my fury in them. 
Moreover I will make thee waste, and a reproach among the nations that are round about thee, in the sight of all that pass by. 
So it shall be a reproach and a taunt, an instruction and an astonishment unto the nations that are round about thee, when I shall execute judgments in thee in anger and in fury and in furious rebukes. I the LORD have spoken it.
941, we walk in the flesh, we do not war after the flesh: 
(For the weapons of our warfare are not carnal, but mighty through God to the pulling down of strong holds;) 
Casting down imaginations, and every high thing that exalteth itself against the knowledge of God, and bringing into captivity every thought to the obedience of Christ; 
And having in a readiness to revenge all disobedience, when your obedience is fulfilled. 
Do ye look on things after the outward appearance? if any man trust to himself that he is Christ's, let him of himself think this again, that, as he is Christ's, even so are we Christ's. 
For though I should boast somewhat more of our authority, which the Lord hath given us for edification, and not for your destruction, I should not be ashamed: 
That I may not seem as if I would terrify you by letters. 
For his letters, say they, are weighty and powerful; but his bodily presence is weak, and his speech contempt
1028, shall be astonished, and shall hiss; and they shall say, Why hath the LORD done thus unto this land, and to this house? 
And they shall answer, Because they forsook the LORD their God, who brought forth their fathers out of the land of Egypt, and have taken hold upon other gods, and have worshipped them, and served them: therefore hath the LORD brought upon them all this evil. 
And it came to pass at the end of twenty years, when Solomon had built the two houses, the house of the LORD, and the king's house, 
(Now Hiram the king of Tyre had furnished Solomon with cedar trees and fir trees, and with gold, according to all his desire,) that then king Solomon gave Hiram twenty cities in the land of Galilee. 
And Hiram came out from Tyre to see the cities which Solomon had given him; and they pleased him not. 
And he said, What cities are these which thou hast given me, my brother? And he called them the land of Cabul unto this day. 
And Hiram sent to the king sixscore talents of gold. 
And this is the reason of the 
728,Ebal, Shepho, and Onam. 
And these are the children of Zibeon; both Ajah, and Anah: this was that Anah that found the mules in the wilderness, as he fed the asses of Zibeon his father. 
And the children of Anah were these; Dishon, and Aholibamah the daughter of Anah. 
And these are the children of Dishon; Hemdan, and Eshban, and Ithran, and Cheran. 
The children of Ezer are these; Bilhan, and Zaavan, and Akan. 
The children of Dishan are these; Uz, and Aran. 
These are the dukes that came of the Horites; duke Lotan, duke Shobal, duke Zibeon, duke Anah, 
Duke Dishon, duke Ezer, duke Dishan: these are the dukes that came of Hori, among their dukes in the land of Seir. 
And these are the kings that reigned in the land of 
889,l Judah; none was exempted: and they took away the stones of Ramah, and the timber thereof, wherewith Baasha had builded; and king Asa built with them Geba of Benjamin, and Mizpah. 
The rest of all the acts of Asa, and all his might, and all that he did, and the cities which he built, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah? Nevertheless in the time of his old age he was diseased in his feet. 
And Asa slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David his father: and Jehoshaphat his son reigned in his stead. 
And Nadab the son of Jeroboam began to reign over Israel in the second year of Asa king of Judah, and reigned over Israel two years. 
And he did evil in the sight of the LORD, and walked in the way of his father, and in his sin wherewith he made Israel to sin. 
And Baasha the son of Ahijah, of the house of Issacha
931,ll fair, my love; there is no spot in thee. 
Come with me from Lebanon, my spouse, with me from Lebanon: look from the top of Amana, from the top of Shenir and Hermon, from the lions' dens, from the mountains of the leopards. 
Thou hast ravished my heart, my sister, my spouse; thou hast ravished my heart with one of thine eyes, with one chain of thy neck. 
How fair is thy love, my sister, my spouse! how much better is thy love than wine! and the smell of thine ointments than all spices! 
Thy lips, O my spouse, drop as the honeycomb: honey and milk are under thy tongue; and the smell of thy garments is like the smell of Lebanon. 
A garden inclosed is my sister, my spouse; a spring shut up, a fountain sealed. 
Thy plants are an orchard of pomegranates, with pleasant fruits; camphire, with spikenard, 
Spikenard and saffron; calamus and cinnamon, with all trees of frankincense; myrrh and aloes, with all the chief spices: 
811,ty because of my holy mountain. 
I will also leave in the midst of thee an afflicted and poor people, and they shall trust in the name of the LORD. 
The remnant of Israel shall not do iniquity, nor speak lies; neither shall a deceitful tongue be found in their mouth: for they shall feed and lie down, and none shall make them afraid. 
Sing, O daughter of Zion; shout, O Israel; be glad and rejoice with all the heart, O daughter of Jerusalem. 
The LORD hath taken away thy judgments, he hath cast out thine enemy: the king of Israel, even the LORD, is in the midst of thee: thou shalt not see evil any more. 
In that day it shall be said to Jerusalem, Fear thou not: and to Zion, Let not thine hands be slack. 
The LORD thy God in the midst of thee is mighty; he will save, he will rejoice over thee with joy; 
797,of Tarshish; for it is laid waste, so that there is no house, no entering in: from the land of Chittim it is revealed to them. 
Be still, ye inhabitants of the isle; thou whom the merchants of Zidon, that pass over the sea, have replenished. 
And by great waters the seed of Sihor, the harvest of the river, is her revenue; and she is a mart of nations. 
Be thou ashamed, O Zidon: for the sea hath spoken, even the strength of the sea, saying, I travail not, nor bring forth children, neither do I nourish up young men, nor bring up virgins. 
As at the report concerning Egypt, so shall they be sorely pained at the report of Tyre. 
Pass ye over to Tarshish; howl, ye inhabitants of the isle. 
Is this your joyous city, whose antiquity is of ancient days? her own feet shall carry her afar off to 
775, earth? 
And David commanded his young men, and they slew them, and cut off their hands and their feet, and hanged them up over the pool in Hebron. But they took the head of Ishbosheth, and buried it in the sepulchre of Abner in Hebron. 
Then came all the tribes of Israel to David unto Hebron, and spake, saying, Behold, we are thy bone and thy flesh. 
Also in time past, when Saul was king over us, thou wast he that leddest out and broughtest in Israel: and the LORD said to thee, Thou shalt feed my people Israel, and thou shalt be a captain over Israel. 
So all the elders of Israel came to the king to Hebron; and king David made a league with them in Hebron before the LORD: and they anointed David king over Israel. 
David was thirty years old when he began to reign,
981,he knees prevent me? or why the breasts that I should suck? 
For now should I have lain still and been quiet, I should have slept: then had I been at rest, 
With kings and counsellors of the earth, which build desolate places for themselves; 
Or with princes that had gold, who filled their houses with silver: 
Or as an hidden untimely birth I had not been; as infants which never saw light. 
There the wicked cease from troubling; and there the weary be at rest. 
There the prisoners rest together; they hear not the voice of the oppressor. 
The small and great are there; and the servant is free from his master. 
Wherefore is light given to him that is in misery, and life unto the bitter in soul; 
Which long for death, but it cometh not; and dig for it more than for hid treasures; 
Which rejoice exceedingly, and are glad, when they can find the grave? 
Why is light given to a man whose way is hid, and whom God hath hedged in? 
For my sighing cometh before I eat, and my r
756,rs of the land of Egypt, 
And all the house of Joseph, and his brethren, and his father's house: only their little ones, and their flocks, and their herds, they left in the land of Goshen. 
And there went up with him both chariots and horsemen: and it was a very great company. 
And they came to the threshingfloor of Atad, which is beyond Jordan, and there they mourned with a great and very sore lamentation: and he made a mourning for his father seven days. 
And when the inhabitants of the land, the Canaanites, saw the mourning in the floor of Atad, they said, This is a grievous mourning to the Egyptians: wherefore the name of it was called Abelmizraim, which is beyond Jordan. 
And his sons did unto him according as he commanded them: 
For his son
1042,ith Benhadad, 
Thy silver and thy gold is mine; thy wives also and thy children, even the goodliest, are mine. 
And the king of Israel answered and said, My lord, O king, according to thy saying, I am thine, and all that I have. 
And the messengers came again, and said, Thus speaketh Benhadad, saying, Although I have sent unto thee, saying, Thou shalt deliver me thy silver, and thy gold, and thy wives, and thy children; 
Yet I will send my servants unto thee to morrow about this time, and they shall search thine house, and the houses of thy servants; and it shall be, that whatsoever is pleasant in thine eyes, they shall put it in their hand, and take it away. 
Then the king of Israel called all the elders of the land, and said, Mark, I pray you, and see how this man seeketh mischief: for he sent unto me for my wives, and for my children, and for my silver, and for my gold; and I denied him not. 
And all the elders and all the people said unto him, Hearken not unto him, nor consent. 
Wherefore he said unto the messengers of Ben
801,hall have his life for a prey, and shall live. 
Thus saith the LORD, This city shall surely be given into the hand of the king of Babylon's army, which shall take it. 
Therefore the princes said unto the king, We beseech thee, let this man be put to death: for thus he weakeneth the hands of the men of war that remain in this city, and the hands of all the people, in speaking such words unto them: for this man seeketh not the welfare of this people, but the hurt. 
Then Zedekiah the king said, Behold, he is in your hand: for the king is not he that can do any thing against you. 
Then took they Jeremiah, and cast him into the dungeon of Malchiah the son of Hammelech, that was in the court of the prison: and they let down Jeremiah with cords. And in the dungeon there was no water, but mire: so 
875,Zarah: but Er and Onan died in the land of Canaan. And the sons of Pharez were Hezron and Hamul. 
And the sons of Issachar; Tola, and Phuvah, and Job, and Shimron. 
And the sons of Zebulun; Sered, and Elon, and Jahleel. 
These be the sons of Leah, which she bare unto Jacob in Padanaram, with his daughter Dinah: all the souls of his sons and his daughters were thirty and three. 
And the sons of Gad; Ziphion, and Haggi, Shuni, and Ezbon, Eri, and Arodi, and Areli. 
And the sons of Asher; Jimnah, and Ishuah, and Isui, and Beriah, and Serah their sister: and the sons of Beriah; Heber, and Malchiel. 
These are the sons of Zilpah, whom Laban gave to Leah his daughter, and these she bare unto Jacob, even sixteen souls. 
The sons of Rachel Jacob's wife; Joseph, and Benjamin. 
And unto Joseph in the land of Egypt were born Manasseh and Ephraim, which Asenath the daughter 
947, ministry of the prophets. 
Is there iniquity in Gilead? surely they are vanity: they sacrifice bullocks in Gilgal; yea, their altars are as heaps in the furrows of the fields. 
And Jacob fled into the country of Syria, and Israel served for a wife, and for a wife he kept sheep. 
And by a prophet the LORD brought Israel out of Egypt, and by a prophet was he preserved. 
Ephraim provoked him to anger most bitterly: therefore shall he leave his blood upon him, and his reproach shall his LORD return unto him. 
When Ephraim spake trembling, he exalted himself in Israel; but when he offended in Baal, he died. 
And now they sin more and more, and have made them molten images of their silver, and idols according to their own understanding, all of it the work of the craftsmen: they say of them, Let the men that sacrifice kiss the calves. 
Therefore they shall be as the morning cloud and as the early dew that passeth away, as the chaff that is
773,place of the banquet of wine; and Haman was fallen upon the bed whereon Esther was. Then said the king, Will he force the queen also before me in the house? As the word went out of king's mouth, they covered Haman's face. 
And Harbonah, one of the chamberlains, said before the king, Behold also, the gallows fifty cubits high, which Haman had made for Mordecai, who spoken good for the king, standeth in the house of Haman. Then the king said, Hang him thereon. 
So they hanged Haman on the gallows that he had prepared for Mordecai. Then was the king's wrath pacified. 
On that day did the king Ahasuerus give the house of Haman the Jews' enemy unto Esther the queen. And Mordecai came before the king; for Esther had told what he was unto her. 
And the king took off his
922,he that hath his hair fallen off from the part of his head toward his face, he is forehead bald: yet is he clean. 
And if there be in the bald head, or bald forehead, a white reddish sore; it is a leprosy sprung up in his bald head, or his bald forehead. 
Then the priest shall look upon it: and, behold, if the rising of the sore be white reddish in his bald head, or in his bald forehead, as the leprosy appeareth in the skin of the flesh; 
He is a leprous man, he is unclean: the priest shall pronounce him utterly unclean; his plague is in his head. 
And the leper in whom the plague is, his clothes shall be rent, and his head bare, and he shall put a covering upon his upper lip, and shall cry, Unclean, unclean. 
All the days wherein the plague shall be in him he shall be defiled; he is unclean: he shall dwell alone; without the camp shall his habitation be. 
The garment also that the plague of leprosy is in, wh
988,l vex thee, and thou shalt be for booties unto them? 
Because thou hast spoiled many nations, all the remnant of the people shall spoil thee; because of men's blood, and for the violence of the land, of the city, and of all that dwell therein. 
Woe to him that coveteth an evil covetousness to his house, that he may set his nest on high, that he may be delivered from the power of evil! 
Thou hast consulted shame to thy house by cutting off many people, and hast sinned against thy soul. 
For the stone shall cry out of the wall, and the beam out of the timber shall answer it. 
Woe to him that buildeth a town with blood, and stablisheth a city by iniquity! 
Behold, is it not of the LORD of hosts that the people shall labour in the very fire, and the people shall weary themselves for very vanity? 
For the earth shall be filled with the knowledge of the glory of the LORD, as the waters cover the sea. 
Woe unto him that giveth his neighbour drink, that puttest thy bottle to him, a
916,ead, and he did eat; and they made him drink water; 
And they gave him a piece of a cake of figs, and two clusters of raisins: and when he had eaten, his spirit came again to him: for he had eaten no bread, nor drunk any water, three days and three nights. 
And David said unto him, To whom belongest thou? and whence art thou? And he said, I am a young man of Egypt, servant to an Amalekite; and my master left me, because three days agone I fell sick. 
We made an invasion upon the south of the Cherethites, and upon the coast which belongeth to Judah, and upon the south of Caleb; and we burned Ziklag with fire. 
And David said to him, Canst thou bring me down to this company? And he said, Swear unto me by God, that thou wilt neither kill me, nor deliver me into the hands of my master, and I will bring thee down to this company. 
And when he had brought him down, behold, they were spread abroad upon all the
1059,God hath done unto us? 
And they came unto Jacob their father unto the land of Canaan, and told him all that befell unto them; saying, 
The man, who is the lord of the land, spake roughly to us, and took us for spies of the country. 
And we said unto him, We are true men; we are no spies: 
We be twelve brethren, sons of our father; one is not, and the youngest is this day with our father in the land of Canaan. 
And the man, the lord of the country, said unto us, Hereby shall I know that ye are true men; leave one of your brethren here with me, and take food for the famine of your households, and be gone: 
And bring your youngest brother unto me: then shall I know that ye are no spies, but that ye are true men: so will I deliver you your brother, and ye shall traffick in the land. 
And it came to pass as they emptied their sacks, that, behold, every man's bundle of money was in his sack: and when both they and their father saw the bundles of money, they were afraid. 
And Jacob their father said unto them, Me have ye bereaved of my children: Jos
1080,us man shall receive a righteous man's reward. 
And whosoever shall give to drink unto one of these little ones a cup of cold water only in the name of a disciple, verily I say unto you, he shall in no wise lose his reward. 
And it came to pass, when Jesus had made an end of commanding his twelve disciples, he departed thence to teach and to preach in their cities. 
Now when John had heard in the prison the works of Christ, he sent two of his disciples, 
And said unto him, Art thou he that should come, or do we look for another? 
Jesus answered and said unto them, Go and shew John again those things which ye do hear and see: 
The blind receive their sight, and the lame walk, the lepers are cleansed, and the deaf hear, the dead are raised up, and the poor have the gospel preached to them. 
And blessed is he, whosoever shall not be offended in me. 
And as they departed, Jesus began to say unto the multitudes concerning John, What went ye out into the wilderness to see? A reed shaken with the wind? 
But what went ye out for to see? A man clothed in soft raiment? beho
830,ndredfold, and shall inherit everlasting life. 
But many that are first shall be last; and the last shall be first. 
For the kingdom of heaven is like unto a man that is an householder, which went out early in the morning to hire labourers into his vineyard. 
And when he had agreed with the labourers for a penny a day, he sent them into his vineyard. 
And he went out about the third hour, and saw others standing idle in the marketplace, 
And said unto them; Go ye also into the vineyard, and whatsoever is right I will give you. And they went their way. 
Again he went out about the sixth and ninth hour, and did likewise. 
And about the eleventh hour he went out, and found others standing idle, and saith unto them, Why stand ye here all the day idle? 
They say unto him, Because no man hath hired us. He saith unto them, Go
913,ee away into captivity: he will visit thine iniquity, O daughter of Edom; he will discover thy sins. 
Remember, O LORD, what is come upon us: consider, and behold our reproach. 
Our inheritance is turned to strangers, our houses to aliens. 
We are orphans and fatherless, our mothers are as widows. 
We have drunken our water for money; our wood is sold unto us. 
Our necks are under persecution: we labour, and have no rest. 
We have given the hand to the Egyptians, and to the Assyrians, to be satisfied with bread. 
Our fathers have sinned, and are not; and we have borne their iniquities. 
Servants have ruled over us: there is none that doth deliver us out of their hand. 
We gat our bread with the peril of our lives because of the sword of the wilderness. 
Our skin was black like an oven because of the terrible famine. 
They ravished the women in Zion, and the maids in the cities of Judah. 
Princes are 
953,his blood out of his mouth, and his abominations from between his teeth: but he that remaineth, even he, shall be for our God, and he shall be as a governor in Judah, and Ekron as a Jebusite. 
And I will encamp about mine house because of the army, because of him that passeth by, and because of him that returneth: and no oppressor shall pass through them any more: for now have I seen with mine eyes. 
Rejoice greatly, O daughter of Zion; shout, O daughter of Jerusalem: behold, thy King cometh unto thee: he is just, and having salvation; lowly, and riding upon an ass, and upon a colt the foal of an ass. 
And I will cut off the chariot from Ephraim, and the horse from Jerusalem, and the battle bow shall be cut off: and he shall speak peace unto the heathen: and his dominion shall be from sea even to sea, and from the river even to the ends of the earth. 
As for thee also, by the blood of thy covenant I have sent forth thy prisoners out of the
734,ured the wall of the house, six cubits; and the breadth of every side chamber, four cubits, round about the house on every side. 
And the side chambers were three, one over another, and thirty in order; and they entered into the wall which was of the house for the side chambers round about, that they might have hold, but they had not hold in the wall of the house. 
And there was an enlarging, and a winding about still upward to the side chambers: for the winding about of the house went still upward round about the house: therefore the breadth of the house was still upward, and so increased from the lowest chamber to the highest by the midst. 
I saw also the height of the house round about: the foundations of the side chamber
1018,he LORD commanded by the hand of Moses to give us cities to dwell in, with the suburbs thereof for our cattle. 
And the children of Israel gave unto the Levites out of their inheritance, at the commandment of the LORD, these cities and their suburbs. 
And the lot came out for the families of the Kohathites: and the children of Aaron the priest, which were of the Levites, had by lot out of the tribe of Judah, and out of the tribe of Simeon, and out of the tribe of Benjamin, thirteen cities. 
And the rest of the children of Kohath had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Ephraim, and out of the tribe of Dan, and out of the half tribe of Manasseh, ten cities. 
And the children of Gershon had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Issachar, and out of the tribe of Asher, and out of the tribe of Naphtali, and out of the half tribe of Manasseh in Bashan, thirteen cities. 
The children of Merari by their families had out of the tribe of Reuben, and out of the tribe of Gad, and out of the tribe of Zeb
1022,air off his head and his beard and his eyebrows, even all his hair he shall shave off: and he shall wash his clothes, also he shall wash his flesh in water, and he shall be clean. 
And on the eighth day he shall take two he lambs without blemish, and one ewe lamb of the first year without blemish, and three tenth deals of fine flour for a meat offering, mingled with oil, and one log of oil. 
And the priest that maketh him clean shall present the man that is to be made clean, and those things, before the LORD, at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation: 
And the priest shall take one he lamb, and offer him for a trespass offering, and the log of oil, and wave them for a wave offering before the LORD: 
And he shall slay the lamb in the place where he shall kill the sin offering and the burnt offering, in the holy place: for as the sin offering is the priest's, so is the trespass offering: it is most holy: 
And the priest shall take some of the blood of the trespass offering, and the priest shall put it
1068,lies. 
Now the cities of the tribe of the children of Benjamin according to their families were Jericho, and Bethhoglah, and the valley of Keziz, 
And Betharabah, and Zemaraim, and Bethel, 
And Avim, and Pharah, and Ophrah, 
And Chepharhaammonai, and Ophni, and Gaba; twelve cities with their villages: 
Gibeon, and Ramah, and Beeroth, 
And Mizpeh, and Chephirah, and Mozah, 
And Rekem, and Irpeel, and Taralah, 
And Zelah, Eleph, and Jebusi, which is Jerusalem, Gibeath, and Kirjath; fourteen cities with their villages. This is the inheritance of the children of Benjamin according to their families. 
And the second lot came forth to Simeon, even for the tribe of the children of Simeon according to their families: and their inheritance was within the inheritance of the children of Judah. 
And they had in their inheritance Beersheba, and Sheba, and Moladah, 
And Hazarshual, and Balah, and Azem, 
And Eltolad, and Bethul, and Hormah, 
And Ziklag, and Bethmarcaboth, and Hazarsusah, 
And Bethlebaoth, and Sharuhen; thirteen cities and their villages: 
Ain, Remmon
841,d he measured the south gate according to these measures; 
And the little chambers thereof, and the posts thereof, and the arches thereof, according to these measures: and there were windows in it and in the arches thereof round about: it was fifty cubits long, and five and twenty cubits broad. 
And the arches round about were five and twenty cubits long, and five cubits broad. 
And the arches thereof were toward the utter court; and palm trees were upon the posts thereof: and the going up to it had eight steps. 
And he brought me into the inner court toward the east: and he measured the gate according to these measures. 
And the little chambers thereof, and the posts thereof, and the arches thereof, were according to these measures: and there were windows therein and in the arches thereof round about: it was fifty cubits long, a
844,come them, and kill them. 
And their dead bodies shall lie in the street of the great city, which spiritually is called Sodom and Egypt, where also our Lord was crucified. 
And they of the people and kindreds and tongues and nations shall see their dead bodies three days and an half, and shall not suffer their dead bodies to be put in graves. 
And they that dwell upon the earth shall rejoice over them, and make merry, and shall send gifts one to another; because these two prophets tormented them that dwelt on the earth. 
And after three days and an half the spirit of life from God entered into them, and they stood upon their feet; and great fear fell upon them which saw them. 
And they heard a great voice from heaven saying unto them, Come up hither. And they ascended up to heaven in a cloud; and their enemies beheld them. 
And the 
725, went home; but David and his men gat them up unto the hold. 
And Samuel died; and all the Israelites were gathered together, and lamented him, and buried him in his house at Ramah. And David arose, and went down to the wilderness of Paran. 
And there was a man in Maon, whose possessions were in Carmel; and the man was very great, and he had three thousand sheep, and a thousand goats: and he was shearing his sheep in Carmel. 
Now the name of the man was Nabal; and the name of his wife Abigail: and she was a woman of good understanding, and of a beautiful countenance: but the man was churlish and evil in his doings; and he was of the house of Caleb. 
And David heard in the wilderness that Nabal did shear his sheep. 

811,; and ye shall afflict your souls, and offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And ye shall do no work in that same day: for it is a day of atonement, to make an atonement for you before the LORD your God. 
For whatsoever soul it be that shall not be afflicted in that same day, he shall be cut off from among his people. 
And whatsoever soul it be that doeth any work in that same day, the same soul will I destroy from among his people. 
Ye shall do no manner of work: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations in all your dwellings. 
It shall be unto you a sabbath of rest, and ye shall afflict your souls: in the ninth day of the month at even, from even unto even, shall ye celebrate your sabbath. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, 
1051,preserved my spirit. 
And these things hast thou hid in thine heart: I know that this is with thee. 
If I sin, then thou markest me, and thou wilt not acquit me from mine iniquity. 
If I be wicked, woe unto me; and if I be righteous, yet will I not lift up my head. I am full of confusion; therefore see thou mine affliction; 
For it increaseth. Thou huntest me as a fierce lion: and again thou shewest thyself marvellous upon me. 
Thou renewest thy witnesses against me, and increasest thine indignation upon me; changes and war are against me. 
Wherefore then hast thou brought me forth out of the womb? Oh that I had given up the ghost, and no eye had seen me! 
I should have been as though I had not been; I should have been carried from the womb to the grave. 
Are not my days few? cease then, and let me alone, that I may take comfort a little, 
Before I go whence I shall not return, even to the land of darkness and the shadow of death; 
A land of darkness, as darkness itself; and of the shadow of death, without any order, and where the ligh
1016,wer. 
And in the synagogue there was a man, which had a spirit of an unclean devil, and cried out with a loud voice, 
Saying, Let us alone; what have we to do with thee, thou Jesus of Nazareth? art thou come to destroy us? I know thee who thou art; the Holy One of God. 
And Jesus rebuked him, saying, Hold thy peace, and come out of him. And when the devil had thrown him in the midst, he came out of him, and hurt him not. 
And they were all amazed, and spake among themselves, saying, What a word is this! for with authority and power he commandeth the unclean spirits, and they come out. 
And the fame of him went out into every place of the country round about. 
And he arose out of the synagogue, and entered into Simon's house. And Simon's wife's mother was taken with a great fever; and they besought him for her. 
And he stood over her, and rebuked the fever; and it left her: and immediately she arose and ministered unto them. 
Now when the sun was setting, all they that had any sick with divers diseases
935,see you, or else be absent, I may hear of your affairs, that ye stand fast in one spirit, with one mind striving together for the faith of the gospel; 
And in nothing terrified by your adversaries: which is to them an evident token of perdition, but to you of salvation, and that of God. 
For unto you it is given in the behalf of Christ, not only to believe on him, but also to suffer for his sake; 
Having the same conflict which ye saw in me, and now hear to be in me. 
If there be therefore any consolation in Christ, if any comfort of love, if any fellowship of the Spirit, if any bowels and mercies, 
Fulfil ye my joy, that ye be likeminded, having the same love, being of one accord, of one mind. 
Let nothing be done through strife or vainglory; but in lowliness of mind let each esteem other better than themselves. 
Look not every man on his own things, but every man also on the things of others. 
Let this mind be in you, w
830,t covet earnestly the best gifts: and yet shew I unto you a more excellent way. 
Though I speak with the tongues of men and of angels, and have not charity, I am become as sounding brass, or a tinkling cymbal. 
And though I have the gift of prophecy, and understand all mysteries, and all knowledge; and though I have all faith, so that I could remove mountains, and have not charity, I am nothing. 
And though I bestow all my goods to feed the poor, and though I give my body to be burned, and have not charity, it profiteth me nothing. 
Charity suffereth long, and is kind; charity envieth not; charity vaunteth not itself, is not puffed up, 
Doth not behave itself unseemly, seeketh not her own, is not easily provoked, thinketh no evil; 
Rejoiceth not in iniquity, but rejoiceth in the truth; 
Beareth all things, believeth al
763,him that liveth for ever, whose dominion is an everlasting dominion, and his kingdom is from generation to generation: 
And all the inhabitants of the earth are reputed as nothing: and he doeth according to his will in the army of heaven, and among the inhabitants of the earth: and none can stay his hand, or say unto him, What doest thou? 
At the same time my reason returned unto me; and for the glory of my kingdom, mine honour and brightness returned unto me; and my counsellors and my lords sought unto me; and I was established in my kingdom, and excellent majesty was added unto me. 
Now I Nebuchadnezzar praise and extol and honour the King of heaven, all whose works are truth, and his ways judgment: and those that walk in pride he is able to abase. 
B
1025, ministered unto them. 
Now when the sun was setting, all they that had any sick with divers diseases brought them unto him; and he laid his hands on every one of them, and healed them. 
And devils also came out of many, crying out, and saying, Thou art Christ the Son of God. And he rebuking them suffered them not to speak: for they knew that he was Christ. 
And when it was day, he departed and went into a desert place: and the people sought him, and came unto him, and stayed him, that he should not depart from them. 
And he said unto them, I must preach the kingdom of God to other cities also: for therefore am I sent. 
And he preached in the synagogues of Galilee. 
And it came to pass, that, as the people pressed upon him to hear the word of God, he stood by the lake of Gennesaret, 
And saw two ships standing by the lake: but the fishermen were gone out of them, and were washing their nets. 
And he entered into one of the ships, which was Simon's, and prayed him that he would thrust out a little from the land
1067,king of Judah sat either of them on his throne, clothed in their robes, and they sat in a void place at the entering in of the gate of Samaria; and all the prophets prophesied before them. 
And Zedekiah the son of Chenaanah had made him horns of iron, and said, Thus saith the LORD, With these thou shalt push Syria until they be consumed. 
And all the prophets prophesied so, saying, Go up to Ramothgilead, and prosper: for the LORD shall deliver it into the hand of the king. 
And the messenger that went to call Micaiah spake to him, saying, Behold, the words of the prophets declare good to the king with one assent; let thy word therefore, I pray thee, be like one of their's, and speak thou good. 
And Micaiah said, As the LORD liveth, even what my God saith, that will I speak. 
And when he was come to the king, the king said unto him, Micaiah, shall we go to Ramothgilead to battle, or shall I forbear? And he said, Go ye up, and prosper, and they shall be delivered into your hand. 
And the king said to him, How many times shall I adjure thee that thou say
783, whither I have caused you to be carried away captives, and pray unto the LORD for it: for in the peace thereof shall ye have peace. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Let not your prophets and your diviners, that be in the midst of you, deceive you, neither hearken to your dreams which ye cause to be dreamed. 
For they prophesy falsely unto you in my name: I have not sent them, saith the LORD. 
For thus saith the LORD, That after seventy years be accomplished at Babylon I will visit you, and perform my good word toward you, in causing you to return to this place. 
For I know the thoughts that I think toward you, saith the LORD, thoughts of peace, and not of evil, to give you an expected end. 
Then shall ye call upon me, and ye shall go and pray unto me,
971,Senir, and unto mount Hermon. 
And these were the heads of the house of their fathers, even Epher, and Ishi, and Eliel, and Azriel, and Jeremiah, and Hodaviah, and Jahdiel, mighty men of valour, famous men, and heads of the house of their fathers. 
And they transgressed against the God of their fathers, and went a whoring after the gods of the people of the land, whom God destroyed before them. 
And the God of Israel stirred up the spirit of Pul king of Assyria, and the spirit of Tilgathpilneser king of Assyria, and he carried them away, even the Reubenites, and the Gadites, and the half tribe of Manasseh, and brought them unto Halah, and Habor, and Hara, and to the river Gozan, unto this day. 
The sons of Levi; Gershon, Kohath, and Merari. 
And the sons of Kohath; Amram, Izhar, and Hebron, and Uzziel. 
And the children of Amram; Aaron, and Moses, and Miriam. The sons also of Aaron; Nadab, and Abihu, Eleazar, and Ithamar. 
Eleazar begat Phinehas, Phinehas b
1012,he heavens; his hand hath formed the crooked serpent. 
Lo, these are parts of his ways: but how little a portion is heard of him? but the thunder of his power who can understand? 
Moreover Job continued his parable, and said, 
As God liveth, who hath taken away my judgment; and the Almighty, who hath vexed my soul; 
All the while my breath is in me, and the spirit of God is in my nostrils; 
My lips shall not speak wickedness, nor my tongue utter deceit. 
God forbid that I should justify you: till I die I will not remove mine integrity from me. 
My righteousness I hold fast, and will not let it go: my heart shall not reproach me so long as I live. 
Let mine enemy be as the wicked, and he that riseth up against me as the unrighteous. 
For what is the hope of the hypocrite, though he hath gained, when God taketh away his soul? 
Will God hear his cry when trouble cometh upon him? 
Will he delight himself in the Almighty? will he always call upon God? 
I will teach you by the hand of God: that which is
921, seven thunders uttered their voices. 
And when the seven thunders had uttered their voices, I was about to write: and I heard a voice from heaven saying unto me, Seal up those things which the seven thunders uttered, and write them not. 
And the angel which I saw stand upon the sea and upon the earth lifted up his hand to heaven, 
And sware by him that liveth for ever and ever, who created heaven, and the things that therein are, and the earth, and the things that therein are, and the sea, and the things which are therein, that there should be time no longer: 
But in the days of the voice of the seventh angel, when he shall begin to sound, the mystery of God should be finished, as he hath declared to his servants the prophets. 
And the voice which I heard from heaven spake unto me again, and said, Go and take the little book which is open in the hand of the angel which standeth upon the sea and upon the ear
935,d, and were scattered abroad, as sheep having no shepherd. 
Then saith he unto his disciples, The harvest truly is plenteous, but the labourers are few; 
Pray ye therefore the Lord of the harvest, that he will send forth labourers into his harvest. 
And when he had called unto him his twelve disciples, he gave them power against unclean spirits, to cast them out, and to heal all manner of sickness and all manner of disease. 
Now the names of the twelve apostles are these; The first, Simon, who is called Peter, and Andrew his brother; James the son of Zebedee, and John his brother; 
Philip, and Bartholomew; Thomas, and Matthew the publican; James the son of Alphaeus, and Lebbaeus, whose surname was Thaddaeus; 
Simon the Canaanite, and Judas Iscariot, who also betrayed him. 
These twelve Jesus sent forth, and commanded them, saying, Go not into the way of the Gentiles, and into any city of the Samaritans enter ye not: 
But 
720,nts, O LORD. 
For thou, LORD, art high above all the earth: thou art exalted far above all gods. 
Ye that love the LORD, hate evil: he preserveth the souls of his saints; he delivereth them out of the hand of the wicked. 
Light is sown for the righteous, and gladness for the upright in heart. 
Rejoice in the LORD, ye righteous; and give thanks at the remembrance of his holiness. 
O sing unto the LORD a new song; for he hath done marvellous things: his right hand, and his holy arm, hath gotten him the victory. 
The LORD hath made known his salvation: his righteousness hath he openly shewed in the sight of the heathen. 
He hath remembered his mercy and his truth toward the house of Israel: all the ends of the ear
970,hened me. 
Then said he, Knowest thou wherefore I come unto thee? and now will I return to fight with the prince of Persia: and when I am gone forth, lo, the prince of Grecia shall come. 
But I will shew thee that which is noted in the scripture of truth: and there is none that holdeth with me in these things, but Michael your prince. 
Also I in the first year of Darius the Mede, even I, stood to confirm and to strengthen him. 
And now will I shew thee the truth. Behold, there shall stand up yet three kings in Persia; and the fourth shall be far richer than they all: and by his strength through his riches he shall stir up all against the realm of Grecia. 
And a mighty king shall stand up, that shall rule with great dominion, and do according to his will. 
And when he shall stand up, his kingdom shall be broken, and shall be divided toward the four winds of heaven; and not to his posterity, nor according to his dominion which he ruled: for his kingdom shall
755,n that he hath sinned in one of these, and it shall be forgiven him: and the remnant shall be the priest's, as a meat offering. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
If a soul commit a trespass, and sin through ignorance, in the holy things of the LORD; then he shall bring for his trespass unto the LORD a ram without blemish out of the flocks, with thy estimation by shekels of silver, after the shekel of the sanctuary, for a trespass offering. 
And he shall make amends for the harm that he hath done in the holy thing, and shall add the fifth part thereto, and give it unto the priest: and the priest shall make an atonement for him with the ram of the trespass offering, and it shall be forgiven him. 
And if a soul sin, and commit any of these t
812,unto us, and brought us word again, and said, It is a good land which the LORD our God doth give us. 
Notwithstanding ye would not go up, but rebelled against the commandment of the LORD your God: 
And ye murmured in your tents, and said, Because the LORD hated us, he hath brought us forth out of the land of Egypt, to deliver us into the hand of the Amorites, to destroy us. 
Whither shall we go up? our brethren have discouraged our heart, saying, The people is greater and taller than we; the cities are great and walled up to heaven; and moreover we have seen the sons of the Anakims there. 
Then I said unto you, Dread not, neither be afraid of them. 
The LORD your God which goeth before you, he shall fight for you, according to all that he did for you in Egypt before your eyes; 
And in the wilderness, 
939, her, my people, that ye be not partakers of her sins, and that ye receive not of her plagues. 
For her sins have reached unto heaven, and God hath remembered her iniquities. 
Reward her even as she rewarded you, and double unto her double according to her works: in the cup which she hath filled fill to her double. 
How much she hath glorified herself, and lived deliciously, so much torment and sorrow give her: for she saith in her heart, I sit a queen, and am no widow, and shall see no sorrow. 
Therefore shall her plagues come in one day, death, and mourning, and famine; and she shall be utterly burned with fire: for strong is the Lord God who judgeth her. 
And the kings of the earth, who have committed fornication and lived deliciously with her, shall bewail her, and lament for her, when they shall see the smoke of her burning, 
Standing afar off for the fear of her torment, saying, Alas, alas that great city Babylon, that 
891,r damnation. 
And he looked up, and saw the rich men casting their gifts into the treasury. 
And he saw also a certain poor widow casting in thither two mites. 
And he said, Of a truth I say unto you, that this poor widow hath cast in more than they all: 
For all these have of their abundance cast in unto the offerings of God: but she of her penury hath cast in all the living that she had. 
And as some spake of the temple, how it was adorned with goodly stones and gifts, he said, 
As for these things which ye behold, the days will come, in the which there shall not be left one stone upon another, that shall not be thrown down. 
And they asked him, saying, Master, but when shall these things be? and what sign will there be when these things shall come to pass? 
And he said, Take heed that ye be not deceived: for many shall come in my name, saying, I am Christ; and the time drawet
963, the children of Israel: that there be no plague among the children of Israel, when the children of Israel come nigh unto the sanctuary. 
And Moses, and Aaron, and all the congregation of the children of Israel, did to the Levites according unto all that the LORD commanded Moses concerning the Levites, so did the children of Israel unto them. 
And the Levites were purified, and they washed their clothes; and Aaron offered them as an offering before the LORD; and Aaron made an atonement for them to cleanse them. 
And after that went the Levites in to do their service in the tabernacle of the congregation before Aaron, and before his sons: as the LORD had commanded Moses concerning the Levites, so did they unto them. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
This is it that belongeth unto the Levites: from twenty and five years old and upward they shall go in to wait upon the service of the tabernacle of the congregation: 
And from the age of fifty yea
948, and so it was, because he feared his father's household, and the men of the city, that he could not do it by day, that he did it by night. 
And when the men of the city arose early in the morning, behold, the altar of Baal was cast down, and the grove was cut down that was by it, and the second bullock was offered upon the altar that was built. 
And they said one to another, Who hath done this thing? And when they enquired and asked, they said, Gideon the son of Joash hath done this thing. 
Then the men of the city said unto Joash, Bring out thy son, that he may die: because he hath cast down the altar of Baal, and because he hath cut down the grove that was by it. 
And Joash said unto all that stood against him, Will ye plead for Baal? will ye save him? he that will plead for him, let him be put to death whilst it is yet morning: if he be a god, let him plead for himself, because one hath cast down his altar. 
Therefore on that day 
740,ildren, and would not be comforted, because they are not. 
But when Herod was dead, behold, an angel of the Lord appeareth in a dream to Joseph in Egypt, 
Saying, Arise, and take the young child and his mother, and go into the land of Israel: for they are dead which sought the young child's life. 
And he arose, and took the young child and his mother, and came into the land of Israel. 
But when he heard that Archelaus did reign in Judaea in the room of his father Herod, he was afraid to go thither: notwithstanding, being warned of God in a dream, he turned aside into the parts of Galilee: 
And he came and dwelt in a city called Nazareth: that it might be fulfilled which was spoken by the prophets, He shall be called a Nazarene. 
I
762,ings worthy of stripes, shall be beaten with few stripes. For unto whomsoever much is given, of him shall be much required: and to whom men have committed much, of him they will ask the more. 
I am come to send fire on the earth; and what will I, if it be already kindled? 
But I have a baptism to be baptized with; and how am I straitened till it be accomplished! 
Suppose ye that I am come to give peace on earth? I tell you, Nay; but rather division: 
For from henceforth there shall be five in one house divided, three against two, and two against three. 
The father shall be divided against the son, and the son against the father; the mother against the daughter, and the daughter against the mother; the mother in law against her daughter in law, and the 
1009,
Then Joshua commanded the officers of the people, saying, 
Pass through the host, and command the people, saying, Prepare you victuals; for within three days ye shall pass over this Jordan, to go in to possess the land, which the LORD your God giveth you to possess it. 
And to the Reubenites, and to the Gadites, and to half the tribe of Manasseh, spake Joshua, saying, 
Remember the word which Moses the servant of the LORD commanded you, saying, The LORD your God hath given you rest, and hath given you this land. 
Your wives, your little ones, and your cattle, shall remain in the land which Moses gave you on this side Jordan; but ye shall pass before your brethren armed, all the mighty men of valour, and help them; 
Until the LORD have given your brethren rest, as he hath given you, and they also have possessed the land which the LORD your God giveth them: then ye shall return unto the land of your possession, and enjoy it, which Moses the LORD's servant gave you on this side Jordan toward the 
1027,e denied him, saying, Woman, I know him not. 
And after a little while another saw him, and said, Thou art also of them. And Peter said, Man, I am not. 
And about the space of one hour after another confidently affirmed, saying, Of a truth this fellow also was with him: for he is a Galilaean. 
And Peter said, Man, I know not what thou sayest. And immediately, while he yet spake, the cock crew. 
And the Lord turned, and looked upon Peter. And Peter remembered the word of the Lord, how he had said unto him, Before the cock crow, thou shalt deny me thrice. 
And Peter went out, and wept bitterly. 
And the men that held Jesus mocked him, and smote him. 
And when they had blindfolded him, they struck him on the face, and asked him, saying, Prophesy, who is it that smote thee? 
And many other things blasphemously spake they against him. 
And as soon as it was day, the elders of the people and the chief priests and the scribes came together, and led him into their council, saying, 
Art thou the Christ? tell us. And he s
766, nor angels, nor principalities, nor powers, nor things present, nor things to come, 
Nor height, nor depth, nor any other creature, shall be able to separate us from the love of God, which is in Christ Jesus our Lord. 
I say the truth in Christ, I lie not, my conscience also bearing me witness in the Holy Ghost, 
That I have great heaviness and continual sorrow in my heart. 
For I could wish that myself were accursed from Christ for my brethren, my kinsmen according to the flesh: 
Who are Israelites; to whom pertaineth the adoption, and the glory, and the covenants, and the giving of the law, and the service of God, and the promises; 
Whose are the fathers, and of whom as concerning the flesh Christ came, who is over all, God blessed for ever. Amen. 
Not 
1032, and a path in the mighty waters; 
Which bringeth forth the chariot and horse, the army and the power; they shall lie down together, they shall not rise: they are extinct, they are quenched as tow. 
Remember ye not the former things, neither consider the things of old. 
Behold, I will do a new thing; now it shall spring forth; shall ye not know it? I will even make a way in the wilderness, and rivers in the desert. 
The beast of the field shall honour me, the dragons and the owls: because I give waters in the wilderness, and rivers in the desert, to give drink to my people, my chosen. 
This people have I formed for myself; they shall shew forth my praise. 
But thou hast not called upon me, O Jacob; but thou hast been weary of me, O Israel. 
Thou hast not brought me the small cattle of thy burnt offerings; neither hast thou honoured me with thy sacrifices. I have not caused thee to serve with an offering, nor wearied thee with incense. 
Thou hast bought me no sweet cane with money, neither hast thou filled me with the
817, of your possession, which Moses the servant of the LORD gave you on the other side Jordan. 
But take diligent heed to do the commandment and the law, which Moses the servant of the LORD charged you, to love the LORD your God, and to walk in all his ways, and to keep his commandments, and to cleave unto him, and to serve him with all your heart and with all your soul. 
So Joshua blessed them, and sent them away: and they went unto their tents. 
Now to the one half of the tribe of Manasseh Moses had given possession in Bashan: but unto the other half thereof gave Joshua among their brethren on this side Jordan westward. And when Joshua sent them away also unto their tents, then he blessed them, 
And he spake unto them, saying, Return with much riches unto your tents, and with very much cattle, with silver, 
869,thou the work of our hands upon us; yea, the work of our hands establish thou it. 
He that dwelleth in the secret place of the most High shall abide under the shadow of the Almighty. 
I will say of the LORD, He is my refuge and my fortress: my God; in him will I trust. 
Surely he shall deliver thee from the snare of the fowler, and from the noisome pestilence. 
He shall cover thee with his feathers, and under his wings shalt thou trust: his truth shall be thy shield and buckler. 
Thou shalt not be afraid for the terror by night; nor for the arrow that flieth by day; 
Nor for the pestilence that walketh in darkness; nor for the destruction that wasteth at noonday. 
A thousand shall fall at thy side, and ten thousand at thy right hand; but it shall not come nigh thee. 
Only with thine eyes shalt thou behold and see the reward of the wicked. 
Because thou hast
744,n thunders uttered, and write them not. 
And the angel which I saw stand upon the sea and upon the earth lifted up his hand to heaven, 
And sware by him that liveth for ever and ever, who created heaven, and the things that therein are, and the earth, and the things that therein are, and the sea, and the things which are therein, that there should be time no longer: 
But in the days of the voice of the seventh angel, when he shall begin to sound, the mystery of God should be finished, as he hath declared to his servants the prophets. 
And the voice which I heard from heaven spake unto me again, and said, Go and take the little book which is open in the hand of the angel which standeth upon the sea and upon the earth. 
And I went unto 
1064,, saying, Master, what shall I do to inherit eternal life? 
He said unto him, What is written in the law? how readest thou? 
And he answering said, Thou shalt love the Lord thy God with all thy heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy strength, and with all thy mind; and thy neighbour as thyself. 
And he said unto him, Thou hast answered right: this do, and thou shalt live. 
But he, willing to justify himself, said unto Jesus, And who is my neighbour? 
And Jesus answering said, A certain man went down from Jerusalem to Jericho, and fell among thieves, which stripped him of his raiment, and wounded him, and departed, leaving him half dead. 
And by chance there came down a certain priest that way: and when he saw him, he passed by on the other side. 
And likewise a Levite, when he was at the place, came and looked on him, and passed by on the other side. 
But a certain Samaritan, as he journeyed, came where he was: and when he saw him, he had compassion on him, 
And went to him, and bound up his wounds, pouring in oil and wine, and set him on h
979, diligently hearken to the voice of the LORD thy God, and wilt do that which is right in his sight, and wilt give ear to his commandments, and keep all his statutes, I will put none of these diseases upon thee, which I have brought upon the Egyptians: for I am the LORD that healeth thee. 
And they came to Elim, where were twelve wells of water, and threescore and ten palm trees: and they encamped there by the waters. 
And they took their journey from Elim, and all the congregation of the children of Israel came unto the wilderness of Sin, which is between Elim and Sinai, on the fifteenth day of the second month after their departing out of the land of Egypt. 
And the whole congregation of the children of Israel murmured against Moses and Aaron in the wilderness: 
And the children of Israel said unto them, Would to God we had died by the hand of the LORD in the land of Egypt, when we sat by the flesh pots, and when we did eat bread to the full; for ye have brought u
784,ght up out of Egypt, buried they in Shechem, in a parcel of ground which Jacob bought of the sons of Hamor the father of Shechem for an hundred pieces of silver: and it became the inheritance of the children of Joseph. 
And Eleazar the son of Aaron died; and they buried him in a hill that pertained to Phinehas his son, which was given him in mount Ephraim. 
Now after the death of Joshua it came to pass, that the children of Israel asked the LORD, saying, Who shall go up for us against the Canaanites first, to fight against them? 
And the LORD said, Judah shall go up: behold, I have delivered the land into his hand. 
And Judah said unto Simeon his brother, Come up with me into my lot, that we may fight against the Canaanites; and I likewise will go with thee into thy lot. So
764,t I may thrust out all your right eyes, and lay it for a reproach upon all Israel. 
And the elders of Jabesh said unto him, Give us seven days' respite, that we may send messengers unto all the coasts of Israel: and then, if there be no man to save us, we will come out to thee. 
Then came the messengers to Gibeah of Saul, and told the tidings in the ears of the people: and all the people lifted up their voices, and wept. 
And, behold, Saul came after the herd out of the field; and Saul said, What aileth the people that they weep? And they told him the tidings of the men of Jabesh. 
And the Spirit of God came upon Saul when he heard those tidings, and his anger was kindled greatly. 
And he took a yoke of oxen, and hewed them in pieces, and sent them throu
791,David, and Jonathan shewed him all those things. And Jonathan brought David to Saul, and he was in his presence, as in times past. 
And there was war again: and David went out, and fought with the Philistines, and slew them with a great slaughter; and they fled from him. 
And the evil spirit from the LORD was upon Saul, as he sat in his house with his javelin in his hand: and David played with his hand. 
And Saul sought to smite David even to the wall with the javelin: but he slipped away out of Saul's presence, and he smote the javelin into the wall: and David fled, and escaped that night. 
Saul also sent messengers unto David's house, to watch him, and to slay him in the morning: and Michal David's wife told him, saying, If thou save not thy life to night, to morrow thou shalt b
1056,in prosperity, and their years in pleasures. 
But if they obey not, they shall perish by the sword, and they shall die without knowledge. 
But the hypocrites in heart heap up wrath: they cry not when he bindeth them. 
They die in youth, and their life is among the unclean. 
He delivereth the poor in his affliction, and openeth their ears in oppression. 
Even so would he have removed thee out of the strait into a broad place, where there is no straitness; and that which should be set on thy table should be full of fatness. 
But thou hast fulfilled the judgment of the wicked: judgment and justice take hold on thee. 
Because there is wrath, beware lest he take thee away with his stroke: then a great ransom cannot deliver thee. 
Will he esteem thy riches? no, not gold, nor all the forces of strength. 
Desire not the night, when people are cut off in their place. 
Take heed, regard not iniquity: for this hast thou chosen rather than affliction. 
Behold, God exalteth by his power: who teacheth like him? 
Who hath enjoined him his way? or who can 
752, passover, a feast of the Jews, was nigh. 
When Jesus then lifted up his eyes, and saw a great company come unto him, he saith unto Philip, Whence shall we buy bread, that these may eat? 
And this he said to prove him: for he himself knew what he would do. 
Philip answered him, Two hundred pennyworth of bread is not sufficient for them, that every one of them may take a little. 
One of his disciples, Andrew, Simon Peter's brother, saith unto him, 
There is a lad here, which hath five barley loaves, and two small fishes: but what are they among so many? 
And Jesus said, Make the men sit down. Now there was much grass in the place. So the men sat down, in number about five thousand. 
And Jesus took the loaves; and when he had given thanks, he d
770,gel, and hath brought us forth out of Egypt: and, behold, we are in Kadesh, a city in the uttermost of thy border: 
Let us pass, I pray thee, through thy country: we will not pass through the fields, or through the vineyards, neither will we drink of the water of the wells: we will go by the king's high way, we will not turn to the right hand nor to the left, until we have passed thy borders. 
And Edom said unto him, Thou shalt not pass by me, lest I come out against thee with the sword. 
And the children of Israel said unto him, We will go by the high way: and if I and my cattle drink of thy water, then I will pay for it: I will only, without doing anything else, go through on my feet. 
And he said, Thou shalt not go through. And Edom came out against him wit
721,ead of the Philistine in his hand. 
And Saul said to him, Whose son art thou, thou young man? And David answered, I am the son of thy servant Jesse the Bethlehemite. 
And it came to pass, when he had made an end of speaking unto Saul, that the soul of Jonathan was knit with the soul of David, and Jonathan loved him as his own soul. 
And Saul took him that day, and would let him go no more home to his father's house. 
Then Jonathan and David made a covenant, because he loved him as his own soul. 
And Jonathan stripped himself of the robe that was upon him, and gave it to David, and his garments, even to his sword, and to his bow, and to his girdle. 
And David went out whithersoever Saul sent him, and behaved hims
900, my supplications, when I cry unto thee, when I lift up my hands toward thy holy oracle. 
Draw me not away with the wicked, and with the workers of iniquity, which speak peace to their neighbours, but mischief is in their hearts. 
Give them according to their deeds, and according to the wickedness of their endeavours: give them after the work of their hands; render to them their desert. 
Because they regard not the works of the LORD, nor the operation of his hands, he shall destroy them, and not build them up. 
Blessed be the LORD, because he hath heard the voice of my supplications. 
The LORD is my strength and my shield; my heart trusted in him, and I am helped: therefore my heart greatly rejoiceth; and with my song will I praise him. 
The LORD is their strength, and he is the saving strength of his anointed. 
Save thy people, and bless thine inheritance: feed them also, and lift them 
818, you; then ye rebelled against the commandment of the LORD your God, and ye believed him not, nor hearkened to his voice. 
Ye have been rebellious against the LORD from the day that I knew you. 
Thus I fell down before the LORD forty days and forty nights, as I fell down at the first; because the LORD had said he would destroy you. 
I prayed therefore unto the LORD, and said, O Lord GOD, destroy not thy people and thine inheritance, which thou hast redeemed through thy greatness, which thou hast brought forth out of Egypt with a mighty hand. 
Remember thy servants, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob; look not unto the stubbornness of this people, nor to their wickedness, nor to their sin: 
Lest the land whence thou broughtest us out say, Because the LORD was not able to bring them into the land which he promised the
847, great waters shall cover thee; 
When I shall bring thee down with them that descend into the pit, with the people of old time, and shall set thee in the low parts of the earth, in places desolate of old, with them that go down to the pit, that thou be not inhabited; and I shall set glory in the land of the living; 
I will make thee a terror, and thou shalt be no more: though thou be sought for, yet shalt thou never be found again, saith the Lord GOD. 
The word of the LORD came again unto me, saying, 
Now, thou son of man, take up a lamentation for Tyrus; 
And say unto Tyrus, O thou that art situate at the entry of the sea, which art a merchant of the people for many isles, Thus saith the Lord GOD; O Tyrus, thou hast said, I am of perfect beauty. 
Thy borders are in the midst of the seas, thy builders have perfected thy beauty. 
They h
773,my anger shall be kindled against them in that day, and I will forsake them, and I will hide my face from them, and they shall be devoured, and many evils and troubles shall befall them; so that they will say in that day, Are not these evils come upon us, because our God is not among us? 
And I will surely hide my face in that day for all the evils which they shall have wrought, in that they are turned unto other gods. 
Now therefore write ye this song for you, and teach it the children of Israel: put it in their mouths, that this song may be a witness for me against the children of Israel. 
For when I shall have brought them into the land which I sware unto their fathers, that floweth with milk and honey; and they shall have eaten and filled themselves, and waxe
876,bbed, walk in the statutes of life, without committing iniquity; he shall surely live, he shall not die. 
None of his sins that he hath committed shall be mentioned unto him: he hath done that which is lawful and right; he shall surely live. 
Yet the children of thy people say, The way of the Lord is not equal: but as for them, their way is not equal. 
When the righteous turneth from his righteousness, and committeth iniquity, he shall even die thereby. 
But if the wicked turn from his wickedness, and do that which is lawful and right, he shall live thereby. 
Yet ye say, The way of the Lord is not equal. O ye house of Israel, I will judge you every one after his ways. 
And it came to pass in the twelfth year of our captivity, in the tenth month, in the fifth day of the month, that one that had escaped out of Jerusalem came unto me, saying, The city is smitten. 
No
922, no joy in their young men, neither shall have mercy on their fatherless and widows: for every one is an hypocrite and an evildoer, and every mouth speaketh folly. For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still. 
For wickedness burneth as the fire: it shall devour the briers and thorns, and shall kindle in the thickets of the forest, and they shall mount up like the lifting up of smoke. 
Through the wrath of the LORD of hosts is the land darkened, and the people shall be as the fuel of the fire: no man shall spare his brother. 
And he shall snatch on the right hand, and be hungry; and he shall eat on the left hand, and they shall not be satisfied: they shall eat every man the flesh of his own arm: 
Manasseh, Ephraim; and Ephraim, Manasseh: and they together shall be against Judah. For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still. 
Woe unto them tha
840,r as we have many members in one body, and all members have not the same office: 
So we, being many, are one body in Christ, and every one members one of another. 
Having then gifts differing according to the grace that is given to us, whether prophecy, let us prophesy according to the proportion of faith; 
Or ministry, let us wait on our ministering: or he that teacheth, on teaching; 
Or he that exhorteth, on exhortation: he that giveth, let him do it with simplicity; he that ruleth, with diligence; he that sheweth mercy, with cheerfulness. 
Let love be without dissimulation. Abhor that which is evil; cleave to that which is good. 
Be kindly affectioned one to another with brotherly love; in honour preferring one another; 
Not slothful in business; fervent in spirit; serving the Lord; 
Rejoicing in hope; patient in tribulation;
900,e Edomites revolted from under the hand of Judah unto this day. The same time also did Libnah revolt from under his hand; because he had forsaken the LORD God of his fathers. 
Moreover he made high places in the mountains of Judah and caused the inhabitants of Jerusalem to commit fornication, and compelled Judah thereto. 
And there came a writing to him from Elijah the prophet, saying, Thus saith the LORD God of David thy father, Because thou hast not walked in the ways of Jehoshaphat thy father, nor in the ways of Asa king of Judah, 
But hast walked in the way of the kings of Israel, and hast made Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem to go a whoring, like to the whoredoms of the house of Ahab, and also hast slain thy brethren of thy father's house, which were better than thyself: 
Behold, with a great plague will the LORD smite thy people, and thy children, and thy wives, and all thy 
922,my people, and will ye save the souls alive that come unto you? 
And will ye pollute me among my people for handfuls of barley and for pieces of bread, to slay the souls that should not die, and to save the souls alive that should not live, by your lying to my people that hear your lies? 
Wherefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against your pillows, wherewith ye there hunt the souls to make them fly, and I will tear them from your arms, and will let the souls go, even the souls that ye hunt to make them fly. 
Your kerchiefs also will I tear, and deliver my people out of your hand, and they shall be no more in your hand to be hunted; and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
Because with lies ye have made the heart of the righteous sad, whom I have not made sad; and strengthened the hands of the wicked, that he should not return from his wicked way, by promising him life: 
Therefore ye shall see no more v
735,the heaven, and the beasts of the earth, to devour and destroy. 
And I will cause them to be removed into all kingdoms of the earth, because of Manasseh the son of Hezekiah king of Judah, for that which he did in Jerusalem. 
For who shall have pity upon thee, O Jerusalem? or who shall bemoan thee? or who shall go aside to ask how thou doest? 
Thou hast forsaken me, saith the LORD, thou art gone backward: therefore will I stretch out my hand against thee, and destroy thee; I am weary with repenting. 
And I will fan them with a fan in the gates of the land; I will bereave them of children, I will destroy my people since they return not from their ways. 
Their widows are increased to me above the sand of the seas: I have brought
1080,se, be gone. 
And she said unto him, There is no cause: this evil in sending me away is greater than the other that thou didst unto me. But he would not hearken unto her. 
Then he called his servant that ministered unto him, and said, Put now this woman out from me, and bolt the door after her. 
And she had a garment of divers colours upon her: for with such robes were the king's daughters that were virgins apparelled. Then his servant brought her out, and bolted the door after her. 
And Tamar put ashes on her head, and rent her garment of divers colours that was on her, and laid her hand on her head, and went on crying. 
And Absalom her brother said unto her, Hath Amnon thy brother been with thee? but hold now thy peace, my sister: he is thy brother; regard not this thing. So Tamar remained desolate in her brother Absalom's house. 
But when king David heard of all these things, he was very wroth. 
And Absalom spake unto his brother Amnon neither good nor bad: for Absalom hated Amnon, because he had forced his sister Tamar. 
And it came to pass after two full year
1073,at their looks, though they be a rebellious house. 
And thou shalt speak my words unto them, whether they will hear, or whether they will forbear: for they are most rebellious. 
But thou, son of man, hear what I say unto thee; Be not thou rebellious like that rebellious house: open thy mouth, and eat that I give thee. 
And when I looked, behold, an hand was sent unto me; and, lo, a roll of a book was therein; 
And he spread it before me; and it was written within and without: and there was written therein lamentations, and mourning, and woe. 
Moreover he said unto me, Son of man, eat that thou findest; eat this roll, and go speak unto the house of Israel. 
So I opened my mouth, and he caused me to eat that roll. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, cause thy belly to eat, and fill thy bowels with this roll that I give thee. Then did I eat it; and it was in my mouth as honey for sweetness. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, go, get thee unto the house of Israel, and speak with my words unto them. 
For thou art not sent to a people of a strange speech and of an h
1045, land, and trade therein; for the land, behold, it is large enough for them; let us take their daughters to us for wives, and let us give them our daughters. 
Only herein will the men consent unto us for to dwell with us, to be one people, if every male among us be circumcised, as they are circumcised. 
Shall not their cattle and their substance and every beast of their's be our's? only let us consent unto them, and they will dwell with us. 
And unto Hamor and unto Shechem his son hearkened all that went out of the gate of his city; and every male was circumcised, all that went out of the gate of his city. 
And it came to pass on the third day, when they were sore, that two of the sons of Jacob, Simeon and Levi, Dinah's brethren, took each man his sword, and came upon the city boldly, and slew all the males. 
And they slew Hamor and Shechem his son with the edge of the sword, and took Dinah out of Shechem's house, and went out. 
The sons of Jacob came upon the slain, and spoiled the city, because they had defiled their sister. 
T
1051,out of my hand? 
Who are they among all the gods of these lands, that have delivered their land out of my hand, that the LORD should deliver Jerusalem out of my hand? 
But they held their peace, and answered him not a word: for the king's commandment was, saying, Answer him not. 
Then came Eliakim, the son of Hilkiah, that was over the household, and Shebna the scribe, and Joah, the son of Asaph, the recorder, to Hezekiah with their clothes rent, and told him the words of Rabshakeh. 
And it came to pass, when king Hezekiah heard it, that he rent his clothes, and covered himself with sackcloth, and went into the house of the LORD. 
And he sent Eliakim, who was over the household, and Shebna the scribe, and the elders of the priests covered with sackcloth, unto Isaiah the prophet the son of Amoz. 
And they said unto him, Thus saith Hezekiah, This day is a day of trouble, and of rebuke, and of blasphemy: for the children are come to the birth, and there is not strength to bring forth. 
It may be the LORD thy God will hear the words of Rab
819,ise and declare them to their children: 
That they might set their hope in God, and not forget the works of God, but keep his commandments: 
And might not be as their fathers, a stubborn and rebellious generation; a generation that set not their heart aright, and whose spirit was not stedfast with God. 
The children of Ephraim, being armed, and carrying bows, turned back in the day of battle. 
They kept not the covenant of God, and refused to walk in his law; 
And forgat his works, and his wonders that he had shewed them. 
Marvellous things did he in the sight of their fathers, in the land of Egypt, in the field of Zoan. 
He divided the sea, and caused them to pass through; and he made the waters to stand as an heap. 
In the daytime also he led them with a cloud, and all the night with a light of fire. 
He c
954,od the tetrarch heard of all that was done by him: and he was perplexed, because that it was said of some, that John was risen from the dead; 
And of some, that Elias had appeared; and of others, that one of the old prophets was risen again. 
And Herod said, John have I beheaded: but who is this, of whom I hear such things? And he desired to see him. 
And the apostles, when they were returned, told him all that they had done. And he took them, and went aside privately into a desert place belonging to the city called Bethsaida. 
And the people, when they knew it, followed him: and he received them, and spake unto them of the kingdom of God, and healed them that had need of healing. 
And when the day began to wear away, then came the twelve, and said unto him, Send the multitude away, that they may go into the towns and country round about, and lodge, and get victuals: for we are here in a desert place. 
But he said unto them, Give ye them to
881,ered her. 
Wherefore it came to pass, when the time was come about after Hannah had conceived, that she bare a son, and called his name Samuel, saying, Because I have asked him of the LORD. 
And the man Elkanah, and all his house, went up to offer unto the LORD the yearly sacrifice, and his vow. 
But Hannah went not up; for she said unto her husband, I will not go up until the child be weaned, and then I will bring him, that he may appear before the LORD, and there abide for ever. 
And Elkanah her husband said unto her, Do what seemeth thee good; tarry until thou have weaned him; only the LORD establish his word. So the woman abode, and gave her son suck until she weaned him. 
And when she had weaned him, she took him up with her, with three bullocks, and one ephah of flour, and a bottle of wine, and brought him unto the house of the LORD in Shiloh: and the child was y
744,nother, even as God for Christ's sake hath forgiven you. 
Be ye therefore followers of God, as dear children; 
And walk in love, as Christ also hath loved us, and hath given himself for us an offering and a sacrifice to God for a sweetsmelling savour. 
But fornication, and all uncleanness, or covetousness, let it not be once named among you, as becometh saints; 
Neither filthiness, nor foolish talking, nor jesting, which are not convenient: but rather giving of thanks. 
For this ye know, that no whoremonger, nor unclean person, nor covetous man, who is an idolater, hath any inheritance in the kingdom of Christ and of God. 
Let no man deceive you with vain words: for because of these things cometh the wrath of God upon the children of 
982,an's dung, and thou shalt prepare thy bread therewith. 
Moreover he said unto me, Son of man, behold, I will break the staff of bread in Jerusalem: and they shall eat bread by weight, and with care; and they shall drink water by measure, and with astonishment: 
That they may want bread and water, and be astonied one with another, and consume away for their iniquity. 
And thou, son of man, take thee a sharp knife, take thee a barber's razor, and cause it to pass upon thine head and upon thy beard: then take thee balances to weigh, and divide the hair. 
Thou shalt burn with fire a third part in the midst of the city, when the days of the siege are fulfilled: and thou shalt take a third part, and smite about it with a knife: and a third part thou shalt scatter in the wind; and I will draw out a sword after them. 
Thou shalt also take thereof a few in number, and bind them in thy skirts. 
Then take of them again, and cast them into the midst of the fire, and burn them in 
751,And Hamath also shall border thereby; Tyrus, and Zidon, though it be very wise. 
And Tyrus did build herself a strong hold, and heaped up silver as the dust, and fine gold as the mire of the streets. 
Behold, the LORD will cast her out, and he will smite her power in the sea; and she shall be devoured with fire. 
Ashkelon shall see it, and fear; Gaza also shall see it, and be very sorrowful, and Ekron; for her expectation shall be ashamed; and the king shall perish from Gaza, and Ashkelon shall not be inhabited. 
And a bastard shall dwell in Ashdod, and I will cut off the pride of the Philistines. 
And I will take away his blood out of his mouth, and his abominations from between his teeth: but he that remaineth, even he, shall be for our Go
939,t if he thrust him of hatred, or hurl at him by laying of wait, that he die; 
Or in enmity smite him with his hand, that he die: he that smote him shall surely be put to death; for he is a murderer: the revenger of blood shall slay the murderer, when he meeteth him. 
But if he thrust him suddenly without enmity, or have cast upon him any thing without laying of wait, 
Or with any stone, wherewith a man may die, seeing him not, and cast it upon him, that he die, and was not his enemy, neither sought his harm: 
Then the congregation shall judge between the slayer and the revenger of blood according to these judgments: 
And the congregation shall deliver the slayer out of the hand of the revenger of blood, and the congregation shall restore him to the city of his refuge, whither he was fled: and he shall abide in it unto the death of the high priest, which was anointed with the holy oil. 
But if the slayer shall at any time come
839,nd their clothes rent, and having cut themselves, with offerings and incense in their hand, to bring them to the house of the LORD. 
And Ishmael the son of Nethaniah went forth from Mizpah to meet them, weeping all along as he went: and it came to pass, as he met them, he said unto them, Come to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam. 
And it was so, when they came into the midst of the city, that Ishmael the son of Nethaniah slew them, and cast them into the midst of the pit, he, and the men that were with him. 
But ten men were found among them that said unto Ishmael, Slay us not: for we have treasures in the field, of wheat, and of barley, and of oil, and of honey. So he forbare, and slew them not among their brethren. 
Now the pit wherein Ishmael had cast all the dead bodies of the men, whom he had slain because of Gedaliah, was it whi
1080, it is written in the law of Moses, all this evil is come upon us: yet made we not our prayer before the LORD our God, that we might turn from our iniquities, and understand thy truth. 
Therefore hath the LORD watched upon the evil, and brought it upon us: for the LORD our God is righteous in all his works which he doeth: for we obeyed not his voice. 
And now, O Lord our God, that hast brought thy people forth out of the land of Egypt with a mighty hand, and hast gotten thee renown, as at this day; we have sinned, we have done wickedly. 
O LORD, according to all thy righteousness, I beseech thee, let thine anger and thy fury be turned away from thy city Jerusalem, thy holy mountain: because for our sins, and for the iniquities of our fathers, Jerusalem and thy people are become a reproach to all that are about us. 
Now therefore, O our God, hear the prayer of thy servant, and his supplications, and cause thy face to shine upon thy sanctuary that is desolate, for the Lord's sake. 
O my God, incline thine ear, and hear; open thine eyes, and behold our desolations, a
957,d one likeness: and their appearance and their work was as it were a wheel in the middle of a wheel. 
When they went, they went upon their four sides: and they turned not when they went. 
As for their rings, they were so high that they were dreadful; and their rings were full of eyes round about them four. 
And when the living creatures went, the wheels went by them: and when the living creatures were lifted up from the earth, the wheels were lifted up. 
Whithersoever the spirit was to go, they went, thither was their spirit to go; and the wheels were lifted up over against them: for the spirit of the living creature was in the wheels. 
When those went, these went; and when those stood, these stood; and when those were lifted up from the earth, the wheels were lifted up over against them: for the spirit of the living creature was in the wheels. 
And the likeness of the firmament upon the heads of the living creature was as the colour of the te
783,RD, all Judah that are in the land of Egypt: 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, saying; Ye and your wives have both spoken with your mouths, and fulfilled with your hand, saying, We will surely perform our vows that we have vowed, to burn incense to the queen of heaven, and to pour out drink offerings unto her: ye will surely accomplish your vows, and surely perform your vows. 
Therefore hear ye the word of the LORD, all Judah that dwell in the land of Egypt; Behold, I have sworn by my great name, saith the LORD, that my name shall no more be named in the mouth of any man of Judah in all the land of Egypt, saying, The Lord GOD liveth. 
Behold, I will watch over them for evil, and not for good: and all the men of Judah that are in the land of Egypt shall be c
1047,de himself in secret places that I shall not see him? saith the LORD. Do not I fill heaven and earth? saith the LORD. 
I have heard what the prophets said, that prophesy lies in my name, saying, I have dreamed, I have dreamed. 
How long shall this be in the heart of the prophets that prophesy lies? yea, they are prophets of the deceit of their own heart; 
Which think to cause my people to forget my name by their dreams which they tell every man to his neighbour, as their fathers have forgotten my name for Baal. 
The prophet that hath a dream, let him tell a dream; and he that hath my word, let him speak my word faithfully. What is the chaff to the wheat? saith the LORD. 
Is not my word like as a fire? saith the LORD; and like a hammer that breaketh the rock in pieces? 
Therefore, behold, I am against the prophets, saith the LORD, that steal my words every one from his neighbour. 
Behold, I am against the prophets, saith the LORD, that use their tongues, and say, He saith. 
Behold, I am against them that prophesy false dreams, saith
999,nd be thou cast into the sea; it shall be done. 
And all things, whatsoever ye shall ask in prayer, believing, ye shall receive. 
And when he was come into the temple, the chief priests and the elders of the people came unto him as he was teaching, and said, By what authority doest thou these things? and who gave thee this authority? 
And Jesus answered and said unto them, I also will ask you one thing, which if ye tell me, I in like wise will tell you by what authority I do these things. 
The baptism of John, whence was it? from heaven, or of men? And they reasoned with themselves, saying, If we shall say, From heaven; he will say unto us, Why did ye not then believe him? 
But if we shall say, Of men; we fear the people; for all hold John as a prophet. 
And they answered Jesus, and said, We cannot tell. And he said unto them, Neither tell I you by what authority I do these things. 
But what think ye? A certain man had two sons; and he came to the first, and said, Son, go work to day 
1059,ver Euphrates: 
The Kenites, and the Kenizzites, and the Kadmonites, 
And the Hittites, and the Perizzites, and the Rephaims, 
And the Amorites, and the Canaanites, and the Girgashites, and the Jebusites. 
Now Sarai Abram's wife bare him no children: and she had an handmaid, an Egyptian, whose name was Hagar. 
And Sarai said unto Abram, Behold now, the LORD hath restrained me from bearing: I pray thee, go in unto my maid; it may be that I may obtain children by her. And Abram hearkened to the voice of Sarai. 
And Sarai Abram's wife took Hagar her maid the Egyptian, after Abram had dwelt ten years in the land of Canaan, and gave her to her husband Abram to be his wife. 
And he went in unto Hagar, and she conceived: and when she saw that she had conceived, her mistress was despised in her eyes. 
And Sarai said unto Abram, My wrong be upon thee: I have given my maid into thy bosom; and when she saw that she had conceived, I was despised in her eyes: the LORD judge between me and thee. 
But Abram said unto Sarai, Behold, thy maid is in thine hand;
1063,
And Abishua, and Naaman, and Ahoah, 
And Gera, and Shephuphan, and Huram. 
And these are the sons of Ehud: these are the heads of the fathers of the inhabitants of Geba, and they removed them to Manahath: 
And Naaman, and Ahiah, and Gera, he removed them, and begat Uzza, and Ahihud. 
And Shaharaim begat children in the country of Moab, after he had sent them away; Hushim and Baara were his wives. 
And he begat of Hodesh his wife, Jobab, and Zibia, and Mesha, and Malcham, 
And Jeuz, and Shachia, and Mirma. These were his sons, heads of the fathers. 
And of Hushim he begat Abitub, and Elpaal. 
The sons of Elpaal; Eber, and Misham, and Shamed, who built Ono, and Lod, with the towns thereof: 
Beriah also, and Shema, who were heads of the fathers of the inhabitants of Aijalon, who drove away the inhabitants of Gath: 
And Ahio, Shashak, and Jeremoth, 
And Zebadiah, and Arad, and Ader, 
And Michael, and Ispah, and Joha, the sons of Beriah; 
And Zebadiah, and Meshullam, and Hezeki, and Heber, 
Ishmerai also, and Jezliah, and Jobab, the sons of Elpaal; 
A
858,sacrifices, as in obeying the voice of the LORD? Behold, to obey is better than sacrifice, and to hearken than the fat of rams. 
For rebellion is as the sin of witchcraft, and stubbornness is as iniquity and idolatry. Because thou hast rejected the word of the LORD, he hath also rejected thee from being king. 
And Saul said unto Samuel, I have sinned: for I have transgressed the commandment of the LORD, and thy words: because I feared the people, and obeyed their voice. 
Now therefore, I pray thee, pardon my sin, and turn again with me, that I may worship the LORD. 
And Samuel said unto Saul, I will not return with thee: for thou hast rejected the word of the LORD, and the LORD hath rejected thee from being king over Israel. 
And as Samuel turned about to go away, he laid hold upon the skirt of his mantle, and it rent. 
And Samuel said unto him, 
881,and sweet odours unto him. 
The king answered unto Daniel, and said, Of a truth it is, that your God is a God of gods, and a Lord of kings, and a revealer of secrets, seeing thou couldest reveal this secret. 
Then the king made Daniel a great man, and gave him many great gifts, and made him ruler over the whole province of Babylon, and chief of the governors over all the wise men of Babylon. 
Then Daniel requested of the king, and he set Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, over the affairs of the province of Babylon: but Daniel sat in the gate of the king. 
Nebuchadnezzar the king made an image of gold, whose height was threescore cubits, and the breadth thereof six cubits: he set it up in the plain of Dura, in the province of Babylon. 
Then Nebuchadnezzar the king sent to gather together the princes, the governors, and the captains, the judges, the treasurers, the counse
900,nd come forth, and offer his burnt offering, and the burnt offering of the people, and make an atonement for himself, and for the people. 
And the fat of the sin offering shall he burn upon the altar. 
And he that let go the goat for the scapegoat shall wash his clothes, and bathe his flesh in water, and afterward come into the camp. 
And the bullock for the sin offering, and the goat for the sin offering, whose blood was brought in to make atonement in the holy place, shall one carry forth without the camp; and they shall burn in the fire their skins, and their flesh, and their dung. 
And he that burneth them shall wash his clothes, and bathe his flesh in water, and afterward he shall come into the camp. 
And this shall be a statute for ever unto you: that in the seventh month, on the tenth day of the month, ye shall afflict your souls, and do no work at all, whether it be one of your o
944,ly prepare a burnt offering unto the LORD of a lamb of the first year without blemish: thou shalt prepare it every morning. 
And thou shalt prepare a meat offering for it every morning, the sixth part of an ephah, and the third part of an hin of oil, to temper with the fine flour; a meat offering continually by a perpetual ordinance unto the LORD. 
Thus shall they prepare the lamb, and the meat offering, and the oil, every morning for a continual burnt offering. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; If the prince give a gift unto any of his sons, the inheritance thereof shall be his sons'; it shall be their possession by inheritance. 
But if he give a gift of his inheritance to one of his servants, then it shall be his to the year of liberty; after it shall return to the prince: but his inheritance shall be his sons' for them. 
Moreover the prince shall not take of the people's inheritance by oppression, to thrust them out of their possession
909,upon Israel. 
When the LORD turned again the captivity of Zion, we were like them that dream. 
Then was our mouth filled with laughter, and our tongue with singing: then said they among the heathen, The LORD hath done great things for them. 
The LORD hath done great things for us; whereof we are glad. 
Turn again our captivity, O LORD, as the streams in the south. 
They that sow in tears shall reap in joy. 
He that goeth forth and weepeth, bearing precious seed, shall doubtless come again with rejoicing, bringing his sheaves with him. 
Except the LORD build the house, they labour in vain that build it: except the LORD keep the city, the watchman waketh but in vain. 
It is vain for you to rise up early, to sit up late, to eat the bread of sorrows: for so he giveth his beloved sleep. 
Lo, children are an heritage of the LORD: and the fruit of the womb is his reward. 
As arrows are in the hand of a 
942,ver his household, to give them their portion of meat in due season? 
Blessed is that servant, whom his lord when he cometh shall find so doing. 
Of a truth I say unto you, that he will make him ruler over all that he hath. 
But and if that servant say in his heart, My lord delayeth his coming; and shall begin to beat the menservants and maidens, and to eat and drink, and to be drunken; 
The lord of that servant will come in a day when he looketh not for him, and at an hour when he is not aware, and will cut him in sunder, and will appoint him his portion with the unbelievers. 
And that servant, which knew his lord's will, and prepared not himself, neither did according to his will, shall be beaten with many stripes. 
But he that knew not, and did commit things worthy of stripes, shall be beaten with few stripes. For unto whomsoever much is given, of him shall be much required: and to whom men have committed much, of him they wi
783,tly be done. 
Behold, I come quickly: blessed is he that keepeth the sayings of the prophecy of this book. 
And I John saw these things, and heard them. And when I had heard and seen, I fell down to worship before the feet of the angel which shewed me these things. 
Then saith he unto me, See thou do it not: for I am thy fellowservant, and of thy brethren the prophets, and of them which keep the sayings of this book: worship God. 
And he saith unto me, Seal not the sayings of the prophecy of this book: for the time is at hand. 
He that is unjust, let him be unjust still: and he which is filthy, let him be filthy still: and he that is righteous, let him be righteous still: and he that is holy, let him be holy still. 
And, behold, I come quickly; and my reward is with me, to
754,l after this tarried there yet a good while, and then took his leave of the brethren, and sailed thence into Syria, and with him Priscilla and Aquila; having shorn his head in Cenchrea: for he had a vow. 
And he came to Ephesus, and left them there: but he himself entered into the synagogue, and reasoned with the Jews. 
When they desired him to tarry longer time with them, he consented not; 
But bade them farewell, saying, I must by all means keep this feast that cometh in Jerusalem: but I will return again unto you, if God will. And he sailed from Ephesus. 
And when he had landed at Caesarea, and gone up, and saluted the church, he went down to Antioch. 
And after he had spent some time there, he departed, and went over all the country of Gala
1020,n the wilderness, to consume them. 
But I wrought for my name's sake, that it should not be polluted before the heathen, in whose sight I brought them out. 
Yet also I lifted up my hand unto them in the wilderness, that I would not bring them into the land which I had given them, flowing with milk and honey, which is the glory of all lands; 
Because they despised my judgments, and walked not in my statutes, but polluted my sabbaths: for their heart went after their idols. 
Nevertheless mine eye spared them from destroying them, neither did I make an end of them in the wilderness. 
But I said unto their children in the wilderness, Walk ye not in the statutes of your fathers, neither observe their judgments, nor defile yourselves with their idols: 
I am the LORD your God; walk in my statutes, and keep my judgments, and do them; 
And hallow my sabbaths; and they shall be a sign between me and you, that ye may know that I am the LORD your God. 
Notwithstanding the children rebelled against me: they walked not
721,ached unto you. 
Wherefore laying aside all malice, and all guile, and hypocrisies, and envies, all evil speakings, 
As newborn babes, desire the sincere milk of the word, that ye may grow thereby: 
If so be ye have tasted that the Lord is gracious. 
To whom coming, as unto a living stone, disallowed indeed of men, but chosen of God, and precious, 
Ye also, as lively stones, are built up a spiritual house, an holy priesthood, to offer up spiritual sacrifices, acceptable to God by Jesus Christ. 
Wherefore also it is contained in the scripture, Behold, I lay in Sion a chief corner stone, elect, precious: and he that believeth on him shall not be confounded. 
Unto you therefore which believe he is precious: but unt
894,ces; and give ear, all ye of far countries: gird yourselves, and ye shall be broken in pieces; gird yourselves, and ye shall be broken in pieces. 
Take counsel together, and it shall come to nought; speak the word, and it shall not stand: for God is with us. 
For the LORD spake thus to me with a strong hand, and instructed me that I should not walk in the way of this people, saying, 
Say ye not, A confederacy, to all them to whom this people shall say, A confederacy; neither fear ye their fear, nor be afraid. 
Sanctify the LORD of hosts himself; and let him be your fear, and let him be your dread. 
And he shall be for a sanctuary; but for a stone of stumbling and for a rock of offence to both the houses of Israel, for a gin and for a snare to the inhabitants of Jerusalem. 
And many among them shall stumble, and fall, and be broken, and be snared, and be taken. 
Bind up the testimon
1030,ness to thirst: 
The LORD will not spare him, but then the anger of the LORD and his jealousy shall smoke against that man, and all the curses that are written in this book shall lie upon him, and the LORD shall blot out his name from under heaven. 
And the LORD shall separate him unto evil out of all the tribes of Israel, according to all the curses of the covenant that are written in this book of the law: 
So that the generation to come of your children that shall rise up after you, and the stranger that shall come from a far land, shall say, when they see the plagues of that land, and the sicknesses which the LORD hath laid upon it; 
And that the whole land thereof is brimstone, and salt, and burning, that it is not sown, nor beareth, nor any grass groweth therein, like the overthrow of Sodom, and Gomorrah, Admah, and Zeboim, which the LORD overthrew in his anger, and in his wrath: 
Even all nations shall say, Wherefore hath the LORD done thus unto this land? what meaneth the heat of this great anger? 
Then men 
847,merchandise of her, because thou hast humbled her. 
If a man have two wives, one beloved, and another hated, and they have born him children, both the beloved and the hated; and if the firstborn son be hers that was hated: 
Then it shall be, when he maketh his sons to inherit that which he hath, that he may not make the son of the beloved firstborn before the son of the hated, which is indeed the firstborn: 
But he shall acknowledge the son of the hated for the firstborn, by giving him a double portion of all that he hath: for he is the beginning of his strength; the right of the firstborn is his. 
If a man have a stubborn and rebellious son, which will not obey the voice of his father, or the voice of his mother, and that, when they have chastened him, will not hearken unto them: 
Then shall his father and his mother lay hold on him, 
818,ere nine hundred and five years: and he died. 
And Cainan lived seventy years and begat Mahalaleel: 
And Cainan lived after he begat Mahalaleel eight hundred and forty years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Cainan were nine hundred and ten years: and he died. 
And Mahalaleel lived sixty and five years, and begat Jared: 
And Mahalaleel lived after he begat Jared eight hundred and thirty years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Mahalaleel were eight hundred ninety and five years: and he died. 
And Jared lived an hundred sixty and two years, and he begat Enoch: 
And Jared lived after he begat Enoch eight hundred years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Jared were nine hundred sixty and two years: and he died. 
And Enoch lived sixty and five years, and begat 
1072,oeth work therein shall be put to death. 
Ye shall kindle no fire throughout your habitations upon the sabbath day. 
And Moses spake unto all the congregation of the children of Israel, saying, This is the thing which the LORD commanded, saying, 
Take ye from among you an offering unto the LORD: whosoever is of a willing heart, let him bring it, an offering of the LORD; gold, and silver, and brass, 
And blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine linen, and goats' hair, 
And rams' skins dyed red, and badgers' skins, and shittim wood, 
And oil for the light, and spices for anointing oil, and for the sweet incense, 
And onyx stones, and stones to be set for the ephod, and for the breastplate. 
And every wise hearted among you shall come, and make all that the LORD hath commanded; 
The tabernacle, his tent, and his covering, his taches, and his boards, his bars, his pillars, and his sockets, 
The ark, and the staves thereof, with the mercy seat, and the vail of the covering, 
The table, and his staves, and all his vessels, and the shewbread, 
The candlestick also
1015,fter them; there remained not so much as one of them. 
But the children of Israel walked upon dry land in the midst of the sea; and the waters were a wall unto them on their right hand, and on their left. 
Thus the LORD saved Israel that day out of the hand of the Egyptians; and Israel saw the Egyptians dead upon the sea shore. 
And Israel saw that great work which the LORD did upon the Egyptians: and the people feared the LORD, and believed the LORD, and his servant Moses. 
Then sang Moses and the children of Israel this song unto the LORD, and spake, saying, I will sing unto the LORD, for he hath triumphed gloriously: the horse and his rider hath he thrown into the sea. 
The LORD is my strength and song, and he is become my salvation: he is my God, and I will prepare him an habitation; my father's God, and I will exalt him. 
The LORD is a man of war: the LORD is his name. 
Pharaoh's chariots and his host hath he cast into the sea: his chosen captains also are drowned in the Red sea. 
The depths hav
1063, see his glory. 
Confounded be all they that serve graven images, that boast themselves of idols: worship him, all ye gods. 
Zion heard, and was glad; and the daughters of Judah rejoiced because of thy judgments, O LORD. 
For thou, LORD, art high above all the earth: thou art exalted far above all gods. 
Ye that love the LORD, hate evil: he preserveth the souls of his saints; he delivereth them out of the hand of the wicked. 
Light is sown for the righteous, and gladness for the upright in heart. 
Rejoice in the LORD, ye righteous; and give thanks at the remembrance of his holiness. 
O sing unto the LORD a new song; for he hath done marvellous things: his right hand, and his holy arm, hath gotten him the victory. 
The LORD hath made known his salvation: his righteousness hath he openly shewed in the sight of the heathen. 
He hath remembered his mercy and his truth toward the house of Israel: all the ends of the earth have seen the salvation of our God. 
Make a joyful noise unto the LORD, all the earth: make a loud noise, and rejoice, and sing prai
1042,t. 
Now these are the names of the children of Israel, which came into Egypt; every man and his household came with Jacob. 
Reuben, Simeon, Levi, and Judah, 
Issachar, Zebulun, and Benjamin, 
Dan, and Naphtali, Gad, and Asher. 
And all the souls that came out of the loins of Jacob were seventy souls: for Joseph was in Egypt already. 
And Joseph died, and all his brethren, and all that generation. 
And the children of Israel were fruitful, and increased abundantly, and multiplied, and waxed exceeding mighty; and the land was filled with them. 
Now there arose up a new king over Egypt, which knew not Joseph. 
And he said unto his people, Behold, the people of the children of Israel are more and mightier than we: 
Come on, let us deal wisely with them; lest they multiply, and it come to pass, that, when there falleth out any war, they join also unto our enemies, and fight against us, and so get them up out of the land. 
Therefore they did set over them taskmasters to afflict them with their burdens. And they built for Pharaoh tre
1018,m of Zobah: and they went to Damascus, and dwelt therein, and reigned in Damascus. 
And he was an adversary to Israel all the days of Solomon, beside the mischief that Hadad did: and he abhorred Israel, and reigned over Syria. 
And Jeroboam the son of Nebat, an Ephrathite of Zereda, Solomon's servant, whose mother's name was Zeruah, a widow woman, even he lifted up his hand against the king. 
And this was the cause that he lifted up his hand against the king: Solomon built Millo, and repaired the breaches of the city of David his father. 
And the man Jeroboam was a mighty man of valour: and Solomon seeing the young man that he was industrious, he made him ruler over all the charge of the house of Joseph. 
And it came to pass at that time when Jeroboam went out of Jerusalem, that the prophet Ahijah the Shilonite found him in the way; and he had clad himself with a new garment; and they two were alone in the field: 
And Ahijah caught the new garment that was on him, and rent it in twelve pieces: 
And he s
1027,ine eyes, let them give me a place in some town in the country, that I may dwell there: for why should thy servant dwell in the royal city with thee? 
Then Achish gave him Ziklag that day: wherefore Ziklag pertaineth unto the kings of Judah unto this day. 
And the time that David dwelt in the country of the Philistines was a full year and four months. 
And David and his men went up, and invaded the Geshurites, and the Gezrites, and the Amalekites: for those nations were of old the inhabitants of the land, as thou goest to Shur, even unto the land of Egypt. 
And David smote the land, and left neither man nor woman alive, and took away the sheep, and the oxen, and the asses, and the camels, and the apparel, and returned, and came to Achish. 
And Achish said, Whither have ye made a road to day? And David said, Against the south of Judah, and against the south of the Jerahmeelites, and against the south of the Kenites. 
And David saved neither man nor woman alive, to bring tidings to Gath, saying, Lest they should t
911,have scattered them abroad; 
Therefore will I save my flock, and they shall no more be a prey; and I will judge between cattle and cattle. 
And I will set up one shepherd over them, and he shall feed them, even my servant David; he shall feed them, and he shall be their shepherd. 
And I the LORD will be their God, and my servant David a prince among them; I the LORD have spoken it. 
And I will make with them a covenant of peace, and will cause the evil beasts to cease out of the land: and they shall dwell safely in the wilderness, and sleep in the woods. 
And I will make them and the places round about my hill a blessing; and I will cause the shower to come down in his season; there shall be showers of blessing. 
And the tree of the field shall yield her fruit, and the earth shall yield her increase, and they shall be safe in their land, and shall know that I am the LORD, when I have broken the ban
1007,, so that there should be no remnant nor escaping? 
O LORD God of Israel, thou art righteous: for we remain yet escaped, as it is this day: behold, we are before thee in our trespasses: for we cannot stand before thee because of this. 
Now when Ezra had prayed, and when he had confessed, weeping and casting himself down before the house of God, there assembled unto him out of Israel a very great congregation of men and women and children: for the people wept very sore. 
And Shechaniah the son of Jehiel, one of the sons of Elam, answered and said unto Ezra, We have trespassed against our God, and have taken strange wives of the people of the land: yet now there is hope in Israel concerning this thing. 
Now therefore let us make a covenant with our God to put away all the wives, and such as are born of them, according to the counsel of my lord, and of those that tremble at the commandment of our God; and let it be done according to the law. 
Arise; for this matter belongeth unto thee: we also w
790, neither be polluted any more with all their transgressions; but that they may be my people, and I may be their God, saith the Lord GOD. 
The word of the LORD came again to me, saying, 
Son of man, when the land sinneth against me by trespassing grievously, then will I stretch out mine hand upon it, and will break the staff of the bread thereof, and will send famine upon it, and will cut off man and beast from it: 
Though these three men, Noah, Daniel, and Job, were in it, they should deliver but their own souls by their righteousness, saith the Lord GOD. 
If I cause noisome beasts to pass through the land, and they spoil it, so that it be desolate, that no man may pass through because of the beasts: 
Though these three men were in it, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, they shall de
1037, death were all their lifetime subject to bondage. 
For verily he took not on him the nature of angels; but he took on him the seed of Abraham. 
Wherefore in all things it behoved him to be made like unto his brethren, that he might be a merciful and faithful high priest in things pertaining to God, to make reconciliation for the sins of the people. 
For in that he himself hath suffered being tempted, he is able to succour them that are tempted. 
Wherefore, holy brethren, partakers of the heavenly calling, consider the Apostle and High Priest of our profession, Christ Jesus; 
Who was faithful to him that appointed him, as also Moses was faithful in all his house. 
For this man was counted worthy of more glory than Moses, inasmuch as he who hath builded the house hath more honour than the house. 
For every house is builded by some man; but he that built all things is God. 
And Moses verily was faithful in all his house, as a servant, for a testimony of those things which were to be spoken after; 
But Christ as a son over h
1014, over against him with his sword drawn in his hand: and Joshua went unto him, and said unto him, Art thou for us, or for our adversaries? 
And he said, Nay; but as captain of the host of the LORD am I now come. And Joshua fell on his face to the earth, and did worship, and said unto him, What saith my Lord unto his servant? 
And the captain of the LORD's host said unto Joshua, Loose thy shoe from off thy foot; for the place whereon thou standest is holy. And Joshua did so. 
Now Jericho was straitly shut up because of the children of Israel: none went out, and none came in. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, See, I have given into thine hand Jericho, and the king thereof, and the mighty men of valour. 
And ye shall compass the city, all ye men of war, and go round about the city once. Thus shalt thou do six days. 
And seven priests shall bear before the ark seven trumpets of rams' horns: and the seventh day ye shall compass the city seven times, and the priests shall blow with the trumpets. 
And it shal
786, offerings and sacrificed sacrifices the same day unto the LORD. 
And when the five lords of the Philistines had seen it, they returned to Ekron the same day. 
And these are the golden emerods which the Philistines returned for a trespass offering unto the LORD; for Ashdod one, for Gaza one, for Askelon one, for Gath one, for Ekron one; 
And the golden mice, according to the number of all the cities of the Philistines belonging to the five lords, both of fenced cities, and of country villages, even unto the great stone of Abel, whereon they set down the ark of the LORD: which stone remaineth unto this day in the field of Joshua, the Bethshemite. 
And he smote the men of Bethshemesh, because they had looked into the ark of the LORD, even he smote of the people fifty thousand a
741,arry to whom they think best; only to the family of the tribe of their father shall they marry. 
So shall not the inheritance of the children of Israel remove from tribe to tribe: for every one of the children of Israel shall keep himself to the inheritance of the tribe of his fathers. 
And every daughter, that possesseth an inheritance in any tribe of the children of Israel, shall be wife unto one of the family of the tribe of her father, that the children of Israel may enjoy every man the inheritance of his fathers. 
Neither shall the inheritance remove from one tribe to another tribe; but every one of the tribes of the children of Israel shall keep himself to his own inheritance. 
Even as the LORD commanded Moses, so did the dau
967,
Because the daughters of Manasseh had an inheritance among his sons: and the rest of Manasseh's sons had the land of Gilead. 
And the coast of Manasseh was from Asher to Michmethah, that lieth before Shechem; and the border went along on the right hand unto the inhabitants of Entappuah. 
Now Manasseh had the land of Tappuah: but Tappuah on the border of Manasseh belonged to the children of Ephraim; 
And the coast descended unto the river Kanah, southward of the river: these cities of Ephraim are among the cities of Manasseh: the coast of Manasseh also was on the north side of the river, and the outgoings of it were at the sea: 
Southward it was Ephraim's, and northward it was Manasseh's, and the sea is his border; and they met together in Asher on the north, and in Issachar on the east. 
And Manasseh had in Issachar and in Asher Bethshean and her towns, and Ibleam and her towns, and the inhabitants of Dor and her towns, and the inhabitants of Endor and
844,O my Lord, what shall be the end of these things? 
And he said, Go thy way, Daniel: for the words are closed up and sealed till the time of the end. 
Many shall be purified, and made white, and tried; but the wicked shall do wickedly: and none of the wicked shall understand; but the wise shall understand. 
And from the time that the daily sacrifice shall be taken away, and the abomination that maketh desolate set up, there shall be a thousand two hundred and ninety days. 
Blessed is he that waiteth, and cometh to the thousand three hundred and five and thirty days. 
But go thou thy way till the end be: for thou shalt rest, and stand in thy lot at the end of the days. 
The word of the LORD that came unto Hosea, the son of Beeri, in the days of Uzziah, Jotham, Ahaz, and Hezekiah, kings of Judah, and in the days of Jeroboam the son of 
854,f the vineyard, and killed him. What therefore shall the lord of the vineyard do unto them? 
He shall come and destroy these husbandmen, and shall give the vineyard to others. And when they heard it, they said, God forbid. 
And he beheld them, and said, What is this then that is written, The stone which the builders rejected, the same is become the head of the corner? 
Whosoever shall fall upon that stone shall be broken; but on whomsoever it shall fall, it will grind him to powder. 
And the chief priests and the scribes the same hour sought to lay hands on him; and they feared the people: for they perceived that he had spoken this parable against them. 
And they watched him, and sent forth spies, which should feign themselves just men, that they might take hold of his words, that so they might deliver him unto the power and authority of the 
966,I have laboured in vain, I have spent my strength for nought, and in vain: yet surely my judgment is with the LORD, and my work with my God. 
And now, saith the LORD that formed me from the womb to be his servant, to bring Jacob again to him, Though Israel be not gathered, yet shall I be glorious in the eyes of the LORD, and my God shall be my strength. 
And he said, It is a light thing that thou shouldest be my servant to raise up the tribes of Jacob, and to restore the preserved of Israel: I will also give thee for a light to the Gentiles, that thou mayest be my salvation unto the end of the earth. 
Thus saith the LORD, the Redeemer of Israel, and his Holy One, to him whom man despiseth, to him whom the nation abhorreth, to a servant of rulers, Kings shall see and arise, princes also shall worship, because of the LORD that is faithful, and the Holy One of Israel, and he shall choose thee. 
Thus saith the LORD, In an acceptable time have I heard thee,
845,our them like a lion: the wild beast shall tear them. 
O Israel, thou hast destroyed thyself; but in me is thine help. 
I will be thy king: where is any other that may save thee in all thy cities? and thy judges of whom thou saidst, Give me a king and princes? 
I gave thee a king in mine anger, and took him away in my wrath. 
The iniquity of Ephraim is bound up; his sin is hid. 
The sorrows of a travailing woman shall come upon him: he is an unwise son; for he should not stay long in the place of the breaking forth of children. 
I will ransom them from the power of the grave; I will redeem them from death: O death, I will be thy plagues; O grave, I will be thy destruction: repentance shall be hid from mine eyes. 
Though he be fruitful among his brethren, an east wind shall come, the wind of the LORD shall come up from the wilderness,
764,udah went to sojourn in the country of Moab, he, and his wife, and his two sons. 
And the name of the man was Elimelech, and the name of his wife Naomi, and the name of his two sons Mahlon and Chilion, Ephrathites of Bethlehemjudah. And they came into the country of Moab, and continued there. 
And Elimelech Naomi's husband died; and she was left, and her two sons. 
And they took them wives of the women of Moab; the name of the one was Orpah, and the name of the other Ruth: and they dwelled there about ten years. 
And Mahlon and Chilion died also both of them; and the woman was left of her two sons and her husband. 
Then she arose with her daughters in law, that she might return from the country of Moab: for she had heard in the country of Moab how that t
1050, son hath stirred up my servant against me, to lie in wait, as at this day? 
Then answered Doeg the Edomite, which was set over the servants of Saul, and said, I saw the son of Jesse coming to Nob, to Ahimelech the son of Ahitub. 
And he enquired of the LORD for him, and gave him victuals, and gave him the sword of Goliath the Philistine. 
Then the king sent to call Ahimelech the priest, the son of Ahitub, and all his father's house, the priests that were in Nob: and they came all of them to the king. 
And Saul said, Hear now, thou son of Ahitub. And he answered, Here I am, my lord. 
And Saul said unto him, Why have ye conspired against me, thou and the son of Jesse, in that thou hast given him bread, and a sword, and hast enquired of God for him, that he should rise against me, to lie in wait, as at this day? 
Then Ahimelech answered the king, and said, And who is so faithful among all thy servants as David, which is the king's son in law, and goeth at thy bidding, and is honourable in thine house? 
Did I then begin to enquire of God
872,ich belonged to the kings; for they said, He is a leper: and Jotham his son reigned in his stead. 
Jotham was twenty and five years old when he began to reign, and he reigned sixteen years in Jerusalem. His mother's name also was Jerushah, the daughter of Zadok. 
And he did that which was right in the sight of the LORD, according to all that his father Uzziah did: howbeit he entered not into the temple of the LORD. And the people did yet corruptly. 
He built the high gate of the house of the LORD, and on the wall of Ophel he built much. 
Moreover he built cities in the mountains of Judah, and in the forests he built castles and towers. 
He fought also with the king of the Ammonites, and prevailed against them. And the children of Ammon gave him the same year an hundred talents of silver, and ten thousand measures of wheat, and ten thousand of barley. So much d
767, our trespasses: for we cannot stand before thee because of this. 
Now when Ezra had prayed, and when he had confessed, weeping and casting himself down before the house of God, there assembled unto him out of Israel a very great congregation of men and women and children: for the people wept very sore. 
And Shechaniah the son of Jehiel, one of the sons of Elam, answered and said unto Ezra, We have trespassed against our God, and have taken strange wives of the people of the land: yet now there is hope in Israel concerning this thing. 
Now therefore let us make a covenant with our God to put away all the wives, and such as are born of them, according to the counsel of my lord, and of those that tremble at the commandment of our God; and let it be done accor
1046,h it of him. 
An ungodly man diggeth up evil: and in his lips there is as a burning fire. 
A froward man soweth strife: and a whisperer separateth chief friends. 
A violent man enticeth his neighbour, and leadeth him into the way that is not good. 
He shutteth his eyes to devise froward things: moving his lips he bringeth evil to pass. 
The hoary head is a crown of glory, if it be found in the way of righteousness. 
He that is slow to anger is better than the mighty; and he that ruleth his spirit than he that taketh a city. 
The lot is cast into the lap; but the whole disposing thereof is of the LORD. 
Better is a dry morsel, and quietness therewith, than an house full of sacrifices with strife. 
A wise servant shall have rule over a son that causeth shame, and shall have part of the inheritance among the brethren. 
The fining pot is for silver, and the furnace for gold: but the LORD trieth the hearts. 
A wicked doer giveth heed to false lips; and a liar giveth ear to a naughty tongue. 
Whoso mocketh the poor reproacheth his Maker
897,whom we may enquire of the LORD: but I hate him; for he never prophesied good unto me, but always evil: the same is Micaiah the son of Imla. And Jehoshaphat said, Let not the king say so. 
And the king of Israel called for one of his officers, and said, Fetch quickly Micaiah the son of Imla. 
And the king of Israel and Jehoshaphat king of Judah sat either of them on his throne, clothed in their robes, and they sat in a void place at the entering in of the gate of Samaria; and all the prophets prophesied before them. 
And Zedekiah the son of Chenaanah had made him horns of iron, and said, Thus saith the LORD, With these thou shalt push Syria until they be consumed. 
And all the prophets prophesied so, saying, Go up to Ramothgilead, and prosper: for the LORD shall deliver it into the hand of the king. 
And the messenger that went to call Micaiah spake to him, saying, Behold, the words o
895,unto Balaam, Neither curse them at all, nor bless them at all. 
But Balaam answered and said unto Balak, Told not I thee, saying, All that the LORD speaketh, that I must do? 
And Balak said unto Balaam, Come, I pray thee, I will bring thee unto another place; peradventure it will please God that thou mayest curse me them from thence. 
And Balak brought Balaam unto the top of Peor, that looketh toward jeshimon. 
And Balaam said unto Balak, Build me here seven altars, and prepare me here seven bullocks and seven rams. 
And Balak did as Balaam had said, and offered a bullock and a ram on every altar. 
And when Balaam saw that it pleased the LORD to bless Israel, he went not, as at other times, to seek for enchantments, but he set his face toward the wilderness. 
And Balaam lifted up his eyes, and he saw Israel abiding in his tents according to their tribes; and the spirit of God came u
945,ses, saying, 
Take the sum of the prey that was taken, both of man and of beast, thou, and Eleazar the priest, and the chief fathers of the congregation: 
And divide the prey into two parts; between them that took the war upon them, who went out to battle, and between all the congregation: 
And levy a tribute unto the LORD of the men of war which went out to battle: one soul of five hundred, both of the persons, and of the beeves, and of the asses, and of the sheep: 
Take it of their half, and give it unto Eleazar the priest, for an heave offering of the LORD. 
And of the children of Israel's half, thou shalt take one portion of fifty, of the persons, of the beeves, of the asses, and of the flocks, of all manner of beasts, and give them unto the Levites, which keep the charge of the tabernacle of the LORD. 
And Moses and Eleazar the priest did as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the booty, being the rest of the prey which the men of 
810,ry one shall howl: for the foundations of Kirhareseth shall ye mourn; surely they are stricken. 
For the fields of Heshbon languish, and the vine of Sibmah: the lords of the heathen have broken down the principal plants thereof, they are come even unto Jazer, they wandered through the wilderness: her branches are stretched out, they are gone over the sea. 
Therefore I will bewail with the weeping of Jazer the vine of Sibmah: I will water thee with my tears, O Heshbon, and Elealeh: for the shouting for thy summer fruits and for thy harvest is fallen. 
And gladness is taken away, and joy out of the plentiful field; and in the vineyards there shall be no singing, neither shall there be shouting: the treaders shall tread out no wine in their presses; I have made their vintage shouting to cease. 
Wherefo
936,of God. 
Now therefore, Tatnai, governor beyond the river, Shetharboznai, and your companions the Apharsachites, which are beyond the river, be ye far from thence: 
Let the work of this house of God alone; let the governor of the Jews and the elders of the Jews build this house of God in his place. 
Moreover I make a decree what ye shall do to the elders of these Jews for the building of this house of God: that of the king's goods, even of the tribute beyond the river, forthwith expenses be given unto these men, that they be not hindered. 
And that which they have need of, both young bullocks, and rams, and lambs, for the burnt offerings of the God of heaven, wheat, salt, wine, and oil, according to the appointment of the priests which are at Jerusalem, let it be given them day by day without fail: 
That they may offer sacrifices of sweet savours unto the God of heaven, and pray for the life of the king, and of his sons. 

907,the LORD is their inheritance, as he hath said unto them. 
And this shall be the priest's due from the people, from them that offer a sacrifice, whether it be ox or sheep; and they shall give unto the priest the shoulder, and the two cheeks, and the maw. 
The firstfruit also of thy corn, of thy wine, and of thine oil, and the first of the fleece of thy sheep, shalt thou give him. 
For the LORD thy God hath chosen him out of all thy tribes, to stand to minister in the name of the LORD, him and his sons for ever. 
And if a Levite come from any of thy gates out of all Israel, where he sojourned, and come with all the desire of his mind unto the place which the LORD shall choose; 
Then he shall minister in the name of the LORD his God, as all his brethren the Levites do, which stand there before the LORD. 
They shall have like portions to eat, beside that which cometh of the sale of his patrimony. 
860,they had slain Athaliah with the sword. 
Joash was seven years old when he began to reign, and he reigned forty years in Jerusalem. His mother's name also was Zibiah of Beersheba. 
And Joash did that which was right in the sight of the LORD all the days of Jehoiada the priest. 
And Jehoiada took for him two wives; and he begat sons and daughters. 
And it came to pass after this, that Joash was minded to repair the house of the LORD. 
And he gathered together the priests and the Levites, and said to them, Go out unto the cities of Judah, and gather of all Israel money to repair the house of your God from year to year, and see that ye hasten the matter. Howbeit the Levites hastened it not. 
And the king called for Jehoiada the chief, and said unto him, Why hast thou not required of the Levites to bring in out of Judah and out of Jerusalem the collect
988, which had been dead, whom he raised from the dead. 
There they made him a supper; and Martha served: but Lazarus was one of them that sat at the table with him. 
Then took Mary a pound of ointment of spikenard, very costly, and anointed the feet of Jesus, and wiped his feet with her hair: and the house was filled with the odour of the ointment. 
Then saith one of his disciples, Judas Iscariot, Simon's son, which should betray him, 
Why was not this ointment sold for three hundred pence, and given to the poor? 
This he said, not that he cared for the poor; but because he was a thief, and had the bag, and bare what was put therein. 
Then said Jesus, Let her alone: against the day of my burying hath she kept this. 
For the poor always ye have with you; but me ye have not always. 
Much people of the Jews therefore knew that he was there: and they came not for Jesus' sake only, but that they might see Lazarus also, whom he had raised from the dead. 
But the chief priests consul
726,they told Joab, saying, Abner the son of Ner came to the king, and he hath sent him away, and he is gone in peace. 
Then Joab came to the king, and said, What hast thou done? behold, Abner came unto thee; why is it that thou hast sent him away, and he is quite gone? 
Thou knowest Abner the son of Ner, that he came to deceive thee, and to know thy going out and thy coming in, and to know all that thou doest. 
And when Joab was come out from David, he sent messengers after Abner, which brought him again from the well of Sirah: but David knew it not. 
And when Abner was returned to Hebron, Joab took him aside in the gate to speak with him quietly, and smote him there under the fifth rib, that he died, for the blood of A
1003,es together, both out of the plain country round about Jerusalem, and from the villages of Netophathi; 
Also from the house of Gilgal, and out of the fields of Geba and Azmaveth: for the singers had builded them villages round about Jerusalem. 
And the priests and the Levites purified themselves, and purified the people, and the gates, and the wall. 
Then I brought up the princes of Judah upon the wall, and appointed two great companies of them that gave thanks, whereof one went on the right hand upon the wall toward the dung gate: 
And after them went Hoshaiah, and half of the princes of Judah, 
And Azariah, Ezra, and Meshullam, 
Judah, and Benjamin, and Shemaiah, and Jeremiah, 
And certain of the priests' sons with trumpets; namely, Zechariah the son of Jonathan, the son of Shemaiah, the son of Mattaniah, the son of Michaiah, the son of Zaccur, the son of Asaph: 
And his brethren, Shemaiah, and Azarael, Milalai, Gilalai, Maai, Nethaneel, and Judah, Hanani, with the musical instruments o
1041,e seed of Aaron the priest shall come nigh to offer the offerings of the LORD made by fire: he hath a blemish; he shall not come nigh to offer the bread of his God. 
He shall eat the bread of his God, both of the most holy, and of the holy. 
Only he shall not go in unto the vail, nor come nigh unto the altar, because he hath a blemish; that he profane not my sanctuaries: for I the LORD do sanctify them. 
And Moses told it unto Aaron, and to his sons, and unto all the children of Israel. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Aaron and to his sons, that they separate themselves from the holy things of the children of Israel, and that they profane not my holy name in those things which they hallow unto me: I am the LORD. 
Say unto them, Whosoever he be of all your seed among your generations, that goeth unto the holy things, which the children of Israel hallow unto the LORD, having his uncleanness upon him, that soul shall be cut off from my presence: I am the LORD. 
What man soever of the seed of Aaron is a leper,
818, 
And the children of Israel carried away captive of their brethren two hundred thousand, women, sons, and daughters, and took also away much spoil from them, and brought the spoil to Samaria. 
But a prophet of the LORD was there, whose name was Oded: and he went out before the host that came to Samaria, and said unto them, Behold, because the LORD God of your fathers was wroth with Judah, he hath delivered them into your hand, and ye have slain them in a rage that reacheth up unto heaven. 
And now ye purpose to keep under the children of Judah and Jerusalem for bondmen and bondwomen unto you: but are there not with you, even with you, sins against the LORD your God? 
Now hear me therefore, and deliver the captives again, which ye have taken captive of your brethren: for the fierce wrath of the LORD is upon
968,ave the king. 
Then Samuel told the people the manner of the kingdom, and wrote it in a book, and laid it up before the LORD. And Samuel sent all the people away, every man to his house. 
And Saul also went home to Gibeah; and there went with him a band of men, whose hearts God had touched. 
But the children of Belial said, How shall this man save us? And they despised him, and brought no presents. But he held his peace. 
Then Nahash the Ammonite came up, and encamped against Jabeshgilead: and all the men of Jabesh said unto Nahash, Make a covenant with us, and we will serve thee. 
And Nahash the Ammonite answered them, On this condition will I make a covenant with you, that I may thrust out all your right eyes, and lay it for a reproach upon all Israel. 
And the elders of Jabesh said unto him, Give us seven days' respite, that we may send messengers unto all the coasts of Israel: and then, if there be no man to save us, we will come out to thee. 
Then c
807,ong men; 
And delivered his strength into captivity, and his glory into the enemy's hand. 
He gave his people over also unto the sword; and was wroth with his inheritance. 
The fire consumed their young men; and their maidens were not given to marriage. 
Their priests fell by the sword; and their widows made no lamentation. 
Then the LORD awaked as one out of sleep, and like a mighty man that shouteth by reason of wine. 
And he smote his enemies in the hinder parts: he put them to a perpetual reproach. 
Moreover he refused the tabernacle of Joseph, and chose not the tribe of Ephraim: 
But chose the tribe of Judah, the mount Zion which he loved. 
And he built his sanctuary like high palaces, like the earth which he hath established for ever. 
He chose David also his servant, and took him from the 
953,halt not eat thereof: thine ass shall be violently taken away from before thy face, and shall not be restored to thee: thy sheep shall be given unto thine enemies, and thou shalt have none to rescue them. 
Thy sons and thy daughters shall be given unto another people, and thine eyes shall look, and fail with longing for them all the day long; and there shall be no might in thine hand. 
The fruit of thy land, and all thy labours, shall a nation which thou knowest not eat up; and thou shalt be only oppressed and crushed alway: 
So that thou shalt be mad for the sight of thine eyes which thou shalt see. 
The LORD shall smite thee in the knees, and in the legs, with a sore botch that cannot be healed, from the sole of thy foot unto the top of thy head. 
The LORD shall bring thee, and thy king which thou shalt set over thee, unto a nation which neither thou nor thy fathers have known; and there shalt thou serve other gods, wood and stone. 
And 
930,hout all the region round about. 
And the disciples of John shewed him of all these things. 
And John calling unto him two of his disciples sent them to Jesus, saying, Art thou he that should come? or look we for another? 
When the men were come unto him, they said, John Baptist hath sent us unto thee, saying, Art thou he that should come? or look we for another? 
And in that same hour he cured many of their infirmities and plagues, and of evil spirits; and unto many that were blind he gave sight. 
Then Jesus answering said unto them, Go your way, and tell John what things ye have seen and heard; how that the blind see, the lame walk, the lepers are cleansed, the deaf hear, the dead are raised, to the poor the gospel is preached. 
And blessed is he, whosoever shall not be offended in me. 
And when the messengers of John were departed, he began to speak unto the people concerning John, What went ye out into the wilder
1048,it of burning. 
And the LORD will create upon every dwelling place of mount Zion, and upon her assemblies, a cloud and smoke by day, and the shining of a flaming fire by night: for upon all the glory shall be a defence. 
And there shall be a tabernacle for a shadow in the day time from the heat, and for a place of refuge, and for a covert from storm and from rain. 
Now will I sing to my wellbeloved a song of my beloved touching his vineyard. My wellbeloved hath a vineyard in a very fruitful hill: 
And he fenced it, and gathered out the stones thereof, and planted it with the choicest vine, and built a tower in the midst of it, and also made a winepress therein: and he looked that it should bring forth grapes, and it brought forth wild grapes. 
And now, O inhabitants of Jerusalem, and men of Judah, judge, I pray you, betwixt me and my vineyard. 
What could have been done more to my vineyard, that I have not done in it? wherefore, when I looked that it should bring forth grapes, brought it forth wild grapes? 
And now go to; I will tel
842, that ye skipped like rams; and ye little hills, like lambs? 
Tremble, thou earth, at the presence of the Lord, at the presence of the God of Jacob; 
Which turned the rock into a standing water, the flint into a fountain of waters. 
Not unto us, O LORD, not unto us, but unto thy name give glory, for thy mercy, and for thy truth's sake. 
Wherefore should the heathen say, Where is now their God? 
But our God is in the heavens: he hath done whatsoever he hath pleased. 
Their idols are silver and gold, the work of men's hands. 
They have mouths, but they speak not: eyes have they, but they see not: 
They have ears, but they hear not: noses have they, but they smell not: 
They have hands, but they handle not: feet have they, but they walk not: neither speak they through their throat. 
They that make them are like unto them; so is every
793,l give a shout, as they that tread the grapes, against all the inhabitants of the earth. 
A noise shall come even to the ends of the earth; for the LORD hath a controversy with the nations, he will plead with all flesh; he will give them that are wicked to the sword, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, Behold, evil shall go forth from nation to nation, and a great whirlwind shall be raised up from the coasts of the earth. 
And the slain of the LORD shall be at that day from one end of the earth even unto the other end of the earth: they shall not be lamented, neither gathered, nor buried; they shall be dung upon the ground. 
Howl, ye shepherds, and cry; and wallow yourselves in the ashes, ye principal of the flock: for the days of your slaughter and of your dispersions ar
783,read the writing, and make known to me the interpretation thereof, thou shalt be clothed with scarlet, and have a chain of gold about thy neck, and shalt be the third ruler in the kingdom. 
Then Daniel answered and said before the king, Let thy gifts be to thyself, and give thy rewards to another; yet I will read the writing unto the king, and make known to him the interpretation. 
O thou king, the most high God gave Nebuchadnezzar thy father a kingdom, and majesty, and glory, and honour: 
And for the majesty that he gave him, all people, nations, and languages, trembled and feared before him: whom he would he slew; and whom he would he kept alive; and whom he would he set up; and whom he would he put down. 
But when his heart was lifted up, and his mind hardened in pride,
924,me; and I set him a time. 
Moreover I said unto the king, If it please the king, let letters be given me to the governors beyond the river, that they may convey me over till I come into Judah; 
And a letter unto Asaph the keeper of the king's forest, that he may give me timber to make beams for the gates of the palace which appertained to the house, and for the wall of the city, and for the house that I shall enter into. And the king granted me, according to the good hand of my God upon me. 
Then I came to the governors beyond the river, and gave them the king's letters. Now the king had sent captains of the army and horsemen with me. 
When Sanballat the Horonite, and Tobiah the servant, the Ammonite, heard of it, it grieved them exceedingly that there was come a man to seek the welfare of the children of Israel. 
So I came to Jerusalem, and was there three days. 
And I arose in the night, I and some few men wi
993,h the Lord GOD; Because thou saidst, Aha, against my sanctuary, when it was profaned; and against the land of Israel, when it was desolate; and against the house of Judah, when they went into captivity; 
Behold, therefore I will deliver thee to the men of the east for a possession, and they shall set their palaces in thee, and make their dwellings in thee: they shall eat thy fruit, and they shall drink thy milk. 
And I will make Rabbah a stable for camels, and the Ammonites a couching place for flocks: and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thou hast clapped thine hands, and stamped with the feet, and rejoiced in heart with all thy despite against the land of Israel; 
Behold, therefore I will stretch out mine hand upon thee, and will deliver thee for a spoil to the heathen; and I will cut thee off from the people, and I will cause thee to perish out of the countries: I will destroy thee; and thou shalt know that I am the LORD. 
Thus saith the
921,as the duty of every day required; 
And afterward offered the continual burnt offering, both of the new moons, and of all the set feasts of the LORD that were consecrated, and of every one that willingly offered a freewill offering unto the LORD. 
From the first day of the seventh month began they to offer burnt offerings unto the LORD. But the foundation of the temple of the LORD was not yet laid. 
They gave money also unto the masons, and to the carpenters; and meat, and drink, and oil, unto them of Zidon, and to them of Tyre, to bring cedar trees from Lebanon to the sea of Joppa, according to the grant that they had of Cyrus king of Persia. 
Now in the second year of their coming unto the house of God at Jerusalem, in the second month, began Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, and Jeshua the son of Jozadak, and the remnant of their brethren the priests and the Levites, and all they that were come out of the 
918,ebat, who made Israel to sin: 
For he served Baal, and worshipped him, and provoked to anger the LORD God of Israel, according to all that his father had done. 
Adam, Sheth, Enosh, 
Kenan, Mahalaleel, Jered, 
Henoch, Methuselah, Lamech, 
Noah, Shem, Ham, and Japheth. 
The sons of Japheth; Gomer, and Magog, and Madai, and Javan, and Tubal, and Meshech, and Tiras. 
And the sons of Gomer; Ashchenaz, and Riphath, and Togarmah. 
And the sons of Javan; Elishah, and Tarshish, Kittim, and Dodanim. 
The sons of Ham; Cush, and Mizraim, Put, and Canaan. 
And the sons of Cush; Seba, and Havilah, and Sabta, and Raamah, and Sabtecha. And the sons of Raamah; Sheba, and Dedan. 
And Cush begat Nimrod: he began to be mighty upon the earth. 
And Mizraim begat Ludim, and Anamim, and Lehabim, and Naphtuhim, 
And Pathrusim, and Casluhim, (of whom came the Philistines,) and Caphthorim. 
And Canaan begat Zidon his firstborn, and
994,k on the fields; for they are white already to harvest. 
And he that reapeth receiveth wages, and gathereth fruit unto life eternal: that both he that soweth and he that reapeth may rejoice together. 
And herein is that saying true, One soweth, and another reapeth. 
I sent you to reap that whereon ye bestowed no labour: other men laboured, and ye are entered into their labours. 
And many of the Samaritans of that city believed on him for the saying of the woman, which testified, He told me all that ever I did. 
So when the Samaritans were come unto him, they besought him that he would tarry with them: and he abode there two days. 
And many more believed because of his own word; 
And said unto the woman, Now we believe, not because of thy saying: for we have heard him ourselves, and know that this is indeed the Christ, the Saviour of the world. 
Now after two days he departed thence, and went into Galilee. 
For Jesus himself testified, that a prophet hath no honour in his own coun
939,given by lot, throughout their families, out of the tribe of Reuben, and out of the tribe of Gad, and out of the tribe of Zebulun, twelve cities. 
And the children of Israel gave to the Levites these cities with their suburbs. 
And they gave by lot out of the tribe of the children of Judah, and out of the tribe of the children of Simeon, and out of the tribe of the children of Benjamin, these cities, which are called by their names. 
And the residue of the families of the sons of Kohath had cities of their coasts out of the tribe of Ephraim. 
And they gave unto them, of the cities of refuge, Shechem in mount Ephraim with her suburbs; they gave also Gezer with her suburbs, 
And Jokmeam with her suburbs, and Bethhoron with her suburbs, 
And Aijalon with her suburbs, and Gathrimmon with her suburbs: 
And out of the half tribe of Manasseh; Aner with her suburbs, and Bileam with her suburbs, for the family of the remnant of the so
1048, thing? 
The kings of the earth set themselves, and the rulers take counsel together, against the LORD, and against his anointed, saying, 
Let us break their bands asunder, and cast away their cords from us. 
He that sitteth in the heavens shall laugh: the LORD shall have them in derision. 
Then shall he speak unto them in his wrath, and vex them in his sore displeasure. 
Yet have I set my king upon my holy hill of Zion. 
I will declare the decree: the LORD hath said unto me, Thou art my Son; this day have I begotten thee. 
Ask of me, and I shall give thee the heathen for thine inheritance, and the uttermost parts of the earth for thy possession. 
Thou shalt break them with a rod of iron; thou shalt dash them in pieces like a potter's vessel. 
Be wise now therefore, O ye kings: be instructed, ye judges of the earth. 
Serve the LORD with fear, and rejoice with trembling. 
Kiss the Son, lest he be angry, and ye perish from the way, when his wrath is kindled but a little. Blessed are all they that put their trust in him. 
Lord, how are
764,rangled, and from blood. 
For Moses of old time hath in every city them that preach him, being read in the synagogues every sabbath day. 
Then pleased it the apostles and elders with the whole church, to send chosen men of their own company to Antioch with Paul and Barnabas; namely, Judas surnamed Barsabas and Silas, chief men among the brethren: 
And they wrote letters by them after this manner; The apostles and elders and brethren send greeting unto the brethren which are of the Gentiles in Antioch and Syria and Cilicia. 
Forasmuch as we have heard, that certain which went out from us have troubled you with words, subverting your souls, saying, Ye must be circumcised, and keep the law: to whom we gave no such commandment: 
It seemed good unto us, being
927,ly of the Nemuelites: of Jamin, the family of the Jaminites: of Jachin, the family of the Jachinites: 
Of Zerah, the family of the Zarhites: of Shaul, the family of the Shaulites. 
These are the families of the Simeonites, twenty and two thousand and two hundred. 
The children of Gad after their families: of Zephon, the family of the Zephonites: of Haggi, the family of the Haggites: of Shuni, the family of the Shunites: 
Of Ozni, the family of the Oznites: of Eri, the family of the Erites: 
Of Arod, the family of the Arodites: of Areli, the family of the Arelites. 
These are the families of the children of Gad according to those that were numbered of them, forty thousand and five hundred. 
The sons of Judah were Er and Onan: and Er and Onan died in the land of Canaan. 
And the sons of Judah after their families were; of Shelah, the family of the Shelanites: of Pharez, the family of the Pharzites: of Zerah, the fam
811,ess in the day that he sinneth. 
When I shall say to the righteous, that he shall surely live; if he trust to his own righteousness, and commit iniquity, all his righteousnesses shall not be remembered; but for his iniquity that he hath committed, he shall die for it. 
Again, when I say unto the wicked, Thou shalt surely die; if he turn from his sin, and do that which is lawful and right; 
If the wicked restore the pledge, give again that he had robbed, walk in the statutes of life, without committing iniquity; he shall surely live, he shall not die. 
None of his sins that he hath committed shall be mentioned unto him: he hath done that which is lawful and right; he shall surely live. 
Yet the children of thy people say, The way of the Lord is not equal: but as for them, their way is not equal. 
When
903,em, saying, Thus shall ye speak unto my lord Esau; Thy servant Jacob saith thus, I have sojourned with Laban, and stayed there until now: 
And I have oxen, and asses, flocks, and menservants, and womenservants: and I have sent to tell my lord, that I may find grace in thy sight. 
And the messengers returned to Jacob, saying, We came to thy brother Esau, and also he cometh to meet thee, and four hundred men with him. 
Then Jacob was greatly afraid and distressed: and he divided the people that was with him, and the flocks, and herds, and the camels, into two bands; 
And said, If Esau come to the one company, and smite it, then the other company which is left shall escape. 
And Jacob said, O God of my father Abraham, and God of my father Isaac, the LORD which saidst unto me, Return unto thy country, and to thy kindred, and I will deal well with thee: 
I am not worthy of the least of all the m
729,e LORD in their trouble, and he saved them out of their distresses. 
He brought them out of darkness and the shadow of death, and brake their bands in sunder. 
Oh that men would praise the LORD for his goodness, and for his wonderful works to the children of men! 
For he hath broken the gates of brass, and cut the bars of iron in sunder. 
Fools because of their transgression, and because of their iniquities, are afflicted. 
Their soul abhorreth all manner of meat; and they draw near unto the gates of death. 
Then they cry unto the LORD in their trouble, and he saveth them out of their distresses. 
He sent his word, and healed them, and delivered them from their destructions. 
Oh that men would praise the LORD for his go
985,r there is nothing hid, which shall not be manifested; neither was any thing kept secret, but that it should come abroad. 
If any man have ears to hear, let him hear. 
And he said unto them, Take heed what ye hear: with what measure ye mete, it shall be measured to you: and unto you that hear shall more be given. 
For he that hath, to him shall be given: and he that hath not, from him shall be taken even that which he hath. 
And he said, So is the kingdom of God, as if a man should cast seed into the ground; 
And should sleep, and rise night and day, and the seed should spring and grow up, he knoweth not how. 
For the earth bringeth forth fruit of herself; first the blade, then the ear, after that the full corn in the ear. 
But when the fruit is brought forth, immediately he putteth in the sickle, because the harvest is come. 
And he said, Whereunto shall we liken the kingdom of God? or with what comparison shall we compare it? 
It is like a grain of mustard seed, which,
1003, that they had cast him out; and when he had found him, he said unto him, Dost thou believe on the Son of God? 
He answered and said, Who is he, Lord, that I might believe on him? 
And Jesus said unto him, Thou hast both seen him, and it is he that talketh with thee. 
And he said, Lord, I believe. And he worshipped him. 
And Jesus said, For judgment I am come into this world, that they which see not might see; and that they which see might be made blind. 
And some of the Pharisees which were with him heard these words, and said unto him, Are we blind also? 
Jesus said unto them, If ye were blind, ye should have no sin: but now ye say, We see; therefore your sin remaineth. 
Verily, verily, I say unto you, He that entereth not by the door into the sheepfold, but climbeth up some other way, the same is a thief and a robber. 
But he that entereth in by the door is the shepherd of the sheep. 
To him the porter openeth; and the sheep hear his voice: and he calleth his own sheep by name, and lea
944,your abominations, 
In that ye have brought into my sanctuary strangers, uncircumcised in heart, and uncircumcised in flesh, to be in my sanctuary, to pollute it, even my house, when ye offer my bread, the fat and the blood, and they have broken my covenant because of all your abominations. 
And ye have not kept the charge of mine holy things: but ye have set keepers of my charge in my sanctuary for yourselves. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; No stranger, uncircumcised in heart, nor uncircumcised in flesh, shall enter into my sanctuary, of any stranger that is among the children of Israel. 
And the Levites that are gone away far from me, when Israel went astray, which went astray away from me after their idols; they shall even bear their iniquity. 
Yet they shall be ministers in my sanctuary, having charge at the gates of the house, and ministering to the house: they shall slay the burnt offering and the sacrifice for the people, and th
868,d I will bring them into the land of Gilead and Lebanon; and place shall not be found for them. 
And he shall pass through the sea with affliction, and shall smite the waves in the sea, and all the deeps of the river shall dry up: and the pride of Assyria shall be brought down, and the sceptre of Egypt shall depart away. 
And I will strengthen them in the LORD; and they shall walk up and down in his name, saith the LORD. 
Open thy doors, O Lebanon, that the fire may devour thy cedars. 
Howl, fir tree; for the cedar is fallen; because the mighty are spoiled: howl, O ye oaks of Bashan; for the forest of the vintage is come down. 
There is a voice of the howling of the shepherds; for their glory is spoiled: a voice of the roaring of young lions; for the pride of Jordan is spoiled. 
Thus saith the LORD my God; Feed the flock of the slaughter; 
Whose possessors
896,o me of my Father: and no man knoweth the Son, but the Father; neither knoweth any man the Father, save the Son, and he to whomsoever the Son will reveal him. 
Come unto me, all ye that labour and are heavy laden, and I will give you rest. 
Take my yoke upon you, and learn of me; for I am meek and lowly in heart: and ye shall find rest unto your souls. 
For my yoke is easy, and my burden is light. 
At that time Jesus went on the sabbath day through the corn; and his disciples were an hungred, and began to pluck the ears of corn and to eat. 
But when the Pharisees saw it, they said unto him, Behold, thy disciples do that which is not lawful to do upon the sabbath day. 
But he said unto them, Have ye not read what David did, when he was an hungred, and they that were with him; 
How he entered into the house of God, and did eat the shewbread, which was not lawful for him to eat, neither
1012, throughout all Manasseh; who also was gathered after him: and he sent messengers unto Asher, and unto Zebulun, and unto Naphtali; and they came up to meet them. 
And Gideon said unto God, If thou wilt save Israel by mine hand, as thou hast said, 
Behold, I will put a fleece of wool in the floor; and if the dew be on the fleece only, and it be dry upon all the earth beside, then shall I know that thou wilt save Israel by mine hand, as thou hast said. 
And it was so: for he rose up early on the morrow, and thrust the fleece together, and wringed the dew out of the fleece, a bowl full of water. 
And Gideon said unto God, Let not thine anger be hot against me, and I will speak but this once: let me prove, I pray thee, but this once with the fleece; let it now be dry only upon the fleece, and upon all the ground let there be dew. 
And God did so that night: for it was dry upon the fleece only, and there was dew on all the ground. 
Then Jerubbaal, who is Gideon, and all the people that were with him, r
840, as he was wont, to the mount of Olives; and his disciples also followed him. 
And when he was at the place, he said unto them, Pray that ye enter not into temptation. 
And he was withdrawn from them about a stone's cast, and kneeled down, and prayed, 
Saying, Father, if thou be willing, remove this cup from me: nevertheless not my will, but thine, be done. 
And there appeared an angel unto him from heaven, strengthening him. 
And being in an agony he prayed more earnestly: and his sweat was as it were great drops of blood falling down to the ground. 
And when he rose up from prayer, and was come to his disciples, he found them sleeping for sorrow, 
And said unto them, Why sleep ye? rise and pray, lest ye enter into temptation. 
And while he yet spake, behold a multitude, and he that was called Judas, one of the twelve, went bef
824,e, and rejoice before the LORD thy God. 
And thou shalt write upon the stones all the words of this law very plainly. 
And Moses and the priests the Levites spake unto all Israel, saying, Take heed, and hearken, O Israel; this day thou art become the people of the LORD thy God. 
Thou shalt therefore obey the voice of the LORD thy God, and do his commandments and his statutes, which I command thee this day. 
And Moses charged the people the same day, saying, 
These shall stand upon mount Gerizim to bless the people, when ye are come over Jordan; Simeon, and Levi, and Judah, and Issachar, and Joseph, and Benjamin: 
And these shall stand upon mount Ebal to curse; Reuben, Gad, and Asher, and Zebulun, Dan, and Naphtali. 
And the Levites shall speak, and say unto all the men of Israel with a loud voice, 
Cursed be the 
850,all the people that follow me. 
And the king of Israel answered and said, Tell him, Let not him that girdeth on his harness boast himself as he that putteth it off. 
And it came to pass, when Ben-hadad heard this message, as he was drinking, he and the kings in the pavilions, that he said unto his servants, Set yourselves in array. And they set themselves in array against the city. 
And, behold, there came a prophet unto Ahab king of Israel, saying, Thus saith the LORD, Hast thou seen all this great multitude? behold, I will deliver it into thine hand this day; and thou shalt know that I am the LORD. 
And Ahab said, By whom? And he said, Thus saith the LORD, Even by the young men of the princes of the provinces. Then he said, Who shall order the battle? And he answered, Thou. 
Then he numbered the young men of the princes of the provinces
868,od of Israel. 
And the people said unto Joshua, The LORD our God will we serve, and his voice will we obey. 
So Joshua made a covenant with the people that day, and set them a statute and an ordinance in Shechem. 
And Joshua wrote these words in the book of the law of God, and took a great stone, and set it up there under an oak, that was by the sanctuary of the LORD. 
And Joshua said unto all the people, Behold, this stone shall be a witness unto us; for it hath heard all the words of the LORD which he spake unto us: it shall be therefore a witness unto you, lest ye deny your God. 
So Joshua let the people depart, every man unto his inheritance. 
And it came to pass after these things, that Joshua the son of Nun, the servant of the LORD, died, being an hundred and ten years old. 
And they buried him in the border of his inheritance in Timnathserah, which 
940, they swear falsely. 
O LORD, are not thine eyes upon the truth? thou hast stricken them, but they have not grieved; thou hast consumed them, but they have refused to receive correction: they have made their faces harder than a rock; they have refused to return. 
Therefore I said, Surely these are poor; they are foolish: for they know not the way of the LORD, nor the judgment of their God. 
I will get me unto the great men, and will speak unto them; for they have known the way of the LORD, and the judgment of their God: but these have altogether broken the yoke, and burst the bonds. 
Wherefore a lion out of the forest shall slay them, and a wolf of the evenings shall spoil them, a leopard shall watch over their cities: every one that goeth out thence shall be torn in pieces: because their transgressions are many, and their backslidings are increased. 
How shall I pardon thee for this? thy children have forsaken me, and sworn b
914,and to let him go for a scapegoat into the wilderness. 
And Aaron shall bring the bullock of the sin offering, which is for himself, and shall make an atonement for himself, and for his house, and shall kill the bullock of the sin offering which is for himself: 
And he shall take a censer full of burning coals of fire from off the altar before the LORD, and his hands full of sweet incense beaten small, and bring it within the vail: 
And he shall put the incense upon the fire before the LORD, that the cloud of the incense may cover the mercy seat that is upon the testimony, that he die not: 
And he shall take of the blood of the bullock, and sprinkle it with his finger upon the mercy seat eastward; and before the mercy seat shall he sprinkle of the blood with his finger seven times. 
Then shall he kill the goat of the sin offering, that is for the people, and bring his blood within the vail, and do wit
1044,aid, Hereby ye shall know that the LORD hath sent me to do all these works; for I have not done them of mine own mind. 
If these men die the common death of all men, or if they be visited after the visitation of all men; then the LORD hath not sent me. 
But if the LORD make a new thing, and the earth open her mouth, and swallow them up, with all that appertain unto them, and they go down quick into the pit; then ye shall understand that these men have provoked the LORD. 
And it came to pass, as he had made an end of speaking all these words, that the ground clave asunder that was under them: 
And the earth opened her mouth, and swallowed them up, and their houses, and all the men that appertained unto Korah, and all their goods. 
They, and all that appertained to them, went down alive into the pit, and the earth closed upon them: and they perished from among the congregation. 
And all Israel that were round about them fled at the cry of them: for they said, Lest the earth swallow us up also. 
And there came out a fire from the L
746,ed him priests for the high places, and for the devils, and for the calves which he had made. 
And after them out of all the tribes of Israel such as set their hearts to seek the LORD God of Israel came to Jerusalem, to sacrifice unto the LORD God of their fathers. 
So they strengthened the kingdom of Judah, and made Rehoboam the son of Solomon strong, three years: for three years they walked in the way of David and Solomon. 
And Rehoboam took him Mahalath the daughter of Jerimoth the son of David to wife, and Abihail the daughter of Eliab the son of Jesse; 
Which bare him children; Jeush, and Shamariah, and Zaham. 
And after her he took Maachah the daughter of Absalom; which bare him Abijah, and Attai, and Ziza, and Shelomith. 
And Reh
885,e name of the LORD, saying, This house shall be like Shiloh, and this city shall be desolate without an inhabitant? And all the people were gathered against Jeremiah in the house of the LORD. 
When the princes of Judah heard these things, then they came up from the king's house unto the house of the LORD, and sat down in the entry of the new gate of the LORD's house. 
Then spake the priests and the prophets unto the princes and to all the people, saying, This man is worthy to die; for he hath prophesied against this city, as ye have heard with your ears. 
Then spake Jeremiah unto all the princes and to all the people, saying, The LORD sent me to prophesy against this house and against this city all the words that ye have heard. 
Therefore now amend your ways and your doings, and obey the voice of the LORD your God; and the LORD will repent him of the evil that he hath pron
897,e opened her womb: but Rachel was barren. 
And Leah conceived, and bare a son, and she called his name Reuben: for she said, Surely the LORD hath looked upon my affliction; now therefore my husband will love me. 
And she conceived again, and bare a son; and said, Because the LORD hath heard I was hated, he hath therefore given me this son also: and she called his name Simeon. 
And she conceived again, and bare a son; and said, Now this time will my husband be joined unto me, because I have born him three sons: therefore was his name called Levi. 
And she conceived again, and bare a son: and she said, Now will I praise the LORD: therefore she called his name Judah; and left bearing. 
And when Rachel saw that she bare Jacob no children, Rachel envied her sister; and said unto Jacob, Give me children, or else I die. 
And Jacob's anger was kindled against Rachel: and he said, Am I in God'
768, of Lasharon, one; 
The king of Madon, one; the king of Hazor, one; 
The king of Shimronmeron, one; the king of Achshaph, one; 
The king of Taanach, one; the king of Megiddo, one; 
The king of Kedesh, one; the king of Jokneam of Carmel, one; 
The king of Dor in the coast of Dor, one; the king of the nations of Gilgal, one; 
The king of Tirzah, one: all the kings thirty and one. 
Now Joshua was old and stricken in years; and the LORD said unto him, Thou art old and stricken in years, and there remaineth yet very much land to be possessed. 
This is the land that yet remaineth: all the borders of the Philistines, and all Geshuri, 
From Sihor, which is before Egypt, even unto the borders of Ekron northward, which is counted to the Canaanite: five lords of the Ph
1008, Moab was distressed because of the children of Israel. 
And Moab said unto the elders of Midian, Now shall this company lick up all that are round about us, as the ox licketh up the grass of the field. And Balak the son of Zippor was king of the Moabites at that time. 
He sent messengers therefore unto Balaam the son of Beor to Pethor, which is by the river of the land of the children of his people, to call him, saying, Behold, there is a people come out from Egypt: behold, they cover the face of the earth, and they abide over against me: 
Come now therefore, I pray thee, curse me this people; for they are too mighty for me: peradventure I shall prevail, that we may smite them, and that I may drive them out of the land: for I wot that he whom thou blessest is blessed, and he whom thou cursest is cursed. 
And the elders of Moab and the elders of Midian departed with the rewards of divination in their hand; and they came unto Balaam, and spake unto him the words of Balak. 
And he said unto them
1045,oaring of young lions; for the pride of Jordan is spoiled. 
Thus saith the LORD my God; Feed the flock of the slaughter; 
Whose possessors slay them, and hold themselves not guilty: and they that sell them say, Blessed be the LORD; for I am rich: and their own shepherds pity them not. 
For I will no more pity the inhabitants of the land, saith the LORD: but, lo, I will deliver the men every one into his neighbour's hand, and into the hand of his king: and they shall smite the land, and out of their hand I will not deliver them. 
And I will feed the flock of slaughter, even you, O poor of the flock. And I took unto me two staves; the one I called Beauty, and the other I called Bands; and I fed the flock. 
Three shepherds also I cut off in one month; and my soul lothed them, and their soul also abhorred me. 
Then said I, I will not feed you: that that dieth, let it die; and that that is to be cut off, let it be cut off; and let the rest eat every one the flesh of another. 
And I took my staff, even Beauty, and cut it asunder, that 
880, of the LORD? 
And he said, I saw all Israel scattered upon the hills, as sheep that have not a shepherd: and the LORD said, These have no master: let them return every man to his house in peace. 
And the king of Israel said unto Jehoshaphat, Did I not tell thee that he would prophesy no good concerning me, but evil? 
And he said, Hear thou therefore the word of the LORD: I saw the LORD sitting on his throne, and all the host of heaven standing by him on his right hand and on his left. 
And the LORD said, Who shall persuade Ahab, that he may go up and fall at Ramothgilead? And one said on this manner, and another said on that manner. 
And there came forth a spirit, and stood before the LORD, and said, I will persuade him. 
And the LORD said unto him, Wherewith? And he said, I will go forth, and I will be a lying spirit in the mouth of all his prophets. And he said, Th
735, harm of thee. 
But we desire to hear of thee what thou thinkest: for as concerning this sect, we know that every where it is spoken against. 
And when they had appointed him a day, there came many to him into his lodging; to whom he expounded and testified the kingdom of God, persuading them concerning Jesus, both out of the law of Moses, and out of the prophets, from morning till evening. 
And some believed the things which were spoken, and some believed not. 
And when they agreed not among themselves, they departed, after that Paul had spoken one word, Well spake the Holy Ghost by Esaias the prophet unto our fathers, 
Saying, Go unto this people, and say, Hearing ye shall hear, and shall not understand; and seeing ye shall
1059,old, there stood other two, the one on this side of the bank of the river, and the other on that side of the bank of the river. 
And one said to the man clothed in linen, which was upon the waters of the river, How long shall it be to the end of these wonders? 
And I heard the man clothed in linen, which was upon the waters of the river, when he held up his right hand and his left hand unto heaven, and sware by him that liveth for ever that it shall be for a time, times, and an half; and when he shall have accomplished to scatter the power of the holy people, all these things shall be finished. 
And I heard, but I understood not: then said I, O my Lord, what shall be the end of these things? 
And he said, Go thy way, Daniel: for the words are closed up and sealed till the time of the end. 
Many shall be purified, and made white, and tried; but the wicked shall do wickedly: and none of the wicked shall understand; but the wise shall understand. 
And from the time that the daily sacrifice shall be taken away, and the abomination that maketh deso
820,eep these two days according to their writing, and according to their appointed time every year; 
And that these days should be remembered and kept throughout every generation, every family, every province, and every city; and that these days of Purim should not fail from among the Jews, nor the memorial of them perish from their seed. 
Then Esther the queen, the daughter of Abihail, and Mordecai the Jew, wrote with all authority, to confirm this second letter of Purim. 
And he sent the letters unto all the Jews, to the hundred twenty and seven provinces of the kingdom of Ahasuerus, with words of peace and truth, 
To confirm these days of Purim in their times appointed, according as Mordecai the Jew and Esther the queen had enjoined them, and as they had decreed for themselves and for their seed, the matters 
829,ey shall drive out Ashdod at the noon day, and Ekron shall be rooted up. 
Woe unto the inhabitants of the sea coast, the nation of the Cherethites! the word of the LORD is against you; O Canaan, the land of the Philistines, I will even destroy thee, that there shall be no inhabitant. 
And the sea coast shall be dwellings and cottages for shepherds, and folds for flocks. 
And the coast shall be for the remnant of the house of Judah; they shall feed thereupon: in the houses of Ashkelon shall they lie down in the evening: for the LORD their God shall visit them, and turn away their captivity. 
I have heard the reproach of Moab, and the revilings of the children of Ammon, whereby they have reproached my people, and magnified themselves against their border. 
Therefore as I live, saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel,
1066,em; and the grisled go forth toward the south country. 
And the bay went forth, and sought to go that they might walk to and fro through the earth: and he said, Get you hence, walk to and fro through the earth. So they walked to and fro through the earth. 
Then cried he upon me, and spake unto me, saying, Behold, these that go toward the north country have quieted my spirit in the north country. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Take of them of the captivity, even of Heldai, of Tobijah, and of Jedaiah, which are come from Babylon, and come thou the same day, and go into the house of Josiah the son of Zephaniah; 
Then take silver and gold, and make crowns, and set them upon the head of Joshua the son of Josedech, the high priest; 
And speak unto him, saying, Thus speaketh the LORD of hosts, saying, Behold the man whose name is The BRANCH; and he shall grow up out of his place, and he shall build the temple of the LORD: 
Even he shall build the temple of the LORD; and he shall bear the glory, and shall sit and rule upon his throne; and h
929,nd the woman: so shalt thou put away evil from Israel. 
If a damsel that is a virgin be betrothed unto an husband, and a man find her in the city, and lie with her; 
Then ye shall bring them both out unto the gate of that city, and ye shall stone them with stones that they die; the damsel, because she cried not, being in the city; and the man, because he hath humbled his neighbour's wife: so thou shalt put away evil from among you. 
But if a man find a betrothed damsel in the field, and the man force her, and lie with her: then the man only that lay with her shall die. 
But unto the damsel thou shalt do nothing; there is in the damsel no sin worthy of death: for as when a man riseth against his neighbour, and slayeth him, even so is this matter: 
For he found her in the field, and the betrothed damsel cried, and there was none to save her. 
If a man find a damsel that is a virgin, which is not betrothed, and lay hol
749,uth two hundred and fifty, and toward the east two hundred and fifty, and toward the west two hundred and fifty. 
And the residue in length over against the oblation of the holy portion shall be ten thousand eastward, and ten thousand westward: and it shall be over against the oblation of the holy portion; and the increase thereof shall be for food unto them that serve the city. 
And they that serve the city shall serve it out of all the tribes of Israel. 
All the oblation shall be five and twenty thousand by five and twenty thousand: ye shall offer the holy oblation foursquare, with the possession of the city. 
And the residue shall be for the prince, on the one side and on the other of the holy oblation, and of the possession of the city
871, bring the offerings into the house of the LORD, we have had enough to eat, and have left plenty: for the LORD hath blessed his people; and that which is left is this great store. 
Then Hezekiah commanded to prepare chambers in the house of the LORD; and they prepared them, 
And brought in the offerings and the tithes and the dedicated things faithfully: over which Cononiah the Levite was ruler, and Shimei his brother was the next. 
And Jehiel, and Azaziah, and Nahath, and Asahel, and Jerimoth, and Jozabad, and Eliel, and Ismachiah, and Mahath, and Benaiah, were overseers under the hand of Cononiah and Shimei his brother, at the commandment of Hezekiah the king, and Azariah the ruler of the house of God. 
And Kore the son of Imnah the Levite, the porter toward the east, was over the freewill offerings of God, to distribute the oblations of the LORD, and the m
1047,d and the vessels weighed in the house of our God by the hand of Meremoth the son of Uriah the priest; and with him was Eleazar the son of Phinehas; and with them was Jozabad the son of Jeshua, and Noadiah the son of Binnui, Levites; 
By number and by weight of every one: and all the weight was written at that time. 
Also the children of those that had been carried away, which were come out of the captivity, offered burnt offerings unto the God of Israel, twelve bullocks for all Israel, ninety and six rams, seventy and seven lambs, twelve he goats for a sin offering: all this was a burnt offering unto the LORD. 
And they delivered the king's commissions unto the king's lieutenants, and to the governors on this side the river: and they furthered the people, and the house of God. 
Now when these things were done, the princes came to me, saying, The people of Israel, and the priests, and the Levites, have not separated themselves from the people of the lands, doing according to their abominations, even of the Canaanites, the Hittites,
738,sepulchre of his father, which was in Bethlehem. And Joab and his men went all night, and they came to Hebron at break of day. 
Now there was long war between the house of Saul and the house of David: but David waxed stronger and stronger, and the house of Saul waxed weaker and weaker. 
And unto David were sons born in Hebron: and his firstborn was Amnon, of Ahinoam the Jezreelitess; 
And his second, Chileab, of Abigail the wife of Nabal the Carmelite; and the third, Absalom the son of Maacah the daughter of Talmai king of Geshur; 
And the fourth, Adonijah the son of Haggith; and the fifth, Shephatiah the son of Abital; 
And the sixth, Ithream, by Eglah David's wife. These were born to David in Hebron. 
And it came to pass, whil
814, them that dwelt on the earth. 
And after three days and an half the spirit of life from God entered into them, and they stood upon their feet; and great fear fell upon them which saw them. 
And they heard a great voice from heaven saying unto them, Come up hither. And they ascended up to heaven in a cloud; and their enemies beheld them. 
And the same hour was there a great earthquake, and the tenth part of the city fell, and in the earthquake were slain of men seven thousand: and the remnant were affrighted, and gave glory to the God of heaven. 
The second woe is past; and, behold, the third woe cometh quickly. 
And the seventh angel sounded; and there were great voices in heaven, saying, The kingdoms of this world are become the kingdoms of our Lord, and of his Christ; and he shall reign for ever and 
740,d wine: 
Let people serve thee, and nations bow down to thee: be lord over thy brethren, and let thy mother's sons bow down to thee: cursed be every one that curseth thee, and blessed be he that blesseth thee. 
And it came to pass, as soon as Isaac had made an end of blessing Jacob, and Jacob was yet scarce gone out from the presence of Isaac his father, that Esau his brother came in from his hunting. 
And he also had made savoury meat, and brought it unto his father, and said unto his father, Let my father arise, and eat of his son's venison, that thy soul may bless me. 
And Isaac his father said unto him, Who art thou? And he said, I am thy son, thy firstborn Esau. 
And Isaac trembled very exceedingly, and said, Who? where is he
834,aid unto him, What wilt thou that I should do unto thee? The blind man said unto him, Lord, that I might receive my sight. 
And Jesus said unto him, Go thy way; thy faith hath made thee whole. And immediately he received his sight, and followed Jesus in the way. 
And when they came nigh to Jerusalem, unto Bethphage and Bethany, at the mount of Olives, he sendeth forth two of his disciples, 
And saith unto them, Go your way into the village over against you: and as soon as ye be entered into it, ye shall find a colt tied, whereon never man sat; loose him, and bring him. 
And if any man say unto you, Why do ye this? say ye that the Lord hath need of him; and straightway he will send him hither. 
And they went their way, and found the colt tied by the door without in a place where two ways met; and they loose him. 
And certai
954,f your fathers? and they returned and said, Like as the LORD of hosts thought to do unto us, according to our ways, and according to our doings, so hath he dealt with us. 
Upon the four and twentieth day of the eleventh month, which is the month Sebat, in the second year of Darius, came the word of the LORD unto Zechariah, the son of Berechiah, the son of Iddo the prophet, saying, 
I saw by night, and behold a man riding upon a red horse, and he stood among the myrtle trees that were in the bottom; and behind him were there red horses, speckled, and white. 
Then said I, O my lord, what are these? And the angel that talked with me said unto me, I will shew thee what these be. 
And the man that stood among the myrtle trees answered and said, These are they whom the LORD hath sent to walk to and fro through the earth. 
And they answered the angel of the LORD that stood among the myrtle trees, and said, We have walked to and fro through the ear
984,e Philistines, which despise thee round about. 
Thou hast borne thy lewdness and thine abominations, saith the LORD. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; I will even deal with thee as thou hast done, which hast despised the oath in breaking the covenant. 
Nevertheless I will remember my covenant with thee in the days of thy youth, and I will establish unto thee an everlasting covenant. 
Then thou shalt remember thy ways, and be ashamed, when thou shalt receive thy sisters, thine elder and thy younger: and I will give them unto thee for daughters, but not by thy covenant. 
And I will establish my covenant with thee; and thou shalt know that I am the LORD: 
That thou mayest remember, and be confounded, and never open thy mouth any more because of thy shame, when I am pacified toward thee for all that thou hast done, saith the Lord GOD. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, put forth a riddle, and speak a parable unto the house of Israel; 
And say, Thus sai
760,f him. 
And Aaron said unto them, Break off the golden earrings, which are in the ears of your wives, of your sons, and of your daughters, and bring them unto me. 
And all the people brake off the golden earrings which were in their ears, and brought them unto Aaron. 
And he received them at their hand, and fashioned it with a graving tool, after he had made it a molten calf: and they said, These be thy gods, O Israel, which brought thee up out of the land of Egypt. 
And when Aaron saw it, he built an altar before it; and Aaron made proclamation, and said, To morrow is a feast to the LORD. 
And they rose up early on the morrow, and offered burnt offerings, and brought peace offerings; and the people sat down to eat and to drink, and rose up to play. 
784,eople together unto the LORD to Mizpeh; 
And said unto the children of Israel, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, I brought up Israel out of Egypt, and delivered you out of the hand of the Egyptians, and out of the hand of all kingdoms, and of them that oppressed you: 
And ye have this day rejected your God, who himself saved you out of all your adversities and your tribulations; and ye have said unto him, Nay, but set a king over us. Now therefore present yourselves before the LORD by your tribes, and by your thousands. 
And when Samuel had caused all the tribes of Israel to come near, the tribe of Benjamin was taken. 
When he had caused the tribe of Benjamin to come near by their families, the family of Matri was taken, and Saul the son of Kish was taken: and when they so
1076,s a man is justified, and not by faith only. 
Likewise also was not Rahab the harlot justified by works, when she had received the messengers, and had sent them out another way? 
For as the body without the spirit is dead, so faith without works is dead also. 
My brethren, be not many masters, knowing that we shall receive the greater condemnation. 
For in many things we offend all. If any man offend not in word, the same is a perfect man, and able also to bridle the whole body. 
Behold, we put bits in the horses' mouths, that they may obey us; and we turn about their whole body. 
Behold also the ships, which though they be so great, and are driven of fierce winds, yet are they turned about with a very small helm, whithersoever the governor listeth. 
Even so the tongue is a little member, and boasteth great things. Behold, how great a matter a little fire kindleth! 
And the tongue is a fire, a world of iniquity: so is the tongue among our members, that it defileth the whole body, and setteth on fire the course of nature; and it is set on fire of hell. 
For eve
820,hty, that thou mayest bring them down. 
For thou art my lamp, O LORD: and the LORD will lighten my darkness. 
For by thee I have run through a troop: by my God have I leaped over a wall. 
As for God, his way is perfect; the word of the LORD is tried: he is a buckler to all them that trust in him. 
For who is God, save the LORD? and who is a rock, save our God? 
God is my strength and power: and he maketh my way perfect. 
He maketh my feet like hinds' feet: and setteth me upon my high places. 
He teacheth my hands to war; so that a bow of steel is broken by mine arms. 
Thou hast also given me the shield of thy salvation: and thy gentleness hath made me great. 
Thou hast enlarged my steps under me; so that my feet did not slip. 
I have pursued mine enemies, and destroyed them; and turned not again until I had c
1056,white in the skin, and it have turned the hair white, and there be quick raw flesh in the rising; 
It is an old leprosy in the skin of his flesh, and the priest shall pronounce him unclean, and shall not shut him up: for he is unclean. 
And if a leprosy break out abroad in the skin, and the leprosy cover all the skin of him that hath the plague from his head even to his foot, wheresoever the priest looketh; 
Then the priest shall consider: and, behold, if the leprosy have covered all his flesh, he shall pronounce him clean that hath the plague: it is all turned white: he is clean. 
But when raw flesh appeareth in him, he shall be unclean. 
And the priest shall see the raw flesh, and pronounce him to be unclean: for the raw flesh is unclean: it is a leprosy. 
Or if the raw flesh turn again, and be changed unto white, he shall come unto the priest; 
And the priest shall see him: and, behold, if the plague be turned into white; then the priest shall pronounce him clean that hath the plague: he is clean. 
The flesh also, in which, even in the s
962,ll come unto thee, the fir tree, the pine tree, and the box together, to beautify the place of my sanctuary; and I will make the place of my feet glorious. 
The sons also of them that afflicted thee shall come bending unto thee; and all they that despised thee shall bow themselves down at the soles of thy feet; and they shall call thee; The city of the LORD, The Zion of the Holy One of Israel. 
Whereas thou has been forsaken and hated, so that no man went through thee, I will make thee an eternal excellency, a joy of many generations. 
Thou shalt also suck the milk of the Gentiles, and shalt suck the breast of kings: and thou shalt know that I the LORD am thy Saviour and thy Redeemer, the mighty One of Jacob. 
For brass I will bring gold, and for iron I will bring silver, and for wood brass, and for stones iron: I will also make thy officers peace, and thine exactors righteousness. 
Violence shall no more be heard in thy land, wasting nor destructi
890, me the interpretation thereof. 
But at the last Daniel came in before me, whose name was Belteshazzar, according to the name of my God, and in whom is the spirit of the holy gods: and before him I told the dream, saying, 
O Belteshazzar, master of the magicians, because I know that the spirit of the holy gods is in thee, and no secret troubleth thee, tell me the visions of my dream that I have seen, and the interpretation thereof. 
Thus were the visions of mine head in my bed; I saw, and behold a tree in the midst of the earth, and the height thereof was great. 
The tree grew, and was strong, and the height thereof reached unto heaven, and the sight thereof to the end of all the earth: 
The leaves thereof were fair, and the fruit thereof much, and in it was meat for all: the beasts of the field had shadow under it, and the fowls of the heaven dwelt in the boughs thereof, and a
886,the LORD our God, for our good always, that he might preserve us alive, as it is at this day. 
And it shall be our righteousness, if we observe to do all these commandments before the LORD our God, as he hath commanded us. 
When the LORD thy God shall bring thee into the land whither thou goest to possess it, and hath cast out many nations before thee, the Hittites, and the Girgashites, and the Amorites, and the Canaanites, and the Perizzites, and the Hivites, and the Jebusites, seven nations greater and mightier than thou; 
And when the LORD thy God shall deliver them before thee; thou shalt smite them, and utterly destroy them; thou shalt make no covenant with them, nor shew mercy unto them: 
Neither shalt thou make marriages with them; thy daughter thou shalt not give unto his son, nor his daughter shalt thou take unto thy son. 
For they will turn away thy son from follo
863,nto God, Depart from us; for we desire not the knowledge of thy ways. 
What is the Almighty, that we should serve him? and what profit should we have, if we pray unto him? 
Lo, their good is not in their hand: the counsel of the wicked is far from me. 
How oft is the candle of the wicked put out! and how oft cometh their destruction upon them! God distributeth sorrows in his anger. 
They are as stubble before the wind, and as chaff that the storm carrieth away. 
God layeth up his iniquity for his children: he rewardeth him, and he shall know it. 
His eyes shall see his destruction, and he shall drink of the wrath of the Almighty. 
For what pleasure hath he in his house after him, when the number of his months is cut off in the midst? 
Shall any teach God knowledge? seeing he judgeth those that are high. 
One dieth in his full strength, being wholly at
799,he harlot shall live, she and all that are with her in the house, because she hid the messengers that we sent. 
And ye, in any wise keep yourselves from the accursed thing, lest ye make yourselves accursed, when ye take of the accursed thing, and make the camp of Israel a curse, and trouble it. 
But all the silver, and gold, and vessels of brass and iron, are consecrated unto the LORD: they shall come into the treasury of the LORD. 
So the people shouted when the priests blew with the trumpets: and it came to pass, when the people heard the sound of the trumpet, and the people shouted with a great shout, that the wall fell down flat, so that the people went up into the city, every man straight before him, and they took the city. 
And they utterly destroyed all that was in the city, both m
803, your God with all your heart and with all your soul. 
Ye shall walk after the LORD your God, and fear him, and keep his commandments, and obey his voice, and ye shall serve him, and cleave unto him. 
And that prophet, or that dreamer of dreams, shall be put to death; because he hath spoken to turn you away from the LORD your God, which brought you out of the land of Egypt, and redeemed you out of the house of bondage, to thrust thee out of the way which the LORD thy God commanded thee to walk in. So shalt thou put the evil away from the midst of thee. 
If thy brother, the son of thy mother, or thy son, or thy daughter, or the wife of thy bosom, or thy friend, which is as thine own soul, entice thee secretly, saying, Let us go and serve other gods, which thou hast not known, thou, nor thy fat
957,u, Aha, even the ancient high places are ours in possession: 
Therefore prophesy and say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because they have made you desolate, and swallowed you up on every side, that ye might be a possession unto the residue of the heathen, and ye are taken up in the lips of talkers, and are an infamy of the people: 
Therefore, ye mountains of Israel, hear the word of the Lord GOD; Thus saith the Lord GOD to the mountains, and to the hills, to the rivers, and to the valleys, to the desolate wastes, and to the cities that are forsaken, which became a prey and derision to the residue of the heathen that are round about; 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Surely in the fire of my jealousy have I spoken against the residue of the heathen, and against all Idumea, which have appointed my land into their possession with the joy of all their heart, with despiteful minds, to cast it out for a prey. 
Prophesy therefore concerning the land of 
915, ill savour shall come up, because he hath done great things. 
Fear not, O land; be glad and rejoice: for the LORD will do great things. 
Be not afraid, ye beasts of the field: for the pastures of the wilderness do spring, for the tree beareth her fruit, the fig tree and the vine do yield their strength. 
Be glad then, ye children of Zion, and rejoice in the LORD your God: for he hath given you the former rain moderately, and he will cause to come down for you the rain, the former rain, and the latter rain in the first month. 
And the floors shall be full of wheat, and the vats shall overflow with wine and oil. 
And I will restore to you the years that the locust hath eaten, the cankerworm, and the caterpiller, and the palmerworm, my great army which I sent among you. 
And ye shall eat in plenty, and be satisfied, and praise the name of the LORD your God, that hath dealt wondrously with you: and my peo
1012,t were wounded to death; and his deadly wound was healed: and all the world wondered after the beast. 
And they worshipped the dragon which gave power unto the beast: and they worshipped the beast, saying, Who is like unto the beast? who is able to make war with him? 
And there was given unto him a mouth speaking great things and blasphemies; and power was given unto him to continue forty and two months. 
And he opened his mouth in blasphemy against God, to blaspheme his name, and his tabernacle, and them that dwell in heaven. 
And it was given unto him to make war with the saints, and to overcome them: and power was given him over all kindreds, and tongues, and nations. 
And all that dwell upon the earth shall worship him, whose names are not written in the book of life of the Lamb slain from the foundation of the world. 
If any man have an ear, let him hear. 
He that leadeth into captivity shall go into captivity: he that killeth with the sword must be killed with the sword. Here is the patience
1030,hee. I the LORD have spoken it. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face toward the mountains of Israel, and prophesy against them, 
And say, Ye mountains of Israel, hear the word of the Lord GOD; Thus saith the Lord GOD to the mountains, and to the hills, to the rivers, and to the valleys; Behold, I, even I, will bring a sword upon you, and I will destroy your high places. 
And your altars shall be desolate, and your images shall be broken: and I will cast down your slain men before your idols. 
And I will lay the dead carcases of the children of Israel before their idols; and I will scatter your bones round about your altars. 
In all your dwellingplaces the cities shall be laid waste, and the high places shall be desolate; that your altars may be laid waste and made desolate, and your idols may be broken and cease, and your images may be cut down, and your works may be abolished. 
And the slain shall fall in the midst of you, and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
Yet will I leave
762,l the places nigh thereunto, in the plain, in the hills, and in the vale, and in the south, and by the sea side, to the land of the Canaanites, and unto Lebanon, unto the great river, the river Euphrates. 
Behold, I have set the land before you: go in and possess the land which the LORD sware unto your fathers, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, to give unto them and to their seed after them. 
And I spake unto you at that time, saying, I am not able to bear you myself alone: 
The LORD your God hath multiplied you, and, behold, ye are this day as the stars of heaven for multitude. 
(The LORD God of your fathers make you a thousand times so many more as ye are, and bless you, as he hath promised you!) 
How can I myself alone bear your cumbrance, and your burden,
775,speaking, he said unto Simon, Launch out into the deep, and let down your nets for a draught. 
And Simon answering said unto him, Master, we have toiled all the night, and have taken nothing: nevertheless at thy word I will let down the net. 
And when they had this done, they inclosed a great multitude of fishes: and their net brake. 
And they beckoned unto their partners, which were in the other ship, that they should come and help them. And they came, and filled both the ships, so that they began to sink. 
When Simon Peter saw it, he fell down at Jesus' knees, saying, Depart from me; for I am a sinful man, O Lord. 
For he was astonished, and all that were with him, at the draught of the fishes which they had taken: 
And so was also James, and John, the sons of Ze
727,ty and three thousand and four hundred. 
Of the sons of Naphtali after their families: of Jahzeel, the family of the Jahzeelites: of Guni, the family of the Gunites: 
Of Jezer, the family of the Jezerites: of Shillem, the family of the Shillemites. 
These are the families of Naphtali according to their families: and they that were numbered of them were forty and five thousand and four hundred. 
These were the numbered of the children of Israel, six hundred thousand and a thousand seven hundred and thirty. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Unto these the land shall be divided for an inheritance according to the number of names. 
To many thou shalt give the more inheritance, and to few thou shalt give the less in
931,no more; neither shall his place any more behold him. 
His children shall seek to please the poor, and his hands shall restore their goods. 
His bones are full of the sin of his youth, which shall lie down with him in the dust. 
Though wickedness be sweet in his mouth, though he hide it under his tongue; 
Though he spare it, and forsake it not; but keep it still within his mouth: 
Yet his meat in his bowels is turned, it is the gall of asps within him. 
He hath swallowed down riches, and he shall vomit them up again: God shall cast them out of his belly. 
He shall suck the poison of asps: the viper's tongue shall slay him. 
He shall not see the rivers, the floods, the brooks of honey and butter. 
That which he laboured for shall he restore, and shall not swallow it down: according to his substance shall the restitution be, and he shall not rejoice therein. 
Because he hath oppressed and hath forsaken the poor; because
754,on the king, heard it, that Jeroboam returned out of Egypt. 
And they sent and called him. So Jeroboam and all Israel came and spake to Rehoboam, saying, 
Thy father made our yoke grievous: now therefore ease thou somewhat the grievous servitude of thy father, and his heavy yoke that he put upon us, and we will serve thee. 
And he said unto them, Come again unto me after three days. And the people departed. 
And king Rehoboam took counsel with the old men that had stood before Solomon his father while he yet lived, saying, What counsel give ye me to return answer to this people? 
And they spake unto him, saying, If thou be kind to this people, and please them, and speak good words to them, they will be thy servants for ever. 
But he forsook the
793,on to the LORD: though hand join in hand, he shall not be unpunished. 
By mercy and truth iniquity is purged: and by the fear of the LORD men depart from evil. 
When a man's ways please the LORD, he maketh even his enemies to be at peace with him. 
Better is a little with righteousness than great revenues without right. 
A man's heart deviseth his way: but the LORD directeth his steps. 
A divine sentence is in the lips of the king: his mouth transgresseth not in judgment. 
A just weight and balance are the LORD's: all the weights of the bag are his work. 
It is an abomination to kings to commit wickedness: for the throne is established by righteousness. 
Righteous lips are the delight of kings; and they love him that speaketh right. 
The wrath of a king is as messengers of death: bu
970, man shall bear his sin. 
And if a stranger shall sojourn among you, and will keep the passover unto the LORD; according to the ordinance of the passover, and according to the manner thereof, so shall he do: ye shall have one ordinance, both for the stranger, and for him that was born in the land. 
And on the day that the tabernacle was reared up the cloud covered the tabernacle, namely, the tent of the testimony: and at even there was upon the tabernacle as it were the appearance of fire, until the morning. 
So it was alway: the cloud covered it by day, and the appearance of fire by night. 
And when the cloud was taken up from the tabernacle, then after that the children of Israel journeyed: and in the place where the cloud abode, there the children of Israel pitched their tents. 
At the commandment of the LORD the children of Israel journeyed, and at the commandment of the LORD they pitched: as long as the cloud abode upon the tabernacle they rested in t
786, openeth not his mouth. 
He was taken from prison and from judgment: and who shall declare his generation? for he was cut off out of the land of the living: for the transgression of my people was he stricken. 
And he made his grave with the wicked, and with the rich in his death; because he had done no violence, neither was any deceit in his mouth. 
Yet it pleased the LORD to bruise him; he hath put him to grief: when thou shalt make his soul an offering for sin, he shall see his seed, he shall prolong his days, and the pleasure of the LORD shall prosper in his hand. 
He shall see of the travail of his soul, and shall be satisfied: by his knowledge shall my righteous servant justify many; for he shall bear their iniquities. 
Therefore will I divide him a portion with the grea
925,was not cut, neither wast thou washed in water to supple thee; thou wast not salted at all, nor swaddled at all. 
None eye pitied thee, to do any of these unto thee, to have compassion upon thee; but thou wast cast out in the open field, to the lothing of thy person, in the day that thou wast born. 
And when I passed by thee, and saw thee polluted in thine own blood, I said unto thee when thou wast in thy blood, Live; yea, I said unto thee when thou wast in thy blood, Live. 
I have caused thee to multiply as the bud of the field, and thou hast increased and waxen great, and thou art come to excellent ornaments: thy breasts are fashioned, and thine hair is grown, whereas thou wast naked and bare. 
Now when I passed by thee, and looked upon thee, behold, thy time was the time of love; and I spread my skirt over thee, and covered thy nakedness: yea, I sware unto thee, and entered into a covenant with thee, saith th
787,ith he may die, and he die, he is a murderer: the murderer shall surely be put to death. 
Or if he smite him with an hand weapon of wood, wherewith he may die, and he die, he is a murderer: the murderer shall surely be put to death. 
The revenger of blood himself shall slay the murderer: when he meeteth him, he shall slay him. 
But if he thrust him of hatred, or hurl at him by laying of wait, that he die; 
Or in enmity smite him with his hand, that he die: he that smote him shall surely be put to death; for he is a murderer: the revenger of blood shall slay the murderer, when he meeteth him. 
But if he thrust him suddenly without enmity, or have cast upon him any thing without laying of wait, 
Or with any stone, wherewith a man may die, seeing him not, and cast it upon him, th
1031,t sojourneth among you: 
For on that day shall the priest make an atonement for you, to cleanse you, that ye may be clean from all your sins before the LORD. 
It shall be a sabbath of rest unto you, and ye shall afflict your souls, by a statute for ever. 
And the priest, whom he shall anoint, and whom he shall consecrate to minister in the priest's office in his father's stead, shall make the atonement, and shall put on the linen clothes, even the holy garments: 
And he shall make an atonement for the holy sanctuary, and he shall make an atonement for the tabernacle of the congregation, and for the altar, and he shall make an atonement for the priests, and for all the people of the congregation. 
And this shall be an everlasting statute unto you, to make an atonement for the children of Israel for all their sins once a year. And he did as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Aaron, and unto his sons, and unto all the children of Israel, and say unto them; This is the thing wh
756,ands of his servants ships, and servants that had knowledge of the sea; and they went with the servants of Solomon to Ophir, and took thence four hundred and fifty talents of gold, and brought them to king Solomon. 
And when the queen of Sheba heard of the fame of Solomon, she came to prove Solomon with hard questions at Jerusalem, with a very great company, and camels that bare spices, and gold in abundance, and precious stones: and when she was come to Solomon, she communed with him of all that was in her heart. 
And Solomon told her all her questions: and there was nothing hid from Solomon which he told her not. 
And when the queen of Sheba had seen the wisdom of Solomon, and the house that he had built, 
And the meat of his table, and the sit
914,st: 
But in the place which the LORD shall choose in one of thy tribes, there thou shalt offer thy burnt offerings, and there thou shalt do all that I command thee. 
Notwithstanding thou mayest kill and eat flesh in all thy gates, whatsoever thy soul lusteth after, according to the blessing of the LORD thy God which he hath given thee: the unclean and the clean may eat thereof, as of the roebuck, and as of the hart. 
Only ye shall not eat the blood; ye shall pour it upon the earth as water. 
Thou mayest not eat within thy gates the tithe of thy corn, or of thy wine, or of thy oil, or the firstlings of thy herds or of thy flock, nor any of thy vows which thou vowest, nor thy freewill offerings, or heave offering of thine hand: 
But thou must eat them before the LORD thy God in the place which the LORD thy God shall choose, thou, and thy son, and thy daughter, and thy manservant, and thy maidservant, an
777,hou didst send me. 
I pray for them: I pray not for the world, but for them which thou hast given me; for they are thine. 
And all mine are thine, and thine are mine; and I am glorified in them. 
And now I am no more in the world, but these are in the world, and I come to thee. Holy Father, keep through thine own name those whom thou hast given me, that they may be one, as we are. 
While I was with them in the world, I kept them in thy name: those that thou gavest me I have kept, and none of them is lost, but the son of perdition; that the scripture might be fulfilled. 
And now come I to thee; and these things I speak in the world, that they might have my joy fulfilled in themselves. 
I have given them thy word; and the world hath hated them, because they are not of 
1019,ce, 
Cursed be the man that maketh any graven or molten image, an abomination unto the LORD, the work of the hands of the craftsman, and putteth it in a secret place. And all the people shall answer and say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that setteth light by his father or his mother. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that removeth his neighbour's landmark. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that maketh the blind to wander out of the way. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that perverteth the judgment of the stranger, fatherless, and widow. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that lieth with his father's wife; because he uncovereth his father's skirt. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that lieth with any manner of beast. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that lieth with his sister, the daughter of his father, or the daughter of his mother. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that lieth with his mother in law. 
981, Manasseh, by their generations, after their families, by the house of their fathers, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war; 
Those that were numbered of them, even of the tribe of Manasseh, were thirty and two thousand and two hundred. 
Of the children of Benjamin, by their generations, after their families, by the house of their fathers, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war; 
Those that were numbered of them, even of the tribe of Benjamin, were thirty and five thousand and four hundred. 
Of the children of Dan, by their generations, after their families, by the house of their fathers, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war; 
Those that were numbered of them, even of the tribe of Dan, were threescore and two thousand and seven hundred. 
Of the children o
1077,alk after our own devices, and we will every one do the imagination of his evil heart. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Ask ye now among the heathen, who hath heard such things: the virgin of Israel hath done a very horrible thing. 
Will a man leave the snow of Lebanon which cometh from the rock of the field? or shall the cold flowing waters that come from another place be forsaken? 
Because my people hath forgotten me, they have burned incense to vanity, and they have caused them to stumble in their ways from the ancient paths, to walk in paths, in a way not cast up; 
To make their land desolate, and a perpetual hissing; every one that passeth thereby shall be astonished, and wag his head. 
I will scatter them as with an east wind before the enemy; I will shew them the back, and not the face, in the day of their calamity. 
Then said they, Come and let us devise devices against Jeremiah; for the law shall not perish from the priest, nor counsel from the wise, nor the word from the prophet. Come, and let us smite him with the tongue, and let us not give heed to a
747,inst any of the commandments of the LORD concerning things which should not be done, and are guilty; 
When the sin, which they have sinned against it, is known, then the congregation shall offer a young bullock for the sin, and bring him before the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And the elders of the congregation shall lay their hands upon the head of the bullock before the LORD: and the bullock shall be killed before the LORD. 
And the priest that is anointed shall bring of the bullock's blood to the tabernacle of the congregation: 
And the priest shall dip his finger in some of the blood, and sprinkle it seven times before the LORD, even before the vail. 
And he shall put some of the blood upon the horns of the altar which is before 
906,soul shall be as a watered garden; and they shall not sorrow any more at all. 
Then shall the virgin rejoice in the dance, both young men and old together: for I will turn their mourning into joy, and will comfort them, and make them rejoice from their sorrow. 
And I will satiate the soul of the priests with fatness, and my people shall be satisfied with my goodness, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD; A voice was heard in Ramah, lamentation, and bitter weeping; Rahel weeping for her children refused to be comforted for her children, because they were not. 
Thus saith the LORD; Refrain thy voice from weeping, and thine eyes from tears: for thy work shall be rewarded, saith the LORD; and they shall come again from the land of the enemy. 
And there is hope in thine end, saith the LORD, that thy children shall come again to their own border. 
I have surely heard Ephraim bemoaning himself thus; 
1073,inst them, and hath smitten them: and the hills did tremble, and their carcases were torn in the midst of the streets. For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still. 
And he will lift up an ensign to the nations from far, and will hiss unto them from the end of the earth: and, behold, they shall come with speed swiftly: 
None shall be weary nor stumble among them; none shall slumber nor sleep; neither shall the girdle of their loins be loosed, nor the latchet of their shoes be broken: 
Whose arrows are sharp, and all their bows bent, their horses' hoofs shall be counted like flint, and their wheels like a whirlwind: 
Their roaring shall be like a lion, they shall roar like young lions: yea, they shall roar, and lay hold of the prey, and shall carry it away safe, and none shall deliver it. 
And in that day they shall roar against them like the roaring of the sea: and if one look unto the land, behold darkness and sorrow, and the light is darkened in the heavens thereof. 
In the year that king Uzziah died I saw also the LORD s
1025, LORD. 
Thou shalt not lie with mankind, as with womankind: it is abomination. 
Neither shalt thou lie with any beast to defile thyself therewith: neither shall any woman stand before a beast to lie down thereto: it is confusion. 
Defile not ye yourselves in any of these things: for in all these the nations are defiled which I cast out before you: 
And the land is defiled: therefore I do visit the iniquity thereof upon it, and the land itself vomiteth out her inhabitants. 
Ye shall therefore keep my statutes and my judgments, and shall not commit any of these abominations; neither any of your own nation, nor any stranger that sojourneth among you: 
(For all these abominations have the men of the land done, which were before you, and the land is defiled;) 
That the land spue not you out also, when ye defile it, as it spued out the nations that were before you. 
For whosoever shall commit any of these abominations, even the souls that commit them shall be cut off from among their people. 
Therefore shall ye keep
796,yet any that is left of the house of Saul, that I may shew him kindness for Jonathan's sake? 
And there was of the house of Saul a servant whose name was Ziba. And when they had called him unto David, the king said unto him, Art thou Ziba? And he said, Thy servant is he. 
And the king said, Is there not yet any of the house of Saul, that I may shew the kindness of God unto him? And Ziba said unto the king, Jonathan hath yet a son, which is lame on his feet. 
And the king said unto him, Where is he? And Ziba said unto the king, Behold, he is in the house of Machir, the son of Ammiel, in Lodebar. 
Then king David sent, and fetched him out of the house of Machir, the son of Ammiel, from Lodebar. 
Now when Mephibosheth, the son of Jonathan, the son of Saul, was come unto David, he fell on 
969,y, but in mine infirmities. 
For though I would desire to glory, I shall not be a fool; for I will say the truth: but now I forbear, lest any man should think of me above that which he seeth me to be, or that he heareth of me. 
And lest I should be exalted above measure through the abundance of the revelations, there was given to me a thorn in the flesh, the messenger of Satan to buffet me, lest I should be exalted above measure. 
For this thing I besought the Lord thrice, that it might depart from me. 
And he said unto me, My grace is sufficient for thee: for my strength is made perfect in weakness. Most gladly therefore will I rather glory in my infirmities, that the power of Christ may rest upon me. 
Therefore I take pleasure in infirmities, in reproaches, in necessities, in persecutions, in distresses for Christ's sake: for when I am weak, then am I strong. 
I am become a fool in glorying; ye have compelled me: for I ought to have been commended of yo
850,that were over and above them that were redeemed by the Levites: 
Of the firstborn of the children of Israel took he the money; a thousand three hundred and threescore and five shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary: 
And Moses gave the money of them that were redeemed unto Aaron and to his sons, according to the word of the LORD, as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
Take the sum of the sons of Kohath from among the sons of Levi, after their families, by the house of their fathers, 
From thirty years old and upward even until fifty years old, all that enter into the host, to do the work in the tabernacle of the congregation. 
This shall be the service of the sons of Kohath in the tabernacle of the congregation, about the most holy things: 
And when the camp setteth forward, Aaron shall c
1012,iness, whereby they lie in wait to deceive; 
But speaking the truth in love, may grow up into him in all things, which is the head, even Christ: 
From whom the whole body fitly joined together and compacted by that which every joint supplieth, according to the effectual working in the measure of every part, maketh increase of the body unto the edifying of itself in love. 
This I say therefore, and testify in the Lord, that ye henceforth walk not as other Gentiles walk, in the vanity of their mind, 
Having the understanding darkened, being alienated from the life of God through the ignorance that is in them, because of the blindness of their heart: 
Who being past feeling have given themselves over unto lasciviousness, to work all uncleanness with greediness. 
But ye have not so learned Christ; 
If so be that ye have heard him, and have been taught by him, as the truth is in Jesus: 
That ye put off concerning the former conversation the old man, which is corrupt according to the deceitful lusts; 
A
1037, times: but, Until seventy times seven. 
Therefore is the kingdom of heaven likened unto a certain king, which would take account of his servants. 
And when he had begun to reckon, one was brought unto him, which owed him ten thousand talents. 
But forasmuch as he had not to pay, his lord commanded him to be sold, and his wife, and children, and all that he had, and payment to be made. 
The servant therefore fell down, and worshipped him, saying, Lord, have patience with me, and I will pay thee all. 
Then the lord of that servant was moved with compassion, and loosed him, and forgave him the debt. 
But the same servant went out, and found one of his fellowservants, which owed him an hundred pence: and he laid hands on him, and took him by the throat, saying, Pay me that thou owest. 
And his fellowservant fell down at his feet, and besought him, saying, Have patience with me, and I will pay thee all. 
And he would not: but went and cast him into prison, till he should pay the debt. 
So when his fellowservants saw what was 
1008, that judgeth righteously: 
Who his own self bare our sins in his own body on the tree, that we, being dead to sins, should live unto righteousness: by whose stripes ye were healed. 
For ye were as sheep going astray; but are now returned unto the Shepherd and Bishop of your souls. 
Likewise, ye wives, be in subjection to your own husbands; that, if any obey not the word, they also may without the word be won by the conversation of the wives; 
While they behold your chaste conversation coupled with fear. 
Whose adorning let it not be that outward adorning of plaiting the hair, and of wearing of gold, or of putting on of apparel; 
But let it be the hidden man of the heart, in that which is not corruptible, even the ornament of a meek and quiet spirit, which is in the sight of God of great price. 
For after this manner in the old time the holy women also, who trusted in God, adorned themselves, being in subjection unto their own husbands: 
Even as Sara obeyed Abraham, calling him lord: whose dau
728,el the son of Jehohanan, and Azariah the son of Obed, and Maaseiah the son of Adaiah, and Elishaphat the son of Zichri, into covenant with him. 
And they went about in Judah, and gathered the Levites out of all the cities of Judah, and the chief of the fathers of Israel, and they came to Jerusalem. 
And all the congregation made a covenant with the king in the house of God. And he said unto them, Behold, the king's son shall reign, as the LORD hath said of the sons of David. 
This is the thing that ye shall do; A third part of you entering on the sabbath, of the priests and of the Levites, shall be porters of the doors; 
And a third part shall be at the king's house; and a third part at the gate of the foundation: and 
883,pride of Moab; he is very proud: even of his haughtiness, and his pride, and his wrath: but his lies shall not be so. 
Therefore shall Moab howl for Moab, every one shall howl: for the foundations of Kirhareseth shall ye mourn; surely they are stricken. 
For the fields of Heshbon languish, and the vine of Sibmah: the lords of the heathen have broken down the principal plants thereof, they are come even unto Jazer, they wandered through the wilderness: her branches are stretched out, they are gone over the sea. 
Therefore I will bewail with the weeping of Jazer the vine of Sibmah: I will water thee with my tears, O Heshbon, and Elealeh: for the shouting for thy summer fruits and for thy harvest is fallen. 
And gladness is taken away, and joy out of the plentiful field; and in the vineyards there shall be no singing, neither shall there be shouting: the treaders shall trea
906,sts, Consider ye, and call for the mourning women, that they may come; and send for cunning women, that they may come: 
And let them make haste, and take up a wailing for us, that our eyes may run down with tears, and our eyelids gush out with waters. 
For a voice of wailing is heard out of Zion, How are we spoiled! we are greatly confounded, because we have forsaken the land, because our dwellings have cast us out. 
Yet hear the word of the LORD, O ye women, and let your ear receive the word of his mouth, and teach your daughters wailing, and every one her neighbour lamentation. 
For death is come up into our windows, and is entered into our palaces, to cut off the children from without, and the young men from the streets. 
Speak, Thus saith the LORD, Even the carcases of men shall fall as dung upon the open field, and as the handful after the harvestman, and none shall gather them. 
Thus sai
793,ria, and said, What do these feeble Jews? will they fortify themselves? will they sacrifice? will they make an end in a day? will they revive the stones out of the heaps of the rubbish which are burned? 
Now Tobiah the Ammonite was by him, and he said, Even that which they build, if a fox go up, he shall even break down their stone wall. 
Hear, O our God; for we are despised: and turn their reproach upon their own head, and give them for a prey in the land of captivity: 
And cover not their iniquity, and let not their sin be blotted out from before thee: for they have provoked thee to anger before the builders. 
So built we the wall; and all the wall was joined together unto the half thereof: for the people had a mind to work. 
But it came to pass, that when Sanballat, and Tobiah, a
742,of their enemies, because they sought after the gods of Edom. 
So Joash the king of Israel went up; and they saw one another in the face, both he and Amaziah king of Judah, at Bethshemesh, which belongeth to Judah. 
And Judah was put to the worse before Israel, and they fled every man to his tent. 
And Joash the king of Israel took Amaziah king of Judah, the son of Joash, the son of Jehoahaz, at Bethshemesh, and brought him to Jerusalem, and brake down the wall of Jerusalem from the gate of Ephraim to the corner gate, four hundred cubits. 
And he took all the gold and the silver, and all the vessels that were found in the house of God with Obededom, and the treasures of the king's house, the hostages also, and returned to Samaria. 

943, houses of Jerusalem, and the houses have ye broken down to fortify the wall. 
Ye made also a ditch between the two walls for the water of the old pool: but ye have not looked unto the maker thereof, neither had respect unto him that fashioned it long ago. 
And in that day did the Lord GOD of hosts call to weeping, and to mourning, and to baldness, and to girding with sackcloth: 
And behold joy and gladness, slaying oxen, and killing sheep, eating flesh, and drinking wine: let us eat and drink; for to morrow we shall die. 
And it was revealed in mine ears by the LORD of hosts, Surely this iniquity shall not be purged from you till ye die, saith the Lord GOD of hosts. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD of hosts, Go, get thee unto this treasurer, even unto Shebna, which is over the house, and say, 
What hast thou here? and whom hast thou here, that thou hast hewed thee out a sepulchre here, as he that heweth him out a sepulchre on high, and 
1034,o Ramothgilead, and prosper: for the LORD shall deliver it into the hand of the king. 
And the messenger that went to call Micaiah spake to him, saying, Behold, the words of the prophets declare good to the king with one assent; let thy word therefore, I pray thee, be like one of their's, and speak thou good. 
And Micaiah said, As the LORD liveth, even what my God saith, that will I speak. 
And when he was come to the king, the king said unto him, Micaiah, shall we go to Ramothgilead to battle, or shall I forbear? And he said, Go ye up, and prosper, and they shall be delivered into your hand. 
And the king said to him, How many times shall I adjure thee that thou say nothing but the truth to me in the name of the LORD? 
Then he said, I did see all Israel scattered upon the mountains, as sheep that have no shepherd: and the LORD said, These have no master; let them return therefore every man to his house in peace. 
And the king of Israel said to Jehoshaphat, Did I not tell thee that he would not prophesy good unto me, b
888,ng, until Solomon had built the house of the LORD in Jerusalem: and then they waited on their office according to their order. 
And these are they that waited with their children. Of the sons of the Kohathites: Heman a singer, the son of Joel, the son of Shemuel, 
The son of Elkanah, the son of Jeroham, the son of Eliel, the son of Toah, 
The son of Zuph, the son of Elkanah, the son of Mahath, the son of Amasai, 
The son of Elkanah, the son of Joel, the son of Azariah, the son of Zephaniah, 
The son of Tahath, the son of Assir, the son of Ebiasaph, the son of Korah, 
The son of Izhar, the son of Kohath, the son of Levi, the son of Israel. 
And his brother Asaph, who stood on his right hand, even Asaph the son of Berachiah, the son of Shimea, 
The son of Michael, the son of Baaseiah, the son of Malchiah, 
The son of Ethni, the son of Zerah, the son of Adaiah, 
The son of Ethan
930,aise the LORD. 
I love the LORD, because he hath heard my voice and my supplications. 
Because he hath inclined his ear unto me, therefore will I call upon him as long as I live. 
The sorrows of death compassed me, and the pains of hell gat hold upon me: I found trouble and sorrow. 
Then called I upon the name of the LORD; O LORD, I beseech thee, deliver my soul. 
Gracious is the LORD, and righteous; yea, our God is merciful. 
The LORD preserveth the simple: I was brought low, and he helped me. 
Return unto thy rest, O my soul; for the LORD hath dealt bountifully with thee. 
For thou hast delivered my soul from death, mine eyes from tears, and my feet from falling. 
I will walk before the LORD in the land of the living. 
I believed, therefore have I spoken: I was greatly afflicted: 
I said in my haste, All men are liars. 
What shall I render unto the LORD for all his benefits toward me? 
I will take the cup of salvat
972, and arise, and speak unto them all that I command thee: be not dismayed at their faces, lest I confound thee before them. 
For, behold, I have made thee this day a defenced city, and an iron pillar, and brasen walls against the whole land, against the kings of Judah, against the princes thereof, against the priests thereof, and against the people of the land. 
And they shall fight against thee; but they shall not prevail against thee; for I am with thee, saith the LORD, to deliver thee. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came to me, saying, 
Go and cry in the ears of Jerusalem, saying, Thus saith the LORD; I remember thee, the kindness of thy youth, the love of thine espousals, when thou wentest after me in the wilderness, in a land that was not sown. 
Israel was holiness unto the LORD, and the firstfruits of his increase: all that devour him shall offend; evil shall come upon them, saith the LORD. 
Hear ye the word of the LORD, O house of Jacob, and all the fa
906, and, behold, he set him up a place, and is gone about, and passed on, and gone down to Gilgal. 
And Samuel came to Saul: and Saul said unto him, Blessed be thou of the LORD: I have performed the commandment of the LORD. 
And Samuel said, What meaneth then this bleating of the sheep in mine ears, and the lowing of the oxen which I hear? 
And Saul said, They have brought them from the Amalekites: for the people spared the best of the sheep and of the oxen, to sacrifice unto the LORD thy God; and the rest we have utterly destroyed. 
Then Samuel said unto Saul, Stay, and I will tell thee what the LORD hath said to me this night. And he said unto him, Say on. 
And Samuel said, When thou wast little in thine own sight, wast thou not made the head of the tribes of Israel, and the LORD anointed thee king over Israel? 
And the LORD sent thee on a journey, and said, Go and utterly destroy the sinners t
728,kings. 
And there was given me a reed like unto a rod: and the angel stood, saying, Rise, and measure the temple of God, and the altar, and them that worship therein. 
But the court which is without the temple leave out, and measure it not; for it is given unto the Gentiles: and the holy city shall they tread under foot forty and two months. 
And I will give power unto my two witnesses, and they shall prophesy a thousand two hundred and threescore days, clothed in sackcloth. 
These are the two olive trees, and the two candlesticks standing before the God of the earth. 
And if any man will hurt them, fire proceedeth out of their mouth, and devoureth their enemies: and if any man will hurt them, he must in this manner be
894,tell the interpretation thereof before the king. 
Thou, O king, art a king of kings: for the God of heaven hath given thee a kingdom, power, and strength, and glory. 
And wheresoever the children of men dwell, the beasts of the field and the fowls of the heaven hath he given into thine hand, and hath made thee ruler over them all. Thou art this head of gold. 
And after thee shall arise another kingdom inferior to thee, and another third kingdom of brass, which shall bear rule over all the earth. 
And the fourth kingdom shall be strong as iron: forasmuch as iron breaketh in pieces and subdueth all things: and as iron that breaketh all these, shall it break in pieces and bruise. 
And whereas thou sawest the feet and toes, part of potters' clay, and part of iron, the kingdom shall be divided; but there shall be in it of the strength of the iron, forasmuch as thou sawest the iron mixed
813, which art, and wast, and art to come; because thou hast taken to thee thy great power, and hast reigned. 
And the nations were angry, and thy wrath is come, and the time of the dead, that they should be judged, and that thou shouldest give reward unto thy servants the prophets, and to the saints, and them that fear thy name, small and great; and shouldest destroy them which destroy the earth. 
And the temple of God was opened in heaven, and there was seen in his temple the ark of his testament: and there were lightnings, and voices, and thunderings, and an earthquake, and great hail. 
And there appeared a great wonder in heaven; a woman clothed with the sun, and the moon under her feet, and upon her head a crown of twelve stars: 
And she being with child cried, travailing in birth, and pained to be de
842,twins, which feed among the lilies. 
Until the day break, and the shadows flee away, I will get me to the mountain of myrrh, and to the hill of frankincense. 
Thou art all fair, my love; there is no spot in thee. 
Come with me from Lebanon, my spouse, with me from Lebanon: look from the top of Amana, from the top of Shenir and Hermon, from the lions' dens, from the mountains of the leopards. 
Thou hast ravished my heart, my sister, my spouse; thou hast ravished my heart with one of thine eyes, with one chain of thy neck. 
How fair is thy love, my sister, my spouse! how much better is thy love than wine! and the smell of thine ointments than all spices! 
Thy lips, O my spouse, drop as the honeycomb: honey and milk are under thy tongue; and the smell of thy garments is like the smell of Lebanon. 
A garden inclosed is my sister, my s
723,h, let him do it with simplicity; he that ruleth, with diligence; he that sheweth mercy, with cheerfulness. 
Let love be without dissimulation. Abhor that which is evil; cleave to that which is good. 
Be kindly affectioned one to another with brotherly love; in honour preferring one another; 
Not slothful in business; fervent in spirit; serving the Lord; 
Rejoicing in hope; patient in tribulation; continuing instant in prayer; 
Distributing to the necessity of saints; given to hospitality. 
Bless them which persecute you: bless, and curse not. 
Rejoice with them that do rejoice, and weep with them that weep. 
Be of the same mind one toward another. Mind not high things, but condescend to men of low estate. Be not 
741,he heaven. 
And all the inhabitants of Egypt shall know that I am the LORD, because they have been a staff of reed to the house of Israel. 
When they took hold of thee by thy hand, thou didst break, and rend all their shoulder: and when they leaned upon thee, thou brakest, and madest all their loins to be at a stand. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will bring a sword upon thee, and cut off man and beast out of thee. 
And the land of Egypt shall be desolate and waste; and they shall know that I am the LORD: because he hath said, The river is mine, and I have made it. 
Behold, therefore I am against thee, and against thy rivers, and I will make the land of Egypt utterly waste and desolate, from the tower of Syene even u
857, to come to pass, then look up, and lift up your heads; for your redemption draweth nigh. 
And he spake to them a parable; Behold the fig tree, and all the trees; 
When they now shoot forth, ye see and know of your own selves that summer is now nigh at hand. 
So likewise ye, when ye see these things come to pass, know ye that the kingdom of God is nigh at hand. 
Verily I say unto you, This generation shall not pass away, till all be fulfilled. 
Heaven and earth shall pass away: but my words shall not pass away. 
And take heed to yourselves, lest at any time your hearts be overcharged with surfeiting, and drunkenness, and cares of this life, and so that day come upon you unawares. 
For as a snare shall it come on all them that dwell on the face of the whole earth. 
Watch ye therefore, and pray always, that ye may be accounted worthy to escape all
928, both by parents, and brethren, and kinsfolks, and friends; and some of you shall they cause to be put to death. 
And ye shall be hated of all men for my name's sake. 
But there shall not an hair of your head perish. 
In your patience possess ye your souls. 
And when ye shall see Jerusalem compassed with armies, then know that the desolation thereof is nigh. 
Then let them which are in Judaea flee to the mountains; and let them which are in the midst of it depart out; and let not them that are in the countries enter thereinto. 
For these be the days of vengeance, that all things which are written may be fulfilled. 
But woe unto them that are with child, and to them that give suck, in those days! for there shall be great distress in the land, and wrath upon this people. 
And they shall fall by the edge of the sword, and shall be led away captive into all nations: and Jerusalem shall be trodden down of the Gentiles, 
894,ine. 
Salute Asyncritus, Phlegon, Hermas, Patrobas, Hermes, and the brethren which are with them. 
Salute Philologus, and Julia, Nereus, and his sister, and Olympas, and all the saints which are with them. 
Salute one another with an holy kiss. The churches of Christ salute you. 
Now I beseech you, brethren, mark them which cause divisions and offences contrary to the doctrine which ye have learned; and avoid them. 
For they that are such serve not our Lord Jesus Christ, but their own belly; and by good words and fair speeches deceive the hearts of the simple. 
For your obedience is come abroad unto all men. I am glad therefore on your behalf: but yet I would have you wise unto that which is good, and simple concerning evil. 
And the God of peace shall bruise Satan under your feet shortly. The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you. Amen. 
Timotheus my workfellow, and Lucius, a
819,ons, filling our hearts with food and gladness. 
And with these sayings scarce restrained they the people, that they had not done sacrifice unto them. 
And there came thither certain Jews from Antioch and Iconium, who persuaded the people, and having stoned Paul, drew him out of the city, supposing he had been dead. 
Howbeit, as the disciples stood round about him, he rose up, and came into the city: and the next day he departed with Barnabas to Derbe. 
And when they had preached the gospel to that city, and had taught many, they returned again to Lystra, and to Iconium, and Antioch, 
Confirming the souls of the disciples, and exhorting them to continue in the faith, and that we must through much tribulation enter into the kingdom of God. 
And when they had ordained them elders in every church, and had praye
880,ght it, and it became a rod in his hand: 
That they may believe that the LORD God of their fathers, the God of Abraham, the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob, hath appeared unto thee. 
And the LORD said furthermore unto him, Put now thine hand into thy bosom. And he put his hand into his bosom: and when he took it out, behold, his hand was leprous as snow. 
And he said, Put thine hand into thy bosom again. And he put his hand into his bosom again; and plucked it out of his bosom, and, behold, it was turned again as his other flesh. 
And it shall come to pass, if they will not believe thee, neither hearken to the voice of the first sign, that they will believe the voice of the latter sign. 
And it shall come to pass, if they will not believe also these two signs, neither hearken unto thy voice, that thou shalt take of the water of the river, and pour it upon the dry l
806,hen they went, I heard the noise of their wings, like the noise of great waters, as the voice of the Almighty, the voice of speech, as the noise of an host: when they stood, they let down their wings. 
And there was a voice from the firmament that was over their heads, when they stood, and had let down their wings. 
And above the firmament that was over their heads was the likeness of a throne, as the appearance of a sapphire stone: and upon the likeness of the throne was the likeness as the appearance of a man above upon it. 
And I saw as the colour of amber, as the appearance of fire round about within it, from the appearance of his loins even upward, and from the appearance of his loins even downward, I saw as it were the appearance of fire, and it had brightness round about. 
As the appearan
959,em in the blood of the prophets. 
Wherefore ye be witnesses unto yourselves, that ye are the children of them which killed the prophets. 
Fill ye up then the measure of your fathers. 
Ye serpents, ye generation of vipers, how can ye escape the damnation of hell? 
Wherefore, behold, I send unto you prophets, and wise men, and scribes: and some of them ye shall kill and crucify; and some of them shall ye scourge in your synagogues, and persecute them from city to city: 
That upon you may come all the righteous blood shed upon the earth, from the blood of righteous Abel unto the blood of Zacharias son of Barachias, whom ye slew between the temple and the altar. 
Verily I say unto you, All these things shall come upon this generation. 
O Jerusalem, Jerusalem, thou that killest the prophets, and stonest them which are sent unto thee, how often would I have gathered thy children together, even as a hen gathereth her chickens under her wings, and ye wo
1040,with the workers of iniquity, and walketh with wicked men. 
For he hath said, It profiteth a man nothing that he should delight himself with God. 
Therefore hearken unto me ye men of understanding: far be it from God, that he should do wickedness; and from the Almighty, that he should commit iniquity. 
For the work of a man shall he render unto him, and cause every man to find according to his ways. 
Yea, surely God will not do wickedly, neither will the Almighty pervert judgment. 
Who hath given him a charge over the earth? or who hath disposed the whole world? 
If he set his heart upon man, if he gather unto himself his spirit and his breath; 
All flesh shall perish together, and man shall turn again unto dust. 
If now thou hast understanding, hear this: hearken to the voice of my words. 
Shall even he that hateth right govern? and wilt thou condemn him that is most just? 
Is it fit to say to a king, Thou art wicked? and to princes, Ye are ungodly? 
How much less to him that accepteth not the persons of princes, nor regard
821,lt anoint unto me him whom I name unto thee. 
And Samuel did that which the LORD spake, and came to Bethlehem. And the elders of the town trembled at his coming, and said, Comest thou peaceably? 
And he said, Peaceably: I am come to sacrifice unto the LORD: sanctify yourselves, and come with me to the sacrifice. And he sanctified Jesse and his sons, and called them to the sacrifice. 
And it came to pass, when they were come, that he looked on Eliab, and said, Surely the LORD's anointed is before him. 
But the LORD said unto Samuel, Look not on his countenance, or on the height of his stature; because I have refused him: for the LORD seeth not as man seeth; for man looketh on the outward appearance, but the LORD looketh on the heart. 
Then Jesse called Abinadab, and made him pass before Samuel. And he said, Nei
931,acle of Joseph, and chose not the tribe of Ephraim: 
But chose the tribe of Judah, the mount Zion which he loved. 
And he built his sanctuary like high palaces, like the earth which he hath established for ever. 
He chose David also his servant, and took him from the sheepfolds: 
From following the ewes great with young he brought him to feed Jacob his people, and Israel his inheritance. 
So he fed them according to the integrity of his heart; and guided them by the skilfulness of his hands. 
O god, the heathen are come into thine inheritance; thy holy temple have they defiled; they have laid Jerusalem on heaps. 
The dead bodies of thy servants have they given to be meat unto the fowls of the heaven, the flesh of thy saints unto the beasts of the earth. 
Their blood have they shed like water round about Jerusalem; and there was none to bury them. 
We are become a reproach to our neighbours, a scorn and derision to the
761,ment they made a chest, and set it without at the gate of the house of the LORD. 
And they made a proclamation through Judah and Jerusalem, to bring in to the LORD the collection that Moses the servant of God laid upon Israel in the wilderness. 
And all the princes and all the people rejoiced, and brought in, and cast into the chest, until they had made an end. 
Now it came to pass, that at what time the chest was brought unto the king's office by the hand of the Levites, and when they saw that there was much money, the king's scribe and the high priest's officer came and emptied the chest, and took it, and carried it to his place again. Thus they did day by day, and gathered money in abundance. 
And the king and Jehoiada gave it to such as did the wo
1071,iled me; no man cared for my soul. 
I cried unto thee, O LORD: I said, Thou art my refuge and my portion in the land of the living. 
Attend unto my cry; for I am brought very low: deliver me from my persecutors; for they are stronger than I. 
Bring my soul out of prison, that I may praise thy name: the righteous shall compass me about; for thou shalt deal bountifully with me. 
Hear my prayer, O LORD, give ear to my supplications: in thy faithfulness answer me, and in thy righteousness. 
And enter not into judgment with thy servant: for in thy sight shall no man living be justified. 
For the enemy hath persecuted my soul; he hath smitten my life down to the ground; he hath made me to dwell in darkness, as those that have been long dead. 
Therefore is my spirit overwhelmed within me; my heart within me is desolate. 
I remember the days of old; I meditate on all thy works; I muse on the work of thy hands. 
I stretch forth my hands unto thee: my soul thirsteth after thee, as a thirsty land. Selah. 
Hear me speedily, O LORD: my spirit faileth: hide not thy fac
754, of the kingdom, whereof Samuel spake, he told him not. 
And Samuel called the people together unto the LORD to Mizpeh; 
And said unto the children of Israel, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, I brought up Israel out of Egypt, and delivered you out of the hand of the Egyptians, and out of the hand of all kingdoms, and of them that oppressed you: 
And ye have this day rejected your God, who himself saved you out of all your adversities and your tribulations; and ye have said unto him, Nay, but set a king over us. Now therefore present yourselves before the LORD by your tribes, and by your thousands. 
And when Samuel had caused all the tribes of Israel to come near, the tribe of Benjamin was taken. 
When he had caused the tribe of Benjamin to co
1055,ure grief, suffering wrongfully. 
For what glory is it, if, when ye be buffeted for your faults, ye shall take it patiently? but if, when ye do well, and suffer for it, ye take it patiently, this is acceptable with God. 
For even hereunto were ye called: because Christ also suffered for us, leaving us an example, that ye should follow his steps: 
Who did no sin, neither was guile found in his mouth: 
Who, when he was reviled, reviled not again; when he suffered, he threatened not; but committed himself to him that judgeth righteously: 
Who his own self bare our sins in his own body on the tree, that we, being dead to sins, should live unto righteousness: by whose stripes ye were healed. 
For ye were as sheep going astray; but are now returned unto the Shepherd and Bishop of your souls. 
Likewise, ye wives, be in subjection to your own husbands; that, if any obey not the word, they also may without the word be won by the conversation of the wives; 
While they behold your chaste conversation coupled with fear. 
Whose adorning let it not be t
903,per; and the right of the needy do they not judge. 
Shall I not visit for these things? saith the LORD: shall not my soul be avenged on such a nation as this? 
A wonderful and horrible thing is committed in the land; 
The prophets prophesy falsely, and the priests bear rule by their means; and my people love to have it so: and what will ye do in the end thereof? 
O ye children of Benjamin, gather yourselves to flee out of the midst of Jerusalem, and blow the trumpet in Tekoa, and set up a sign of fire in Bethhaccerem: for evil appeareth out of the north, and great destruction. 
I have likened the daughter of Zion to a comely and delicate woman. 
The shepherds with their flocks shall come unto her; they shall pitch their tents against her round about; they shall feed every one in his place. 
Prepare ye war against her; arise, and let us go up at noon. Woe unto us! for the day goeth away, for
864,e wicked: they judge not the cause, the cause of the fatherless, yet they prosper; and the right of the needy do they not judge. 
Shall I not visit for these things? saith the LORD: shall not my soul be avenged on such a nation as this? 
A wonderful and horrible thing is committed in the land; 
The prophets prophesy falsely, and the priests bear rule by their means; and my people love to have it so: and what will ye do in the end thereof? 
O ye children of Benjamin, gather yourselves to flee out of the midst of Jerusalem, and blow the trumpet in Tekoa, and set up a sign of fire in Bethhaccerem: for evil appeareth out of the north, and great destruction. 
I have likened the daughter of Zion to a comely and delicate woman. 
The shepherds with their flocks shall come unto her; they shall pitch their tents against her round about; they shall feed every one
863,d taken with the tongs from off the altar: 
And he laid it upon my mouth, and said, Lo, this hath touched thy lips; and thine iniquity is taken away, and thy sin purged. 
Also I heard the voice of the Lord, saying, Whom shall I send, and who will go for us? Then said I, Here am I; send me. 
And he said, Go, and tell this people, Hear ye indeed, but understand not; and see ye indeed, but perceive not. 
Make the heart of this people fat, and make their ears heavy, and shut their eyes; lest they see with their eyes, and hear with their ears, and understand with their heart, and convert, and be healed. 
Then said I, Lord, how long? And he answered, Until the cities be wasted without inhabitant, and the houses without man, and the land be utterly desolate, 
And the LORD have removed men far away, and there be a great forsaking in the midst of the land. 
Bu
769,r thee. 
And all the people went over Jordan. And when the king was come over, the king kissed Barzillai, and blessed him; and he returned unto his own place. 
Then the king went on to Gilgal, and Chimham went on with him: and all the people of Judah conducted the king, and also half the people of Israel. 
And, behold, all the men of Israel came to the king, and said unto the king, Why have our brethren the men of Judah stolen thee away, and have brought the king, and his household, and all David's men with him, over Jordan? 
And all the men of Judah answered the men of Israel, Because the king is near of kin to us: wherefore then be ye angry for this matter? have we eaten at all of the king's cost? or hath he given us any gift? 
And the men of Israel answere
882,those things which the seven thunders uttered, and write them not. 
And the angel which I saw stand upon the sea and upon the earth lifted up his hand to heaven, 
And sware by him that liveth for ever and ever, who created heaven, and the things that therein are, and the earth, and the things that therein are, and the sea, and the things which are therein, that there should be time no longer: 
But in the days of the voice of the seventh angel, when he shall begin to sound, the mystery of God should be finished, as he hath declared to his servants the prophets. 
And the voice which I heard from heaven spake unto me again, and said, Go and take the little book which is open in the hand of the angel which standeth upon the sea and upon the earth. 
And I went unto the angel, and said unto him, Give me the little book. And he said unto me, Take it, and eat it up; and it shal
1014,armless, undefiled, separate from sinners, and made higher than the heavens; 
Who needeth not daily, as those high priests, to offer up sacrifice, first for his own sins, and then for the people's: for this he did once, when he offered up himself. 
For the law maketh men high priests which have infirmity; but the word of the oath, which was since the law, maketh the Son, who is consecrated for evermore. 
Now of the things which we have spoken this is the sum: We have such an high priest, who is set on the right hand of the throne of the Majesty in the heavens; 
A minister of the sanctuary, and of the true tabernacle, which the Lord pitched, and not man. 
For every high priest is ordained to offer gifts and sacrifices: wherefore it is of necessity that this man have somewhat also to offer. 
For if he were on earth, he should not be a priest, seeing that there are priests that offer gifts according to the law: 
Who serve unto the example and shadow of heavenly things, as Moses was admonished of God wh
862, me in the top of the mount. 
And no man shall come up with thee, neither let any man be seen throughout all the mount; neither let the flocks nor herds feed before that mount. 
And he hewed two tables of stone like unto the first; and Moses rose up early in the morning, and went up unto mount Sinai, as the LORD had commanded him, and took in his hand the two tables of stone. 
And the LORD descended in the cloud, and stood with him there, and proclaimed the name of the LORD. 
And the LORD passed by before him, and proclaimed, The LORD, The LORD God, merciful and gracious, longsuffering, and abundant in goodness and truth, 
Keeping mercy for thousands, forgiving iniquity and transgression and sin, and that will by no means clear the guilty; visiting the iniquity of the fathers upon the children, and upon the children's children, unto the third and to 
950,brews hath met with us: and now let us go, we beseech thee, three days' journey into the wilderness, that we may sacrifice to the LORD our God. 
And I am sure that the king of Egypt will not let you go, no, not by a mighty hand. 
And I will stretch out my hand, and smite Egypt with all my wonders which I will do in the midst thereof: and after that he will let you go. 
And I will give this people favour in the sight of the Egyptians: and it shall come to pass, that, when ye go, ye shall not go empty. 
But every woman shall borrow of her neighbour, and of her that sojourneth in her house, jewels of silver, and jewels of gold, and raiment: and ye shall put them upon your sons, and upon your daughters; and ye shall spoil the Egyptians. 
And Moses answered and said, But, behold, they will not believe me, nor hearken unto my voice: for they will say, The LORD hath not appeared unto thee. 
And the LORD said unto him, What is that in thine han
915, incense unto them. 
Wherefore the anger of the LORD was kindled against Amaziah, and he sent unto him a prophet, which said unto him, Why hast thou sought after the gods of the people, which could not deliver their own people out of thine hand? 
And it came to pass, as he talked with him, that the king said unto him, Art thou made of the king's counsel? forbear; why shouldest thou be smitten? Then the prophet forbare, and said, I know that God hath determined to destroy thee, because thou hast done this, and hast not hearkened unto my counsel. 
Then Amaziah king of Judah took advice, and sent to Joash, the son of Jehoahaz, the son of Jehu, king of Israel, saying, Come, let us see one another in the face. 
And Joash king of Israel sent to Amaziah king of Judah, saying, The thistle that was in Lebanon sent to the cedar that was in Lebanon, saying, Give thy daughter to my son to wife: and there passed by
811,one. 
Then I saw that wisdom excelleth folly, as far as light excelleth darkness. 
The wise man's eyes are in his head; but the fool walketh in darkness: and I myself perceived also that one event happeneth to them all. 
Then said I in my heart, As it happeneth to the fool, so it happeneth even to me; and why was I then more wise? Then I said in my heart, that this also is vanity. 
For there is no remembrance of the wise more than of the fool for ever; seeing that which now is in the days to come shall all be forgotten. And how dieth the wise man? as the fool. 
Therefore I hated life; because the work that is wrought under the sun is grievous unto me: for all is vanity and vexation of spirit. 
Yea, I hated all my labour which I had taken under the sun: because I should leave it unto the man that shal
996,ing of the Jews? And he answering said unto them, Thou sayest it. 
And the chief priests accused him of many things: but he answered nothing. 
And Pilate asked him again, saying, Answerest thou nothing? behold how many things they witness against thee. 
But Jesus yet answered nothing; so that Pilate marvelled. 
Now at that feast he released unto them one prisoner, whomsoever they desired. 
And there was one named Barabbas, which lay bound with them that had made insurrection with him, who had committed murder in the insurrection. 
And the multitude crying aloud began to desire him to do as he had ever done unto them. 
But Pilate answered them, saying, Will ye that I release unto you the King of the Jews? 
For he knew that the chief priests had delivered him for envy. 
But the chief priests moved the people, that he should rather release Barabbas unto them. 
And Pilate answered and said again unto them, What will ye then that I shall do unto him whom ye call the King of the Jews? 
A
1067,waste, and brought to silence; 
He is gone up to Bajith, and to Dibon, the high places, to weep: Moab shall howl over Nebo, and over Medeba: on all their heads shall be baldness, and every beard cut off. 
In their streets they shall gird themselves with sackcloth: on the tops of their houses, and in their streets, every one shall howl, weeping abundantly. 
And Heshbon shall cry, and Elealeh: their voice shall be heard even unto Jahaz: therefore the armed soldiers of Moab shall cry out; his life shall be grievous unto him. 
My heart shall cry out for Moab; his fugitives shall flee unto Zoar, an heifer of three years old: for by the mounting up of Luhith with weeping shall they go it up; for in the way of Horonaim they shall raise up a cry of destruction. 
For the waters of Nimrim shall be desolate: for the hay is withered away, the grass faileth, there is no green thing. 
Therefore the abundance they have gotten, and that which they have laid up, shall they carry away to the brook of the willows. 
For the cry is gone round about the borders of Moab; th
986,nd the flood came, and destroyed them all. 
Likewise also as it was in the days of Lot; they did eat, they drank, they bought, they sold, they planted, they builded; 
But the same day that Lot went out of Sodom it rained fire and brimstone from heaven, and destroyed them all. 
Even thus shall it be in the day when the Son of man is revealed. 
In that day, he which shall be upon the housetop, and his stuff in the house, let him not come down to take it away: and he that is in the field, let him likewise not return back. 
Remember Lot's wife. 
Whosoever shall seek to save his life shall lose it; and whosoever shall lose his life shall preserve it. 
I tell you, in that night there shall be two men in one bed; the one shall be taken, and the other shall be left. 
Two women shall be grinding together; the one shall be taken, and the other left. 
Two men shall be in the field; the one shall be taken, and the other left. 
And they answered and said unto him, Where, Lord? And he 
992,e died: 
That through them I may prove Israel, whether they will keep the way of the LORD to walk therein, as their fathers did keep it, or not. 
Therefore the LORD left those nations, without driving them out hastily; neither delivered he them into the hand of Joshua. 
Now these are the nations which the LORD left, to prove Israel by them, even as many of Israel as had not known all the wars of Canaan; 
Only that the generations of the children of Israel might know, to teach them war, at the least such as before knew nothing thereof; 
Namely, five lords of the Philistines, and all the Canaanites, and the Sidonians, and the Hivites that dwelt in mount Lebanon, from mount Baalhermon unto the entering in of Hamath. 
And they were to prove Israel by them, to know whether they would hearken unto the commandments of the LORD, which he commanded their fathers by the hand of Moses. 
And the children of Israel dwelt among the Canaanites, Hittites, and Amorites, and Perizzites, and Hivi
748, Christ, as of a lamb without blemish and without spot: 
Who verily was foreordained before the foundation of the world, but was manifest in these last times for you, 
Who by him do believe in God, that raised him up from the dead, and gave him glory; that your faith and hope might be in God. 
Seeing ye have purified your souls in obeying the truth through the Spirit unto unfeigned love of the brethren, see that ye love one another with a pure heart fervently: 
Being born again, not of corruptible seed, but of incorruptible, by the word of God, which liveth and abideth for ever. 
For all flesh is as grass, and all the glory of man as the flower of grass. The grass withereth, and the flower thereof falleth away: 
But the word of the Lord e
998,ther, and not die by the hand of the avenger of blood, until he stood before the congregation. 
Then came near the heads of the fathers of the Levites unto Eleazar the priest, and unto Joshua the son of Nun, and unto the heads of the fathers of the tribes of the children of Israel; 
And they spake unto them at Shiloh in the land of Canaan, saying, The LORD commanded by the hand of Moses to give us cities to dwell in, with the suburbs thereof for our cattle. 
And the children of Israel gave unto the Levites out of their inheritance, at the commandment of the LORD, these cities and their suburbs. 
And the lot came out for the families of the Kohathites: and the children of Aaron the priest, which were of the Levites, had by lot out of the tribe of Judah, and out of the tribe of Simeon, and out of the tribe of Benjamin, thirteen cities. 
And the rest of the children of Kohath had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Ephraim, and out of the tribe of Dan, and out of the half tribe o
902, not, nor did him reverence, then was Haman full of wrath. 
And he thought scorn to lay hands on Mordecai alone; for they had shewed him the people of Mordecai: wherefore Haman sought to destroy all the Jews that were throughout the whole kingdom of Ahasuerus, even the people of Mordecai. 
In the first month, that is, the month Nisan, in the twelfth year of king Ahasuerus, they cast Pur, that is, the lot, before Haman from day to day, and from month to month, to the twelfth month, that is, the month Adar. 
And Haman said unto king Ahasuerus, There is a certain people scattered abroad and dispersed among the people in all the provinces of thy kingdom; and their laws are diverse from all people; neither keep they the king's laws: therefore it is not for the king's profit to suffer them. 
If it please the king, let it be written that they may be destroyed: and I will pay ten thousand talents 
771, under me; so that my feet did not slip. 
I have pursued mine enemies, and destroyed them; and turned not again until I had consumed them. 
And I have consumed them, and wounded them, that they could not arise: yea, they are fallen under my feet. 
For thou hast girded me with strength to battle: them that rose up against me hast thou subdued under me. 
Thou hast also given me the necks of mine enemies, that I might destroy them that hate me. 
They looked, but there was none to save; even unto the LORD, but he answered them not. 
Then did I beat them as small as the dust of the earth, I did stamp them as the mire of the street, and did spread them abroad. 
Thou also hast delivered me from the strivings of my people, thou hast kept me to be head of the heathen: a
1073,they came thither into the midst of the house, as though they would have fetched wheat; and they smote him under the fifth rib: and Rechab and Baanah his brother escaped. 
For when they came into the house, he lay on his bed in his bedchamber, and they smote him, and slew him, and beheaded him, and took his head, and gat them away through the plain all night. 
And they brought the head of Ishbosheth unto David to Hebron, and said to the king, Behold the head of Ishbosheth the son of Saul thine enemy, which sought thy life; and the LORD hath avenged my lord the king this day of Saul, and of his seed. 
And David answered Rechab and Baanah his brother, the sons of Rimmon the Beerothite, and said unto them, As the LORD liveth, who hath redeemed my soul out of all adversity, 
When one told me, saying, Behold, Saul is dead, thinking to have brought good tidings, I took hold of him, and slew him in Ziklag, who thought that I would have given him a reward for his tidings: 
How much more, when wicked men have slain a righteous person in his own house upon his bed? s
941,ter, and Andrew his brother, casting a net into the sea: for they were fishers. 
And he saith unto them, Follow me, and I will make you fishers of men. 
And they straightway left their nets, and followed him. 
And going on from thence, he saw other two brethren, James the son of Zebedee, and John his brother, in a ship with Zebedee their father, mending their nets; and he called them. 
And they immediately left the ship and their father, and followed him. 
And Jesus went about all Galilee, teaching in their synagogues, and preaching the gospel of the kingdom, and healing all manner of sickness and all manner of disease among the people. 
And his fame went throughout all Syria: and they brought unto him all sick people that were taken with divers diseases and torments, and those which were possessed with devils, and those which were lunatick, and those that had the palsy; and he healed them. 
And there followed him great multitu
910,d his words were without wisdom. 
My desire is that Job may be tried unto the end because of his answers for wicked men. 
For he addeth rebellion unto his sin, he clappeth his hands among us, and multiplieth his words against God. 
Elihu spake moreover, and said, 
Thinkest thou this to be right, that thou saidst, My righteousness is more than God's? 
For thou saidst, What advantage will it be unto thee? and, What profit shall I have, if I be cleansed from my sin? 
I will answer thee, and thy companions with thee. 
Look unto the heavens, and see; and behold the clouds which are higher than thou. 
If thou sinnest, what doest thou against him? or if thy transgressions be multiplied, what doest thou unto him? 
If thou be righteous, what givest thou him? or what receiveth he of thine hand? 
Thy wickedness may hurt a man as thou art; and thy righteousness may profit the son of man. 
By reason of the mul
777,our God. 
He is the Rock, his work is perfect: for all his ways are judgment: a God of truth and without iniquity, just and right is he. 
They have corrupted themselves, their spot is not the spot of his children: they are a perverse and crooked generation. 
Do ye thus requite the LORD, O foolish people and unwise? is not he thy father that hath bought thee? hath he not made thee, and established thee? 
Remember the days of old, consider the years of many generations: ask thy father, and he will shew thee; thy elders, and they will tell thee. 
When the Most High divided to the nations their inheritance, when he separated the sons of Adam, he set the bounds of the people according to the number of the children of Israel. 
For the LORD's portion is his people; Jacob is
774,er, and for the children of Shemida: these were the male children of Manasseh the son of Joseph by their families. 
But Zelophehad, the son of Hepher, the son of Gilead, the son of Machir, the son of Manasseh, had no sons, but daughters: and these are the names of his daughters, Mahlah, and Noah, Hoglah, Milcah, and Tirzah. 
And they came near before Eleazar the priest, and before Joshua the son of Nun, and before the princes, saying, The LORD commanded Moses to give us an inheritance among our brethren. Therefore according to the commandment of the LORD he gave them an inheritance among the brethren of their father. 
And there fell ten portions to Manasseh, beside the land of Gilead and Bashan, which were on the other side Jordan; 
Because the daughters of Manass
1012, in heaven and in earth, who hath delivered Daniel from the power of the lions. 
So this Daniel prospered in the reign of Darius, and in the reign of Cyrus the Persian. 
In the first year of Belshazzar king of Babylon Daniel had a dream and visions of his head upon his bed: then he wrote the dream, and told the sum of the matters. 
Daniel spake and said, I saw in my vision by night, and, behold, the four winds of the heaven strove upon the great sea. 
And four great beasts came up from the sea, diverse one from another. 
The first was like a lion, and had eagle's wings: I beheld till the wings thereof were plucked, and it was lifted up from the earth, and made stand upon the feet as a man, and a man's heart was given to it. 
And behold another beast, a second, like to a bear, and it raised up itself on one side, and it had three ribs in the mouth of it between the teeth of it: and they said thus unto it, Arise, devour much flesh. 
After this I beheld, and lo another, like a leopard, which had upon
1077, my people Israel; and thou hast walked in the way of Jeroboam, and hast made my people Israel to sin, to provoke me to anger with their sins; 
Behold, I will take away the posterity of Baasha, and the posterity of his house; and will make thy house like the house of Jeroboam the son of Nebat. 
Him that dieth of Baasha in the city shall the dogs eat; and him that dieth of his in the fields shall the fowls of the air eat. 
Now the rest of the acts of Baasha, and what he did, and his might, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel? 
So Baasha slept with his fathers, and was buried in Tirzah: and Elah his son reigned in his stead. 
And also by the hand of the prophet Jehu the son of Hanani came the word of the LORD against Baasha, and against his house, even for all the evil that he did in the sight of the LORD, in provoking him to anger with the work of his hands, in being like the house of Jeroboam; and because he killed him. 
In the twenty and sixth year of Asa king of Judah began Elah the son of Baasha to reign over Israel in T
906,. 
Wherefore I command thee, saying, Thou shalt separate three cities for thee. 
And if the LORD thy God enlarge thy coast, as he hath sworn unto thy fathers, and give thee all the land which he promised to give unto thy fathers; 
If thou shalt keep all these commandments to do them, which I command thee this day, to love the LORD thy God, and to walk ever in his ways; then shalt thou add three cities more for thee, beside these three: 
That innocent blood be not shed in thy land, which the LORD thy God giveth thee for an inheritance, and so blood be upon thee. 
But if any man hate his neighbour, and lie in wait for him, and rise up against him, and smite him mortally that he die, and fleeth into one of these cities: 
Then the elders of his city shall send and fetch him thence, and deliver him into the hand of the avenger of blood, that he may die. 
Thine eye shall not pity him, but thou shalt
984,ace of my rest? 
For all those things hath mine hand made, and all those things have been, saith the LORD: but to this man will I look, even to him that is poor and of a contrite spirit, and trembleth at my word. 
He that killeth an ox is as if he slew a man; he that sacrificeth a lamb, as if he cut off a dog's neck; he that offereth an oblation, as if he offered swine's blood; he that burneth incense, as if he blessed an idol. Yea, they have chosen their own ways, and their soul delighteth in their abominations. 
I also will choose their delusions, and will bring their fears upon them; because when I called, none did answer; when I spake, they did not hear: but they did evil before mine eyes, and chose that in which I delighted not. 
Hear the word of the LORD, ye that tremble at his word; Your brethren that hated you, that cast you out for my name's sake, said, Let the LORD be glorified: but he shall appear to your joy, and they shall be ashamed. 
A voice of noise from
769,d unto you the gospel of God. 
Ye are witnesses, and God also, how holily and justly and unblameably we behaved ourselves among you that believe: 
As ye know how we exhorted and comforted and charged every one of you, as a father doth his children, 
That ye would walk worthy of God, who hath called you unto his kingdom and glory. 
For this cause also thank we God without ceasing, because, when ye received the word of God which ye heard of us, ye received it not as the word of men, but as it is in truth, the word of God, which effectually worketh also in you that believe. 
For ye, brethren, became followers of the churches of God which in Judaea are in Christ Jesus: for ye also have suffered like things of your own countrymen, even as they have of the Jews: 
W
808,th for thirst: the young children ask bread, and no man breaketh it unto them. 
They that did feed delicately are desolate in the streets: they that were brought up in scarlet embrace dunghills. 
For the punishment of the iniquity of the daughter of my people is greater than the punishment of the sin of Sodom, that was overthrown as in a moment, and no hands stayed on her. 
Her Nazarites were purer than snow, they were whiter than milk, they were more ruddy in body than rubies, their polishing was of sapphire: 
Their visage is blacker than a coal; they are not known in the streets: their skin cleaveth to their bones; it is withered, it is become like a stick. 
They that be slain with the sword are better than they that be slain with hunger: for these pine away, stricken through for want of the fru
769, men of the guard which followed me, none of us put off our clothes, saving that every one put them off for washing. 
And there was a great cry of the people and of their wives against their brethren the Jews. 
For there were that said, We, our sons, and our daughters, are many: therefore we take up corn for them, that we may eat, and live. 
Some also there were that said, We have mortgaged our lands, vineyards, and houses, that we might buy corn, because of the dearth. 
There were also that said, We have borrowed money for the king's tribute, and that upon our lands and vineyards. 
Yet now our flesh is as the flesh of our brethren, our children as their children: and, lo, we bring into bondage our sons and our daughters to be servants, and some of our daught
806,eiveth himself. 
But let every man prove his own work, and then shall he have rejoicing in himself alone, and not in another. 
For every man shall bear his own burden. 
Let him that is taught in the word communicate unto him that teacheth in all good things. 
Be not deceived; God is not mocked: for whatsoever a man soweth, that shall he also reap. 
For he that soweth to his flesh shall of the flesh reap corruption; but he that soweth to the Spirit shall of the Spirit reap life everlasting. 
And let us not be weary in well doing: for in due season we shall reap, if we faint not. 
As we have therefore opportunity, let us do good unto all men, especially unto them who are of the household of faith. 
Ye see how large a letter I have written unto you with mine own hand. 
As many as desire to make a f
928,f Israel: Joshua destroyed them utterly with their cities. 
There was none of the Anakims left in the land of the children of Israel: only in Gaza, in Gath, and in Ashdod, there remained. 
So Joshua took the whole land, according to all that the LORD said unto Moses; and Joshua gave it for an inheritance unto Israel according to their divisions by their tribes. And the land rested from war. 
Now these are the kings of the land, which the children of Israel smote, and possessed their land on the other side Jordan toward the rising of the sun, from the river Arnon unto mount Hermon, and all the plain on the east: 
Sihon king of the Amorites, who dwelt in Heshbon, and ruled from Aroer, which is upon the bank of the river Arnon, and from the middle of the river, and from half Gilead, even unto the river Jabbok, which is the border of the children of Ammon; 
And from the plain to the sea of Chinneroth on the east, and u
988,e the LORD, all ye his saints: for the LORD preserveth the faithful, and plentifully rewardeth the proud doer. 
Be of good courage, and he shall strengthen your heart, all ye that hope in the LORD. 
Blessed is he whose transgression is forgiven, whose sin is covered. 
Blessed is the man unto whom the LORD imputeth not iniquity, and in whose spirit there is no guile. 
When I kept silence, my bones waxed old through my roaring all the day long. 
For day and night thy hand was heavy upon me: my moisture is turned into the drought of summer. Selah. 
I acknowledge my sin unto thee, and mine iniquity have I not hid. I said, I will confess my transgressions unto the LORD; and thou forgavest the iniquity of my sin. Selah. 
For this shall every one that is godly pray unto thee in a time when thou mayest be found: surely in the floods of great waters they shall not come nigh unto him. 
Thou art my hiding place; thou shalt preserve me from trouble; thou shalt compass me about with son
892,t now speak particularly. 
Now when these things were thus ordained, the priests went always into the first tabernacle, accomplishing the service of God. 
But into the second went the high priest alone once every year, not without blood, which he offered for himself, and for the errors of the people: 
The Holy Ghost this signifying, that the way into the holiest of all was not yet made manifest, while as the first tabernacle was yet standing: 
Which was a figure for the time then present, in which were offered both gifts and sacrifices, that could not make him that did the service perfect, as pertaining to the conscience; 
Which stood only in meats and drinks, and divers washings, and carnal ordinances, imposed on them until the time of reformation. 
But Christ being come an high priest of good things to come, by a greater and more perfect tabernacle, not made with hands, that is
1021,now put off thy ornaments from thee, that I may know what to do unto thee. 
And the children of Israel stripped themselves of their ornaments by the mount Horeb. 
And Moses took the tabernacle, and pitched it without the camp, afar off from the camp, and called it the Tabernacle of the congregation. And it came to pass, that every one which sought the LORD went out unto the tabernacle of the congregation, which was without the camp. 
And it came to pass, when Moses went out unto the tabernacle, that all the people rose up, and stood every man at his tent door, and looked after Moses, until he was gone into the tabernacle. 
And it came to pass, as Moses entered into the tabernacle, the cloudy pillar descended, and stood at the door of the tabernacle, and the Lord talked with Moses. 
And all the people saw the cloudy pillar stand at the tabernacle door: and all the people rose up and worshipped, every man in his tent door. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses face to face, as a man speaketh unto his friend. And he
1075,gue: whom when Aquila and Priscilla had heard, they took him unto them, and expounded unto him the way of God more perfectly. 
And when he was disposed to pass into Achaia, the brethren wrote, exhorting the disciples to receive him: who, when he was come, helped them much which had believed through grace: 
For he mightily convinced the Jews, and that publickly, shewing by the scriptures that Jesus was Christ. 
And it came to pass, that, while Apollos was at Corinth, Paul having passed through the upper coasts came to Ephesus: and finding certain disciples, 
He said unto them, Have ye received the Holy Ghost since ye believed? And they said unto him, We have not so much as heard whether there be any Holy Ghost. 
And he said unto them, Unto what then were ye baptized? And they said, Unto John's baptism. 
Then said Paul, John verily baptized with the baptism of repentance, saying unto the people, that they should believe on him which should come after him, that is, on Christ Jesus. 
When they heard this, they were baptized in the name of the Lord Jesus. 
And whe
788, bury the slain, after he had smitten every male in Edom; 
(For six months did Joab remain there with all Israel, until he had cut off every male in Edom:) 
That Hadad fled, he and certain Edomites of his father's servants with him, to go into Egypt; Hadad being yet a little child. 
And they arose out of Midian, and came to Paran: and they took men with them out of Paran, and they came to Egypt, unto Pharaoh king of Egypt; which gave him an house, and appointed him victuals, and gave him land. 
And Hadad found great favour in the sight of Pharaoh, so that he gave him to wife the sister of his own wife, the sister of Tahpenes the queen. 
And the sister of Tahpenes bare him Genubath his son, whom Tahpenes weaned in Pharaoh's house: and Genubath was in Pharaoh's household among th
1062, of man, the house of Israel is to me become dross: all they are brass, and tin, and iron, and lead, in the midst of the furnace; they are even the dross of silver. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because ye are all become dross, behold, therefore I will gather you into the midst of Jerusalem. 
As they gather silver, and brass, and iron, and lead, and tin, into the midst of the furnace, to blow the fire upon it, to melt it; so will I gather you in mine anger and in my fury, and I will leave you there, and melt you. 
Yea, I will gather you, and blow upon you in the fire of my wrath, and ye shall be melted in the midst therof. 
As silver is melted in the midst of the furnace, so shall ye be melted in the midst thereof; and ye shall know that I the LORD have poured out my fury upon you. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, say unto her, Thou art the land that is not cleansed, nor rained upon in the day of indignation. 
There is a conspiracy of her prophets in the midst thereof, like a roaring lion ravening the prey; they 
939,a the son of Shaphat, who was plowing with twelve yoke of oxen before him, and he with the twelfth: and Elijah passed by him, and cast his mantle upon him. 
And he left the oxen, and ran after Elijah, and said, Let me, I pray thee, kiss my father and my mother, and then I will follow thee. And he said unto him, Go back again: for what have I done to thee? 
And he returned back from him, and took a yoke of oxen, and slew them, and boiled their flesh with the instruments of the oxen, and gave unto the people, and they did eat. Then he arose, and went after Elijah, and ministered unto him. 
And Benhadad the king of Syria gathered all his host together: and there were thirty and two kings with him, and horses, and chariots; and he went up and besieged Samaria, and warred against it. 
And he sent messengers to Ahab king of Israel into the city, and said unto him, Thus saith Benhadad, 
Thy silver and thy gold is mine; thy wives als
731,titudes followed him. 
And, behold, there came a leper and worshipped him, saying, Lord, if thou wilt, thou canst make me clean. 
And Jesus put forth his hand, and touched him, saying, I will; be thou clean. And immediately his leprosy was cleansed. 
And Jesus saith unto him, See thou tell no man; but go thy way, shew thyself to the priest, and offer the gift that Moses commanded, for a testimony unto them. 
And when Jesus was entered into Capernaum, there came unto him a centurion, beseeching him, 
And saying, Lord, my servant lieth at home sick of the palsy, grievously tormented. 
And Jesus saith unto him, I will come and heal him. 
The centurion answered and said, Lord, I am not worthy that thou shouldest come under my
956,. 
For if the inheritance be of the law, it is no more of promise: but God gave it to Abraham by promise. 
Wherefore then serveth the law? It was added because of transgressions, till the seed should come to whom the promise was made; and it was ordained by angels in the hand of a mediator. 
Now a mediator is not a mediator of one, but God is one. 
Is the law then against the promises of God? God forbid: for if there had been a law given which could have given life, verily righteousness should have been by the law. 
But the scripture hath concluded all under sin, that the promise by faith of Jesus Christ might be given to them that believe. 
But before faith came, we were kept under the law, shut up unto the faith which should afterwards be revealed. 
Wherefore the law was our schoolmaster to bring us unto Christ, that we might be justified by faith. 
But after that faith is come, we are no longer under a schoolmaster. 
For ye are all the chi
727,he children of Israel. 
This is the portion of the anointing of Aaron, and of the anointing of his sons, out of the offerings of the LORD made by fire, in the day when he presented them to minister unto the LORD in the priest's office; 
Which the LORD commanded to be given them of the children of Israel, in the day that he anointed them, by a statute for ever throughout their generations. 
This is the law of the burnt offering, of the meat offering, and of the sin offering, and of the trespass offering, and of the consecrations, and of the sacrifice of the peace offerings; 
Which the LORD commanded Moses in mount Sinai, in the day that he commanded the children of Israel to offer their oblations unto the LORD, in the 
969,heaven followed him upon white horses, clothed in fine linen, white and clean. 
And out of his mouth goeth a sharp sword, that with it he should smite the nations: and he shall rule them with a rod of iron: and he treadeth the winepress of the fierceness and wrath of Almighty God. 
And he hath on his vesture and on his thigh a name written, KING OF KINGS, AND LORD OF LORDS. 
And I saw an angel standing in the sun; and he cried with a loud voice, saying to all the fowls that fly in the midst of heaven, Come and gather yourselves together unto the supper of the great God; 
That ye may eat the flesh of kings, and the flesh of captains, and the flesh of mighty men, and the flesh of horses, and of them that sit on them, and the flesh of all men, both free and bond, both small and great. 
And I saw the beast, and the kings of the earth, and their armies, gathered together to make war against him that sat on the horse, and against his army. 
And the beast was ta
909,rise and give thee. 
I say unto you, Though he will not rise and give him, because he is his friend, yet because of his importunity he will rise and give him as many as he needeth. 
And I say unto you, Ask, and it shall be given you; seek, and ye shall find; knock, and it shall be opened unto you. 
For every one that asketh receiveth; and he that seeketh findeth; and to him that knocketh it shall be opened. 
If a son shall ask bread of any of you that is a father, will he give him a stone? or if he ask a fish, will he for a fish give him a serpent? 
Or if he shall ask an egg, will he offer him a scorpion? 
If ye then, being evil, know how to give good gifts unto your children: how much more shall your heavenly Father give the Holy Spirit to them that ask him? 
And he was casting out a devil, and it was dumb. And it came to pass, when the devil was gone out, the dumb spake; and the people wondered
1037,f his life, which God giveth him: for it is his portion. 
Every man also to whom God hath given riches and wealth, and hath given him power to eat thereof, and to take his portion, and to rejoice in his labour; this is the gift of God. 
For he shall not much remember the days of his life; because God answereth him in the joy of his heart. 
There is an evil which I have seen under the sun, and it is common among men: 
A man to whom God hath given riches, wealth, and honour, so that he wanteth nothing for his soul of all that he desireth, yet God giveth him not power to eat thereof, but a stranger eateth it: this is vanity, and it is an evil disease. 
If a man beget an hundred children, and live many years, so that the days of his years be many, and his soul be not filled with good, and also that he have no burial; I say, that an untimely birth is better than he. 
For he cometh in with vanity, and departeth in darkness, and his name shall be covered with darkness. 
Moreover he hath not seen the sun, nor known any thing: thi
1054,come, that all that is in thine house, and that which thy fathers have laid up in store until this day, shall be carried to Babylon: nothing shall be left, saith the LORD. 
And of thy sons that shall issue from thee, which thou shalt beget, shall they take away; and they shall be eunuchs in the palace of the king of Babylon. 
Then said Hezekiah to Isaiah, Good is the word of the LORD which thou hast spoken. He said moreover, For there shall be peace and truth in my days. 
Comfort ye, comfort ye my people, saith your God. 
Speak ye comfortably to Jerusalem, and cry unto her, that her warfare is accomplished, that her iniquity is pardoned: for she hath received of the LORD's hand double for all her sins. 
The voice of him that crieth in the wilderness, Prepare ye the way of the LORD, make straight in the desert a highway for our God. 
Every valley shall be exalted, and every mountain and hill shall be made low: and the crooked shall be made straight, and the rough places plain: 
And the glory of the LORD shall be revealed, and all flesh sha
744,had heard that Peter was there, they sent unto him two men, desiring him that he would not delay to come to them. 
Then Peter arose and went with them. When he was come, they brought him into the upper chamber: and all the widows stood by him weeping, and shewing the coats and garments which Dorcas made, while she was with them. 
But Peter put them all forth, and kneeled down, and prayed; and turning him to the body said, Tabitha, arise. And she opened her eyes: and when she saw Peter, she sat up. 
And he gave her his hand, and lifted her up, and when he had called the saints and widows, presented her alive. 
And it was known throughout all Joppa; and many believed in the Lord. 
And it came to pass, that he tarried many days in Joppa 
971,en the doors of the shadow of death? 
Hast thou perceived the breadth of the earth? declare if thou knowest it all. 
Where is the way where light dwelleth? and as for darkness, where is the place thereof, 
That thou shouldest take it to the bound thereof, and that thou shouldest know the paths to the house thereof? 
Knowest thou it, because thou wast then born? or because the number of thy days is great? 
Hast thou entered into the treasures of the snow? or hast thou seen the treasures of the hail, 
Which I have reserved against the time of trouble, against the day of battle and war? 
By what way is the light parted, which scattereth the east wind upon the earth? 
Who hath divided a watercourse for the overflowing of waters, or a way for the lightning of thunder; 
To cause it to rain on the earth, where no man is; on the wilderness, wherein there is no man; 
To satisfy the desolate and waste ground; and to cause the bud of the tender herb to spring forth? 

740,ow that not many wise men after the flesh, not many mighty, not many noble, are called: 
But God hath chosen the foolish things of the world to confound the wise; and God hath chosen the weak things of the world to confound the things which are mighty; 
And base things of the world, and things which are despised, hath God chosen, yea, and things which are not, to bring to nought things that are: 
That no flesh should glory in his presence. 
But of him are ye in Christ Jesus, who of God is made unto us wisdom, and righteousness, and sanctification, and redemption: 
That, according as it is written, He that glorieth, let him glory in the Lord. 
And I, brethren, when I came to you, came not with excellency of speech or of wisdom, dec
851,s of Bashan have they made thine oars; the company of the Ashurites have made thy benches of ivory, brought out of the isles of Chittim. 
Fine linen with broidered work from Egypt was that which thou spreadest forth to be thy sail; blue and purple from the isles of Elishah was that which covered thee. 
The inhabitants of Zidon and Arvad were thy mariners: thy wise men, O Tyrus, that were in thee, were thy pilots. 
The ancients of Gebal and the wise men thereof were in thee thy calkers: all the ships of the sea with their mariners were in thee to occupy thy merchandise. 
They of Persia and of Lud and of Phut were in thine army, thy men of war: they hanged the shield and helmet in thee; they set forth thy comeliness. 
The men of Arvad with thine army were upon thy walls round about, and the Gammadims were in thy towers: they hanged their shi
1056,ce thirty pieces of silver. 
And the LORD said unto me, Cast it unto the potter: a goodly price that I was prised at of them. And I took the thirty pieces of silver, and cast them to the potter in the house of the LORD. 
Then I cut asunder mine other staff, even Bands, that I might break the brotherhood between Judah and Israel. 
And the LORD said unto me, Take unto thee yet the instruments of a foolish shepherd. 
For, lo, I will raise up a shepherd in the land, which shall not visit those that be cut off, neither shall seek the young one, nor heal that that is broken, nor feed that that standeth still: but he shall eat the flesh of the fat, and tear their claws in pieces. 
Woe to the idol shepherd that leaveth the flock! the sword shall be upon his arm, and upon his right eye: his arm shall be clean dried up, and his right eye shall be utterly darkened. 
The burden of the word of the LORD for Israel, saith the LORD, which stretcheth forth the heavens, and layeth the foundation of the earth, and formeth the spirit of man within him. 
Behold
1051,ow he spake unto you when he was yet in Galilee, 
Saying, The Son of man must be delivered into the hands of sinful men, and be crucified, and the third day rise again. 
And they remembered his words, 
And returned from the sepulchre, and told all these things unto the eleven, and to all the rest. 
It was Mary Magdalene and Joanna, and Mary the mother of James, and other women that were with them, which told these things unto the apostles. 
And their words seemed to them as idle tales, and they believed them not. 
Then arose Peter, and ran unto the sepulchre; and stooping down, he beheld the linen clothes laid by themselves, and departed, wondering in himself at that which was come to pass. 
And, behold, two of them went that same day to a village called Emmaus, which was from Jerusalem about threescore furlongs. 
And they talked together of all these things which had happened. 
And it came to pass, that, while they communed together and reasoned, Jesus himself drew near, and went with them. 
But their eyes were holden that they should
837,ut one in a certain place testified, saying, What is man, that thou art mindful of him? or the son of man that thou visitest him? 
Thou madest him a little lower than the angels; thou crownedst him with glory and honour, and didst set him over the works of thy hands: 
Thou hast put all things in subjection under his feet. For in that he put all in subjection under him, he left nothing that is not put under him. But now we see not yet all things put under him. 
But we see Jesus, who was made a little lower than the angels for the suffering of death, crowned with glory and honour; that he by the grace of God should taste death for every man. 
For it became him, for whom are all things, and by whom are all things, in bringing many sons unto glory, to make the captain of their salvation perfect through sufferings. 
For both he th
886,re ye Abraham's seed, and heirs according to the promise. 
Now I say, That the heir, as long as he is a child, differeth nothing from a servant, though he be lord of all; 
But is under tutors and governors until the time appointed of the father. 
Even so we, when we were children, were in bondage under the elements of the world: 
But when the fulness of the time was come, God sent forth his Son, made of a woman, made under the law, 
To redeem them that were under the law, that we might receive the adoption of sons. 
And because ye are sons, God hath sent forth the Spirit of his Son into your hearts, crying, Abba, Father. 
Wherefore thou art no more a servant, but a son; and if a son, then an heir of God through Christ. 
Howbeit then, when ye knew not God, ye did service unto them which by nature are no gods. 
But now, after that ye have known God, or rather are known of God
885,it will make no peace with thee, but will make war against thee, then thou shalt besiege it: 
And when the LORD thy God hath delivered it into thine hands, thou shalt smite every male thereof with the edge of the sword: 
But the women, and the little ones, and the cattle, and all that is in the city, even all the spoil thereof, shalt thou take unto thyself; and thou shalt eat the spoil of thine enemies, which the LORD thy God hath given thee. 
Thus shalt thou do unto all the cities which are very far off from thee, which are not of the cities of these nations. 
But of the cities of these people, which the LORD thy God doth give thee for an inheritance, thou shalt save alive nothing that breatheth: 
But thou shalt utterly destroy them; namely, the Hittites, and the Amorites, the Canaanites, and the Perizzites, the Hivites, and the Jebusites; as the LORD thy God hath command
731,shdod, (when Sargon the king of Assyria sent him,) and fought against Ashdod, and took it; 
At the same time spake the LORD by Isaiah the son of Amoz, saying, Go and loose the sackcloth from off thy loins, and put off thy shoe from thy foot. And he did so, walking naked and barefoot. 
And the LORD said, Like as my servant Isaiah hath walked naked and barefoot three years for a sign and wonder upon Egypt and upon Ethiopia; 
So shall the king of Assyria lead away the Egyptians prisoners, and the Ethiopians captives, young and old, naked and barefoot, even with their buttocks uncovered, to the shame of Egypt. 
And they shall be afraid and ashamed of Ethiopia their expectation, and of Egypt their glory. 
And the inhabitant of
915,you, than he that is in the world. 
They are of the world: therefore speak they of the world, and the world heareth them. 
We are of God: he that knoweth God heareth us; he that is not of God heareth not us. Hereby know we the spirit of truth, and the spirit of error. 
Beloved, let us love one another: for love is of God; and every one that loveth is born of God, and knoweth God. 
He that loveth not knoweth not God; for God is love. 
In this was manifested the love of God toward us, because that God sent his only begotten Son into the world, that we might live through him. 
Herein is love, not that we loved God, but that he loved us, and sent his Son to be the propitiation for our sins. 
Beloved, if God so loved us, we ought also to love one another. 
No man hath seen God at any time. If we love one another, God dwelleth in us, and his love is perfected in us. 
Hereby know we that we dwell in him, and 
779,instruction, and understanding. 
The father of the righteous shall greatly rejoice: and he that begetteth a wise child shall have joy of him. 
Thy father and thy mother shall be glad, and she that bare thee shall rejoice. 
My son, give me thine heart, and let thine eyes observe my ways. 
For a whore is a deep ditch; and a strange woman is a narrow pit. 
She also lieth in wait as for a prey, and increaseth the transgressors among men. 
Who hath woe? who hath sorrow? who hath contentions? who hath babbling? who hath wounds without cause? who hath redness of eyes? 
They that tarry long at the wine; they that go to seek mixed wine. 
Look not thou upon the wine when it is red, when it giveth his colour in the cup, when it moveth itself aright. 
At the last it biteth like a 
734,And he said, I will not let thee go, except thou bless me. 
And he said unto him, What is thy name? And he said, Jacob. 
And he said, Thy name shall be called no more Jacob, but Israel: for as a prince hast thou power with God and with men, and hast prevailed. 
And Jacob asked him, and said, Tell me, I pray thee, thy name. And he said, Wherefore is it that thou dost ask after my name? And he blessed him there. 
And Jacob called the name of the place Peniel: for I have seen God face to face, and my life is preserved. 
And as he passed over Penuel the sun rose upon him, and he halted upon his thigh. 
Therefore the children of Israel eat not of the sinew which shrank, which is upon the hollow of the thigh, unto this day: becaus
1021,er; and Beeshterah with her suburbs; two cities. 
And out of the tribe of Issachar, Kishon with her suburbs, Dabareh with her suburbs, 
Jarmuth with her suburbs, Engannim with her suburbs; four cities. 
And out of the tribe of Asher, Mishal with her suburbs, Abdon with her suburbs, 
Helkath with her suburbs, and Rehob with her suburbs; four cities. 
And out of the tribe of Naphtali, Kedesh in Galilee with her suburbs, to be a city of refuge for the slayer; and Hammothdor with her suburbs, and Kartan with her suburbs; three cities. 
All the cities of the Gershonites according to their families were thirteen cities with their suburbs. 
And unto the families of the children of Merari, the rest of the Levites, out of the tribe of Zebulun, Jokneam with her suburbs, and Kartah with her suburbs, 
Dimnah with her suburbs, Nahalal with her suburbs; four cities. 
And out of the tribe of Reuben, Bezer with her suburbs, and Jahazah with her suburbs, 
Kedemoth with her suburbs, and Mephaath with her suburbs; four citie
725,se thou hast heard, O my soul, the sound of the trumpet, the alarm of war. 
Destruction upon destruction is cried; for the whole land is spoiled: suddenly are my tents spoiled, and my curtains in a moment. 
How long shall I see the standard, and hear the sound of the trumpet? 
For my people is foolish, they have not known me; they are sottish children, and they have none understanding: they are wise to do evil, but to do good they have no knowledge. 
I beheld the earth, and, lo, it was without form, and void; and the heavens, and they had no light. 
I beheld the mountains, and, lo, they trembled, and all the hills moved lightly. 
I beheld, and, lo, there was no man, and all the birds of the heavens were fled. 
I beh
973, son of Ammihud, the son of Omri, the son of Imri, the son of Bani, of the children of Pharez the son of Judah. 
And of the Shilonites; Asaiah the firstborn, and his sons. 
And of the sons of Zerah; Jeuel, and their brethren, six hundred and ninety. 
And of the sons of Benjamin; Sallu the son of Meshullam, the son of Hodaviah, the son of Hasenuah, 
And Ibneiah the son of Jeroham, and Elah the son of Uzzi, the son of Michri, and Meshullam the son of Shephathiah, the son of Reuel, the son of Ibnijah; 
And their brethren, according to their generations, nine hundred and fifty and six. All these men were chief of the fathers in the house of their fathers. 
And of the priests; Jedaiah, and Jehoiarib, and Jachin, 
And Azariah the son of Hilkiah, the son of Meshullam, the son of Zadok, the son of Meraioth, the son of Ahitub, the ruler of the house of God; 
And Adaiah the son of Jeroham, the son of Pashur, the son of Malchijah, and Maasiai the son of Adiel, the son o
754,h before them, and the sheep follow him: for they know his voice. 
And a stranger will they not follow, but will flee from him: for they know not the voice of strangers. 
This parable spake Jesus unto them: but they understood not what things they were which he spake unto them. 
Then said Jesus unto them again, Verily, verily, I say unto you, I am the door of the sheep. 
All that ever came before me are thieves and robbers: but the sheep did not hear them. 
I am the door: by me if any man enter in, he shall be saved, and shall go in and out, and find pasture. 
The thief cometh not, but for to steal, and to kill, and to destroy: I am come that they might have life, and that they might have it more abundantly. 
I am the good shepherd: the good sh
981, have kept me from the paths of the destroyer. 
Hold up my goings in thy paths, that my footsteps slip not. 
I have called upon thee, for thou wilt hear me, O God: incline thine ear unto me, and hear my speech. 
Shew thy marvellous lovingkindness, O thou that savest by thy right hand them which put their trust in thee from those that rise up against them. 
Keep me as the apple of the eye, hide me under the shadow of thy wings, 
From the wicked that oppress me, from my deadly enemies, who compass me about. 
They are inclosed in their own fat: with their mouth they speak proudly. 
They have now compassed us in our steps: they have set their eyes bowing down to the earth; 
Like as a lion that is greedy of his prey, and as it were a young lion lurking in secret places. 
Arise, O LORD, disappoint him, cast him down: deliver my soul from the wicked, which is thy sword: 
From men which are thy hand, O LORD, from men of the world, which have their portion in this life, and w
806,s heard; and thy wife Elisabeth shall bear thee a son, and thou shalt call his name John. 
And thou shalt have joy and gladness; and many shall rejoice at his birth. 
For he shall be great in the sight of the Lord, and shall drink neither wine nor strong drink; and he shall be filled with the Holy Ghost, even from his mother's womb. 
And many of the children of Israel shall he turn to the Lord their God. 
And he shall go before him in the spirit and power of Elias, to turn the hearts of the fathers to the children, and the disobedient to the wisdom of the just; to make ready a people prepared for the Lord. 
And Zacharias said unto the angel, Whereby shall I know this? for I am an old man, and my wife well stricken in years. 
And the angel answering said unto him, I am Gabriel, that stand in the 
1036,ught the ram for the burnt offering: and Aaron and his sons laid their hands upon the head of the ram. 
And he killed it; and Moses sprinkled the blood upon the altar round about. 
And he cut the ram into pieces; and Moses burnt the head, and the pieces, and the fat. 
And he washed the inwards and the legs in water; and Moses burnt the whole ram upon the altar: it was a burnt sacrifice for a sweet savour, and an offering made by fire unto the LORD; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he brought the other ram, the ram of consecration: and Aaron and his sons laid their hands upon the head of the ram. 
And he slew it; and Moses took of the blood of it, and put it upon the tip of Aaron's right ear, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot. 
And he brought Aaron's sons, and Moses put of the blood upon the tip of their right ear, and upon the thumbs of their right hands, and upon the great toes of their right feet: and Moses sprinkled the blood upon the altar round about. 
And he took the fa
818,ght side of the house, and five on the left side of the house: and he set the sea on the right side of the house eastward over against the south. 
And Hiram made the lavers, and the shovels, and the basons. So Hiram made an end of doing all the work that he made king Solomon for the house of the LORD: 
The two pillars, and the two bowls of the chapiters that were on the top of the two pillars; and the two networks, to cover the two bowls of the chapiters which were upon the top of the pillars; 
And four hundred pomegranates for the two networks, even two rows of pomegranates for one network, to cover the two bowls of the chapiters that were upon the pillars; 
And the ten bases, and ten lavers on the bases; 
And one sea, and twelve oxen under the sea; 
And the pots, and the shovels, and the basons: and all t
765,rave, where is thy victory? 
The sting of death is sin; and the strength of sin is the law. 
But thanks be to God, which giveth us the victory through our Lord Jesus Christ. 
Therefore, my beloved brethren, be ye stedfast, unmoveable, always abounding in the work of the Lord, forasmuch as ye know that your labour is not in vain in the Lord. 
Now concerning the collection for the saints, as I have given order to the churches of Galatia, even so do ye. 
Upon the first day of the week let every one of you lay by him in store, as God hath prospered him, that there be no gatherings when I come. 
And when I come, whomsoever ye shall approve by your letters, them will I send to bring your liberality unto Jerusalem. 
And if it be meet that I go also, they shall g
958,he lot fell upon Jonah. 
Then said they unto him, Tell us, we pray thee, for whose cause this evil is upon us; What is thine occupation? and whence comest thou? what is thy country? and of what people art thou? 
And he said unto them, I am an Hebrew; and I fear the LORD, the God of heaven, which hath made the sea and the dry land. 
Then were the men exceedingly afraid, and said unto him. Why hast thou done this? For the men knew that he fled from the presence of the LORD, because he had told them. 
Then said they unto him, What shall we do unto thee, that the sea may be calm unto us? for the sea wrought, and was tempestuous. 
And he said unto them, Take me up, and cast me forth into the sea; so shall the sea be calm unto you: for I know that for my sake this great tempest is upon you. 
Nevertheless the men rowed hard to bring it to the land; but they could not: for the sea wrought, and was tempestuous against them. 
Wherefore they cried unto th
791,nto the children of Israel, A prophet shall the Lord your God raise up unto you of your brethren, like unto me; him shall ye hear. 
This is he, that was in the church in the wilderness with the angel which spake to him in the mount Sina, and with our fathers: who received the lively oracles to give unto us: 
To whom our fathers would not obey, but thrust him from them, and in their hearts turned back again into Egypt, 
Saying unto Aaron, Make us gods to go before us: for as for this Moses, which brought us out of the land of Egypt, we wot not what is become of him. 
And they made a calf in those days, and offered sacrifice unto the idol, and rejoiced in the works of their own hands. 
Then God turned, and gave them up to worship the host of heaven; as it is written in the book of t
928, commandest him, he shall be put to death: only be strong and of a good courage. 
And Joshua the son of Nun sent out of Shittim two men to spy secretly, saying, Go view the land, even Jericho. And they went, and came into an harlot's house, named Rahab, and lodged there. 
And it was told the king of Jericho, saying, Behold, there came men in hither to night of the children of Israel to search out the country. 
And the king of Jericho sent unto Rahab, saying, Bring forth the men that are come to thee, which are entered into thine house: for they be come to search out all the country. 
And the woman took the two men, and hid them, and said thus, There came men unto me, but I wist not whence they were: 
And it came to pass about the time of shutting of the gate, when it was dark, that the men went out: whither the men went I wot not: pursue after them quickly; for ye shall overtake them. 
But she had brought them up t
742,oil, and all that prey upon thee will I give for a prey. 
For I will restore health unto thee, and I will heal thee of thy wounds, saith the LORD; because they called thee an Outcast, saying, This is Zion, whom no man seeketh after. 
Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will bring again the captivity of Jacob's tents, and have mercy on his dwellingplaces; and the city shall be builded upon her own heap, and the palace shall remain after the manner thereof. 
And out of them shall proceed thanksgiving and the voice of them that make merry: and I will multiply them, and they shall not be few; I will also glorify them, and they shall not be small. 
Their children also shall be as aforetime, and their congregation shall be established before m
760, ruler of Mizpah, another piece over against the going up to the armoury at the turning of the wall. 
After him Baruch the son of Zabbai earnestly repaired the other piece, from the turning of the wall unto the door of the house of Eliashib the high priest. 
After him repaired Meremoth the son of Urijah the son of Koz another piece, from the door of the house of Eliashib even to the end of the house of Eliashib. 
And after him repaired the priests, the men of the plain. 
After him repaired Benjamin and Hashub over against their house. After him repaired Azariah the son of Maaseiah the son of Ananiah by his house. 
After him repaired Binnui the son of Henadad another piece, from the house of Azariah unto the turning of the wall, even unto the corner. 
786,is upon the hollow of the thigh, unto this day: because he touched the hollow of Jacob's thigh in the sinew that shrank. 
And Jacob lifted up his eyes, and looked, and, behold, Esau came, and with him four hundred men. And he divided the children unto Leah, and unto Rachel, and unto the two handmaids. 
And he put the handmaids and their children foremost, and Leah and her children after, and Rachel and Joseph hindermost. 
And he passed over before them, and bowed himself to the ground seven times, until he came near to his brother. 
And Esau ran to meet him, and embraced him, and fell on his neck, and kissed him: and they wept. 
And he lifted up his eyes, and saw the women and the children; and said, Who are those with thee? And he said, The children which God hath graciously
930,, Be thou plucked up by the root, and be thou planted in the sea; and it should obey you. 
But which of you, having a servant plowing or feeding cattle, will say unto him by and by, when he is come from the field, Go and sit down to meat? 
And will not rather say unto him, Make ready wherewith I may sup, and gird thyself, and serve me, till I have eaten and drunken; and afterward thou shalt eat and drink? 
Doth he thank that servant because he did the things that were commanded him? I trow not. 
So likewise ye, when ye shall have done all those things which are commanded you, say, We are unprofitable servants: we have done that which was our duty to do. 
And it came to pass, as he went to Jerusalem, that he passed through the midst of Samaria and Galilee. 
And as he entered into a certain village, there met him ten men that were lepers, which stood afar off: 
And they lifted up their voices, and said, Jesus, Master, 
925,n there with all Israel, until he had cut off every male in Edom:) 
That Hadad fled, he and certain Edomites of his father's servants with him, to go into Egypt; Hadad being yet a little child. 
And they arose out of Midian, and came to Paran: and they took men with them out of Paran, and they came to Egypt, unto Pharaoh king of Egypt; which gave him an house, and appointed him victuals, and gave him land. 
And Hadad found great favour in the sight of Pharaoh, so that he gave him to wife the sister of his own wife, the sister of Tahpenes the queen. 
And the sister of Tahpenes bare him Genubath his son, whom Tahpenes weaned in Pharaoh's house: and Genubath was in Pharaoh's household among the sons of Pharaoh. 
And when Hadad heard in Egypt that David slept with his fathers, and that Joab the captain of the host was dead, Hadad said to Pharaoh, Let me depart, that I may go to mine own country. 
Then Pharaoh said u
940,ake thee a roll of a book, and write therein all the words that I have spoken unto thee against Israel, and against Judah, and against all the nations, from the day I spake unto thee, from the days of Josiah, even unto this day. 
It may be that the house of Judah will hear all the evil which I purpose to do unto them; that they may return every man from his evil way; that I may forgive their iniquity and their sin. 
Then Jeremiah called Baruch the son of Neriah: and Baruch wrote from the mouth of Jeremiah all the words of the LORD, which he had spoken unto him, upon a roll of a book. 
And Jeremiah commanded Baruch, saying, I am shut up; I cannot go into the house of the LORD: 
Therefore go thou, and read in the roll, which thou hast written from my mouth, the words of the LORD in the ears of the people in the LORD's house upon the fasting day: and also thou shalt read them in the ears of all Judah that come out of their cities
845,o the dead. And Naomi said unto her, The man is near of kin unto us, one of our next kinsmen. 
And Ruth the Moabitess said, He said unto me also, Thou shalt keep fast by my young men, until they have ended all my harvest. 
And Naomi said unto Ruth her daughter in law, It is good, my daughter, that thou go out with his maidens, that they meet thee not in any other field. 
So she kept fast by the maidens of Boaz to glean unto the end of barley harvest and of wheat harvest; and dwelt with her mother in law. 
Then Naomi her mother in law said unto her, My daughter, shall I not seek rest for thee, that it may be well with thee? 
And now is not Boaz of our kindred, with whose maidens thou wast? Behold, he winnoweth barley to night in the threshingfloor. 
Wash thyself therefore, and anoint thee, and put thy raiment upon thee, and get thee d
781,the children of Israel were, was there no hail. 
And Pharaoh sent, and called for Moses and Aaron, and said unto them, I have sinned this time: the LORD is righteous, and I and my people are wicked. 
Intreat the LORD (for it is enough) that there be no more mighty thunderings and hail; and I will let you go, and ye shall stay no longer. 
And Moses said unto him, As soon as I am gone out of the city, I will spread abroad my hands unto the LORD; and the thunder shall cease, neither shall there be any more hail; that thou mayest know how that the earth is the LORD's. 
But as for thee and thy servants, I know that ye will not yet fear the LORD God. 
And the flax and the barley was smitten: for the barley was in the ear, and the flax was bolled. 
But the wheat and the rie wer
969,ay we know what this new doctrine, whereof thou speakest, is? 
For thou bringest certain strange things to our ears: we would know therefore what these things mean. 
(For all the Athenians and strangers which were there spent their time in nothing else, but either to tell, or to hear some new thing.) 
Then Paul stood in the midst of Mars' hill, and said, Ye men of Athens, I perceive that in all things ye are too superstitious. 
For as I passed by, and beheld your devotions, I found an altar with this inscription, TO THE UNKNOWN GOD. Whom therefore ye ignorantly worship, him declare I unto you. 
God that made the world and all things therein, seeing that he is Lord of heaven and earth, dwelleth not in temples made with hands; 
Neither is worshipped with men's hands, as though he needed any thing, seeing he giveth to all life, and breath, and all things; 
And hath made of one blood all nations of men for to dwell on all the face of the earth, and hath deter
1079, them in the morning; and their beauty shall consume in the grave from their dwelling. 
But God will redeem my soul from the power of the grave: for he shall receive me. Selah. 
Be not thou afraid when one is made rich, when the glory of his house is increased; 
For when he dieth he shall carry nothing away: his glory shall not descend after him. 
Though while he lived he blessed his soul: and men will praise thee, when thou doest well to thyself. 
He shall go to the generation of his fathers; they shall never see light. 
Man that is in honour, and understandeth not, is like the beasts that perish. 
The mighty God, even the LORD, hath spoken, and called the earth from the rising of the sun unto the going down thereof. 
Out of Zion, the perfection of beauty, God hath shined. 
Our God shall come, and shall not keep silence: a fire shall devour before him, and it shall be very tempestuous round about him. 
He shall call to the heavens from above, and to the earth, that he may judge his people. 
Gather my saints together unto me; those that have made a covenant with 
808,e house of Pharaoh, saying, If now I have found grace in your eyes, speak, I pray you, in the ears of Pharaoh, saying, 
My father made me swear, saying, Lo, I die: in my grave which I have digged for me in the land of Canaan, there shalt thou bury me. Now therefore let me go up, I pray thee, and bury my father, and I will come again. 
And Pharaoh said, Go up, and bury thy father, according as he made thee swear. 
And Joseph went up to bury his father: and with him went up all the servants of Pharaoh, the elders of his house, and all the elders of the land of Egypt, 
And all the house of Joseph, and his brethren, and his father's house: only their little ones, and their flocks, and their herds, they left in the land of Goshen. 
And there went up with him both chariots and horsemen: and it was a ver
851,el in mount Ebal, 
As Moses the servant of the LORD commanded the children of Israel, as it is written in the book of the law of Moses, an altar of whole stones, over which no man hath lift up any iron: and they offered thereon burnt offerings unto the LORD, and sacrificed peace offerings. 
And he wrote there upon the stones a copy of the law of Moses, which he wrote in the presence of the children of Israel. 
And all Israel, and their elders, and officers, and their judges, stood on this side the ark and on that side before the priests the Levites, which bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD, as well the stranger, as he that was born among them; half of them over against mount Gerizim, and half of them over against mount Ebal; as Moses the servant of the LORD had commanded before, that they should bless the people of Israel. 
And after
971, made by fire; it is most holy, as is the sin offering, and as the trespass offering. 
All the males among the children of Aaron shall eat of it. It shall be a statute for ever in your generations concerning the offerings of the LORD made by fire: every one that toucheth them shall be holy. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
This is the offering of Aaron and of his sons, which they shall offer unto the LORD in the day when he is anointed; the tenth part of an ephah of fine flour for a meat offering perpetual, half of it in the morning, and half thereof at night. 
In a pan it shall be made with oil; and when it is baken, thou shalt bring it in: and the baken pieces of the meat offering shalt thou offer for a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And the priest of his sons that is anointed in his stead shall offer it: it is a statute for ever unto the LORD; it shall be wholly burnt. 
For every meat offering for the priest shall be wholly burnt: it shall not be e
944,e bendeth his bow to shoot his arrows, let them be as cut in pieces. 
As a snail which melteth, let every one of them pass away: like the untimely birth of a woman, that they may not see the sun. 
Before your pots can feel the thorns, he shall take them away as with a whirlwind, both living, and in his wrath. 
The righteous shall rejoice when he seeth the vengeance: he shall wash his feet in the blood of the wicked. 
So that a man shall say, Verily there is a reward for the righteous: verily he is a God that judgeth in the earth. 
Deliver me from mine enemies, O my God: defend me from them that rise up against me. 
Deliver me from the workers of iniquity, and save me from bloody men. 
For, lo, they lie in wait for my soul: the mighty are gathered against me; not for my transgression, nor for my sin, O LORD. 
They run and prepare themselves without my fault: awake to help me, and behold. 
Thou therefore, O LORD God of hosts, the Go
1072,m small as the dust before the wind: I did cast them out as the dirt in the streets. 
Thou hast delivered me from the strivings of the people; and thou hast made me the head of the heathen: a people whom I have not known shall serve me. 
As soon as they hear of me, they shall obey me: the strangers shall submit themselves unto me. 
The strangers shall fade away, and be afraid out of their close places. 
The LORD liveth; and blessed be my rock; and let the God of my salvation be exalted. 
It is God that avengeth me, and subdueth the people under me. 
He delivereth me from mine enemies: yea, thou liftest me up above those that rise up against me: thou hast delivered me from the violent man. 
Therefore will I give thanks unto thee, O LORD, among the heathen, and sing praises unto thy name. 
Great deliverance giveth he to his king; and sheweth mercy to his anointed, to David, and to his seed for evermore. 
The heavens declare the glory of God; and the firmament sheweth his handywork. 
Day unto day uttereth speech, and night unto night sheweth knowledge. 
There
1064,to thee, do. 
Then Jacob rose up, and set his sons and his wives upon camels; 
And he carried away all his cattle, and all his goods which he had gotten, the cattle of his getting, which he had gotten in Padanaram, for to go to Isaac his father in the land of Canaan. 
And Laban went to shear his sheep: and Rachel had stolen the images that were her father's. 
And Jacob stole away unawares to Laban the Syrian, in that he told him not that he fled. 
So he fled with all that he had; and he rose up, and passed over the river, and set his face toward the mount Gilead. 
And it was told Laban on the third day that Jacob was fled. 
And he took his brethren with him, and pursued after him seven days' journey; and they overtook him in the mount Gilead. 
And God came to Laban the Syrian in a dream by night, and said unto him, Take heed that thou speak not to Jacob either good or bad. 
Then Laban overtook Jacob. Now Jacob had pitched his tent in the mount: and Laban with his brethren pitched in the mount of Gilead. 
And Laban said to Jacob, What hast thou done
774,from Kir? 
Behold, the eyes of the Lord GOD are upon the sinful kingdom, and I will destroy it from off the face of the earth; saving that I will not utterly destroy the house of Jacob, saith the LORD. 
For, lo, I will command, and I will sift the house of Israel among all nations, like as corn is sifted in a sieve, yet shall not the least grain fall upon the earth. 
All the sinners of my people shall die by the sword, which say, The evil shall not overtake nor prevent us. 
In that day will I raise up the tabernacle of David that is fallen, and close up the breaches thereof; and I will raise up his ruins, and I will build it as in the days of old: 
That they may possess the remnant of Edom, and of all the heathen, which are called by my name, saith the LORD that d
1056,le spirit, to revive the spirit of the humble, and to revive the heart of the contrite ones. 
For I will not contend for ever, neither will I be always wroth: for the spirit should fail before me, and the souls which I have made. 
For the iniquity of his covetousness was I wroth, and smote him: I hid me, and was wroth, and he went on frowardly in the way of his heart. 
I have seen his ways, and will heal him: I will lead him also, and restore comforts unto him and to his mourners. 
I create the fruit of the lips; Peace, peace to him that is far off, and to him that is near, saith the LORD; and I will heal him. 
But the wicked are like the troubled sea, when it cannot rest, whose waters cast up mire and dirt. 
There is no peace, saith my God, to the wicked. 
Cry aloud, spare not, lift up thy voice like a trumpet, and shew my people their transgression, and the house of Jacob their sins. 
Yet they seek me daily, and delight to know my ways, as a nation that did righteousness, and forsook not the ordinance of their God: they ask of me the ordi
978,er king; and how the inhabitants of Gibeon had made peace with Israel, and were among them; 
That they feared greatly, because Gibeon was a great city, as one of the royal cities, and because it was greater than Ai, and all the men thereof were mighty. 
Wherefore Adonizedec king of Jerusalem, sent unto Hoham king of Hebron, and unto Piram king of Jarmuth, and unto Japhia king of Lachish, and unto Debir king of Eglon, saying, 
Come up unto me, and help me, that we may smite Gibeon: for it hath made peace with Joshua and with the children of Israel. 
Therefore the five kings of the Amorites, the king of Jerusalem, the king of Hebron, the king of Jarmuth, the king of Lachish, the king of Eglon, gathered themselves together, and went up, they and all their hosts, and encamped before Gibeon, and made war against it. 
And the men of Gibeon sent unto Joshua to the camp to Gilgal, saying, Slack not thy hand from thy servants; come up to us quickly, and save us, and help u
726,y beloved, let us cleanse ourselves from all filthiness of the flesh and spirit, perfecting holiness in the fear of God. 
Receive us; we have wronged no man, we have corrupted no man, we have defrauded no man. 
I speak not this to condemn you: for I have said before, that ye are in our hearts to die and live with you. 
Great is my boldness of speech toward you, great is my glorying of you: I am filled with comfort, I am exceeding joyful in all our tribulation. 
For, when we were come into Macedonia, our flesh had no rest, but we were troubled on every side; without were fightings, within were fears. 
Nevertheless God, that comforteth those that are cast down, comforted us by the coming of Titus; 
And not by his comin
1002,on, whom Moses and the children of Israel smote, after they were come forth out of Egypt: 
And they possessed his land, and the land of Og king of Bashan, two kings of the Amorites, which were on this side Jordan toward the sunrising; 
From Aroer, which is by the bank of the river Arnon, even unto mount Sion, which is Hermon, 
And all the plain on this side Jordan eastward, even unto the sea of the plain, under the springs of Pisgah. 
And Moses called all Israel, and said unto them, Hear, O Israel, the statutes and judgments which I speak in your ears this day, that ye may learn them, and keep, and do them. 
The LORD our God made a covenant with us in Horeb. 
The LORD made not this covenant with our fathers, but with us, even us, who are all of us here alive this day. 
The LORD talked with you face to face in the mount out of the midst of the fire, 
(I stood between the LORD and you at that time, to shew you the word of the LORD: for ye were afraid by reason of the fire, and went not up 
800,ill the Son of man were risen from the dead. 
And they kept that saying with themselves, questioning one with another what the rising from the dead should mean. 
And they asked him, saying, Why say the scribes that Elias must first come? 
And he answered and told them, Elias verily cometh first, and restoreth all things; and how it is written of the Son of man, that he must suffer many things, and be set at nought. 
But I say unto you, That Elias is indeed come, and they have done unto him whatsoever they listed, as it is written of him. 
And when he came to his disciples, he saw a great multitude about them, and the scribes questioning with them. 
And straightway all the people, when they beheld him, were greatly amazed, and running to him saluted him. 
And he asked the scribes, What ques
720,ars old when he began to reign; and he reigned twenty and five years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was Azubah the daughter of Shilhi. 
And he walked in all the ways of Asa his father; he turned not aside from it, doing that which was right in the eyes of the LORD: nevertheless the high places were not taken away; for the people offered and burnt incense yet in the high places. 
And Jehoshaphat made peace with the king of Israel. 
Now the rest of the acts of Jehoshaphat, and his might that he shewed, and how he warred, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah? 
And the remnant of the sodomites, which remained in the days of his father Asa, he took out of the land. 
There was
732, day of the LORD be darkness, and not light? even very dark, and no brightness in it? 
I hate, I despise your feast days, and I will not smell in your solemn assemblies. 
Though ye offer me burnt offerings and your meat offerings, I will not accept them: neither will I regard the peace offerings of your fat beasts. 
Take thou away from me the noise of thy songs; for I will not hear the melody of thy viols. 
But let judgment run down as waters, and righteousness as a mighty stream. 
Have ye offered unto me sacrifices and offerings in the wilderness forty years, O house of Israel? 
But ye have borne the tabernacle of your Moloch and Chiun your images, the star of your god, which ye made to yourselves. 
Therefore will I cause
948,eepers for the ark. 
So David, and the elders of Israel, and the captains over thousands, went to bring up the ark of the covenant of the LORD out of the house of Obededom with joy. 
And it came to pass, when God helped the Levites that bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD, that they offered seven bullocks and seven rams. 
And David was clothed with a robe of fine linen, and all the Levites that bare the ark, and the singers, and Chenaniah the master of the song with the singers: David also had upon him an ephod of linen. 
Thus all Israel brought up the ark of the covenant of the LORD with shouting, and with sound of the cornet, and with trumpets, and with cymbals, making a noise with psalteries and harps. 
And it came to pass, as the ark of the covenant of the LORD came to the city of David, that Michal, the daughter of Saul looking out at a window saw king David dancing and playing: and she despised him in her heart. 
So they br
813, riches are not for ever: and doth the crown endure to every generation? 
The hay appeareth, and the tender grass sheweth itself, and herbs of the mountains are gathered. 
The lambs are for thy clothing, and the goats are the price of the field. 
And thou shalt have goats' milk enough for thy food, for the food of thy household, and for the maintenance for thy maidens. 
The wicked flee when no man pursueth: but the righteous are bold as a lion. 
For the transgression of a land many are the princes thereof: but by a man of understanding and knowledge the state thereof shall be prolonged. 
A poor man that oppresseth the poor is like a sweeping rain which leaveth no food. 
They that forsake the law praise the wicked: but such as keep the law contend with them. 
Evil men understand not judgment: but they t
766, battle in thine own person. 
So shall we come upon him in some place where he shall be found, and we will light upon him as the dew falleth on the ground: and of him and of all the men that are with him there shall not be left so much as one. 
Moreover, if he be gotten into a city, then shall all Israel bring ropes to that city, and we will draw it into the river, until there be not one small stone found there. 
And Absalom and all the men of Israel said, The counsel of Hushai the Archite is better than the counsel of Ahithophel. For the LORD had appointed to defeat the good counsel of Ahithophel, to the intent that the LORD might bring evil upon Absalom. 
Then said Hushai unto Zadok and to Abiathar the priests, Thus and thus did Ahithophel counsel Absalo
1050,f the Medes and Persians, which altereth not. 
Then answered they and said before the king, That Daniel, which is of the children of the captivity of Judah, regardeth not thee, O king, nor the decree that thou hast signed, but maketh his petition three times a day. 
Then the king, when he heard these words, was sore displeased with himself, and set his heart on Daniel to deliver him: and he laboured till the going down of the sun to deliver him. 
Then these men assembled unto the king, and said unto the king, Know, O king, that the law of the Medes and Persians is, That no decree nor statute which the king establisheth may be changed. 
Then the king commanded, and they brought Daniel, and cast him into the den of lions. Now the king spake and said unto Daniel, Thy God whom thou servest continually, he will deliver thee. 
And a stone was brought, and laid upon the mouth of the den; and the king sealed it with his own signet, and with the signet of his lords; that the purpose might not be changed concerning Daniel. 
Then the king went t
833,t was given unto him to make war with the saints, and to overcome them: and power was given him over all kindreds, and tongues, and nations. 
And all that dwell upon the earth shall worship him, whose names are not written in the book of life of the Lamb slain from the foundation of the world. 
If any man have an ear, let him hear. 
He that leadeth into captivity shall go into captivity: he that killeth with the sword must be killed with the sword. Here is the patience and the faith of the saints. 
And I beheld another beast coming up out of the earth; and he had two horns like a lamb, and he spake as a dragon. 
And he exerciseth all the power of the first beast before him, and causeth the earth and them which dwell therein to worship the first beast, whose deadly wound was healed. 
And he doeth great wonders, so that he 
919, I shake not the earth only, but also heaven. 
And this word, Yet once more, signifieth the removing of those things that are shaken, as of things that are made, that those things which cannot be shaken may remain. 
Wherefore we receiving a kingdom which cannot be moved, let us have grace, whereby we may serve God acceptably with reverence and godly fear: 
For our God is a consuming fire. 
Let brotherly love continue. 
Be not forgetful to entertain strangers: for thereby some have entertained angels unawares. 
Remember them that are in bonds, as bound with them; and them which suffer adversity, as being yourselves also in the body. 
Marriage is honourable in all, and the bed undefiled: but whoremongers and adulterers God will judge. 
Let your conversation be without covetousness; and be content with such things as ye have: for he hath said, I will never leave thee, nor forsake thee. 
So that we may boldly 
865,the word of the LORD by Haggai the prophet, saying, 
Is it time for you, O ye, to dwell in your cieled houses, and this house lie waste? 
Now therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts; Consider your ways. 
Ye have sown much, and bring in little; ye eat, but ye have not enough; ye drink, but ye are not filled with drink; ye clothe you, but there is none warm; and he that earneth wages earneth wages to put it into a bag with holes. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Consider your ways. 
Go up to the mountain, and bring wood, and build the house; and I will take pleasure in it, and I will be glorified, saith the LORD. 
Ye looked for much, and, lo it came to little; and when ye brought it home, I did blow upon it. Why? saith the LORD of hosts. Because of mine house that is waste, and ye run every man unto his own house. 
Therefore the heaven over you is stayed fro
1078,old the man! 
When the chief priests therefore and officers saw him, they cried out, saying, Crucify him, crucify him. Pilate saith unto them, Take ye him, and crucify him: for I find no fault in him. 
The Jews answered him, We have a law, and by our law he ought to die, because he made himself the Son of God. 
When Pilate therefore heard that saying, he was the more afraid; 
And went again into the judgment hall, and saith unto Jesus, Whence art thou? But Jesus gave him no answer. 
Then saith Pilate unto him, Speakest thou not unto me? knowest thou not that I have power to crucify thee, and have power to release thee? 
Jesus answered, Thou couldest have no power at all against me, except it were given thee from above: therefore he that delivered me unto thee hath the greater sin. 
And from thenceforth Pilate sought to release him: but the Jews cried out, saying, If thou let this man go, thou art not Caesar's friend: whosoever maketh himself a king speaketh against Caesar. 
When Pilate therefore heard that saying, he brought Jesus forth, and sat down in the judg
746,trembling. 
Then said he unto me, Fear not, Daniel: for from the first day that thou didst set thine heart to understand, and to chasten thyself before thy God, thy words were heard, and I am come for thy words. 
But the prince of the kingdom of Persia withstood me one and twenty days: but, lo, Michael, one of the chief princes, came to help me; and I remained there with the kings of Persia. 
Now I am come to make thee understand what shall befall thy people in the latter days: for yet the vision is for many days. 
And when he had spoken such words unto me, I set my face toward the ground, and I became dumb. 
And, behold, one like the similitude of the sons of men touched my lips: then I opened my mouth, and spake, and said unto him tha
920,peak boldly in the synagogue: whom when Aquila and Priscilla had heard, they took him unto them, and expounded unto him the way of God more perfectly. 
And when he was disposed to pass into Achaia, the brethren wrote, exhorting the disciples to receive him: who, when he was come, helped them much which had believed through grace: 
For he mightily convinced the Jews, and that publickly, shewing by the scriptures that Jesus was Christ. 
And it came to pass, that, while Apollos was at Corinth, Paul having passed through the upper coasts came to Ephesus: and finding certain disciples, 
He said unto them, Have ye received the Holy Ghost since ye believed? And they said unto him, We have not so much as heard whether there be any Holy Ghost. 
And he said unto them, Unto what then were ye baptized? And they said, Unto John's baptism. 
Then said Paul, John verily baptized with the baptism of repentance, saying unto 
759,everse it. 
He hath not beheld iniquity in Jacob, neither hath he seen perverseness in Israel: the LORD his God is with him, and the shout of a king is among them. 
God brought them out of Egypt; he hath as it were the strength of an unicorn. 
Surely there is no enchantment against Jacob, neither is there any divination against Israel: according to this time it shall be said of Jacob and of Israel, What hath God wrought! 
Behold, the people shall rise up as a great lion, and lift up himself as a young lion: he shall not lie down until he eat of the prey, and drink the blood of the slain. 
And Balak said unto Balaam, Neither curse them at all, nor bless them at all. 
But Balaam answered and said unto Balak, Told not I thee, saying, All that the LORD 
1047, in those days. 
No man also seweth a piece of new cloth on an old garment: else the new piece that filled it up taketh away from the old, and the rent is made worse. 
And no man putteth new wine into old bottles: else the new wine doth burst the bottles, and the wine is spilled, and the bottles will be marred: but new wine must be put into new bottles. 
And it came to pass, that he went through the corn fields on the sabbath day; and his disciples began, as they went, to pluck the ears of corn. 
And the Pharisees said unto him, Behold, why do they on the sabbath day that which is not lawful? 
And he said unto them, Have ye never read what David did, when he had need, and was an hungred, he, and they that were with him? 
How he went into the house of God in the days of Abiathar the high priest, and did eat the shewbread, which is not lawful to eat but for the priests, and gave also to them which were with him? 
And he said unto them, The sabbath was made for man, and not man for the sabbath: 
Therefore the Son of man is Lord also o
1033,ainst Gog, the land of Magog, the chief prince of Meshech and Tubal, and prophesy against him, 
And say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against thee, O Gog, the chief prince of Meshech and Tubal: 
And I will turn thee back, and put hooks into thy jaws, and I will bring thee forth, and all thine army, horses and horsemen, all of them clothed with all sorts of armour, even a great company with bucklers and shields, all of them handling swords: 
Persia, Ethiopia, and Libya with them; all of them with shield and helmet: 
Gomer, and all his bands; the house of Togarmah of the north quarters, and all his bands: and many people with thee. 
Be thou prepared, and prepare for thyself, thou, and all thy company that are assembled unto thee, and be thou a guard unto them. 
After many days thou shalt be visited: in the latter years thou shalt come into the land that is brought back from the sword, and is gathered out of many people, against the mountains of Israel, which have been always waste: but it is brought forth out o
1027,mp trembled. 
And Moses brought forth the people out of the camp to meet with God; and they stood at the nether part of the mount. 
And mount Sinai was altogether on a smoke, because the LORD descended upon it in fire: and the smoke thereof ascended as the smoke of a furnace, and the whole mount quaked greatly. 
And when the voice of the trumpet sounded long, and waxed louder and louder, Moses spake, and God answered him by a voice. 
And the LORD came down upon mount Sinai, on the top of the mount: and the LORD called Moses up to the top of the mount; and Moses went up. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Go down, charge the people, lest they break through unto the LORD to gaze, and many of them perish. 
And let the priests also, which come near to the LORD, sanctify themselves, lest the LORD break forth upon them. 
And Moses said unto the LORD, The people cannot come up to mount Sinai: for thou chargedst us, saying, Set bounds about the mount, and sanctify it. 
And the LORD said unto him, Away, get thee down, and th
787,' feet, and he will make me to walk upon mine high places. To the chief singer on my stringed instruments. 
The word of the LORD which came unto Zephaniah the son of Cushi, the son of Gedaliah, the son of Amariah, the son of Hizkiah, in the days of Josiah the son of Amon, king of Judah. 
I will utterly consume all things from off the land, saith the LORD. 
I will consume man and beast; I will consume the fowls of the heaven, and the fishes of the sea, and the stumbling blocks with the wicked: and I will cut off man from off the land, saith the LORD. 
I will also stretch out mine hand upon Judah, and upon all the inhabitants of Jerusalem; and I will cut off the remnant of Baal from this place, and the name of the Chemarims with the priests; 
And them that worship the host of he
862, persons with God. 
For as many as have sinned without law shall also perish without law: and as many as have sinned in the law shall be judged by the law; 
(For not the hearers of the law are just before God, but the doers of the law shall be justified. 
For when the Gentiles, which have not the law, do by nature the things contained in the law, these, having not the law, are a law unto themselves: 
Which shew the work of the law written in their hearts, their conscience also bearing witness, and their thoughts the mean while accusing or else excusing one another;) 
In the day when God shall judge the secrets of men by Jesus Christ according to my gospel. 
Behold, thou art called a Jew, and restest in the law, and makest thy boast of God, 
And knowest his will, and approvest the things that are more excellent, being instructed out of the law; 
And a
930, 
Therefore thus saith the LORD concerning the prophets that prophesy in my name, and I sent them not, yet they say, Sword and famine shall not be in this land; By sword and famine shall those prophets be consumed. 
And the people to whom they prophesy shall be cast out in the streets of Jerusalem because of the famine and the sword; and they shall have none to bury them, them, their wives, nor their sons, nor their daughters: for I will pour their wickedness upon them. 
Therefore thou shalt say this word unto them; Let mine eyes run down with tears night and day, and let them not cease: for the virgin daughter of my people is broken with a great breach, with a very grievous blow. 
If I go forth into the field, then behold the slain with the sword! and if I enter into the city, then behold them that are sick with famine! yea, both the prophet and the priest go about into a land that they know not. 
Hast thou utterly 
851,ver will not receive you, when ye go out of that city, shake off the very dust from your feet for a testimony against them. 
And they departed, and went through the towns, preaching the gospel, and healing every where. 
Now Herod the tetrarch heard of all that was done by him: and he was perplexed, because that it was said of some, that John was risen from the dead; 
And of some, that Elias had appeared; and of others, that one of the old prophets was risen again. 
And Herod said, John have I beheaded: but who is this, of whom I hear such things? And he desired to see him. 
And the apostles, when they were returned, told him all that they had done. And he took them, and went aside privately into a desert place belonging to the city called Bethsaida. 
And the people, when they knew it, followed him: and he received them, and spake unto them
1060, the edge of the sword, and the king thereof, and all the cities thereof, and all the souls that were therein; he left none remaining, according to all that he had done to Eglon; but destroyed it utterly, and all the souls that were therein. 
And Joshua returned, and all Israel with him, to Debir; and fought against it: 
And he took it, and the king thereof, and all the cities thereof; and they smote them with the edge of the sword, and utterly destroyed all the souls that were therein; he left none remaining: as he had done to Hebron, so he did to Debir, and to the king thereof; as he had done also to Libnah, and to her king. 
So Joshua smote all the country of the hills, and of the south, and of the vale, and of the springs, and all their kings: he left none remaining, but utterly destroyed all that breathed, as the LORD God of Israel commanded. 
And Joshua smote them from Kadeshbarnea even unto Gaza, and all the country of Goshen, even unto Gibeon. 
And all these kings and their land did Joshua take at one time, because the LORD God of Israe
854,I have fully preached the gospel of Christ. 
Yea, so have I strived to preach the gospel, not where Christ was named, lest I should build upon another man's foundation: 
But as it is written, To whom he was not spoken of, they shall see: and they that have not heard shall understand. 
For which cause also I have been much hindered from coming to you. 
But now having no more place in these parts, and having a great desire these many years to come unto you; 
Whensoever I take my journey into Spain, I will come to you: for I trust to see you in my journey, and to be brought on my way thitherward by you, if first I be somewhat filled with your company. 
But now I go unto Jerusalem to minister unto the saints. 
For it hath pleased them of Macedonia and Achaia to make a certain contribution for the poor saints which are at Jerusalem. 
It hath pleas
893,orth also into a large place: he delivered me, because he delighted in me. 
The LORD rewarded me according to my righteousness: according to the cleanness of my hands hath he recompensed me. 
For I have kept the ways of the LORD, and have not wickedly departed from my God. 
For all his judgments were before me: and as for his statutes, I did not depart from them. 
I was also upright before him, and have kept myself from mine iniquity. 
Therefore the LORD hath recompensed me according to my righteousness; according to my cleanness in his eye sight. 
With the merciful thou wilt shew thyself merciful, and with the upright man thou wilt shew thyself upright. 
With the pure thou wilt shew thyself pure; and with the froward thou wilt shew thyself unsavoury. 
And the afflicted people thou wilt save: but thine eyes are upon the haughty, that thou mayest bring them down. 
For thou art my l
796, with the unfruitful works of darkness, but rather reprove them. 
For it is a shame even to speak of those things which are done of them in secret. 
But all things that are reproved are made manifest by the light: for whatsoever doth make manifest is light. 
Wherefore he saith, Awake thou that sleepest, and arise from the dead, and Christ shall give thee light. 
See then that ye walk circumspectly, not as fools, but as wise, 
Redeeming the time, because the days are evil. 
Wherefore be ye not unwise, but understanding what the will of the Lord is. 
And be not drunk with wine, wherein is excess; but be filled with the Spirit; 
Speaking to yourselves in psalms and hymns and spiritual songs, singing and making melody in your heart to the Lord; 
Giving thanks always for all things unto God
755, 
His mouth is full of cursing and deceit and fraud: under his tongue is mischief and vanity. 
He sitteth in the lurking places of the villages: in the secret places doth he murder the innocent: his eyes are privily set against the poor. 
He lieth in wait secretly as a lion in his den: he lieth in wait to catch the poor: he doth catch the poor, when he draweth him into his net. 
He croucheth, and humbleth himself, that the poor may fall by his strong ones. 
He hath said in his heart, God hath forgotten: he hideth his face; he will never see it. 
Arise, O LORD; O God, lift up thine hand: forget not the humble. 
Wherefore doth the wicked contemn God? he hath said in his heart, Thou wilt not require it. 
Thou hast seen it; for thou beholdest mischi
818,the Pharisees believed on him? 
But this people who knoweth not the law are cursed. 
Nicodemus saith unto them, (he that came to Jesus by night, being one of them,) 
Doth our law judge any man, before it hear him, and know what he doeth? 
They answered and said unto him, Art thou also of Galilee? Search, and look: for out of Galilee ariseth no prophet. 
And every man went unto his own house. 
Jesus went unto the mount of Olives. 
And early in the morning he came again into the temple, and all the people came unto him; and he sat down, and taught them. 
And the scribes and Pharisees brought unto him a woman taken in adultery; and when they had set her in the midst, 
They say unto him, Master, this woman was taken in adultery, in the very act. 
Now Moses in the law commanded us, that such should be stoned: bu
1067,ast thou here, that thou hast hewed thee out a sepulchre here, as he that heweth him out a sepulchre on high, and that graveth an habitation for himself in a rock? 
Behold, the LORD will carry thee away with a mighty captivity, and will surely cover thee. 
He will surely violently turn and toss thee like a ball into a large country: there shalt thou die, and there the chariots of thy glory shall be the shame of thy lord's house. 
And I will drive thee from thy station, and from thy state shall he pull thee down. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that I will call my servant Eliakim the son of Hilkiah: 
And I will clothe him with thy robe, and strengthen him with thy girdle, and I will commit thy government into his hand: and he shall be a father to the inhabitants of Jerusalem, and to the house of Judah. 
And the key of the house of David will I lay upon his shoulder; so he shall open, and none shall shut; and he shall shut, and none shall open. 
And I will fasten him as a nail in a sure place; and he shall be for a glorious throne to his father'
1007,hall be devoured with the fire of my jealousy. 
For then will I turn to the people a pure language, that they may all call upon the name of the LORD, to serve him with one consent. 
From beyond the rivers of Ethiopia my suppliants, even the daughter of my dispersed, shall bring mine offering. 
In that day shalt thou not be ashamed for all thy doings, wherein thou hast transgressed against me: for then I will take away out of the midst of thee them that rejoice in thy pride, and thou shalt no more be haughty because of my holy mountain. 
I will also leave in the midst of thee an afflicted and poor people, and they shall trust in the name of the LORD. 
The remnant of Israel shall not do iniquity, nor speak lies; neither shall a deceitful tongue be found in their mouth: for they shall feed and lie down, and none shall make them afraid. 
Sing, O daughter of Zion; shout, O Israel; be glad and rejoice with all the heart, O daughter of Jerusalem. 
The LORD hath taken away thy judgments, he hath cast
744, will speak unto thee all the commandments, and the statutes, and the judgments, which thou shalt teach them, that they may do them in the land which I give them to possess it. 
Ye shall observe to do therefore as the LORD your God hath commanded you: ye shall not turn aside to the right hand or to the left. 
Ye shall walk in all the ways which the LORD your God hath commanded you, that ye may live, and that it may be well with you, and that ye may prolong your days in the land which ye shall possess. 
Now these are the commandments, the statutes, and the judgments, which the LORD your God commanded to teach you, that ye might do them in the land whither ye go to possess it: 
That thou mightest fear the LORD thy God, to keep all his s
1066, they dwelt in their tents throughout all the east land of Gilead. 
And the children of Gad dwelt over against them, in the land of Bashan unto Salcah: 
Joel the chief, and Shapham the next, and Jaanai, and Shaphat in Bashan. 
And their brethren of the house of their fathers were, Michael, and Meshullam, and Sheba, and Jorai, and Jachan, and Zia, and Heber, seven. 
These are the children of Abihail the son of Huri, the son of Jaroah, the son of Gilead, the son of Michael, the son of Jeshishai, the son of Jahdo, the son of Buz; 
Ahi the son of Abdiel, the son of Guni, chief of the house of their fathers. 
And they dwelt in Gilead in Bashan, and in her towns, and in all the suburbs of Sharon, upon their borders. 
All these were reckoned by genealogies in the days of Jotham king of Judah, and in the days of Jeroboam king of Israel. 
The sons of Reuben, and the Gadites, and half the tribe of Manasseh, of valiant men, men able to bear buckler and sword, and to shoot with bow, and skilful in war, were four and forty thousand seven hundred and threescore, t
900,remoth, and Zabad, and Aziza. 
Of the sons also of Bebai; Jehohanan, Hananiah, Zabbai, and Athlai. 
And of the sons of Bani; Meshullam, Malluch, and Adaiah, Jashub, and Sheal, and Ramoth. 
And of the sons of Pahathmoab; Adna, and Chelal, Benaiah, Maaseiah, Mattaniah, Bezaleel, and Binnui, and Manasseh. 
And of the sons of Harim; Eliezer, Ishijah, Malchiah, Shemaiah, Shimeon, 
Benjamin, Malluch, and Shemariah. 
Of the sons of Hashum; Mattenai, Mattathah, Zabad, Eliphelet, Jeremai, Manasseh, and Shimei. 
Of the sons of Bani; Maadai, Amram, and Uel, 
Benaiah, Bedeiah, Chelluh, 
Vaniah, Meremoth, Eliashib, 
Mattaniah, Mattenai, and Jaasau, 
And Bani, and Binnui, Shimei, 
And Shelemiah, and Nathan, and Adaiah, 
Machnadebai, Shashai, Sharai, 
Azareel, and Shelemiah, Shemariah, 
Shallum, Amariah, and Joseph. 
Of the sons of Nebo; Jeiel, Mattithiah, Zabad, Zebina, Jadau, and Joel, Benaiah. 
All 
890, Kirjathjearim, a city of the children of Judah: this was the west quarter. 
And the south quarter was from the end of Kirjathjearim, and the border went out on the west, and went out to the well of waters of Nephtoah: 
And the border came down to the end of the mountain that lieth before the valley of the son of Hinnom, and which is in the valley of the giants on the north, and descended to the valley of Hinnom, to the side of Jebusi on the south, and descended to Enrogel, 
And was drawn from the north, and went forth to Enshemesh, and went forth toward Geliloth, which is over against the going up of Adummim, and descended to the stone of Bohan the son of Reuben, 
And passed along toward the side over against Arabah northward, and went down unto Arabah: 
And the border passed along to the side of Bethhoglah northward: and the outgoings of the border were at the north bay of th
792,s were done, because they repented not: 
Woe unto thee, Chorazin! woe unto thee, Bethsaida! for if the mighty works, which were done in you, had been done in Tyre and Sidon, they would have repented long ago in sackcloth and ashes. 
But I say unto you, It shall be more tolerable for Tyre and Sidon at the day of judgment, than for you. 
And thou, Capernaum, which art exalted unto heaven, shalt be brought down to hell: for if the mighty works, which have been done in thee, had been done in Sodom, it would have remained until this day. 
But I say unto you, That it shall be more tolerable for the land of Sodom in the day of judgment, than for thee. 
At that time Jesus answered and said, I thank thee, O Father, Lord of heaven and earth, because thou hast hid these things from the wise a
782,ng their hearts by faith. 
Now therefore why tempt ye God, to put a yoke upon the neck of the disciples, which neither our fathers nor we were able to bear? 
But we believe that through the grace of the LORD Jesus Christ we shall be saved, even as they. 
Then all the multitude kept silence, and gave audience to Barnabas and Paul, declaring what miracles and wonders God had wrought among the Gentiles by them. 
And after they had held their peace, James answered, saying, Men and brethren, hearken unto me: 
Simeon hath declared how God at the first did visit the Gentiles, to take out of them a people for his name. 
And to this agree the words of the prophets; as it is written, 
After this I will return, and will build again the tabernacle of David, which is fallen down; and 
787,cause I live, ye shall live also. 
At that day ye shall know that I am in my Father, and ye in me, and I in you. 
He that hath my commandments, and keepeth them, he it is that loveth me: and he that loveth me shall be loved of my Father, and I will love him, and will manifest myself to him. 
Judas saith unto him, not Iscariot, Lord, how is it that thou wilt manifest thyself unto us, and not unto the world? 
Jesus answered and said unto him, If a man love me, he will keep my words: and my Father will love him, and we will come unto him, and make our abode with him. 
He that loveth me not keepeth not my sayings: and the word which ye hear is not mine, but the Father's which sent me. 
These things have I spoken unto you, being yet present with you. 
But the Comforter, which is th
778, name at the first, and see what I did to it for the wickedness of my people Israel. 
And now, because ye have done all these works, saith the LORD, and I spake unto you, rising up early and speaking, but ye heard not; and I called you, but ye answered not; 
Therefore will I do unto this house, which is called by my name, wherein ye trust, and unto the place which I gave to you and to your fathers, as I have done to Shiloh. 
And I will cast you out of my sight, as I have cast out all your brethren, even the whole seed of Ephraim. 
Therefore pray not thou for this people, neither lift up cry nor prayer for them, neither make intercession to me: for I will not hear thee. 
Seest thou not what they do in the cities of Judah and in the streets of Jerusalem? 
The children g
953, and upon thy people, and upon thy father's house, days that have not come, from the day that Ephraim departed from Judah; even the king of Assyria. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that the LORD shall hiss for the fly that is in the uttermost part of the rivers of Egypt, and for the bee that is in the land of Assyria. 
And they shall come, and shall rest all of them in the desolate valleys, and in the holes of the rocks, and upon all thorns, and upon all bushes. 
In the same day shall the Lord shave with a razor that is hired, namely, by them beyond the river, by the king of Assyria, the head, and the hair of the feet: and it shall also consume the beard. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that a man shall nourish a young cow, and two sheep; 
And it shall come to pass, for the abundance of milk that they shall give he shall eat butter: for butter and honey shall every one eat that is left in the land. 
And it shall come to pas
798, cometh from above is above all: he that is of the earth is earthly, and speaketh of the earth: he that cometh from heaven is above all. 
And what he hath seen and heard, that he testifieth; and no man receiveth his testimony. 
He that hath received his testimony hath set to his seal that God is true. 
For he whom God hath sent speaketh the words of God: for God giveth not the Spirit by measure unto him. 
The Father loveth the Son, and hath given all things into his hand. 
He that believeth on the Son hath everlasting life: and he that believeth not the Son shall not see life; but the wrath of God abideth on him. 
When therefore the LORD knew how the Pharisees had heard that Jesus made and baptized more disciples than John, 
(Though Jesus himself baptized not, but his disciples,) 
He lef
765,eed of six great cubits. 
The thickness of the wall, which was for the side chamber without, was five cubits: and that which was left was the place of the side chambers that were within. 
And between the chambers was the wideness of twenty cubits round about the house on every side. 
And the doors of the side chambers were toward the place that was left, one door toward the north, and another door toward the south: and the breadth of the place that was left was five cubits round about. 
Now the building that was before the separate place at the end toward the west was seventy cubits broad; and the wall of the building was five cubits thick round about, and the length thereof ninety cubits. 
So he measured the house, an hundred cubits long; and the separat
723,g of Jericho. 
And Joshua passed from Libnah, and all Israel with him, unto Lachish, and encamped against it, and fought against it: 
And the LORD delivered Lachish into the hand of Israel, which took it on the second day, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein, according to all that he had done to Libnah. 
Then Horam king of Gezer came up to help Lachish; and Joshua smote him and his people, until he had left him none remaining. 
And from Lachish Joshua passed unto Eglon, and all Israel with him; and they encamped against it, and fought against it: 
And they took it on that day, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein he utterly destroyed 
887,pel of God, that the offering up of the Gentiles might be acceptable, being sanctified by the Holy Ghost. 
I have therefore whereof I may glory through Jesus Christ in those things which pertain to God. 
For I will not dare to speak of any of those things which Christ hath not wrought by me, to make the Gentiles obedient, by word and deed, 
Through mighty signs and wonders, by the power of the Spirit of God; so that from Jerusalem, and round about unto Illyricum, I have fully preached the gospel of Christ. 
Yea, so have I strived to preach the gospel, not where Christ was named, lest I should build upon another man's foundation: 
But as it is written, To whom he was not spoken of, they shall see: and they that have not heard shall understand. 
For which cause also I have been much hindered from coming to you. 
But now having no more place in these parts, and having a great d
742, who hath his eyes like unto a flame of fire, and his feet are like fine brass; 
I know thy works, and charity, and service, and faith, and thy patience, and thy works; and the last to be more than the first. 
Notwithstanding I have a few things against thee, because thou sufferest that woman Jezebel, which calleth herself a prophetess, to teach and to seduce my servants to commit fornication, and to eat things sacrificed unto idols. 
And I gave her space to repent of her fornication; and she repented not. 
Behold, I will cast her into a bed, and them that commit adultery with her into great tribulation, except they repent of their deeds. 
And I will kill her children with death; and all the churches shall know that I am he which se
1000,
There is one come out of thee, that imagineth evil against the LORD, a wicked counsellor. 
Thus saith the LORD; Though they be quiet, and likewise many, yet thus shall they be cut down, when he shall pass through. Though I have afflicted thee, I will afflict thee no more. 
For now will I break his yoke from off thee, and will burst thy bonds in sunder. 
And the LORD hath given a commandment concerning thee, that no more of thy name be sown: out of the house of thy gods will I cut off the graven image and the molten image: I will make thy grave; for thou art vile. 
Behold upon the mountains the feet of him that bringeth good tidings, that publisheth peace! O Judah, keep thy solemn feasts, perform thy vows: for the wicked shall no more pass through thee; he is utterly cut off. 
He that dasheth in pieces is come up before thy face: keep the munition, watch the way, make thy loins strong, fortify thy power mightily. 
For the LORD hath turned away the excellency of Jacob, as the excellency
899,ing health among all nations. 
Let the people praise thee, O God; let all the people praise thee. 
O let the nations be glad and sing for joy: for thou shalt judge the people righteously, and govern the nations upon earth. Selah. 
Let the people praise thee, O God; let all the people praise thee. 
Then shall the earth yield her increase; and God, even our own God, shall bless us. 
God shall bless us; and all the ends of the earth shall fear him. 
Let God arise, let his enemies be scattered: let them also that hate him flee before him. 
As smoke is driven away, so drive them away: as wax melteth before the fire, so let the wicked perish at the presence of God. 
But let the righteous be glad; let them rejoice before God: yea, let them exceedingly rejoice. 
Sing unto God, sing praises to his name: extol him that rideth upon the heavens by his name JAH, and rejoice before him. 
A father of 
802,bove me, to make yourselves fat with the chiefest of all the offerings of Israel my people? 
Wherefore the LORD God of Israel saith, I said indeed that thy house, and the house of thy father, should walk before me for ever: but now the LORD saith, Be it far from me; for them that honour me I will honour, and they that despise me shall be lightly esteemed. 
Behold, the days come, that I will cut off thine arm, and the arm of thy father's house, that there shall not be an old man in thine house. 
And thou shalt see an enemy in my habitation, in all the wealth which God shall give Israel: and there shall not be an old man in thine house for ever. 
And the man of thine, whom I shall not cut off from mine altar, shall be to consume thine eyes, and to grieve thine heart: and all the increase of th
881,he tabernacle of the tent of the congregation. 
And thou shalt put therein the ark of the testimony, and cover the ark with the vail. 
And thou shalt bring in the table, and set in order the things that are to be set in order upon it; and thou shalt bring in the candlestick, and light the lamps thereof. 
And thou shalt set the altar of gold for the incense before the ark of the testimony, and put the hanging of the door to the tabernacle. 
And thou shalt set the altar of the burnt offering before the door of the tabernacle of the tent of the congregation. 
And thou shalt set the laver between the tent of the congregation and the altar, and shalt put water therein. 
And thou shalt set up the court round about, and hang up the hanging at the court gate. 
And thou shalt take the anointing oil, and anoint the tabernacle, and all that is therein, and shalt hallow it, and al
1058,n which shall be spoken against; 
(Yea, a sword shall pierce through thy own soul also,) that the thoughts of many hearts may be revealed. 
And there was one Anna, a prophetess, the daughter of Phanuel, of the tribe of Aser: she was of a great age, and had lived with an husband seven years from her virginity; 
And she was a widow of about fourscore and four years, which departed not from the temple, but served God with fastings and prayers night and day. 
And she coming in that instant gave thanks likewise unto the Lord, and spake of him to all them that looked for redemption in Jerusalem. 
And when they had performed all things according to the law of the Lord, they returned into Galilee, to their own city Nazareth. 
And the child grew, and waxed strong in spirit, filled with wisdom: and the grace of God was upon him. 
Now his parents went to Jerusalem every year at the feast of the passover. 
And when he was twelve years old, they went up to Jerusalem after the custom of the feast. 
And when they had fulfilled the days, as they returned, th
748, very wise. 
And Tyrus did build herself a strong hold, and heaped up silver as the dust, and fine gold as the mire of the streets. 
Behold, the LORD will cast her out, and he will smite her power in the sea; and she shall be devoured with fire. 
Ashkelon shall see it, and fear; Gaza also shall see it, and be very sorrowful, and Ekron; for her expectation shall be ashamed; and the king shall perish from Gaza, and Ashkelon shall not be inhabited. 
And a bastard shall dwell in Ashdod, and I will cut off the pride of the Philistines. 
And I will take away his blood out of his mouth, and his abominations from between his teeth: but he that remaineth, even he, shall be for our God, and he shall be as a governor in Judah, and Ekron as a Jebusit
883, and lay no hand upon him; that he might rid him out of their hands, to deliver him to his father again. 
And it came to pass, when Joseph was come unto his brethren, that they stript Joseph out of his coat, his coat of many colours that was on him; 
And they took him, and cast him into a pit: and the pit was empty, there was no water in it. 
And they sat down to eat bread: and they lifted up their eyes and looked, and, behold, a company of Ishmeelites came from Gilead with their camels bearing spicery and balm and myrrh, going to carry it down to Egypt. 
And Judah said unto his brethren, What profit is it if we slay our brother, and conceal his blood? 
Come, and let us sell him to the Ishmeelites, and let not our hand be upon him; for he is our brother and our flesh. And his brethren were content. 
Then there passed by Midianites merchantmen; and they drew and lifted up
931,u not it that hath cut Rahab, and wounded the dragon? 
Art thou not it which hath dried the sea, the waters of the great deep; that hath made the depths of the sea a way for the ransomed to pass over? 
Therefore the redeemed of the LORD shall return, and come with singing unto Zion; and everlasting joy shall be upon their head: they shall obtain gladness and joy; and sorrow and mourning shall flee away. 
I, even I, am he that comforteth you: who art thou, that thou shouldest be afraid of a man that shall die, and of the son of man which shall be made as grass; 
And forgettest the LORD thy maker, that hath stretched forth the heavens, and laid the foundations of the earth; and hast feared continually every day because of the fury of the oppressor, as if he were ready to destroy? and where is the fury of the oppressor? 
The captive exile hasteneth that he may be loosed, and that he should not die in the pit, nor that hi
1003,lt cities for defence in Judah. 
He built even Bethlehem, and Etam, and Tekoa, 
And Bethzur, and Shoco, and Adullam, 
And Gath, and Mareshah, and Ziph, 
And Adoraim, and Lachish, and Azekah, 
And Zorah, and Aijalon, and Hebron, which are in Judah and in Benjamin fenced cities. 
And he fortified the strong holds, and put captains in them, and store of victual, and of oil and wine. 
And in every several city he put shields and spears, and made them exceeding strong, having Judah and Benjamin on his side. 
And the priests and the Levites that were in all Israel resorted to him out of all their coasts. 
For the Levites left their suburbs and their possession, and came to Judah and Jerusalem: for Jeroboam and his sons had cast them off from executing the priest's office unto the LORD: 
And he ordained him priests for the high places, and for the devils, and for the calves which he had made. 
And after them out of all the tribes of Israel such as set their hearts to seek the LORD God of Israel 
996,days that break away every man from his master. 
Shall I then take my bread, and my water, and my flesh that I have killed for my shearers, and give it unto men, whom I know not whence they be? 
So David's young men turned their way, and went again, and came and told him all those sayings. 
And David said unto his men, Gird ye on every man his sword. And they girded on every man his sword; and David also girded on his sword: and there went up after David about four hundred men; and two hundred abode by the stuff. 
But one of the young men told Abigail, Nabal's wife, saying, Behold, David sent messengers out of the wilderness to salute our master; and he railed on them. 
But the men were very good unto us, and we were not hurt, neither missed we any thing, as long as we were conversant with them, when we were in the fields: 
They were a wall unto us both by night and day, all the while we were with them keeping the sheep. 
Now therefore know and consider what thou wilt do; for evil 
1062, our money in full weight: and we have brought it again in our hand. 
And other money have we brought down in our hands to buy food: we cannot tell who put our money in our sacks. 
And he said, Peace be to you, fear not: your God, and the God of your father, hath given you treasure in your sacks: I had your money. And he brought Simeon out unto them. 
And the man brought the men into Joseph's house, and gave them water, and they washed their feet; and he gave their asses provender. 
And they made ready the present against Joseph came at noon: for they heard that they should eat bread there. 
And when Joseph came home, they brought him the present which was in their hand into the house, and bowed themselves to him to the earth. 
And he asked them of their welfare, and said, Is your father well, the old man of whom ye spake? Is he yet alive? 
And they answered, Thy servant our father is in good health, he is yet alive. And they bowed down their heads, and made obeisance. 
And he lifted up his eyes, and saw his brother Benjamin, his mother's son, an
861,sign between me and the children of Israel for ever: for in six days the LORD made heaven and earth, and on the seventh day he rested, and was refreshed. 
And he gave unto Moses, when he had made an end of communing with him upon mount Sinai, two tables of testimony, tables of stone, written with the finger of God. 
And when the people saw that Moses delayed to come down out of the mount, the people gathered themselves together unto Aaron, and said unto him, Up, make us gods, which shall go before us; for as for this Moses, the man that brought us up out of the land of Egypt, we wot not what is become of him. 
And Aaron said unto them, Break off the golden earrings, which are in the ears of your wives, of your sons, and of your daughters, and bring them unto me. 
And all the people brake off the golden earrings which were in their ears, and brought 
747, the evening. 
And it came to pass at the time of the going down of the sun, that Joshua commanded, and they took them down off the trees, and cast them into the cave wherein they had been hid, and laid great stones in the cave's mouth, which remain until this very day. 
And that day Joshua took Makkedah, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and the king thereof he utterly destroyed, them, and all the souls that were therein; he let none remain: and he did to the king of Makkedah as he did unto the king of Jericho. 
Then Joshua passed from Makkedah, and all Israel with him, unto Libnah, and fought against Libnah: 
And the LORD delivered it also, and the king thereof, into the hand of Israel; and he smote it with the edge of the sword
1068, loveth strife: and he that exalteth his gate seeketh destruction. 
He that hath a froward heart findeth no good: and he that hath a perverse tongue falleth into mischief. 
He that begetteth a fool doeth it to his sorrow: and the father of a fool hath no joy. 
A merry heart doeth good like a medicine: but a broken spirit drieth the bones. 
A wicked man taketh a gift out of the bosom to pervert the ways of judgment. 
Wisdom is before him that hath understanding; but the eyes of a fool are in the ends of the earth. 
A foolish son is a grief to his father, and bitterness to her that bare him. 
Also to punish the just is not good, nor to strike princes for equity. 
He that hath knowledge spareth his words: and a man of understanding is of an excellent spirit. 
Even a fool, when he holdeth his peace, is counted wise: and he that shutteth his lips is esteemed a man of understanding. 
Through desire a man, having separated himself, seeketh and intermeddleth with all wisdom. 
A fool hath no delight in understanding, but that his heart may discover itself. 
Whe
846,iven two wings of a great eagle, that she might fly into the wilderness, into her place, where she is nourished for a time, and times, and half a time, from the face of the serpent. 
And the serpent cast out of his mouth water as a flood after the woman, that he might cause her to be carried away of the flood. 
And the earth helped the woman, and the earth opened her mouth, and swallowed up the flood which the dragon cast out of his mouth. 
And the dragon was wroth with the woman, and went to make war with the remnant of her seed, which keep the commandments of God, and have the testimony of Jesus Christ. 
And I stood upon the sand of the sea, and saw a beast rise up out of the sea, having seven heads and ten horns, and upon his horns ten crowns, and upon his heads the name of blasphemy. 
And the beast which I saw was like unto a leop
1069, you, if the Lord permit. 
But I will tarry at Ephesus until Pentecost. 
For a great door and effectual is opened unto me, and there are many adversaries. 
Now if Timotheus come, see that he may be with you without fear: for he worketh the work of the Lord, as I also do. 
Let no man therefore despise him: but conduct him forth in peace, that he may come unto me: for I look for him with the brethren. 
As touching our brother Apollos, I greatly desired him to come unto you with the brethren: but his will was not at all to come at this time; but he will come when he shall have convenient time. 
Watch ye, stand fast in the faith, quit you like men, be strong. 
Let all your things be done with charity. 
I beseech you, brethren, (ye know the house of Stephanas, that it is the firstfruits of Achaia, and that they have addicted themselves to the ministry of the saints,) 
That ye submit yourselves unto such, and to every one that helpeth with us, and laboureth. 
I am glad of the coming of Stephanas and Fortunatus and Achaicus: for that which was lacking on your 
919,men. 
Among all this people there were seven hundred chosen men lefthanded; every one could sling stones at an hair breadth, and not miss. 
And the men of Israel, beside Benjamin, were numbered four hundred thousand men that drew sword: all these were men of war. 
And the children of Israel arose, and went up to the house of God, and asked counsel of God, and said, Which of us shall go up first to the battle against the children of Benjamin? And the LORD said, Judah shall go up first. 
And the children of Israel rose up in the morning, and encamped against Gibeah. 
And the men of Israel went out to battle against Benjamin; and the men of Israel put themselves in array to fight against them at Gibeah. 
And the children of Benjamin came forth out of Gibeah, and destroyed down to the ground of the Israelites that day twenty and two thousand men. 
And the people the men of Israel encouraged themselves, and set
949,hich is by the sea shore innumerable. 
These all died in faith, not having received the promises, but having seen them afar off, and were persuaded of them, and embraced them, and confessed that they were strangers and pilgrims on the earth. 
For they that say such things declare plainly that they seek a country. 
And truly, if they had been mindful of that country from whence they came out, they might have had opportunity to have returned. 
But now they desire a better country, that is, an heavenly: wherefore God is not ashamed to be called their God: for he hath prepared for them a city. 
By faith Abraham, when he was tried, offered up Isaac: and he that had received the promises offered up his only begotten son, 
Of whom it was said, That in Isaac shall thy seed be called: 
Accounting that God was able to raise him up, even from the dead; from whence also he received him in a figure. 
By faith Isaac blessed Jacob and Esau concerning
992,r; than that thou shouldest be put lower in the presence of the prince whom thine eyes have seen. 
Go not forth hastily to strive, lest thou know not what to do in the end thereof, when thy neighbour hath put thee to shame. 
Debate thy cause with thy neighbour himself; and discover not a secret to another: 
Lest he that heareth it put thee to shame, and thine infamy turn not away. 
A word fitly spoken is like apples of gold in pictures of silver. 
As an earring of gold, and an ornament of fine gold, so is a wise reprover upon an obedient ear. 
As the cold of snow in the time of harvest, so is a faithful messenger to them that send him: for he refresheth the soul of his masters. 
Whoso boasteth himself of a false gift is like clouds and wind without rain. 
By long forbearing is a prince persuaded, and a soft tongue breaketh the bone. 
Hast thou found honey? eat so much as is sufficient for thee, lest thou be filled therewith, and vomit it. 
Withdraw thy foot from thy neighbour's
842, done, they feared greatly, saying, Truly this was the Son of God. 
And many women were there beholding afar off, which followed Jesus from Galilee, ministering unto him: 
Among which was Mary Magdalene, and Mary the mother of James and Joses, and the mother of Zebedees children. 
When the even was come, there came a rich man of Arimathaea, named Joseph, who also himself was Jesus' disciple: 
He went to Pilate, and begged the body of Jesus. Then Pilate commanded the body to be delivered. 
And when Joseph had taken the body, he wrapped it in a clean linen cloth, 
And laid it in his own new tomb, which he had hewn out in the rock: and he rolled a great stone to the door of the sepulchre, and departed. 
And there was Mary Magdalene, and the other Mary, sitting over against the sepulchre. 
Now the next day, that followed the day of th
962,rs, with whom thou hast taken pleasure, and all them that thou hast loved, with all them that thou hast hated; I will even gather them round about against thee, and will discover thy nakedness unto them, that they may see all thy nakedness. 
And I will judge thee, as women that break wedlock and shed blood are judged; and I will give thee blood in fury and jealousy. 
And I will also give thee into their hand, and they shall throw down thine eminent place, and shall break down thy high places: they shall strip thee also of thy clothes, and shall take thy fair jewels, and leave thee naked and bare. 
They shall also bring up a company against thee, and they shall stone thee with stones, and thrust thee through with their swords. 
And they shall burn thine houses with fire, and execute judgments upon thee in the sight of many women: and I will cause thee to cease from playing the harlot, and thou also shalt give no hire any more. 
So will I make my fur
958,bitterness to her that bare him. 
Also to punish the just is not good, nor to strike princes for equity. 
He that hath knowledge spareth his words: and a man of understanding is of an excellent spirit. 
Even a fool, when he holdeth his peace, is counted wise: and he that shutteth his lips is esteemed a man of understanding. 
Through desire a man, having separated himself, seeketh and intermeddleth with all wisdom. 
A fool hath no delight in understanding, but that his heart may discover itself. 
When the wicked cometh, then cometh also contempt, and with ignominy reproach. 
The words of a man's mouth are as deep waters, and the wellspring of wisdom as a flowing brook. 
It is not good to accept the person of the wicked, to overthrow the righteous in judgment. 
A fool's lips enter into contention, and his mouth calleth for strokes. 
A fool's mouth is his destruction, and his lips are the snare of his soul. 
The words of a talebearer are as wounds
961,its toward me? 
I will take the cup of salvation, and call upon the name of the LORD. 
I will pay my vows unto the LORD now in the presence of all his people. 
Precious in the sight of the LORD is the death of his saints. 
O LORD, truly I am thy servant; I am thy servant, and the son of thine handmaid: thou hast loosed my bonds. 
I will offer to thee the sacrifice of thanksgiving, and will call upon the name of the LORD. 
I will pay my vows unto the LORD now in the presence of all his people. 
In the courts of the LORD's house, in the midst of thee, O Jerusalem. Praise ye the LORD. 
O praise the LORD, all ye nations: praise him, all ye people. 
For his merciful kindness is great toward us: and the truth of the LORD endureth for ever. Praise ye the LORD. 
O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is good: because his mercy endureth for ever. 
Let Israel now say, that his mercy endureth for ever. 
Let the house of Aaron now say, that his mercy endureth fo
995,n in life by one, Jesus Christ.) 
Therefore as by the offence of one judgment came upon all men to condemnation; even so by the righteousness of one the free gift came upon all men unto justification of life. 
For as by one man's disobedience many were made sinners, so by the obedience of one shall many be made righteous. 
Moreover the law entered, that the offence might abound. But where sin abounded, grace did much more abound: 
That as sin hath reigned unto death, even so might grace reign through righteousness unto eternal life by Jesus Christ our Lord. 
What shall we say then? Shall we continue in sin, that grace may abound? 
God forbid. How shall we, that are dead to sin, live any longer therein? 
Know ye not, that so many of us as were baptized into Jesus Christ were baptized into his death? 
Therefore we are buried with him by baptism into death: that like as Christ was raised up from the dead by the glory of the Father, even so we also should walk in newness of life. 
For
1019,incense. 
And he cried against the altar in the word of the LORD, and said, O altar, altar, thus saith the LORD; Behold, a child shall be born unto the house of David, Josiah by name; and upon thee shall he offer the priests of the high places that burn incense upon thee, and men's bones shall be burnt upon thee. 
And he gave a sign the same day, saying, This is the sign which the LORD hath spoken; Behold, the altar shall be rent, and the ashes that are upon it shall be poured out. 
And it came to pass, when king Jeroboam heard the saying of the man of God, which had cried against the altar in Bethel, that he put forth his hand from the altar, saying, Lay hold on him. And his hand, which he put forth against him, dried up, so that he could not pull it in again to him. 
The altar also was rent, and the ashes poured out from the altar, according to the sign which the man of God had given by the word of the LORD. 
And the king answered and said unto the man of God, Intreat now the face of the LORD thy God, 
919,not. 
For Ahaz took away a portion out of the house of the LORD, and out of the house of the king, and of the princes, and gave it unto the king of Assyria: but he helped him not. 
And in the time of his distress did he trespass yet more against the LORD: this is that king Ahaz. 
For he sacrificed unto the gods of Damascus, which smote him: and he said, Because the gods of the kings of Syria help them, therefore will I sacrifice to them, that they may help me. But they were the ruin of him, and of all Israel. 
And Ahaz gathered together the vessels of the house of God, and cut in pieces the vessels of the house of God, and shut up the doors of the house of the LORD, and he made him altars in every corner of Jerusalem. 
And in every several city of Judah he made high places to burn incense unto other gods, and provoked to anger the LORD God of his fathers. 
Now the rest of his acts and of all his ways, firs
784,he chief ruler of the synagogue, believed on the Lord with all his house; and many of the Corinthians hearing believed, and were baptized. 
Then spake the Lord to Paul in the night by a vision, Be not afraid, but speak, and hold not thy peace: 
For I am with thee, and no man shall set on thee to hurt thee: for I have much people in this city. 
And he continued there a year and six months, teaching the word of God among them. 
And when Gallio was the deputy of Achaia, the Jews made insurrection with one accord against Paul, and brought him to the judgment seat, 
Saying, This fellow persuadeth men to worship God contrary to the law. 
And when Paul was now about to open his mouth, Gallio said unto the Jews, If it were a matter of wrong or wicked lewdness, O ye Jews, reason wou
967,rth quarters, and all his bands: and many people with thee. 
Be thou prepared, and prepare for thyself, thou, and all thy company that are assembled unto thee, and be thou a guard unto them. 
After many days thou shalt be visited: in the latter years thou shalt come into the land that is brought back from the sword, and is gathered out of many people, against the mountains of Israel, which have been always waste: but it is brought forth out of the nations, and they shall dwell safely all of them. 
Thou shalt ascend and come like a storm, thou shalt be like a cloud to cover the land, thou, and all thy bands, and many people with thee. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; It shall also come to pass, that at the same time shall things come into thy mind, and thou shalt think an evil thought: 
And thou shalt say, I will go up to the land of unwalled villages; I will go to them that are at rest, that dwell safely, all of them dwelling without walls, and having neither 
843, cities which he had taken from mount Ephraim, and renewed the altar of the LORD, that was before the porch of the LORD. 
And he gathered all Judah and Benjamin, and the strangers with them out of Ephraim and Manasseh, and out of Simeon: for they fell to him out of Israel in abundance, when they saw that the LORD his God was with him. 
So they gathered themselves together at Jerusalem in the third month, in the fifteenth year of the reign of Asa. 
And they offered unto the LORD the same time, of the spoil which they had brought, seven hundred oxen and seven thousand sheep. 
And they entered into a covenant to seek the LORD God of their fathers with all their heart and with all their soul; 
That whosoever would not seek the LORD God of Israel should be put to death, whether small or great, whether man or woman. 
And they sware unto 
1006,e Creator of the ends of the earth, fainteth not, neither is weary? there is no searching of his understanding. 
He giveth power to the faint; and to them that have no might he increaseth strength. 
Even the youths shall faint and be weary, and the young men shall utterly fall: 
But they that wait upon the LORD shall renew their strength; they shall mount up with wings as eagles; they shall run, and not be weary; and they shall walk, and not faint. 
Keep silence before me, O islands; and let the people renew their strength: let them come near; then let them speak: let us come near together to judgment. 
Who raised up the righteous man from the east, called him to his foot, gave the nations before him, and made him rule over kings? he gave them as the dust to his sword, and as driven stubble to his bow. 
He pursued them, and passed safely; even by the way that he had not gone with his feet. 
Who hath wrought and done it, calling the generations from the beginning? I the LORD, the first, and w
843,escore and two weeks: the street shall be built again, and the wall, even in troublous times. 
And after threescore and two weeks shall Messiah be cut off, but not for himself: and the people of the prince that shall come shall destroy the city and the sanctuary; and the end thereof shall be with a flood, and unto the end of the war desolations are determined. 
And he shall confirm the covenant with many for one week: and in the midst of the week he shall cause the sacrifice and the oblation to cease, and for the overspreading of abominations he shall make it desolate, even until the consummation, and that determined shall be poured upon the desolate. 
In the third year of Cyrus king of Persia a thing was revealed unto Daniel, whose name was called Belteshazzar; and the thing was true, but the time appointed was long: and he unders
954, a wife he kept sheep. 
And by a prophet the LORD brought Israel out of Egypt, and by a prophet was he preserved. 
Ephraim provoked him to anger most bitterly: therefore shall he leave his blood upon him, and his reproach shall his LORD return unto him. 
When Ephraim spake trembling, he exalted himself in Israel; but when he offended in Baal, he died. 
And now they sin more and more, and have made them molten images of their silver, and idols according to their own understanding, all of it the work of the craftsmen: they say of them, Let the men that sacrifice kiss the calves. 
Therefore they shall be as the morning cloud and as the early dew that passeth away, as the chaff that is driven with the whirlwind out of the floor, and as the smoke out of the chimney. 
Yet I am the LORD thy God from the land of Egypt, and thou shalt know no god but me: for there is no saviour beside me. 
I did know thee in the wilderness, in the land of great drou
741, and brass as rotten wood. 
The arrow cannot make him flee: slingstones are turned with him into stubble. 
Darts are counted as stubble: he laugheth at the shaking of a spear. 
Sharp stones are under him: he spreadeth sharp pointed things upon the mire. 
He maketh the deep to boil like a pot: he maketh the sea like a pot of ointment. 
He maketh a path to shine after him; one would think the deep to be hoary. 
Upon earth there is not his like, who is made without fear. 
He beholdeth all high things: he is a king over all the children of pride. 
Then Job answered the LORD, and said, 
I know that thou canst do every thing, and that no thought can be withholden from thee. 
Who is he that hideth counsel without knowledge? therefore have
902,eat offering; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he set the laver between the tent of the congregation and the altar, and put water there, to wash withal. 
And Moses and Aaron and his sons washed their hands and their feet thereat: 
When they went into the tent of the congregation, and when they came near unto the altar, they washed; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he reared up the court round about the tabernacle and the altar, and set up the hanging of the court gate. So Moses finished the work. 
Then a cloud covered the tent of the congregation, and the glory of the LORD filled the tabernacle. 
And Moses was not able to enter into the tent of the congregation, because the cloud abode thereon, and the glory of the LORD filled the tabernacle. 
And when the cloud was taken up from over the tabernacle, the children of Israel went onward in all their journeys: 
But if the cloud were not tak
793,And Aholibamah bare Jeush, and Jaalam, and Korah: these are the sons of Esau, which were born unto him in the land of Canaan. 
And Esau took his wives, and his sons, and his daughters, and all the persons of his house, and his cattle, and all his beasts, and all his substance, which he had got in the land of Canaan; and went into the country from the face of his brother Jacob. 
For their riches were more than that they might dwell together; and the land wherein they were strangers could not bear them because of their cattle. 
Thus dwelt Esau in mount Seir: Esau is Edom. 
And these are the generations of Esau the father of the Edomites in mount Seir: 
These are the names of Esau's sons; Eliphaz the son of Adah the wife of Esau, Reuel the son of Bashemath the wife of Esau. 
And the so
842,t is written, The first man Adam was made a living soul; the last Adam was made a quickening spirit. 
Howbeit that was not first which is spiritual, but that which is natural; and afterward that which is spiritual. 
The first man is of the earth, earthy; the second man is the Lord from heaven. 
As is the earthy, such are they also that are earthy: and as is the heavenly, such are they also that are heavenly. 
And as we have borne the image of the earthy, we shall also bear the image of the heavenly. 
Now this I say, brethren, that flesh and blood cannot inherit the kingdom of God; neither doth corruption inherit incorruption. 
Behold, I shew you a mystery; We shall not all sleep, but we shall all be changed, 
In a moment, in the twinkling of an eye, at the last trump: for the trumpet shall sound, and the dead shall be raised incor
754,Timnah, duke Alvah, duke Jetheth, 
Duke Aholibamah, duke Elah, duke Pinon, 
Duke Kenaz, duke Teman, duke Mibzar, 
Duke Magdiel, duke Iram: these be the dukes of Edom, according to their habitations in the land of their possession: he is Esau the father of the Edomites. 
And Jacob dwelt in the land wherein his father was a stranger, in the land of Canaan. 
These are the generations of Jacob. Joseph, being seventeen years old, was feeding the flock with his brethren; and the lad was with the sons of Bilhah, and with the sons of Zilpah, his father's wives: and Joseph brought unto his father their evil report. 
Now Israel loved Joseph more than all his children, because he was the son of his old age: and he made him a coat of many colours. 
And whe
1079,ot to be done. 
And Abimelech said unto Abraham, What sawest thou, that thou hast done this thing? 
And Abraham said, Because I thought, Surely the fear of God is not in this place; and they will slay me for my wife's sake. 
And yet indeed she is my sister; she is the daughter of my father, but not the daughter of my mother; and she became my wife. 
And it came to pass, when God caused me to wander from my father's house, that I said unto her, This is thy kindness which thou shalt shew unto me; at every place whither we shall come, say of me, He is my brother. 
And Abimelech took sheep, and oxen, and menservants, and womenservants, and gave them unto Abraham, and restored him Sarah his wife. 
And Abimelech said, Behold, my land is before thee: dwell where it pleaseth thee. 
And unto Sarah he said, Behold, I have given thy brother a thousand pieces of silver: behold, he is to thee a covering of the eyes, unto all that are with thee, and with all other: thus she was reproved. 
So Abraham prayed unto God: and God healed Abimelech, and his wife, and his maidservants;
1049,fast that I have chosen? to loose the bands of wickedness, to undo the heavy burdens, and to let the oppressed go free, and that ye break every yoke? 
Is it not to deal thy bread to the hungry, and that thou bring the poor that are cast out to thy house? when thou seest the naked, that thou cover him; and that thou hide not thyself from thine own flesh? 
Then shall thy light break forth as the morning, and thine health shall spring forth speedily: and thy righteousness shall go before thee; the glory of the LORD shall be thy rereward. 
Then shalt thou call, and the LORD shall answer; thou shalt cry, and he shall say, Here I am. If thou take away from the midst of thee the yoke, the putting forth of the finger, and speaking vanity; 
And if thou draw out thy soul to the hungry, and satisfy the afflicted soul; then shall thy light rise in obscurity, and thy darkness be as the noon day: 
And the LORD shall guide thee continually, and satisfy thy soul in drought, and make fat thy bones: and thou shalt be like a watered garden, and like a 
1038,aim, and the fields of Samaria: and Benjamin shall possess Gilead. 
And the captivity of this host of the children of Israel shall possess that of the Canaanites, even unto Zarephath; and the captivity of Jerusalem, which is in Sepharad, shall possess the cities of the south. 
And saviours shall come up on mount Zion to judge the mount of Esau; and the kingdom shall be the LORD's. 
Now the word of the LORD came unto Jonah the son of Amittai, saying, 
Arise, go to Nineveh, that great city, and cry against it; for their wickedness is come up before me. 
But Jonah rose up to flee unto Tarshish from the presence of the LORD, and went down to Joppa; and he found a ship going to Tarshish: so he paid the fare thereof, and went down into it, to go with them unto Tarshish from the presence of the LORD. 
But the LORD sent out a great wind into the sea, and there was a mighty tempest in the sea, so that the ship was like to be broken. 
Then the mariners were afraid, and cried every man unto his god, and cast forth the wares that were
763,sons to pass through the fire, ye pollute yourselves with all your idols, even unto this day: and shall I be enquired of by you, O house of Israel? As I live, saith the Lord GOD, I will not be enquired of by you. 
And that which cometh into your mind shall not be at all, that ye say, We will be as the heathen, as the families of the countries, to serve wood and stone. 
As I live, saith the Lord GOD, surely with a mighty hand, and with a stretched out arm, and with fury poured out, will I rule over you: 
And I will bring you out from the people, and will gather you out of the countries wherein ye are scattered, with a mighty hand, and with a stretched out arm, and with fury poured out. 
And I will bring you into the wilderness of the people, and there wi
787,th shall rise up in the judgment with the men of this generation, and condemn them: for she came from the utmost parts of the earth to hear the wisdom of Solomon; and, behold, a greater than Solomon is here. 
The men of Nineve shall rise up in the judgment with this generation, and shall condemn it: for they repented at the preaching of Jonas; and, behold, a greater than Jonas is here. 
No man, when he hath lighted a candle, putteth it in a secret place, neither under a bushel, but on a candlestick, that they which come in may see the light. 
The light of the body is the eye: therefore when thine eye is single, thy whole body also is full of light; but when thine eye is evil, thy body also is full of darkness. 
Take heed therefore that the light which is in thee be not darknes
795,ery sabbath, and persuaded the Jews and the Greeks. 
And when Silas and Timotheus were come from Macedonia, Paul was pressed in the spirit, and testified to the Jews that Jesus was Christ. 
And when they opposed themselves, and blasphemed, he shook his raiment, and said unto them, Your blood be upon your own heads; I am clean; from henceforth I will go unto the Gentiles. 
And he departed thence, and entered into a certain man's house, named Justus, one that worshipped God, whose house joined hard to the synagogue. 
And Crispus, the chief ruler of the synagogue, believed on the Lord with all his house; and many of the Corinthians hearing believed, and were baptized. 
Then spake the Lord to Paul in the night by a vision, Be not afraid, but speak, and hold not thy peace: 
For I am with t
858,hich keep the commandments of God, and have the testimony of Jesus Christ. 
And I stood upon the sand of the sea, and saw a beast rise up out of the sea, having seven heads and ten horns, and upon his horns ten crowns, and upon his heads the name of blasphemy. 
And the beast which I saw was like unto a leopard, and his feet were as the feet of a bear, and his mouth as the mouth of a lion: and the dragon gave him his power, and his seat, and great authority. 
And I saw one of his heads as it were wounded to death; and his deadly wound was healed: and all the world wondered after the beast. 
And they worshipped the dragon which gave power unto the beast: and they worshipped the beast, saying, Who is like unto the beast? who is able to make war with him? 
And there was given unto him a mouth speaking great things and blasphemies; and power was given
727,ills, as sheep that have not a shepherd: and the LORD said, These have no master: let them return every man to his house in peace. 
And the king of Israel said unto Jehoshaphat, Did I not tell thee that he would prophesy no good concerning me, but evil? 
And he said, Hear thou therefore the word of the LORD: I saw the LORD sitting on his throne, and all the host of heaven standing by him on his right hand and on his left. 
And the LORD said, Who shall persuade Ahab, that he may go up and fall at Ramothgilead? And one said on this manner, and another said on that manner. 
And there came forth a spirit, and stood before the LORD, and said, I will persuade him. 
And the LORD said unto him, Wherewith? And he said, I will 
1048,ust me through therewith; lest these uncircumcised come and thrust me through, and abuse me. But his armourbearer would not; for he was sore afraid. Therefore Saul took a sword, and fell upon it. 
And when his armourbearer saw that Saul was dead, he fell likewise upon his sword, and died with him. 
So Saul died, and his three sons, and his armourbearer, and all his men, that same day together. 
And when the men of Israel that were on the other side of the valley, and they that were on the other side Jordan, saw that the men of Israel fled, and that Saul and his sons were dead, they forsook the cities, and fled; and the Philistines came and dwelt in them. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, when the Philistines came to strip the slain, that they found Saul and his three sons fallen in mount Gilboa. 
And they cut off his head, and stripped off his armour, and sent into the land of the Philistines round about, to publish it in the house of their idols, and among the people. 
And they put his armour in the house of Ashtaroth: and they f
938,t. 
And in the eleventh year of Zedekiah, in the fourth month, the ninth day of the month, the city was broken up. 
And all the princes of the king of Babylon came in, and sat in the middle gate, even Nergalsharezer, Samgarnebo, Sarsechim, Rabsaris, Nergalsharezer, Rabmag, with all the residue of the princes of the king of Babylon. 
And it came to pass, that when Zedekiah the king of Judah saw them, and all the men of war, then they fled, and went forth out of the city by night, by the way of the king's garden, by the gate betwixt the two walls: and he went out the way of the plain. 
But the Chaldeans' army pursued after them, and overtook Zedekiah in the plains of Jericho: and when they had taken him, they brought him up to Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon to Riblah in the land of Hamath, where he gave judgment upon him. 
Then the king of Babylon slew the sons of Zedekiah in Riblah before his eyes: also the king of Babylon sl
752,vineyards and fields at the same time. 
Now Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon gave charge concerning Jeremiah to Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard, saying, 
Take him, and look well to him, and do him no harm; but do unto him even as he shall say unto thee. 
So Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard sent, and Nebushasban, Rabsaris, and Nergalsharezer, Rabmag, and all the king of Babylon's princes; 
Even they sent, and took Jeremiah out of the court of the prison, and committed him unto Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan, that he should carry him home: so he dwelt among the people. 
Now the word of the LORD came unto Jeremiah, while he was shut up in the court of the prison, saying, 
Go and speak to Ebedmelech the Ethiopian, saying, Th
965,, Ye sought for David in times past to be king over you: 
Now then do it: for the LORD hath spoken of David, saying, By the hand of my servant David I will save my people Israel out of the hand of the Philistines, and out of the hand of all their enemies. 
And Abner also spake in the ears of Benjamin: and Abner went also to speak in the ears of David in Hebron all that seemed good to Israel, and that seemed good to the whole house of Benjamin. 
So Abner came to David to Hebron, and twenty men with him. And David made Abner and the men that were with him a feast. 
And Abner said unto David, I will arise and go, and will gather all Israel unto my lord the king, that they may make a league with thee, and that thou mayest reign over all that thine heart desireth. And David sent Abner away; and he went in peace. 
And, behold, the servants of David and Joab came from pursuing a troop, and brought in a great spoil with them: but Abner was not with David in H
832,al: 
And I will turn thee back, and put hooks into thy jaws, and I will bring thee forth, and all thine army, horses and horsemen, all of them clothed with all sorts of armour, even a great company with bucklers and shields, all of them handling swords: 
Persia, Ethiopia, and Libya with them; all of them with shield and helmet: 
Gomer, and all his bands; the house of Togarmah of the north quarters, and all his bands: and many people with thee. 
Be thou prepared, and prepare for thyself, thou, and all thy company that are assembled unto thee, and be thou a guard unto them. 
After many days thou shalt be visited: in the latter years thou shalt come into the land that is brought back from the sword, and is gathered out of many people, against the mountains of Israel, which have been always waste: but it is brought forth out
818,ver, and from half Gilead, even unto the river Jabbok, which is the border of the children of Ammon; 
And from the plain to the sea of Chinneroth on the east, and unto the sea of the plain, even the salt sea on the east, the way to Bethjeshimoth; and from the south, under Ashdothpisgah: 
And the coast of Og king of Bashan, which was of the remnant of the giants, that dwelt at Ashtaroth and at Edrei, 
And reigned in mount Hermon, and in Salcah, and in all Bashan, unto the border of the Geshurites and the Maachathites, and half Gilead, the border of Sihon king of Heshbon. 
Them did Moses the servant of the LORD and the children of Israel smite: and Moses the servant of the LORD gave it for a possession unto the Reubenites, and the Gadites, and the half tribe of Manasseh. 
And these are the kings of the countr
932,th us, when we obey the voice of the LORD our God. 
And it came to pass after ten days, that the word of the LORD came unto Jeremiah. 
Then called he Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces which were with him, and all the people from the least even to the greatest, 
And said unto them, Thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel, unto whom ye sent me to present your supplication before him; 
If ye will still abide in this land, then will I build you, and not pull you down, and I will plant you, and not pluck you up: for I repent me of the evil that I have done unto you. 
Be not afraid of the king of Babylon, of whom ye are afraid; be not afraid of him, saith the LORD: for I am with you to save you, and to deliver you from his hand. 
And I will shew mercies unto you, that he may have mercy upon you, and cause you to return to your own land. 
But if ye say, We will not dwell in this land, neither obey t
833,ey are written in the book of the kings of Judah and Israel. 
And Asa in the thirty and ninth year of his reign was diseased in his feet, until his disease was exceeding great: yet in his disease he sought not to the LORD, but to the physicians. 
And Asa slept with his fathers, and died in the one and fortieth year of his reign. 
And they buried him in his own sepulchres, which he had made for himself in the city of David, and laid him in the bed which was filled with sweet odours and divers kinds of spices prepared by the apothecaries' art: and they made a very great burning for him. 
And Jehoshaphat his son reigned in his stead, and strengthened himself against Israel. 
And he placed forces in all the fenced cities of Judah, and set garrisons in the land of Judah, and in the cities of Ephraim, which Asa his father had t
1007,hesying of Haggai the prophet and Zechariah the son of Iddo. And they builded, and finished it, according to the commandment of the God of Israel, and according to the commandment of Cyrus, and Darius, and Artaxerxes king of Persia. 
And this house was finished on the third day of the month Adar, which was in the sixth year of the reign of Darius the king. 
And the children of Israel, the priests, and the Levites, and the rest of the children of the captivity, kept the dedication of this house of God with joy. 
And offered at the dedication of this house of God an hundred bullocks, two hundred rams, four hundred lambs; and for a sin offering for all Israel, twelve he goats, according to the number of the tribes of Israel. 
And they set the priests in their divisions, and the Levites in their courses, for the service of God, which is at Jerusalem; as it is written in the book of Moses. 
And the children of the captivity kept the passover upon the fourteenth day of the first month. 
For the pri
783,e children of Israel, and the stranger that sojourneth among them; seeing all the people were in ignorance. 
And if any soul sin through ignorance, then he shall bring a she goat of the first year for a sin offering. 
And the priest shall make an atonement for the soul that sinneth ignorantly, when he sinneth by ignorance before the LORD, to make an atonement for him; and it shall be forgiven him. 
Ye shall have one law for him that sinneth through ignorance, both for him that is born among the children of Israel, and for the stranger that sojourneth among them. 
But the soul that doeth ought presumptuously, whether he be born in the land, or a stranger, the same reproacheth the LORD; and that soul shall be cut off from among his people. 
Because he hath despised the word 
949,ud happy; yea, they that work wickedness are set up; yea, they that tempt God are even delivered. 
Then they that feared the LORD spake often one to another: and the LORD hearkened, and heard it, and a book of remembrance was written before him for them that feared the LORD, and that thought upon his name. 
And they shall be mine, saith the LORD of hosts, in that day when I make up my jewels; and I will spare them, as a man spareth his own son that serveth him. 
Then shall ye return, and discern between the righteous and the wicked, between him that serveth God and him that serveth him not. 
For, behold, the day cometh, that shall burn as an oven; and all the proud, yea, and all that do wickedly, shall be stubble: and the day that cometh shall burn them up, saith the LORD of hosts, that it shall leave them neither root nor branch. 
But unto you that fear my name shall the Sun of righteousness arise with healing in his wings; and ye sha
1001,e ground, and thy speech shall whisper out of the dust. 
Moreover the multitude of thy strangers shall be like small dust, and the multitude of the terrible ones shall be as chaff that passeth away: yea, it shall be at an instant suddenly. 
Thou shalt be visited of the LORD of hosts with thunder, and with earthquake, and great noise, with storm and tempest, and the flame of devouring fire. 
And the multitude of all the nations that fight against Ariel, even all that fight against her and her munition, and that distress her, shall be as a dream of a night vision. 
It shall even be as when an hungry man dreameth, and, behold, he eateth; but he awaketh, and his soul is empty: or as when a thirsty man dreameth, and, behold, he drinketh; but he awaketh, and, behold, he is faint, and his soul hath appetite: so shall the multitude of all the nations be, that fight against mount Zion. 
Stay yourselves, and wonder; cry ye out, and cry: they are drunken, but not with wine; they stagger, but not w
813,riah, the son of Benaiah, the son of Jeiel, the son of Mattaniah, a Levite of the sons of Asaph, came the Spirit of the LORD in the midst of the congregation; 
And he said, Hearken ye, all Judah, and ye inhabitants of Jerusalem, and thou king Jehoshaphat, Thus saith the LORD unto you, Be not afraid nor dismayed by reason of this great multitude; for the battle is not yours, but God's. 
To morrow go ye down against them: behold, they come up by the cliff of Ziz; and ye shall find them at the end of the brook, before the wilderness of Jeruel. 
Ye shall not need to fight in this battle: set yourselves, stand ye still, and see the salvation of the LORD with you, O Judah and Jerusalem: fear not, nor be dismayed; to morrow go out against them: for the LORD will be with you. 
And Jehoshaphat bowed his head wi
789,, O LORD: what wilt thou give? give them a miscarrying womb and dry breasts. 
All their wickedness is in Gilgal: for there I hated them: for the wickedness of their doings I will drive them out of mine house, I will love them no more: all their princes are revolters. 
Ephraim is smitten, their root is dried up, they shall bear no fruit: yea, though they bring forth, yet will I slay even the beloved fruit of their womb. 
My God will cast them away, because they did not hearken unto him: and they shall be wanderers among the nations. 
Israel is an empty vine, he bringeth forth fruit unto himself: according to the multitude of his fruit he hath increased the altars; according to the goodness of his land they have made goodly images. 
Their heart is divided; now shall they be found 
854,n. 
And the sons of Appaim; Ishi. And the sons of Ishi; Sheshan. And the children of Sheshan; Ahlai. 
And the sons of Jada the brother of Shammai; Jether, and Jonathan: and Jether died without children. 
And the sons of Jonathan; Peleth, and Zaza. These were the sons of Jerahmeel. 
Now Sheshan had no sons, but daughters. And Sheshan had a servant, an Egyptian, whose name was Jarha. 
And Sheshan gave his daughter to Jarha his servant to wife; and she bare him Attai. 
And Attai begat Nathan, and Nathan begat Zabad, 
And Zabad begat Ephlal, and Ephlal begat Obed, 
And Obed begat Jehu, and Jehu begat Azariah, 
And Azariah begat Helez, and Helez begat Eleasah, 
And Eleasah begat Sisamai, and Sisamai begat Shallum, 
And Shallum begat Jekamiah, and Jekamiah begat Elishama. 
Now the sons of Caleb the brother of Jerahmeel were, Mesha his firstborn, wh
955,stroyed in the midst of them. 
Thus they inclosed the Benjamites round about, and chased them, and trode them down with ease over against Gibeah toward the sunrising. 
And there fell of Benjamin eighteen thousand men; all these were men of valour. 
And they turned and fled toward the wilderness unto the rock of Rimmon: and they gleaned of them in the highways five thousand men; and pursued hard after them unto Gidom, and slew two thousand men of them. 
So that all which fell that day of Benjamin were twenty and five thousand men that drew the sword; all these were men of valour. 
But six hundred men turned and fled to the wilderness unto the rock Rimmon, and abode in the rock Rimmon four months. 
And the men of Israel turned again upon the children of Benjamin, and smote them with the edge of the sword, as well the men of every city, as the beast, and all that came to hand: also they set on fire all the cities that they came to. 
Now the men
867,cked. 
I was at ease, but he hath broken me asunder: he hath also taken me by my neck, and shaken me to pieces, and set me up for his mark. 
His archers compass me round about, he cleaveth my reins asunder, and doth not spare; he poureth out my gall upon the ground. 
He breaketh me with breach upon breach, he runneth upon me like a giant. 
I have sewed sackcloth upon my skin, and defiled my horn in the dust. 
My face is foul with weeping, and on my eyelids is the shadow of death; 
Not for any injustice in mine hands: also my prayer is pure. 
O earth, cover not thou my blood, and let my cry have no place. 
Also now, behold, my witness is in heaven, and my record is on high. 
My friends scorn me: but mine eye poureth out tears unto God. 
O that one might plead for a man with God, as a man pleadeth for his neighbour! 
When a few years are come, then I shall 
964,ein we went, and among all the people through whom we passed: 
And the LORD drave out from before us all the people, even the Amorites which dwelt in the land: therefore will we also serve the LORD; for he is our God. 
And Joshua said unto the people, Ye cannot serve the LORD: for he is an holy God; he is a jealous God; he will not forgive your transgressions nor your sins. 
If ye forsake the LORD, and serve strange gods, then he will turn and do you hurt, and consume you, after that he hath done you good. 
And the people said unto Joshua, Nay; but we will serve the LORD. 
And Joshua said unto the people, Ye are witnesses against yourselves that ye have chosen you the LORD, to serve him. And they said, We are witnesses. 
Now therefore put away, said he, the strange gods which are among you, and incline your heart unto the LORD God of Israel. 
And the people said unto Joshua, The LORD our God will we serve, and his voice will we obey. 
So Joshua made 
1052,? And the Lord said, I am Jesus whom thou persecutest: it is hard for thee to kick against the pricks. 
And he trembling and astonished said, Lord, what wilt thou have me to do? And the Lord said unto him, Arise, and go into the city, and it shall be told thee what thou must do. 
And the men which journeyed with him stood speechless, hearing a voice, but seeing no man. 
And Saul arose from the earth; and when his eyes were opened, he saw no man: but they led him by the hand, and brought him into Damascus. 
And he was three days without sight, and neither did eat nor drink. 
And there was a certain disciple at Damascus, named Ananias; and to him said the Lord in a vision, Ananias. And he said, Behold, I am here, Lord. 
And the Lord said unto him, Arise, and go into the street which is called Straight, and enquire in the house of Judas for one called Saul, of Tarsus: for, behold, he prayeth, 
And hath seen in a vision a man named Ananias coming in, and putting his hand on him, that he might receive his sight. 
Then Ananias answered, Lord,
752,ap the harvest of your land, thou shalt not wholly reap the corners of thy field, neither shalt thou gather the gleanings of thy harvest. 
And thou shalt not glean thy vineyard, neither shalt thou gather every grape of thy vineyard; thou shalt leave them for the poor and stranger: I am the LORD your God. 
Ye shall not steal, neither deal falsely, neither lie one to another. 
And ye shall not swear by my name falsely, neither shalt thou profane the name of thy God: I am the LORD. 
Thou shalt not defraud thy neighbour, neither rob him: the wages of him that is hired shall not abide with thee all night until the morning. 
Thou shalt not curse the deaf, nor put a stumblingblock before the blind, but shalt fear thy God: I am the LORD. 
Ye shall do
1046, the meat of the sacrifice made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD: it shall be offered beside the continual burnt offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the seventh day ye shall have an holy convocation; ye shall do no servile work. 
Also in the day of the firstfruits, when ye bring a new meat offering unto the LORD, after your weeks be out, ye shall have an holy convocation; ye shall do no servile work: 
But ye shall offer the burnt offering for a sweet savour unto the LORD; two young bullocks, one ram, seven lambs of the first year; 
And their meat offering of flour mingled with oil, three tenth deals unto one bullock, two tenth deals unto one ram, 
A several tenth deal unto one lamb, throughout the seven lambs; 
And one kid of the goats, to make an atonement for you. 
Ye shall offer them beside the continual burnt offering, and his meat offering, (they shall be unto you without blemish) and their drink offerings. 
And in the seventh month, on the first day of the month, ye shall have an holy convocation; ye shall do n
977,d when they saw him, they were amazed: and his mother said unto him, Son, why hast thou thus dealt with us? behold, thy father and I have sought thee sorrowing. 
And he said unto them, How is it that ye sought me? wist ye not that I must be about my Father's business? 
And they understood not the saying which he spake unto them. 
And he went down with them, and came to Nazareth, and was subject unto them: but his mother kept all these sayings in her heart. 
And Jesus increased in wisdom and stature, and in favour with God and man. 
Now in the fifteenth year of the reign of Tiberius Caesar, Pontius Pilate being governor of Judaea, and Herod being tetrarch of Galilee, and his brother Philip tetrarch of Ituraea and of the region of Trachonitis, and Lysanias the tetrarch of Abilene, 
Annas and Caiaphas being the high priests, the word of God came unto John the son of Zacharias in the wilderness. 
And he came into all the country about Jordan, preaching the baptism of
922,ehold, the LORD hath kept me alive, as he said, these forty and five years, even since the LORD spake this word unto Moses, while the children of Israel wandered in the wilderness: and now, lo, I am this day fourscore and five years old. 
As yet I am as strong this day as I was in the day that Moses sent me: as my strength was then, even so is my strength now, for war, both to go out, and to come in. 
Now therefore give me this mountain, whereof the LORD spake in that day; for thou heardest in that day how the Anakims were there, and that the cities were great and fenced: if so be the LORD will be with me, then I shall be able to drive them out, as the LORD said. 
And Joshua blessed him, and gave unto Caleb the son of Jephunneh Hebron for an inheritance. 
Hebron therefore became the inheritance of Caleb the son of Jephunneh the Kenezite unto this day, because that he wholly followed the LORD God of Israel. 
A
1047,n, What is my trespass? what is my sin, that thou hast so hotly pursued after me? 
Whereas thou hast searched all my stuff, what hast thou found of all thy household stuff? set it here before my brethren and thy brethren, that they may judge betwixt us both. 
This twenty years have I been with thee; thy ewes and thy she goats have not cast their young, and the rams of thy flock have I not eaten. 
That which was torn of beasts I brought not unto thee; I bare the loss of it; of my hand didst thou require it, whether stolen by day, or stolen by night. 
Thus I was; in the day the drought consumed me, and the frost by night; and my sleep departed from mine eyes. 
Thus have I been twenty years in thy house; I served thee fourteen years for thy two daughters, and six years for thy cattle: and thou hast changed my wages ten times. 
Except the God of my father, the God of Abraham, and the fear of Isaac, had been with me, surely thou hadst sent me away now empty. God hath seen mine affliction and the labour of my hands, and rebuked thee yest
752,shittim wood: two cubits and a half shall be the length thereof, and a cubit and a half the breadth thereof, and a cubit and a half the height thereof. 
And thou shalt overlay it with pure gold, within and without shalt thou overlay it, and shalt make upon it a crown of gold round about. 
And thou shalt cast four rings of gold for it, and put them in the four corners thereof; and two rings shall be in the one side of it, and two rings in the other side of it. 
And thou shalt make staves of shittim wood, and overlay them with gold. 
And thou shalt put the staves into the rings by the sides of the ark, that the ark may be borne with them. 
The staves shall be in the rings of the ark: they shall not be taken from it. 
And thou shalt put into the
1033,s of the ephod before it. 
And thou shalt make two rings of gold, and thou shalt put them upon the two ends of the breastplate in the border thereof, which is in the side of the ephod inward. 
And two other rings of gold thou shalt make, and shalt put them on the two sides of the ephod underneath, toward the forepart thereof, over against the other coupling thereof, above the curious girdle of the ephod. 
And they shall bind the breastplate by the rings thereof unto the rings of the ephod with a lace of blue, that it may be above the curious girdle of the ephod, and that the breastplate be not loosed from the ephod. 
And Aaron shall bear the names of the children of Israel in the breastplate of judgment upon his heart, when he goeth in unto the holy place, for a memorial before the LORD continually. 
And thou shalt put in the breastplate of judgment the Urim and the Thummim; and they shall be upon Aaron's heart, when he goeth in before the LORD: and Aaron shall bear the judgment of the children of Israel upon his hear
735,efore God, and the Lord Jesus Christ, who shall judge the quick and the dead at his appearing and his kingdom; 
Preach the word; be instant in season, out of season; reprove, rebuke, exhort with all long suffering and doctrine. 
For the time will come when they will not endure sound doctrine; but after their own lusts shall they heap to themselves teachers, having itching ears; 
And they shall turn away their ears from the truth, and shall be turned unto fables. 
But watch thou in all things, endure afflictions, do the work of an evangelist, make full proof of thy ministry. 
For I am now ready to be offered, and the time of my departure is at hand. 
I have fought a good fight, I have finished my course, I have kept the faith:
737,l I cry: for the fire hath devoured the pastures of the wilderness, and the flame hath burned all the trees of the field. 
The beasts of the field cry also unto thee: for the rivers of waters are dried up, and the fire hath devoured the pastures of the wilderness. 
Blow ye the trumpet in Zion, and sound an alarm in my holy mountain: let all the inhabitants of the land tremble: for the day of the LORD cometh, for it is nigh at hand; 
A day of darkness and of gloominess, a day of clouds and of thick darkness, as the morning spread upon the mountains: a great people and a strong; there hath not been ever the like, neither shall be any more after it, even to the years of many generations. 
A fire devoureth before them; and behind t
888,ehold, I will profane my sanctuary, the excellency of your strength, the desire of your eyes, and that which your soul pitieth; and your sons and your daughters whom ye have left shall fall by the sword. 
And ye shall do as I have done: ye shall not cover your lips, nor eat the bread of men. 
And your tires shall be upon your heads, and your shoes upon your feet: ye shall not mourn nor weep; but ye shall pine away for your iniquities, and mourn one toward another. 
Thus Ezekiel is unto you a sign: according to all that he hath done shall ye do: and when this cometh, ye shall know that I am the Lord GOD. 
Also, thou son of man, shall it not be in the day when I take from them their strength, the joy of their glory, the desire of their eyes, and that whereupon they set their minds, their sons and their daughters, 
That he that escapeth in that day shall come unto thee, to cause
1060,esse: peace, peace be unto thee, and peace be to thine helpers; for thy God helpeth thee. Then David received them, and made them captains of the band. 
And there fell some of Manasseh to David, when he came with the Philistines against Saul to battle: but they helped them not: for the lords of the Philistines upon advisement sent him away, saying, He will fall to his master Saul to the jeopardy of our heads. 
As he went to Ziklag, there fell to him of Manasseh, Adnah, and Jozabad, and Jediael, and Michael, and Jozabad, and Elihu, and Zilthai, captains of the thousands that were of Manasseh. 
And they helped David against the band of the rovers: for they were all mighty men of valour, and were captains in the host. 
For at that time day by day there came to David to help him, until it was a great host, like the host of God. 
And these are the numbers of the bands that were ready armed to the war, and came to David to Hebron, to turn the kingdom of Saul to him, according to the word of the LORD. 
The children of Judah that bare shield and spear 
823, hath laboured under the sun? 
For all his days are sorrows, and his travail grief; yea, his heart taketh not rest in the night. This is also vanity. 
There is nothing better for a man, than that he should eat and drink, and that he should make his soul enjoy good in his labour. This also I saw, that it was from the hand of God. 
For who can eat, or who else can hasten hereunto, more than I? 
For God giveth to a man that is good in his sight wisdom, and knowledge, and joy: but to the sinner he giveth travail, to gather and to heap up, that he may give to him that is good before God. This also is vanity and vexation of spirit. 
To every thing there is a season, and a time to every purpose under the heaven: 
A time to be born, and a time to die; a time to plant, and a time to pluck up that which is planted; 
A tim
1065,ing sin against his servant, against David; because he hath not sinned against thee, and because his works have been to thee-ward very good: 
For he did put his life in his hand, and slew the Philistine, and the LORD wrought a great salvation for all Israel: thou sawest it, and didst rejoice: wherefore then wilt thou sin against innocent blood, to slay David without a cause? 
And Saul hearkened unto the voice of Jonathan: and Saul sware, As the LORD liveth, he shall not be slain. 
And Jonathan called David, and Jonathan shewed him all those things. And Jonathan brought David to Saul, and he was in his presence, as in times past. 
And there was war again: and David went out, and fought with the Philistines, and slew them with a great slaughter; and they fled from him. 
And the evil spirit from the LORD was upon Saul, as he sat in his house with his javelin in his hand: and David played with his hand. 
And Saul sought to smite David even to the wall with the javelin: but he slipped away out of Saul's presence, and he smote the javelin into the wall: a
967,the tabernacle of the congregation, where I will meet with thee: it shall be unto you most holy. 
And as for the perfume which thou shalt make, ye shall not make to yourselves according to the composition thereof: it shall be unto thee holy for the LORD. 
Whosoever shall make like unto that, to smell thereto, shall even be cut off from his people. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
See, I have called by name Bezaleel the son of Uri, the son of Hur, of the tribe of Judah: 
And I have filled him with the spirit of God, in wisdom, and in understanding, and in knowledge, and in all manner of workmanship, 
To devise cunning works, to work in gold, and in silver, and in brass, 
And in cutting of stones, to set them, and in carving of timber, to work in all manner of workmanship. 
And I, behold, I have given with him Aholiab, the son of Ahisamach, of the tribe of Dan: and in the hearts of all that are wise hearted I have put wisdom, that they may make al
728,is mine own, and I have made it for myself. 
But I will put hooks in thy jaws, and I will cause the fish of thy rivers to stick unto thy scales, and I will bring thee up out of the midst of thy rivers, and all the fish of thy rivers shall stick unto thy scales. 
And I will leave thee thrown into the wilderness, thee and all the fish of thy rivers: thou shalt fall upon the open fields; thou shalt not be brought together, nor gathered: I have given thee for meat to the beasts of the field and to the fowls of the heaven. 
And all the inhabitants of Egypt shall know that I am the LORD, because they have been a staff of reed to the house of Israel. 
When they took hold of thee by thy hand, thou didst break, and rend all the
956, me. 
Thy children shall make haste; thy destroyers and they that made thee waste shall go forth of thee. 
Lift up thine eyes round about, and behold: all these gather themselves together, and come to thee. As I live, saith the LORD, thou shalt surely clothe thee with them all, as with an ornament, and bind them on thee, as a bride doeth. 
For thy waste and thy desolate places, and the land of thy destruction, shall even now be too narrow by reason of the inhabitants, and they that swallowed thee up shall be far away. 
The children which thou shalt have, after thou hast lost the other, shall say again in thine ears, The place is too strait for me: give place to me that I may dwell. 
Then shalt thou say in thine heart, Who hath begotten me these, seeing I have lost my children, and am desolate, a captive, and removing to and fro? and who hath brought up these? Behold, I was left alone; these, where had they been? 
Thus saith the Lord GOD, Beho
902,ased; and he that humbleth himself shall be exalted. 
Then said he also to him that bade him, When thou makest a dinner or a supper, call not thy friends, nor thy brethren, neither thy kinsmen, nor thy rich neighbours; lest they also bid thee again, and a recompence be made thee. 
But when thou makest a feast, call the poor, the maimed, the lame, the blind: 
And thou shalt be blessed; for they cannot recompense thee: for thou shalt be recompensed at the resurrection of the just. 
And when one of them that sat at meat with him heard these things, he said unto him, Blessed is he that shall eat bread in the kingdom of God. 
Then said he unto him, A certain man made a great supper, and bade many: 
And sent his servant at supper time to say to them that were bidden, Come; for all things are now ready. 
And they all with one consent began to make excuse. The first said unto him, I have bought a 
831,in it, and there shall be no more utter destruction; but Jerusalem shall be safely inhabited. 
And this shall be the plague wherewith the LORD will smite all the people that have fought against Jerusalem; Their flesh shall consume away while they stand upon their feet, and their eyes shall consume away in their holes, and their tongue shall consume away in their mouth. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that a great tumult from the LORD shall be among them; and they shall lay hold every one on the hand of his neighbour, and his hand shall rise up against the hand of his neighbour. 
And Judah also shall fight at Jerusalem; and the wealth of all the heathen round about shall be gathered together, gold, and silver, and apparel, in great abundance. 
And so shall be the plague of the horse, of the mule, of the camel, an
1038,o that she sitteth upon shall be unclean. 
And whosoever toucheth her bed shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And whosoever toucheth any thing that she sat upon shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And if it be on her bed, or on any thing whereon she sitteth, when he toucheth it, he shall be unclean until the even. 
And if any man lie with her at all, and her flowers be upon him, he shall be unclean seven days; and all the bed whereon he lieth shall be unclean. 
And if a woman have an issue of her blood many days out of the time of her separation, or if it run beyond the time of her separation; all the days of the issue of her uncleanness shall be as the days of her separation: she shall be unclean. 
Every bed whereon she lieth all the days of her issue shall be unto her as the bed of her separation: and whatsoever she sitteth upon shall be unclean, as the uncleanness of her separation. 
And whosoever toucheth those things shall 
749,ell in houses of clay, whose foundation is in the dust, which are crushed before the moth? 
They are destroyed from morning to evening: they perish for ever without any regarding it. 
Doth not their excellency which is in them go away? they die, even without wisdom. 
Call now, if there be any that will answer thee; and to which of the saints wilt thou turn? 
For wrath killeth the foolish man, and envy slayeth the silly one. 
I have seen the foolish taking root: but suddenly I cursed his habitation. 
His children are far from safety, and they are crushed in the gate, neither is there any to deliver them. 
Whose harvest the hungry eateth up, and taketh it even out of the thorns, and the robber swalloweth up their substance. 
Although afflict
1042,t of the children of Judah round about according to their families. 
And unto Caleb the son of Jephunneh he gave a part among the children of Judah, according to the commandment of the LORD to Joshua, even the city of Arba the father of Anak, which city is Hebron. 
And Caleb drove thence the three sons of Anak, Sheshai, and Ahiman, and Talmai, the children of Anak. 
And he went up thence to the inhabitants of Debir: and the name of Debir before was Kirjathsepher. 
And Caleb said, He that smiteth Kirjathsepher, and taketh it, to him will I give Achsah my daughter to wife. 
And Othniel the son of Kenaz, the brother of Caleb, took it: and he gave him Achsah his daughter to wife. 
And it came to pass, as she came unto him, that she moved him to ask of her father a field: and she lighted off her ass; and Caleb said unto her, What wouldest thou? 
Who answered, Give me a blessing; for thou hast given me a south land; give me also springs of water. And he gave her the upper springs, and the nether springs. 
This is the inheritance of 
974,ith thee: I will bring thy seed from the east, and gather thee from the west; 
I will say to the north, Give up; and to the south, Keep not back: bring my sons from far, and my daughters from the ends of the earth; 
Even every one that is called by my name: for I have created him for my glory, I have formed him; yea, I have made him. 
Bring forth the blind people that have eyes, and the deaf that have ears. 
Let all the nations be gathered together, and let the people be assembled: who among them can declare this, and shew us former things? let them bring forth their witnesses, that they may be justified: or let them hear, and say, It is truth. 
Ye are my witnesses, saith the LORD, and my servant whom I have chosen: that ye may know and believe me, and understand that I am he: before me there was no God formed, neither shall there be after me. 
I, even I, am the LORD; and beside me there is no saviour. 
I have declared, and have saved, and I have shewed, when 
862,he host of the Philistines encamped in the valley of Rephaim. 
And David was then in the hold, and the Philistines' garrison was then at Bethlehem. 
And David longed, and said, Oh that one would give me drink of the water of the well of Bethlehem, that is at the gate! 
And the three brake through the host of the Philistines, and drew water out of the well of Bethlehem, that was by the gate, and took it, and brought it to David: but David would not drink of it, but poured it out to the LORD. 
And said, My God forbid it me, that I should do this thing: shall I drink the blood of these men that have put their lives in jeopardy? for with the jeopardy of their lives they brought it. Therefore he would not drink it. These things did these three mightiest. 
And Abishai the brother of Joab, he was chief of the three: for lifting up his spear against three hu
806, my darling from the lions. 
I will give thee thanks in the great congregation: I will praise thee among much people. 
Let not them that are mine enemies wrongfully rejoice over me: neither let them wink with the eye that hate me without a cause. 
For they speak not peace: but they devise deceitful matters against them that are quiet in the land. 
Yea, they opened their mouth wide against me, and said, Aha, aha, our eye hath seen it. 
This thou hast seen, O LORD: keep not silence: O Lord, be not far from me. 
Stir up thyself, and awake to my judgment, even unto my cause, my God and my Lord. 
Judge me, O LORD my God, according to thy righteousness; and let them not rejoice over me. 
Let them not say in their hearts, Ah, so would we have it: let them not say, We have swallowed him up. 
Let them be
1038,he multitude, they went upon the housetop, and let him down through the tiling with his couch into the midst before Jesus. 
And when he saw their faith, he said unto him, Man, thy sins are forgiven thee. 
And the scribes and the Pharisees began to reason, saying, Who is this which speaketh blasphemies? Who can forgive sins, but God alone? 
But when Jesus perceived their thoughts, he answering said unto them, What reason ye in your hearts? 
Whether is easier, to say, Thy sins be forgiven thee; or to say, Rise up and walk? 
But that ye may know that the Son of man hath power upon earth to forgive sins, (he said unto the sick of the palsy,) I say unto thee, Arise, and take up thy couch, and go into thine house. 
And immediately he rose up before them, and took up that whereon he lay, and departed to his own house, glorifying God. 
And they were all amazed, and they glorified God, and were filled with fear, saying, We have seen strange things to day. 
And after these things he went forth, and saw a publican, named Levi, sittin
906,ll give it you. 
Hitherto have ye asked nothing in my name: ask, and ye shall receive, that your joy may be full. 
These things have I spoken unto you in proverbs: but the time cometh, when I shall no more speak unto you in proverbs, but I shall shew you plainly of the Father. 
At that day ye shall ask in my name: and I say not unto you, that I will pray the Father for you: 
For the Father himself loveth you, because ye have loved me, and have believed that I came out from God. 
I came forth from the Father, and am come into the world: again, I leave the world, and go to the Father. 
His disciples said unto him, Lo, now speakest thou plainly, and speakest no proverb. 
Now are we sure that thou knowest all things, and needest not that any man should ask thee: by this we believe that thou camest forth from God. 
Jesus answered them, Do ye now believe? 
Behold, the hour cometh, yea, is now come, 
796,ffer a meat offering of thy firstfruits unto the LORD, thou shalt offer for the meat offering of thy firstfruits green ears of corn dried by the fire, even corn beaten out of full ears. 
And thou shalt put oil upon it, and lay frankincense thereon: it is a meat offering. 
And the priest shall burn the memorial of it, part of the beaten corn thereof, and part of the oil thereof, with all the frankincense thereof: it is an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And if his oblation be a sacrifice of peace offering, if he offer it of the herd; whether it be a male or female, he shall offer it without blemish before the LORD. 
And he shall lay his hand upon the head of his offering, and kill it at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation: and Aaron's sons the priests shall sprinkle the
810,o sockets under another board for his two tenons. 
And for the second side of the tabernacle on the north side there shall be twenty boards: 
And their forty sockets of silver; two sockets under one board, and two sockets under another board. 
And for the sides of the tabernacle westward thou shalt make six boards. 
And two boards shalt thou make for the corners of the tabernacle in the two sides. 
And they shall be coupled together beneath, and they shall be coupled together above the head of it unto one ring: thus shall it be for them both; they shall be for the two corners. 
And they shall be eight boards, and their sockets of silver, sixteen sockets; two sockets under one board, and two sockets under another board. 
And thou shalt make bars of shittim wood; five for the boards of the one side of
778,dah within three days, and be thou here present. 
So Amasa went to assemble the men of Judah: but he tarried longer than the set time which he had appointed him. 
And David said to Abishai, Now shall Sheba the son of Bichri do us more harm than did Absalom: take thou thy lord's servants, and pursue after him, lest he get him fenced cities, and escape us. 
And there went out after him Joab's men, and the Cherethites, and the Pelethites, and all the mighty men: and they went out of Jerusalem, to pursue after Sheba the son of Bichri. 
When they were at the great stone which is in Gibeon, Amasa went before them. And Joab's garment that he had put on was girded unto him, and upon it a girdle with a sword fastened upon his loins in the sheath thereof; and as he went forth i
888, drink, and to send portions, and to make great mirth, because they had understood the words that were declared unto them. 
And on the second day were gathered together the chief of the fathers of all the people, the priests, and the Levites, unto Ezra the scribe, even to understand the words of the law. 
And they found written in the law which the LORD had commanded by Moses, that the children of Israel should dwell in booths in the feast of the seventh month: 
And that they should publish and proclaim in all their cities, and in Jerusalem, saying, Go forth unto the mount, and fetch olive branches, and pine branches, and myrtle branches, and palm branches, and branches of thick trees, to make booths, as it is written. 
So the people went forth, and brought them, and made themselves booths, every one upon the roof of his house, and in their courts, and in the courts of the ho
796, have taken captive of your brethren: for the fierce wrath of the LORD is upon you. 
Then certain of the heads of the children of Ephraim, Azariah the son of Johanan, Berechiah the son of Meshillemoth, and Jehizkiah the son of Shallum, and Amasa the son of Hadlai, stood up against them that came from the war, 
And said unto them, Ye shall not bring in the captives hither: for whereas we have offended against the LORD already, ye intend to add more to our sins and to our trespass: for our trespass is great, and there is fierce wrath against Israel. 
So the armed men left the captives and the spoil before the princes and all the congregation. 
And the men which were expressed by name rose up, and took the captives, and with the spoil clothed all that were naked among them, and arrayed th
766, nor make to yourselves molten gods: I am the LORD your God. 
And if ye offer a sacrifice of peace offerings unto the LORD, ye shall offer it at your own will. 
It shall be eaten the same day ye offer it, and on the morrow: and if ought remain until the third day, it shall be burnt in the fire. 
And if it be eaten at all on the third day, it is abominable; it shall not be accepted. 
Therefore every one that eateth it shall bear his iniquity, because he hath profaned the hallowed thing of the LORD: and that soul shall be cut off from among his people. 
And when ye reap the harvest of your land, thou shalt not wholly reap the corners of thy field, neither shalt thou gather the gleanings of thy harvest. 
And thou shalt not glean thy vineyard, neither shalt th
844,nd the name of his city was Dinhabah. 
And Bela died, and Jobab the son of Zerah of Bozrah reigned in his stead. 
And Jobab died, and Husham of the land of Temani reigned in his stead. 
And Husham died, and Hadad the son of Bedad, who smote Midian in the field of Moab, reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Avith. 
And Hadad died, and Samlah of Masrekah reigned in his stead. 
And Samlah died, and Saul of Rehoboth by the river reigned in his stead. 
And Saul died, and Baalhanan the son of Achbor reigned in his stead. 
And Baalhanan the son of Achbor died, and Hadar reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Pau; and his wife's name was Mehetabel, the daughter of Matred, the daughter of Mezahab. 
And these are the names of the dukes that came of Esau, according to their families, after their places, by their names;
997,u to do to declare my statutes, or that thou shouldest take my covenant in thy mouth? 
Seeing thou hatest instruction, and casteth my words behind thee. 
When thou sawest a thief, then thou consentedst with him, and hast been partaker with adulterers. 
Thou givest thy mouth to evil, and thy tongue frameth deceit. 
Thou sittest and speakest against thy brother; thou slanderest thine own mother's son. 
These things hast thou done, and I kept silence; thou thoughtest that I was altogether such an one as thyself: but I will reprove thee, and set them in order before thine eyes. 
Now consider this, ye that forget God, lest I tear you in pieces, and there be none to deliver. 
Whoso offereth praise glorifieth me: and to him that ordereth his conversation aright will I shew the salvation of God. 
Have mercy upon me, O God, according to thy lovingkindness: according unto the multitude of thy tender mercies blot out my transgressions. 
Wash me throughly from mine iniquity, and cleanse me from
1071, the LORD, as in the days of old, and as in former years. 
And I will come near to you to judgment; and I will be a swift witness against the sorcerers, and against the adulterers, and against false swearers, and against those that oppress the hireling in his wages, the widow, and the fatherless, and that turn aside the stranger from his right, and fear not me, saith the LORD of hosts. 
For I am the LORD, I change not; therefore ye sons of Jacob are not consumed. 
Even from the days of your fathers ye are gone away from mine ordinances, and have not kept them. Return unto me, and I will return unto you, saith the LORD of hosts. But ye said, Wherein shall we return? 
Will a man rob God? Yet ye have robbed me. But ye say, Wherein have we robbed thee? In tithes and offerings. 
Ye are cursed with a curse: for ye have robbed me, even this whole nation. 
Bring ye all the tithes into the storehouse, that there may be meat in mine house, and prove me now herewith, saith the LORD of hosts, if I will not open you the windows of heaven, and pour you out a blessing, 
725,en the scorner is punished, the simple is made wise: and when the wise is instructed, he receiveth knowledge. 
The righteous man wisely considereth the house of the wicked: but God overthroweth the wicked for their wickedness. 
Whoso stoppeth his ears at the cry of the poor, he also shall cry himself, but shall not be heard. 
A gift in secret pacifieth anger: and a reward in the bosom strong wrath. 
It is joy to the just to do judgment: but destruction shall be to the workers of iniquity. 
The man that wandereth out of the way of understanding shall remain in the congregation of the dead. 
He that loveth pleasure shall be a poor man: he that loveth wine and oil shall not be rich. 
The wicked shall be a ransom for th
967,ments. And the angel of the LORD stood by. 
And the angel of the LORD protested unto Joshua, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; If thou wilt walk in my ways, and if thou wilt keep my charge, then thou shalt also judge my house, and shalt also keep my courts, and I will give thee places to walk among these that stand by. 
Hear now, O Joshua the high priest, thou, and thy fellows that sit before thee: for they are men wondered at: for, behold, I will bring forth my servant the BRANCH. 
For behold the stone that I have laid before Joshua; upon one stone shall be seven eyes: behold, I will engrave the graving thereof, saith the LORD of hosts, and I will remove the iniquity of that land in one day. 
In that day, saith the LORD of hosts, shall ye call every man his neighbour under the vine and under the fig tree. 
And the angel that talked with me came again, and waked me, as a man that is wakened out of his sleep. 
And said unto me, What seest thou? And 
885,ay began to wear away, then came the twelve, and said unto him, Send the multitude away, that they may go into the towns and country round about, and lodge, and get victuals: for we are here in a desert place. 
But he said unto them, Give ye them to eat. And they said, We have no more but five loaves and two fishes; except we should go and buy meat for all this people. 
For they were about five thousand men. And he said to his disciples, Make them sit down by fifties in a company. 
And they did so, and made them all sit down. 
Then he took the five loaves and the two fishes, and looking up to heaven, he blessed them, and brake, and gave to the disciples to set before the multitude. 
And they did eat, and were all filled: and there was taken up of fragments that remained to them twelve baskets. 
And it came to pass, as he was alone praying, his disciples were with him: and 
827,ion thereof shall be afraid in himself, because of the counsel of the LORD of hosts, which he hath determined against it. 
In that day shall five cities in the land of Egypt speak the language of Canaan, and swear to the LORD of hosts; one shall be called, The city of destruction. 
In that day shall there be an altar to the LORD in the midst of the land of Egypt, and a pillar at the border thereof to the LORD. 
And it shall be for a sign and for a witness unto the LORD of hosts in the land of Egypt: for they shall cry unto the LORD because of the oppressors, and he shall send them a saviour, and a great one, and he shall deliver them. 
And the LORD shall be known to Egypt, and the Egyptians shall know the LORD in that day, and shall do sacrifice and oblation; yea, they shall vow a vow unto the LORD, and perform it. 
788,ed in their own counsels. 
Oh that my people had hearkened unto me, and Israel had walked in my ways! 
I should soon have subdued their enemies, and turned my hand against their adversaries. 
The haters of the LORD should have submitted themselves unto him: but their time should have endured for ever. 
He should have fed them also with the finest of the wheat: and with honey out of the rock should I have satisfied thee. 
God standeth in the congregation of the mighty; he judgeth among the gods. 
How long will ye judge unjustly, and accept the persons of the wicked? Selah. 
Defend the poor and fatherless: do justice to the afflicted and needy. 
Deliver the poor and needy: rid them out of the hand of the wicked. 
They know not, neither will they understand; they walk on in darkne
744,l the fourteenth day of the same month: and the whole assembly of the congregation of Israel shall kill it in the evening. 
And they shall take of the blood, and strike it on the two side posts and on the upper door post of the houses, wherein they shall eat it. 
And they shall eat the flesh in that night, roast with fire, and unleavened bread; and with bitter herbs they shall eat it. 
Eat not of it raw, nor sodden at all with water, but roast with fire; his head with his legs, and with the purtenance thereof. 
And ye shall let nothing of it remain until the morning; and that which remaineth of it until the morning ye shall burn with fire. 
And thus shall ye eat it; with your loins girded, your shoes on your feet, and your staff in yo
1021,eh stood, and cried with a loud voice in the Jews' language, and said, Hear ye the words of the great king, the king of Assyria. 
Thus saith the king, Let not Hezekiah deceive you: for he shall not be able to deliver you. 
Neither let Hezekiah make you trust in the LORD, saying, The LORD will surely deliver us: this city shall not be delivered into the hand of the king of Assyria. 
Hearken not to Hezekiah: for thus saith the king of Assyria, Make an agreement with me by a present, and come out to me: and eat ye every one of his vine, and every one of his fig tree, and drink ye every one the waters of his own cistern; 
Until I come and take you away to a land like your own land, a land of corn and wine, a land of bread and vineyards. 
Beware lest Hezekiah persuade you, saying, the LORD will deliver us. Hath any of the gods of the nations delivered his land out of the hand of the king of Assyria? 
Where are the gods of Hamath and Arphad? where are the gods of Sepharvaim? and have they delivered Samaria out o
782,inate love than she, and in her whoredoms more than her sister in her whoredoms. 
She doted upon the Assyrians her neighbours, captains and rulers clothed most gorgeously, horsemen riding upon horses, all of them desirable young men. 
Then I saw that she was defiled, that they took both one way, 
And that she increased her whoredoms: for when she saw men pourtrayed upon the wall, the images of the Chaldeans pourtrayed with vermilion, 
Girded with girdles upon their loins, exceeding in dyed attire upon their heads, all of them princes to look to, after the manner of the Babylonians of Chaldea, the land of their nativity: 
And as soon as she saw them with her eyes, she doted upon them, and sent messengers unto them into Chaldea. 
And the Babylonians came to her into the bed
821,bbaths of the LORD, and beside your gifts, and beside all your vows, and beside all your freewill offerings, which ye give unto the LORD. 
Also in the fifteenth day of the seventh month, when ye have gathered in the fruit of the land, ye shall keep a feast unto the LORD seven days: on the first day shall be a sabbath, and on the eighth day shall be a sabbath. 
And ye shall take you on the first day the boughs of goodly trees, branches of palm trees, and the boughs of thick trees, and willows of the brook; and ye shall rejoice before the LORD your God seven days. 
And ye shall keep it a feast unto the LORD seven days in the year. It shall be a statute for ever in your generations: ye shall celebrate it in the seventh month. 
Ye shall dwell in booths seven days; all that are Israelites born shall dwell in booths
969,rple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And they wrought onyx stones inclosed in ouches of gold, graven, as signets are graven, with the names of the children of Israel. 
And he put them on the shoulders of the ephod, that they should be stones for a memorial to the children of Israel; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he made the breastplate of cunning work, like the work of the ephod; of gold, blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen. 
It was foursquare; they made the breastplate double: a span was the length thereof, and a span the breadth thereof, being doubled. 
And they set in it four rows of stones: the first row was a sardius, a topaz, and a carbuncle: this was the first row. 
And the second row, an emerald, a sapphire, and a diamond. 
And the third row, a ligure, an agate, and an amethyst. 
And the fourth row, a beryl, an onyx, and a jasper: they were inclosed in ouches of gold in their inclosings. 
And
906, is the patience of the saints: here are they that keep the commandments of God, and the faith of Jesus. 
And I heard a voice from heaven saying unto me, Write, Blessed are the dead which die in the Lord from henceforth: Yea, saith the Spirit, that they may rest from their labours; and their works do follow them. 
And I looked, and behold a white cloud, and upon the cloud one sat like unto the Son of man, having on his head a golden crown, and in his hand a sharp sickle. 
And another angel came out of the temple, crying with a loud voice to him that sat on the cloud, Thrust in thy sickle, and reap: for the time is come for thee to reap; for the harvest of the earth is ripe. 
And he that sat on the cloud thrust in his sickle on the earth; and the earth was reaped. 
And another angel came out of the temple which is in heaven, he also having a sharp sickle. 
And another angel came out from the al
913,at the last day. 
For my flesh is meat indeed, and my blood is drink indeed. 
He that eateth my flesh, and drinketh my blood, dwelleth in me, and I in him. 
As the living Father hath sent me, and I live by the Father: so he that eateth me, even he shall live by me. 
This is that bread which came down from heaven: not as your fathers did eat manna, and are dead: he that eateth of this bread shall live for ever. 
These things said he in the synagogue, as he taught in Capernaum. 
Many therefore of his disciples, when they had heard this, said, This is an hard saying; who can hear it? 
When Jesus knew in himself that his disciples murmured at it, he said unto them, Doth this offend you? 
What and if ye shall see the Son of man ascend up where he was before? 
It is the spirit that quickeneth; the flesh profiteth nothing: the words that I speak unto you, they are spirit, and they are life. 
But there are s
942,ajoth, to be his wife. 
And Jacob went out from Beersheba, and went toward Haran. 
And he lighted upon a certain place, and tarried there all night, because the sun was set; and he took of the stones of that place, and put them for his pillows, and lay down in that place to sleep. 
And he dreamed, and behold a ladder set up on the earth, and the top of it reached to heaven: and behold the angels of God ascending and descending on it. 
And, behold, the LORD stood above it, and said, I am the LORD God of Abraham thy father, and the God of Isaac: the land whereon thou liest, to thee will I give it, and to thy seed; 
And thy seed shall be as the dust of the earth, and thou shalt spread abroad to the west, and to the east, and to the north, and to the south: and in thee and in thy seed shall all the families of the earth be blessed. 
And, behold, I am with thee, and will keep thee in all places whither thou goest, and will bring thee
990,root out, and to pull down, and to destroy, and to throw down, to build, and to plant. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, Jeremiah, what seest thou? And I said, I see a rod of an almond tree. 
Then said the LORD unto me, Thou hast well seen: for I will hasten my word to perform it. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me the second time, saying, What seest thou? And I said, I see a seething pot; and the face thereof is toward the north. 
Then the LORD said unto me, Out of the north an evil shall break forth upon all the inhabitants of the land. 
For, lo, I will call all the families of the kingdoms of the north, saith the LORD; and they shall come, and they shall set every one his throne at the entering of the gates of Jerusalem, and against all the walls thereof round about, and against all the cities of Judah. 
And I will utter my judgments against them touching all their wickedness, who have forsaken me, and have burned incense unto other gods, and worship
1059,eroboam, as a man taketh away dung, till it be all gone. 
Him that dieth of Jeroboam in the city shall the dogs eat; and him that dieth in the field shall the fowls of the air eat: for the LORD hath spoken it. 
Arise thou therefore, get thee to thine own house: and when thy feet enter into the city, the child shall die. 
And all Israel shall mourn for him, and bury him: for he only of Jeroboam shall come to the grave, because in him there is found some good thing toward the LORD God of Israel in the house of Jeroboam. 
Moreover the LORD shall raise him up a king over Israel, who shall cut off the house of Jeroboam that day: but what? even now. 
For the LORD shall smite Israel, as a reed is shaken in the water, and he shall root up Israel out of this good land, which he gave to their fathers, and shall scatter them beyond the river, because they have made their groves, provoking the LORD to anger. 
And he shall give Israel up because of the sins of Jeroboam, who did sin, and who made Israel to sin. 
And Jeroboam's wife arose, and departed, and 
1045,ree nights. 
Then Jonah prayed unto the LORD his God out of the fish's belly, 
And said, I cried by reason of mine affliction unto the LORD, and he heard me; out of the belly of hell cried I, and thou heardest my voice. 
For thou hadst cast me into the deep, in the midst of the seas; and the floods compassed me about: all thy billows and thy waves passed over me. 
Then I said, I am cast out of thy sight; yet I will look again toward thy holy temple. 
The waters compassed me about, even to the soul: the depth closed me round about, the weeds were wrapped about my head. 
I went down to the bottoms of the mountains; the earth with her bars was about me for ever: yet hast thou brought up my life from corruption, O LORD my God. 
When my soul fainted within me I remembered the LORD: and my prayer came in unto thee, into thine holy temple. 
They that observe lying vanities forsake their own mercy. 
But I will sacrifice unto thee with the voice of thanksgiving; I will pay that that I have vowed. Salvation is of the LORD. 
And the LORD sp
811,in Baal, and caused my people Israel to err. 
I have seen also in the prophets of Jerusalem an horrible thing: they commit adultery, and walk in lies: they strengthen also the hands of evildoers, that none doth return from his wickedness; they are all of them unto me as Sodom, and the inhabitants thereof as Gomorrah. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts concerning the prophets; Behold, I will feed them with wormwood, and make them drink the water of gall: for from the prophets of Jerusalem is profaneness gone forth into all the land. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, Hearken not unto the words of the prophets that prophesy unto you: they make you vain: they speak a vision of their own heart, and not out of the mouth of the LORD. 
They say still unto them that despise me, The LORD hath said, Ye shall 
902,p himself to take hold of thee: for thou hast hid thy face from us, and hast consumed us, because of our iniquities. 
But now, O LORD, thou art our father; we are the clay, and thou our potter; and we all are the work of thy hand. 
Be not wroth very sore, O LORD, neither remember iniquity for ever: behold, see, we beseech thee, we are all thy people. 
Thy holy cities are a wilderness, Zion is a wilderness, Jerusalem a desolation. 
Our holy and our beautiful house, where our fathers praised thee, is burned up with fire: and all our pleasant things are laid waste. 
Wilt thou refrain thyself for these things, O LORD? wilt thou hold thy peace, and afflict us very sore? 
I am sought of them that asked not for me; I am found of them that sought me not: I said, Behold me, behold me, unto a nation that was not called by my name. 
I have spread out my hands all the day unto a rebellious people, whi
841,he Gentiles had also received the word of God. 
And when Peter was come up to Jerusalem, they that were of the circumcision contended with him, 
Saying, Thou wentest in to men uncircumcised, and didst eat with them. 
But Peter rehearsed the matter from the beginning, and expounded it by order unto them, saying, 
I was in the city of Joppa praying: and in a trance I saw a vision, A certain vessel descend, as it had been a great sheet, let down from heaven by four corners; and it came even to me: 
Upon the which when I had fastened mine eyes, I considered, and saw fourfooted beasts of the earth, and wild beasts, and creeping things, and fowls of the air. 
And I heard a voice saying unto me, Arise, Peter; slay and eat. 
But I said, Not so, Lord: for nothing common or unclean hath at any time entered into my mouth. 
But the voice ans
746,brethren, and his father's house: only their little ones, and their flocks, and their herds, they left in the land of Goshen. 
And there went up with him both chariots and horsemen: and it was a very great company. 
And they came to the threshingfloor of Atad, which is beyond Jordan, and there they mourned with a great and very sore lamentation: and he made a mourning for his father seven days. 
And when the inhabitants of the land, the Canaanites, saw the mourning in the floor of Atad, they said, This is a grievous mourning to the Egyptians: wherefore the name of it was called Abelmizraim, which is beyond Jordan. 
And his sons did unto him according as he commanded them: 
For his sons carried him into the land of Canaan, and buried him
954,ake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the congregation, saying, Get you up from about the tabernacle of Korah, Dathan, and Abiram. 
And Moses rose up and went unto Dathan and Abiram; and the elders of Israel followed him. 
And he spake unto the congregation, saying, Depart, I pray you, from the tents of these wicked men, and touch nothing of their's, lest ye be consumed in all their sins. 
So they gat up from the tabernacle of Korah, Dathan, and Abiram, on every side: and Dathan and Abiram came out, and stood in the door of their tents, and their wives, and their sons, and their little children. 
And Moses said, Hereby ye shall know that the LORD hath sent me to do all these works; for I have not done them of mine own mind. 
If these men die the common death of all men, or if they be visited after the visitation of all men; then the LORD hath not sent me. 
But if the LORD make a new thing, and the earth open her mouth, and swallow them up, wi
743,ilderness. 
The breath of our nostrils, the anointed of the LORD, was taken in their pits, of whom we said, Under his shadow we shall live among the heathen. 
Rejoice and be glad, O daughter of Edom, that dwellest in the land of Uz; the cup also shall pass through unto thee: thou shalt be drunken, and shalt make thyself naked. 
The punishment of thine iniquity is accomplished, O daughter of Zion; he will no more carry thee away into captivity: he will visit thine iniquity, O daughter of Edom; he will discover thy sins. 
Remember, O LORD, what is come upon us: consider, and behold our reproach. 
Our inheritance is turned to strangers, our houses to aliens. 
We are orphans and fatherless, our mothers are as widows. 
We have drunken our
812,of him that spake to me. 
And I said, What shall I do, LORD? And the Lord said unto me, Arise, and go into Damascus; and there it shall be told thee of all things which are appointed for thee to do. 
And when I could not see for the glory of that light, being led by the hand of them that were with me, I came into Damascus. 
And one Ananias, a devout man according to the law, having a good report of all the Jews which dwelt there, 
Came unto me, and stood, and said unto me, Brother Saul, receive thy sight. And the same hour I looked up upon him. 
And he said, The God of our fathers hath chosen thee, that thou shouldest know his will, and see that Just One, and shouldest hear the voice of his mouth. 
For thou shalt be his witness unto all men of what thou hast seen and heard. 
And now why tarriest thou?
806,in the cities thereof, when I shall bring again their captivity; The LORD bless thee, O habitation of justice, and mountain of holiness. 
And there shall dwell in Judah itself, and in all the cities thereof together, husbandmen, and they that go forth with flocks. 
For I have satiated the weary soul, and I have replenished every sorrowful soul. 
Upon this I awaked, and beheld; and my sleep was sweet unto me. 
Behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will sow the house of Israel and the house of Judah with the seed of man, and with the seed of beast. 
And it shall come to pass, that like as I have watched over them, to pluck up, and to break down, and to throw down, and to destroy, and to afflict; so will I watch over them, to build, and to plant, saith the LORD. 
In those days they shall sa
926,king in Edom: a deputy was king. 
Jehoshaphat made ships of Tharshish to go to Ophir for gold: but they went not; for the ships were broken at Eziongeber. 
Then said Ahaziah the son of Ahab unto Jehoshaphat, Let my servants go with thy servants in the ships. But Jehoshaphat would not. 
And Jehoshaphat slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David his father: and Jehoram his son reigned in his stead. 
Ahaziah the son of Ahab began to reign over Israel in Samaria the seventeenth year of Jehoshaphat king of Judah, and reigned two years over Israel. 
And he did evil in the sight of the LORD, and walked in the way of his father, and in the way of his mother, and in the way of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, who made Israel to sin: 
For he served Baal, and worshipped him, and provoked to anger the LORD God of Israel, according to all that his father had done. 
Adam, Sheth, Enosh, 
Kenan, Mahal
1003,elve, called Didymus, was not with them when Jesus came. 
The other disciples therefore said unto him, We have seen the LORD. But he said unto them, Except I shall see in his hands the print of the nails, and put my finger into the print of the nails, and thrust my hand into his side, I will not believe. 
And after eight days again his disciples were within, and Thomas with them: then came Jesus, the doors being shut, and stood in the midst, and said, Peace be unto you. 
Then saith he to Thomas, Reach hither thy finger, and behold my hands; and reach hither thy hand, and thrust it into my side: and be not faithless, but believing. 
And Thomas answered and said unto him, My LORD and my God. 
Jesus saith unto him, Thomas, because thou hast seen me, thou hast believed: blessed are they that have not seen, and yet have believed. 
And many other signs truly did Jesus in the presence of his disciples, which are not written in this book: 
But these are written, that ye might believe that Jesus i
959,th with his teeth, and pineth away: and I spake to thy disciples that they should cast him out; and they could not. 
He answereth him, and saith, O faithless generation, how long shall I be with you? how long shall I suffer you? bring him unto me. 
And they brought him unto him: and when he saw him, straightway the spirit tare him; and he fell on the ground, and wallowed foaming. 
And he asked his father, How long is it ago since this came unto him? And he said, Of a child. 
And ofttimes it hath cast him into the fire, and into the waters, to destroy him: but if thou canst do any thing, have compassion on us, and help us. 
Jesus said unto him, If thou canst believe, all things are possible to him that believeth. 
And straightway the father of the child cried out, and said with tears, Lord, I believe; help thou mine unbelief. 
When Jesus saw that the people came running together, he rebuked the foul spirit, saying unto him, Thou dumb and deaf spi
864,also your brother, and arise, go again unto the man: 
And God Almighty give you mercy before the man, that he may send away your other brother, and Benjamin. If I be bereaved of my children, I am bereaved. 
And the men took that present, and they took double money in their hand and Benjamin; and rose up, and went down to Egypt, and stood before Joseph. 
And when Joseph saw Benjamin with them, he said to the ruler of his house, Bring these men home, and slay, and make ready; for these men shall dine with me at noon. 
And the man did as Joseph bade; and the man brought the men into Joseph's house. 
And the men were afraid, because they were brought into Joseph's house; and they said, Because of the money that was returned in our sacks at the first time are we brought in; that he may seek occasion against us, and fall upon us, and take us for bondmen, and
1034,mong them, and with them partakest of the root and fatness of the olive tree; 
Boast not against the branches. But if thou boast, thou bearest not the root, but the root thee. 
Thou wilt say then, The branches were broken off, that I might be graffed in. 
Well; because of unbelief they were broken off, and thou standest by faith. Be not highminded, but fear: 
For if God spared not the natural branches, take heed lest he also spare not thee. 
Behold therefore the goodness and severity of God: on them which fell, severity; but toward thee, goodness, if thou continue in his goodness: otherwise thou also shalt be cut off. 
And they also, if they abide not still in unbelief, shall be graffed in: for God is able to graff them in again. 
For if thou wert cut out of the olive tree which is wild by nature, and wert graffed contrary to nature into a good olive tree: how much more shall these, which be the natural branches, be graffed into their own olive tree? 
For I would not, brethren, that ye should be ignorant of this myster
839,the riches of the Gentiles; how much more their fulness? 
For I speak to you Gentiles, inasmuch as I am the apostle of the Gentiles, I magnify mine office: 
If by any means I may provoke to emulation them which are my flesh, and might save some of them. 
For if the casting away of them be the reconciling of the world, what shall the receiving of them be, but life from the dead? 
For if the firstfruit be holy, the lump is also holy: and if the root be holy, so are the branches. 
And if some of the branches be broken off, and thou, being a wild olive tree, wert graffed in among them, and with them partakest of the root and fatness of the olive tree; 
Boast not against the branches. But if thou boast, thou bearest not the root, but the root thee. 
Thou wilt say then, The branches were broken off, that I might be graffed in. 
Well;
914,outing, and with the sound of the trumpet. 
And as the ark of the LORD came into the city of David, Michal Saul's daughter looked through a window, and saw king David leaping and dancing before the LORD; and she despised him in her heart. 
And they brought in the ark of the LORD, and set it in his place, in the midst of the tabernacle that David had pitched for it: and David offered burnt offerings and peace offerings before the LORD. 
And as soon as David had made an end of offering burnt offerings and peace offerings, he blessed the people in the name of the LORD of hosts. 
And he dealt among all the people, even among the whole multitude of Israel, as well to the women as men, to every one a cake of bread, and a good piece of flesh, and a flagon of wine. So all the people departed every one to his house. 
Then David returned to bless his household. And Michal the daughter of Saul came out to meet D
936,hand of the LORD his God upon him. 
And there went up some of the children of Israel, and of the priests, and the Levites, and the singers, and the porters, and the Nethinims, unto Jerusalem, in the seventh year of Artaxerxes the king. 
And he came to Jerusalem in the fifth month, which was in the seventh year of the king. 
For upon the first day of the first month began he to go up from Babylon, and on the first day of the fifth month came he to Jerusalem, according to the good hand of his God upon him. 
For Ezra had prepared his heart to seek the law of the LORD, and to do it, and to teach in Israel statutes and judgments. 
Now this is the copy of the letter that the king Artaxerxes gave unto Ezra the priest, the scribe, even a scribe of the words of the commandments of the LORD, and of his statutes to Israel. 
Artaxerxes, king of kings, unto Ezra the priest, a scribe of the law of the God of heaven, perfect peace, and a
896,te of the valley, even before the dragon well, and to the dung port, and viewed the walls of Jerusalem, which were broken down, and the gates thereof were consumed with fire. 
Then I went on to the gate of the fountain, and to the king's pool: but there was no place for the beast that was under me to pass. 
Then went I up in the night by the brook, and viewed the wall, and turned back, and entered by the gate of the valley, and so returned. 
And the rulers knew not whither I went, or what I did; neither had I as yet told it to the Jews, nor to the priests, nor to the nobles, nor to the rulers, nor to the rest that did the work. 
Then said I unto them, Ye see the distress that we are in, how Jerusalem lieth waste, and the gates thereof are burned with fire: come, and let us build up the wall of Jerusalem, that we be no more a reproach. 
Then I told them of the hand of my God which was
841,of Manasseh to David, when he came with the Philistines against Saul to battle: but they helped them not: for the lords of the Philistines upon advisement sent him away, saying, He will fall to his master Saul to the jeopardy of our heads. 
As he went to Ziklag, there fell to him of Manasseh, Adnah, and Jozabad, and Jediael, and Michael, and Jozabad, and Elihu, and Zilthai, captains of the thousands that were of Manasseh. 
And they helped David against the band of the rovers: for they were all mighty men of valour, and were captains in the host. 
For at that time day by day there came to David to help him, until it was a great host, like the host of God. 
And these are the numbers of the bands that were ready armed to the war, and came to David to Hebron, to turn the kingdom of Saul to him, according to the word of the LORD. 
The
927,wels of gold, and raiment: 
And the LORD gave the people favour in the sight of the Egyptians, so that they lent unto them such things as they required. And they spoiled the Egyptians. 
And the children of Israel journeyed from Rameses to Succoth, about six hundred thousand on foot that were men, beside children. 
And a mixed multitude went up also with them; and flocks, and herds, even very much cattle. 
And they baked unleavened cakes of the dough which they brought forth out of Egypt, for it was not leavened; because they were thrust out of Egypt, and could not tarry, neither had they prepared for themselves any victual. 
Now the sojourning of the children of Israel, who dwelt in Egypt, was four hundred and thirty years. 
And it came to pass at the end of the four hundred and thirty years, even the selfsame day it came to pass, that all the hosts of the LORD went out from the land of Egypt. 
It is a night to be
845,: and the slain of the LORD shall be many. 
They that sanctify themselves, and purify themselves in the gardens behind one tree in the midst, eating swine's flesh, and the abomination, and the mouse, shall be consumed together, saith the LORD. 
For I know their works and their thoughts: it shall come, that I will gather all nations and tongues; and they shall come, and see my glory. 
And I will set a sign among them, and I will send those that escape of them unto the nations, to Tarshish, Pul, and Lud, that draw the bow, to Tubal, and Javan, to the isles afar off, that have not heard my fame, neither have seen my glory; and they shall declare my glory among the Gentiles. 
And they shall bring all your brethren for an offering unto the LORD out of all nations upon horses, and in chariots, and in litters, and upon mules, and upon swift
799,which they bring unto the LORD, whether it be of men or beasts, shall be thine: nevertheless the firstborn of man shalt thou surely redeem, and the firstling of unclean beasts shalt thou redeem. 
And those that are to be redeemed from a month old shalt thou redeem, according to thine estimation, for the money of five shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary, which is twenty gerahs. 
But the firstling of a cow, or the firstling of a sheep, or the firstling of a goat, thou shalt not redeem; they are holy: thou shalt sprinkle their blood upon the altar, and shalt burn their fat for an offering made by fire, for a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And the flesh of them shall be thine, as the wave breast and as the right shoulder are thine. 
All the heave offerings of the holy things, which the c
856, they removed from Shittim, and came to Jordan, he and all the children of Israel, and lodged there before they passed over. 
And it came to pass after three days, that the officers went through the host; 
And they commanded the people, saying, When ye see the ark of the covenant of the LORD your God, and the priests the Levites bearing it, then ye shall remove from your place, and go after it. 
Yet there shall be a space between you and it, about two thousand cubits by measure: come not near unto it, that ye may know the way by which ye must go: for ye have not passed this way heretofore. 
And Joshua said unto the people, Sanctify yourselves: for to morrow the LORD will do wonders among you. 
And Joshua spake unto the priests, saying, Take up the ark of the covenant, and pass over before the people. And they took up the ark of the covenant, an
894,conformed to this world: but be ye transformed by the renewing of your mind, that ye may prove what is that good, and acceptable, and perfect, will of God. 
For I say, through the grace given unto me, to every man that is among you, not to think of himself more highly than he ought to think; but to think soberly, according as God hath dealt to every man the measure of faith. 
For as we have many members in one body, and all members have not the same office: 
So we, being many, are one body in Christ, and every one members one of another. 
Having then gifts differing according to the grace that is given to us, whether prophecy, let us prophesy according to the proportion of faith; 
Or ministry, let us wait on our ministering: or he that teacheth, on teaching; 
Or he that exhorteth, on exhortation: he that giveth, let him do it with simplicity; he that ruleth, with diligence; he that
964,oud, even the house of the LORD; 
So that the priests could not stand to minister by reason of the cloud: for the glory of the LORD had filled the house of God. 
Then said Solomon, The LORD hath said that he would dwell in the thick darkness. 
But I have built an house of habitation for thee, and a place for thy dwelling for ever. 
And the king turned his face, and blessed the whole congregation of Israel: and all the congregation of Israel stood. 
And he said, Blessed be the LORD God of Israel, who hath with his hands fulfilled that which he spake with his mouth to my father David, saying, 
Since the day that I brought forth my people out of the land of Egypt I chose no city among all the tribes of Israel to build an house in, that my name might be there; neither chose I any man to be a ruler over my people Israel: 
But I have chosen Jerusalem, that my name might be there; and have chosen David to be over my people Israel. 
Now it was in the heart o
796, tenth part of an ephah of flour for a meat offering, mingled with the fourth part of an hin of beaten oil. 
It is a continual burnt offering, which was ordained in mount Sinai for a sweet savour, a sacrifice made by fire unto the LORD. 
And the drink offering thereof shall be the fourth part of an hin for the one lamb: in the holy place shalt thou cause the strong wine to be poured unto the LORD for a drink offering. 
And the other lamb shalt thou offer at even: as the meat offering of the morning, and as the drink offering thereof, thou shalt offer it, a sacrifice made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And on the sabbath day two lambs of the first year without spot, and two tenth deals of flour for a meat offering, mingled with oil, and the drink offering thereof: 
This is t
1011,sty land, where no water is; 
To see thy power and thy glory, so as I have seen thee in the sanctuary. 
Because thy lovingkindness is better than life, my lips shall praise thee. 
Thus will I bless thee while I live: I will lift up my hands in thy name. 
My soul shall be satisfied as with marrow and fatness; and my mouth shall praise thee with joyful lips: 
When I remember thee upon my bed, and meditate on thee in the night watches. 
Because thou hast been my help, therefore in the shadow of thy wings will I rejoice. 
My soul followeth hard after thee: thy right hand upholdeth me. 
But those that seek my soul, to destroy it, shall go into the lower parts of the earth. 
They shall fall by the sword: they shall be a portion for foxes. 
But the king shall rejoice in God; every one that sweareth by him shall glory: but the mouth of them that speak lies shall be stopped. 
Hear my voice, O God, in my prayer: preserve my life from fear of the enemy. 
Hide me from the secret counsel of the wicked; from t
883,wn, that thou shalt mark the place where he shall lie, and thou shalt go in, and uncover his feet, and lay thee down; and he will tell thee what thou shalt do. 
And she said unto her, All that thou sayest unto me I will do. 
And she went down unto the floor, and did according to all that her mother in law bade her. 
And when Boaz had eaten and drunk, and his heart was merry, he went to lie down at the end of the heap of corn: and she came softly, and uncovered his feet, and laid her down. 
And it came to pass at midnight, that the man was afraid, and turned himself: and, behold, a woman lay at his feet. 
And he said, Who art thou? And she answered, I am Ruth thine handmaid: spread therefore thy skirt over thine handmaid; for thou art a near kinsman. 
And he said, Blessed be thou of the LORD, my daughter: for thou hast shewed more kindness in the latter end than at the be
1015,n the head of it, and kill it before the tabernacle of the congregation: and the sons of Aaron shall sprinkle the blood thereof upon the altar round about. 
And he shall offer thereof his offering, even an offering made by fire unto the LORD; the fat that covereth the inwards, and all the fat that is upon the inwards, 
And the two kidneys, and the fat that is upon them, which is by the flanks, and the caul above the liver, with the kidneys, it shall he take away. 
And the priest shall burn them upon the altar: it is the food of the offering made by fire for a sweet savour: all the fat is the LORD's. 
It shall be a perpetual statute for your generations throughout all your dwellings, that ye eat neither fat nor blood. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, If a soul shall sin through ignorance against any of the commandments of the LORD concerning things which ought not to be done, and shall do against any of them: 
If the priest that is anointed do sin acc
729,t none giveth answer, because of the pride of evil men. 
Surely God will not hear vanity, neither will the Almighty regard it. 
Although thou sayest thou shalt not see him, yet judgment is before him; therefore trust thou in him. 
But now, because it is not so, he hath visited in his anger; yet he knoweth it not in great extremity: 
Therefore doth Job open his mouth in vain; he multiplieth words without knowledge. 
Elihu also proceeded, and said, 
Suffer me a little, and I will shew thee that I have yet to speak on God's behalf. 
I will fetch my knowledge from afar, and will ascribe righteousness to my Maker. 
For truly my words shall not be false: he that is perfect in knowledge is with thee. 
Behold, God is mighty, an
767,e chestnut trees were not like his branches; nor any tree in the garden of God was like unto him in his beauty. 
I have made him fair by the multitude of his branches: so that all the trees of Eden, that were in the garden of God, envied him. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thou hast lifted up thyself in height, and he hath shot up his top among the thick boughs, and his heart is lifted up in his height; 
I have therefore delivered him into the hand of the mighty one of the heathen; he shall surely deal with him: I have driven him out for his wickedness. 
And strangers, the terrible of the nations, have cut him off, and have left him: upon the mountains and in all the valleys his branches are fallen, and his boughs are broken by all the rivers o
738,ed upon the altar that was built. 
And they said one to another, Who hath done this thing? And when they enquired and asked, they said, Gideon the son of Joash hath done this thing. 
Then the men of the city said unto Joash, Bring out thy son, that he may die: because he hath cast down the altar of Baal, and because he hath cut down the grove that was by it. 
And Joash said unto all that stood against him, Will ye plead for Baal? will ye save him? he that will plead for him, let him be put to death whilst it is yet morning: if he be a god, let him plead for himself, because one hath cast down his altar. 
Therefore on that day he called him Jerubbaal, saying, Let Baal plead against him, because he hath thrown down his altar. 
The
728, abominations. 
And mine eye shall not spare, neither will I have pity: I will recompense thee according to thy ways and thine abominations that are in the midst of thee; and ye shall know that I am the LORD that smiteth. 
Behold the day, behold, it is come: the morning is gone forth; the rod hath blossomed, pride hath budded. 
Violence is risen up into a rod of wickedness: none of them shall remain, nor of their multitude, nor of any of their's: neither shall there be wailing for them. 
The time is come, the day draweth near: let not the buyer rejoice, nor the seller mourn: for wrath is upon all the multitude thereof. 
For the seller shall not return to that which is sold, although they were yet alive: for the vision 
961,o years, and he begat Enoch: 
And Jared lived after he begat Enoch eight hundred years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Jared were nine hundred sixty and two years: and he died. 
And Enoch lived sixty and five years, and begat Methuselah: 
And Enoch walked with God after he begat Methuselah three hundred years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Enoch were three hundred sixty and five years: 
And Enoch walked with God: and he was not; for God took him. 
And Methuselah lived an hundred eighty and seven years, and begat Lamech. 
And Methuselah lived after he begat Lamech seven hundred eighty and two years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Methuselah were nine hundred sixty and nine years: and he died. 
And Lamech lived an hundred eighty and two years, and begat a son: 
And he called his name Noah, saying, This same shall comfort us concerning our work and toil of our hands, because of the ground w
850, to refuse the evil, and choose the good. 
For before the child shall know to refuse the evil, and choose the good, the land that thou abhorrest shall be forsaken of both her kings. 
The LORD shall bring upon thee, and upon thy people, and upon thy father's house, days that have not come, from the day that Ephraim departed from Judah; even the king of Assyria. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that the LORD shall hiss for the fly that is in the uttermost part of the rivers of Egypt, and for the bee that is in the land of Assyria. 
And they shall come, and shall rest all of them in the desolate valleys, and in the holes of the rocks, and upon all thorns, and upon all bushes. 
In the same day shall the Lord shave with a razor that is hired, namely, by them beyond the river, by the king of Assyria, the head, and the hair of the feet: a
878,g lions, where the lion, even the old lion, walked, and the lion's whelp, and none made them afraid? 
The lion did tear in pieces enough for his whelps, and strangled for his lionesses, and filled his holes with prey, and his dens with ravin. 
Behold, I am against thee, saith the LORD of hosts, and I will burn her chariots in the smoke, and the sword shall devour thy young lions: and I will cut off thy prey from the earth, and the voice of thy messengers shall no more be heard. 
Woe to the bloody city! it is all full of lies and robbery; the prey departeth not; 
The noise of a whip, and the noise of the rattling of the wheels, and of the pransing horses, and of the jumping chariots. 
The horseman lifteth up both the bright sword and the glittering spear: and there is a multitude of slain, and a great number of carcases; and there is none end of their corpses; they s
1069, and he saith, Let not Jonathan know this, lest he be grieved: but truly as the LORD liveth, and as thy soul liveth, there is but a step between me and death. 
Then said Jonathan unto David, Whatsoever thy soul desireth, I will even do it for thee. 
And David said unto Jonathan, Behold, to morrow is the new moon, and I should not fail to sit with the king at meat: but let me go, that I may hide myself in the field unto the third day at even. 
If thy father at all miss me, then say, David earnestly asked leave of me that he might run to Bethlehem his city: for there is a yearly sacrifice there for all the family. 
If he say thus, It is well; thy servant shall have peace: but if he be very wroth, then be sure that evil is determined by him. 
Therefore thou shalt deal kindly with thy servant; for thou hast brought thy servant into a covenant of the LORD with thee: notwithstanding, if there be in me iniquity, slay me thyself; for why shouldest thou bring me to thy father? 
And Jonathan said, Far be it from thee: for if I knew certainly that evil were determ
944,he that blesseth thee. 
And it came to pass, as soon as Isaac had made an end of blessing Jacob, and Jacob was yet scarce gone out from the presence of Isaac his father, that Esau his brother came in from his hunting. 
And he also had made savoury meat, and brought it unto his father, and said unto his father, Let my father arise, and eat of his son's venison, that thy soul may bless me. 
And Isaac his father said unto him, Who art thou? And he said, I am thy son, thy firstborn Esau. 
And Isaac trembled very exceedingly, and said, Who? where is he that hath taken venison, and brought it me, and I have eaten of all before thou camest, and have blessed him? yea, and he shall be blessed. 
And when Esau heard the words of his father, he cried with a great and exceeding bitter cry, and said unto his father, Bless me, even me also, O my father. 
And he said, Thy brother came with subtilty, and hath taken away thy blessing. 
And he said,
1068,nd of any of the people that were with Saul and Jonathan: but with Saul and with Jonathan his son was there found. 
And the garrison of the Philistines went out to the passage of Michmash. 
Now it came to pass upon a day, that Jonathan the son of Saul said unto the young man that bare his armour, Come, and let us go over to the Philistines' garrison, that is on the other side. But he told not his father. 
And Saul tarried in the uttermost part of Gibeah under a pomegranate tree which is in Migron: and the people that were with him were about six hundred men; 
And Ahiah, the son of Ahitub, Ichabod's brother, the son of Phinehas, the son of Eli, the LORD's priest in Shiloh, wearing an ephod. And the people knew not that Jonathan was gone. 
And between the passages, by which Jonathan sought to go over unto the Philistines' garrison, there was a sharp rock on the one side, and a sharp rock on the other side: and the name of the one was Bozez, and the name of the other Seneh. 
The forefront of the one was situate northward over against Michmash, and the oth
946,the voice of them that contend with me. 
Shall evil be recompensed for good? for they have digged a pit for my soul. Remember that I stood before thee to speak good for them, and to turn away thy wrath from them. 
Therefore deliver up their children to the famine, and pour out their blood by the force of the sword; and let their wives be bereaved of their children, and be widows; and let their men be put to death; let their young men be slain by the sword in battle. 
Let a cry be heard from their houses, when thou shalt bring a troop suddenly upon them: for they have digged a pit to take me, and hid snares for my feet. 
Yet, LORD, thou knowest all their counsel against me to slay me: forgive not their iniquity, neither blot out their sin from thy sight, but let them be overthrown before thee; deal thus with them in the time of thine anger. 
Thus saith the LORD, Go and get a potter's earthen bottle, and take of the ancients of the pe
1017,n the body, he wrapped it in a clean linen cloth, 
And laid it in his own new tomb, which he had hewn out in the rock: and he rolled a great stone to the door of the sepulchre, and departed. 
And there was Mary Magdalene, and the other Mary, sitting over against the sepulchre. 
Now the next day, that followed the day of the preparation, the chief priests and Pharisees came together unto Pilate, 
Saying, Sir, we remember that that deceiver said, while he was yet alive, After three days I will rise again. 
Command therefore that the sepulchre be made sure until the third day, lest his disciples come by night, and steal him away, and say unto the people, He is risen from the dead: so the last error shall be worse than the first. 
Pilate said unto them, Ye have a watch: go your way, make it as sure as ye can. 
So they went, and made the sepulchre sure, sealing the stone, and setting a watch. 
In the end of the sabbath, as it began to dawn toward the first day of the week, came Mary Magdalene and the other 
998,ight govern? and wilt thou condemn him that is most just? 
Is it fit to say to a king, Thou art wicked? and to princes, Ye are ungodly? 
How much less to him that accepteth not the persons of princes, nor regardeth the rich more than the poor? for they all are the work of his hands. 
In a moment shall they die, and the people shall be troubled at midnight, and pass away: and the mighty shall be taken away without hand. 
For his eyes are upon the ways of man, and he seeth all his goings. 
There is no darkness, nor shadow of death, where the workers of iniquity may hide themselves. 
For he will not lay upon man more than right; that he should enter into judgment with God. 
He shall break in pieces mighty men without number, and set others in their stead. 
Therefore he knoweth their works, and he overturneth them in the night, so that they are destroyed. 
He striketh them as wicked men in the open sight of others; 
Because they turned back from him, and would not consider any of his way
856,and dwell there: and make there an altar unto God, that appeared unto thee when thou fleddest from the face of Esau thy brother. 
Then Jacob said unto his household, and to all that were with him, Put away the strange gods that are among you, and be clean, and change your garments: 
And let us arise, and go up to Bethel; and I will make there an altar unto God, who answered me in the day of my distress, and was with me in the way which I went. 
And they gave unto Jacob all the strange gods which were in their hand, and all their earrings which were in their ears; and Jacob hid them under the oak which was by Shechem. 
And they journeyed: and the terror of God was upon the cities that were round about them, and they did not pursue after the sons of Jacob. 
So Jacob came to Luz, which is in the land of Canaan, that is, Bethel, he and all the peop
902,d laid it in a tomb. 
And the apostles gathered themselves together unto Jesus, and told him all things, both what they had done, and what they had taught. 
And he said unto them, Come ye yourselves apart into a desert place, and rest a while: for there were many coming and going, and they had no leisure so much as to eat. 
And they departed into a desert place by ship privately. 
And the people saw them departing, and many knew him, and ran afoot thither out of all cities, and outwent them, and came together unto him. 
And Jesus, when he came out, saw much people, and was moved with compassion toward them, because they were as sheep not having a shepherd: and he began to teach them many things. 
And when the day was now far spent, his disciples came unto him, and said, This is a desert place, and now the time is far passed: 
Send them away, that they may go into the country round about, a
856,e discouraged. 
And ye came near unto me every one of you, and said, We will send men before us, and they shall search us out the land, and bring us word again by what way we must go up, and into what cities we shall come. 
And the saying pleased me well: and I took twelve men of you, one of a tribe: 
And they turned and went up into the mountain, and came unto the valley of Eshcol, and searched it out. 
And they took of the fruit of the land in their hands, and brought it down unto us, and brought us word again, and said, It is a good land which the LORD our God doth give us. 
Notwithstanding ye would not go up, but rebelled against the commandment of the LORD your God: 
And ye murmured in your tents, and said, Because the LORD hated us, he hath brought us forth out of the land of Egypt, to deliver us into the hand of the Amorites, to destroy 
725,ou of your brethren that dwell in your cities, between blood and blood, between law and commandment, statutes and judgments, ye shall even warn them that they trespass not against the LORD, and so wrath come upon you, and upon your brethren: this do, and ye shall not trespass. 
And, behold, Amariah the chief priest is over you in all matters of the LORD; and Zebadiah the son of Ishmael, the ruler of the house of Judah, for all the king's matters: also the Levites shall be officers before you. Deal courageously, and the LORD shall be with the good. 
It came to pass after this also, that the children of Moab, and the children of Ammon, and with them other beside the Ammonites, came against Jehoshaphat to battle. 
Then
935,e round about, both of the temple and of the oracle: and he made chambers round about: 
The nethermost chamber was five cubits broad, and the middle was six cubits broad, and the third was seven cubits broad: for without in the wall of the house he made narrowed rests round about, that the beams should not be fastened in the walls of the house. 
And the house, when it was in building, was built of stone made ready before it was brought thither: so that there was neither hammer nor axe nor any tool of iron heard in the house, while it was in building. 
The door for the middle chamber was in the right side of the house: and they went up with winding stairs into the middle chamber, and out of the middle into the third. 
So he built the house, and finished it; and covered the house with beams and boards of cedar. 
And then he built chambers against all the house, five cubits high: and they rested on the house with timber of c
1047,gh places, and fountains in the midst of the valleys: I will make the wilderness a pool of water, and the dry land springs of water. 
I will plant in the wilderness the cedar, the shittah tree, and the myrtle, and the oil tree; I will set in the desert the fir tree, and the pine, and the box tree together: 
That they may see, and know, and consider, and understand together, that the hand of the LORD hath done this, and the Holy One of Israel hath created it. 
Produce your cause, saith the LORD; bring forth your strong reasons, saith the King of Jacob. 
Let them bring them forth, and shew us what shall happen: let them shew the former things, what they be, that we may consider them, and know the latter end of them; or declare us things for to come. 
Shew the things that are to come hereafter, that we may know that ye are gods: yea, do good, or do evil, that we may be dismayed, and behold it together. 
Behold, ye are of nothing, and your work of nought: an abomination is he that chooseth you. 
I have raised up one from the north, and
937,will bring you to Zion: 
And I will give you pastors according to mine heart, which shall feed you with knowledge and understanding. 
And it shall come to pass, when ye be multiplied and increased in the land, in those days, saith the LORD, they shall say no more, The ark of the covenant of the LORD: neither shall it come to mind: neither shall they remember it; neither shall they visit it; neither shall that be done any more. 
At that time they shall call Jerusalem the throne of the LORD; and all the nations shall be gathered unto it, to the name of the LORD, to Jerusalem: neither shall they walk any more after the imagination of their evil heart. 
In those days the house of Judah shall walk with the house of Israel, and they shall come together out of the land of the north to the land that I have given for an inheritance unto your fathers. 
But I said, How shall I put thee among the children, and give thee a pleasant land
1013,he children of Israel dedicated the house of the LORD. 
The same day did the king hallow the middle of the court that was before the house of the LORD: for there he offered burnt offerings, and meat offerings, and the fat of the peace offerings: because the brasen altar that was before the LORD was too little to receive the burnt offerings, and meat offerings, and the fat of the peace offerings. 
And at that time Solomon held a feast, and all Israel with him, a great congregation, from the entering in of Hamath unto the river of Egypt, before the LORD our God, seven days and seven days, even fourteen days. 
On the eighth day he sent the people away: and they blessed the king, and went unto their tents joyful and glad of heart for all the goodness that the LORD had done for David his servant, and for Israel his people. 
And it came to pass, when Solomon had finished the building of the house of the LORD, and the king's house, and all Solomon's desire which he was pleased to do, 
That the LORD appear
835,e foundations of the earth searched out beneath, I will also cast off all the seed of Israel for all that they have done, saith the LORD. 
Behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that the city shall be built to the LORD from the tower of Hananeel unto the gate of the corner. 
And the measuring line shall yet go forth over against it upon the hill Gareb, and shall compass about to Goath. 
And the whole valley of the dead bodies, and of the ashes, and all the fields unto the brook of Kidron, unto the corner of the horse gate toward the east, shall be holy unto the LORD; it shall not be plucked up, nor thrown down any more for ever. 
The word that came to Jeremiah from the LORD in the tenth year of Zedekiah king of Judah, which was the eighteenth year of Nebuchadrezzar. 
For then the king of Babylon's army besieged Jerusalem: a
781,he chief priests and all their council to appear, and brought Paul down, and set him before them. 
And Paul, earnestly beholding the council, said, Men and brethren, I have lived in all good conscience before God until this day. 
And the high priest Ananias commanded them that stood by him to smite him on the mouth. 
Then said Paul unto him, God shall smite thee, thou whited wall: for sittest thou to judge me after the law, and commandest me to be smitten contrary to the law? 
And they that stood by said, Revilest thou God's high priest? 
Then said Paul, I wist not, brethren, that he was the high priest: for it is written, Thou shalt not speak evil of the ruler of thy people. 
But when Paul perceived that the one part were Sadducees, and the other Pharisees, he cried out
987,; and he shall be for a glorious throne to his father's house. 
And they shall hang upon him all the glory of his father's house, the offspring and the issue, all vessels of small quantity, from the vessels of cups, even to all the vessels of flagons. 
In that day, saith the LORD of hosts, shall the nail that is fastened in the sure place be removed, and be cut down, and fall; and the burden that was upon it shall be cut off: for the LORD hath spoken it. 
The burden of Tyre. Howl, ye ships of Tarshish; for it is laid waste, so that there is no house, no entering in: from the land of Chittim it is revealed to them. 
Be still, ye inhabitants of the isle; thou whom the merchants of Zidon, that pass over the sea, have replenished. 
And by great waters the seed of Sihor, the harvest of the river, is her revenue; and she is a mart of nations. 
Be thou ashamed, O Zidon: for the sea hath spoken, even the strength of the sea, saying, I travail not, nor bring forth children, neither
888,erewith I fed thee, thou hast even set it before them for a sweet savour: and thus it was, saith the Lord GOD. 
Moreover thou hast taken thy sons and thy daughters, whom thou hast borne unto me, and these hast thou sacrificed unto them to be devoured. Is this of thy whoredoms a small matter, 
That thou hast slain my children, and delivered them to cause them to pass through the fire for them? 
And in all thine abominations and thy whoredoms thou hast not remembered the days of thy youth, when thou wast naked and bare, and wast polluted in thy blood. 
And it came to pass after all thy wickedness, (woe, woe unto thee! saith the LORD GOD;) 
That thou hast also built unto thee an eminent place, and hast made thee an high place in every street. 
Thou hast built thy high place at every head of the way, and hast made thy beauty to be abhorred, and hast opened thy feet to every one t
982, art afraid. 
Moreover the LORD thy God will send the hornet among them, until they that are left, and hide themselves from thee, be destroyed. 
Thou shalt not be affrighted at them: for the LORD thy God is among you, a mighty God and terrible. 
And the LORD thy God will put out those nations before thee by little and little: thou mayest not consume them at once, lest the beasts of the field increase upon thee. 
But the LORD thy God shall deliver them unto thee, and shall destroy them with a mighty destruction, until they be destroyed. 
And he shall deliver their kings into thine hand, and thou shalt destroy their name from under heaven: there shall no man be able to stand before thee, until thou have destroyed them. 
The graven images of their gods shall ye burn with fire: thou shalt not desire the silver or gold that is on them, nor take it unto thee, lest thou be snared therin: for it is an abomination to the LORD thy God. 
Neither shalt thou bring an abomination i
725,phet, and he shall pray for thee, and thou shalt live: and if thou restore her not, know thou that thou shalt surely die, thou, and all that are thine. 
Therefore Abimelech rose early in the morning, and called all his servants, and told all these things in their ears: and the men were sore afraid. 
Then Abimelech called Abraham, and said unto him, What hast thou done unto us? and what have I offended thee, that thou hast brought on me and on my kingdom a great sin? thou hast done deeds unto me that ought not to be done. 
And Abimelech said unto Abraham, What sawest thou, that thou hast done this thing? 
And Abraham said, Because I thought, Surely the fear of God is not in this place; and they will slay me for my wi
876,d with her suburbs, and Mahanaim with her suburbs, 
And Heshbon with her suburbs, and Jazer with her suburbs. 
Now the sons of Issachar were, Tola, and Puah, Jashub, and Shimrom, four. 
And the sons of Tola; Uzzi, and Rephaiah, and Jeriel, and Jahmai, and Jibsam, and Shemuel, heads of their father's house, to wit, of Tola: they were valiant men of might in their generations; whose number was in the days of David two and twenty thousand and six hundred. 
And the sons of Uzzi; Izrahiah: and the sons of Izrahiah; Michael, and Obadiah, and Joel, Ishiah, five: all of them chief men. 
And with them, by their generations, after the house of their fathers, were bands of soldiers for war, six and thirty thousand men: for they had many wives and sons. 
And their brethren among all the families of Issachar were valiant men of might, reckoned in all by their genealogies fours
725,ng out and thy coming in from this time forth, and even for evermore. 
I was glad when they said unto me, Let us go into the house of the LORD. 
Our feet shall stand within thy gates, O Jerusalem. 
Jerusalem is builded as a city that is compact together: 
Whither the tribes go up, the tribes of the LORD, unto the testimony of Israel, to give thanks unto the name of the LORD. 
For there are set thrones of judgment, the thrones of the house of David. 
Pray for the peace of Jerusalem: they shall prosper that love thee. 
Peace be within thy walls, and prosperity within thy palaces. 
For my brethren and companions' sakes, I will now say, Peace be within thee. 
Because of the house of the LORD our God I will seek thy good
964,devoured Jacob, and laid waste his dwelling place. 
O remember not against us former iniquities: let thy tender mercies speedily prevent us: for we are brought very low. 
Help us, O God of our salvation, for the glory of thy name: and deliver us, and purge away our sins, for thy name's sake. 
Wherefore should the heathen say, Where is their God? let him be known among the heathen in our sight by the revenging of the blood of thy servants which is shed. 
Let the sighing of the prisoner come before thee; according to the greatness of thy power preserve thou those that are appointed to die; 
And render unto our neighbours sevenfold into their bosom their reproach, wherewith they have reproached thee, O Lord. 
So we thy people and sheep of thy pasture will give thee thanks for ever: we will shew forth thy praise to all generations. 
Give ear, O Shepherd of Israel, thou that leadest Joseph like a flock; thou that dwellest between the cherubims, shine fort
1023,peace offerings, which was for the people: and Aaron's sons presented unto him the blood, which he sprinkled upon the altar round about, 
And the fat of the bullock and of the ram, the rump, and that which covereth the inwards, and the kidneys, and the caul above the liver: 
And they put the fat upon the breasts, and he burnt the fat upon the altar: 
And the breasts and the right shoulder Aaron waved for a wave offering before the LORD; as Moses commanded. 
And Aaron lifted up his hand toward the people, and blessed them, and came down from offering of the sin offering, and the burnt offering, and peace offerings. 
And Moses and Aaron went into the tabernacle of the congregation, and came out, and blessed the people: and the glory of the LORD appeared unto all the people. 
And there came a fire out from before the LORD, and consumed upon the altar the burnt offering and the fat: which when all the people saw, they shouted, and fell on their faces. 
And Nadab and Abihu, the sons of Aaron, took either of them 
919,e witness, and hath testified falsely against his brother; 
Then shall ye do unto him, as he had thought to have done unto his brother: so shalt thou put the evil away from among you. 
And those which remain shall hear, and fear, and shall henceforth commit no more any such evil among you. 
And thine eye shall not pity; but life shall go for life, eye for eye, tooth for tooth, hand for hand, foot for foot. 
When thou goest out to battle against thine enemies, and seest horses, and chariots, and a people more than thou, be not afraid of them: for the LORD thy God is with thee, which brought thee up out of the land of Egypt. 
And it shall be, when ye are come nigh unto the battle, that the priest shall approach and speak unto the people, 
And shall say unto them, Hear, O Israel, ye approach this day unto battle against your enemies: let not your hearts faint, fear not, and do not tremble, neither be ye terri
743,ement in the holy place, shall one carry forth without the camp; and they shall burn in the fire their skins, and their flesh, and their dung. 
And he that burneth them shall wash his clothes, and bathe his flesh in water, and afterward he shall come into the camp. 
And this shall be a statute for ever unto you: that in the seventh month, on the tenth day of the month, ye shall afflict your souls, and do no work at all, whether it be one of your own country, or a stranger that sojourneth among you: 
For on that day shall the priest make an atonement for you, to cleanse you, that ye may be clean from all your sins before the LORD. 
It shall be a sabbath of rest unto you, and ye shall afflict your souls, by a statute for ever. 
And the
991,anded them: the LORD also accepted Job. 
And the LORD turned the captivity of Job, when he prayed for his friends: also the LORD gave Job twice as much as he had before. 
Then came there unto him all his brethren, and all his sisters, and all they that had been of his acquaintance before, and did eat bread with him in his house: and they bemoaned him, and comforted him over all the evil that the LORD had brought upon him: every man also gave him a piece of money, and every one an earring of gold. 
So the LORD blessed the latter end of Job more than his beginning: for he had fourteen thousand sheep, and six thousand camels, and a thousand yoke of oxen, and a thousand she asses. 
He had also seven sons and three daughters. 
And he called the name of the first, Jemima; and the name of the second, Kezia; and the name of the third, Kerenhappuch. 
And in all the land were no women found so fair as the daughters of Job: and their father gave them inheritance among their brethren. 
Af
936,he was there in the wilderness forty days, tempted of Satan; and was with the wild beasts; and the angels ministered unto him. 
Now after that John was put in prison, Jesus came into Galilee, preaching the gospel of the kingdom of God, 
And saying, The time is fulfilled, and the kingdom of God is at hand: repent ye, and believe the gospel. 
Now as he walked by the sea of Galilee, he saw Simon and Andrew his brother casting a net into the sea: for they were fishers. 
And Jesus said unto them, Come ye after me, and I will make you to become fishers of men. 
And straightway they forsook their nets, and followed him. 
And when he had gone a little farther thence, he saw James the son of Zebedee, and John his brother, who also were in the ship mending their nets. 
And straightway he called them: and they left their father Zebedee in the ship with the hired servants, and went after him. 
And they went into Capernaum; and straigh
797,And the strong shall be as tow, and the maker of it as a spark, and they shall both burn together, and none shall quench them. 
The word that Isaiah the son of Amoz saw concerning Judah and Jerusalem. 
And it shall come to pass in the last days, that the mountain of the LORD's house shall be established in the top of the mountains, and shall be exalted above the hills; and all nations shall flow unto it. 
And many people shall go and say, Come ye, and let us go up to the mountain of the LORD, to the house of the God of Jacob; and he will teach us of his ways, and we will walk in his paths: for out of Zion shall go forth the law, and the word of the LORD from Jerusalem. 
And he shall judge among the nations, and shall rebuke many people: and they shall beat their swords into plowshares, 
1074,e seventh day: and if it be spread much abroad in the skin, then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is the plague of leprosy. 
And if the bright spot stay in his place, and spread not in the skin, but it be somewhat dark; it is a rising of the burning, and the priest shall pronounce him clean: for it is an inflammation of the burning. 
If a man or woman have a plague upon the head or the beard; 
Then the priest shall see the plague: and, behold, if it be in sight deeper than the skin; and there be in it a yellow thin hair; then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is a dry scall, even a leprosy upon the head or beard. 
And if the priest look on the plague of the scall, and, behold, it be not in sight deeper than the skin, and that there is no black hair in it; then the priest shall shut up him that hath the plague of the scall seven days: 
And in the seventh day the priest shall look on the plague: and, behold, if the scall spread not, and there be in it no yellow hair, and the scall be not in sight deeper than the skin; 
He shall be shaven, bu
899,old for a farthing? and one of them shall not fall on the ground without your Father. 
But the very hairs of your head are all numbered. 
Fear ye not therefore, ye are of more value than many sparrows. 
Whosoever therefore shall confess me before men, him will I confess also before my Father which is in heaven. 
But whosoever shall deny me before men, him will I also deny before my Father which is in heaven. 
Think not that I am come to send peace on earth: I came not to send peace, but a sword. 
For I am come to set a man at variance against his father, and the daughter against her mother, and the daughter in law against her mother in law. 
And a man's foes shall be they of his own household. 
He that loveth father or mother more than me is not worthy of me: and he that loveth son or daughter more than me is not worthy of me. 
And he that taketh not his cross, and followeth after me, i
896,a perpetual hatred, and hast shed the blood of the children of Israel by the force of the sword in the time of their calamity, in the time that their iniquity had an end: 
Therefore, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, I will prepare thee unto blood, and blood shall pursue thee: sith thou hast not hated blood, even blood shall pursue thee. 
Thus will I make mount Seir most desolate, and cut off from it him that passeth out and him that returneth. 
And I will fill his mountains with his slain men: in thy hills, and in thy valleys, and in all thy rivers, shall they fall that are slain with the sword. 
I will make thee perpetual desolations, and thy cities shall not return: and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
Because thou hast said, These two nations and these two countries shall be mine, and we will possess it; whereas the LORD was there: 
Therefore, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, I will
1060, boasteth himself of a false gift is like clouds and wind without rain. 
By long forbearing is a prince persuaded, and a soft tongue breaketh the bone. 
Hast thou found honey? eat so much as is sufficient for thee, lest thou be filled therewith, and vomit it. 
Withdraw thy foot from thy neighbour's house; lest he be weary of thee, and so hate thee. 
A man that beareth false witness against his neighbour is a maul, and a sword, and a sharp arrow. 
Confidence in an unfaithful man in time of trouble is like a broken tooth, and a foot out of joint. 
As he that taketh away a garment in cold weather, and as vinegar upon nitre, so is he that singeth songs to an heavy heart. 
If thine enemy be hungry, give him bread to eat; and if he be thirsty, give him water to drink: 
For thou shalt heap coals of fire upon his head, and the LORD shall reward thee. 
The north wind driveth away rain: so doth an angry countenance a backbiting tongue. 
It is better to dwell in the corner of the housetop, than with a brawling woman and in a wide house. 
As cold waters to
1000,ut rivers among the rocks; and his eye seeth every precious thing. 
He bindeth the floods from overflowing; and the thing that is hid bringeth he forth to light. 
But where shall wisdom be found? and where is the place of understanding? 
Man knoweth not the price thereof; neither is it found in the land of the living. 
The depth saith, It is not in me: and the sea saith, It is not with me. 
It cannot be gotten for gold, neither shall silver be weighed for the price thereof. 
It cannot be valued with the gold of Ophir, with the precious onyx, or the sapphire. 
The gold and the crystal cannot equal it: and the exchange of it shall not be for jewels of fine gold. 
No mention shall be made of coral, or of pearls: for the price of wisdom is above rubies. 
The topaz of Ethiopia shall not equal it, neither shall it be valued with pure gold. 
Whence then cometh wisdom? and where is the place of understanding? 
Seeing it is hid from the eyes of all living, and kept close from the fowls of the a
977, set liers in wait round about Gibeah. 
And the children of Israel went up against the children of Benjamin on the third day, and put themselves in array against Gibeah, as at other times. 
And the children of Benjamin went out against the people, and were drawn away from the city; and they began to smite of the people, and kill, as at other times, in the highways, of which one goeth up to the house of God, and the other to Gibeah in the field, about thirty men of Israel. 
And the children of Benjamin said, They are smitten down before us, as at the first. But the children of Israel said, Let us flee, and draw them from the city unto the highways. 
And all the men of Israel rose up out of their place, and put themselves in array at Baaltamar: and the liers in wait of Israel came forth out of their places, even out of the meadows of Gibeah. 
And there came against Gibeah ten thousand chosen men out of all Israel, and the battle was sore: but they knew not that evi
739,n of Dan, stood by the entering of the gate. 
And the five men that went to spy out the land went up, and came in thither, and took the graven image, and the ephod, and the teraphim, and the molten image: and the priest stood in the entering of the gate with the six hundred men that were appointed with weapons of war. 
And these went into Micah's house, and fetched the carved image, the ephod, and the teraphim, and the molten image. Then said the priest unto them, What do ye? 
And they said unto him, Hold thy peace, lay thine hand upon thy mouth, and go with us, and be to us a father and a priest: is it better for thee to be a priest unto the house of one man, or that thou be a priest unto a tribe and a family in Israel? 
And the
868,ill not suffer him to sleep. 
There is a sore evil which I have seen under the sun, namely, riches kept for the owners thereof to their hurt. 
But those riches perish by evil travail: and he begetteth a son, and there is nothing in his hand. 
As he came forth of his mother's womb, naked shall he return to go as he came, and shall take nothing of his labour, which he may carry away in his hand. 
And this also is a sore evil, that in all points as he came, so shall he go: and what profit hath he that hath laboured for the wind? 
All his days also he eateth in darkness, and he hath much sorrow and wrath with his sickness. 
Behold that which I have seen: it is good and comely for one to eat and to drink, and to enjoy the good of all his labour that he taketh under the sun all the days of his life, which God giveth him: for it is his portion. 
Every man also to
1005,e high and holy place, with him also that is of a contrite and humble spirit, to revive the spirit of the humble, and to revive the heart of the contrite ones. 
For I will not contend for ever, neither will I be always wroth: for the spirit should fail before me, and the souls which I have made. 
For the iniquity of his covetousness was I wroth, and smote him: I hid me, and was wroth, and he went on frowardly in the way of his heart. 
I have seen his ways, and will heal him: I will lead him also, and restore comforts unto him and to his mourners. 
I create the fruit of the lips; Peace, peace to him that is far off, and to him that is near, saith the LORD; and I will heal him. 
But the wicked are like the troubled sea, when it cannot rest, whose waters cast up mire and dirt. 
There is no peace, saith my God, to the wicked. 
Cry aloud, spare not, lift up thy voice like a trumpet, and shew my people their transgression, and the house of Jacob their sins. 
Yet they seek me daily, and delight to
812,and that I have heard all thy blasphemies which thou hast spoken against the mountains of Israel, saying, They are laid desolate, they are given us to consume. 
Thus with your mouth ye have boasted against me, and have multiplied your words against me: I have heard them. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; When the whole earth rejoiceth, I will make thee desolate. 
As thou didst rejoice at the inheritance of the house of Israel, because it was desolate, so will I do unto thee: thou shalt be desolate, O mount Seir, and all Idumea, even all of it: and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
Also, thou son of man, prophesy unto the mountains of Israel, and say, Ye mountains of Israel, hear the word of the LORD: 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because the enemy hath said against you, Aha, even the ancient high places are ou
1071,, for the blood of Asahel his brother. 
And afterward when David heard it, he said, I and my kingdom are guiltless before the LORD for ever from the blood of Abner the son of Ner: 
Let it rest on the head of Joab, and on all his father's house; and let there not fail from the house of Joab one that hath an issue, or that is a leper, or that leaneth on a staff, or that falleth on the sword, or that lacketh bread. 
So Joab, and Abishai his brother slew Abner, because he had slain their brother Asahel at Gibeon in the battle. 
And David said to Joab, and to all the people that were with him, Rend your clothes, and gird you with sackcloth, and mourn before Abner. And king David himself followed the bier. 
And they buried Abner in Hebron: and the king lifted up his voice, and wept at the grave of Abner; and all the people wept. 
And the king lamented over Abner, and said, Died Abner as a fool dieth? 
Thy hands were not bound, nor thy feet put into fetters: as a man falleth before wicked men, so fellest thou. And all the people wept again over him. 
And when al
835,field are mine. 
If I were hungry, I would not tell thee: for the world is mine, and the fulness thereof. 
Will I eat the flesh of bulls, or drink the blood of goats? 
Offer unto God thanksgiving; and pay thy vows unto the most High: 
And call upon me in the day of trouble: I will deliver thee, and thou shalt glorify me. 
But unto the wicked God saith, What hast thou to do to declare my statutes, or that thou shouldest take my covenant in thy mouth? 
Seeing thou hatest instruction, and casteth my words behind thee. 
When thou sawest a thief, then thou consentedst with him, and hast been partaker with adulterers. 
Thou givest thy mouth to evil, and thy tongue frameth deceit. 
Thou sittest and speakest against thy brother; thou slanderest thine own mother's son. 
These things hast thou done, and I kept silence; thou thoughtes
1004,ie thereby. 
But if the wicked turn from his wickedness, and do that which is lawful and right, he shall live thereby. 
Yet ye say, The way of the Lord is not equal. O ye house of Israel, I will judge you every one after his ways. 
And it came to pass in the twelfth year of our captivity, in the tenth month, in the fifth day of the month, that one that had escaped out of Jerusalem came unto me, saying, The city is smitten. 
Now the hand of the LORD was upon me in the evening, afore he that was escaped came; and had opened my mouth, until he came to me in the morning; and my mouth was opened, and I was no more dumb. 
Then the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, they that inhabit those wastes of the land of Israel speak, saying, Abraham was one, and he inherited the land: but we are many; the land is given us for inheritance. 
Wherefore say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Ye eat with the blood, and lift up your eyes toward your idols, and shed blood: and shall ye possess 
1025,lant of renown, and they shall be no more consumed with hunger in the land, neither bear the shame of the heathen any more. 
Thus shall they know that I the LORD their God am with them, and that they, even the house of Israel, are my people, saith the Lord GOD. 
And ye my flock, the flock of my pasture, are men, and I am your God, saith the Lord GOD. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face against mount Seir, and prophesy against it, 
And say unto it, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, O mount Seir, I am against thee, and I will stretch out mine hand against thee, and I will make thee most desolate. 
I will lay thy cities waste, and thou shalt be desolate, and thou shalt know that I am the LORD. 
Because thou hast had a perpetual hatred, and hast shed the blood of the children of Israel by the force of the sword in the time of their calamity, in the time that their iniquity had an end: 
Therefore, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, I will prepare thee unto blood, and blood shal
813,hom Jesus loved following; which also leaned on his breast at supper, and said, Lord, which is he that betrayeth thee? 
Peter seeing him saith to Jesus, Lord, and what shall this man do? 
Jesus saith unto him, If I will that he tarry till I come, what is that to thee? follow thou me. 
Then went this saying abroad among the brethren, that that disciple should not die: yet Jesus said not unto him, He shall not die; but, If I will that he tarry till I come, what is that to thee? 
This is the disciple which testifieth of these things, and wrote these things: and we know that his testimony is true. 
And there are also many other things which Jesus did, the which, if they should be written every one, I suppose that even the world itself could not contain the books that should be written. Amen. 
The former tr
948, unclean unto you: they shall not be eaten. 
But of all clean fowls ye may eat. 
Ye shall not eat of anything that dieth of itself: thou shalt give it unto the stranger that is in thy gates, that he may eat it; or thou mayest sell it unto an alien: for thou art an holy people unto the LORD thy God. Thou shalt not seethe a kid in his mother's milk. 
Thou shalt truly tithe all the increase of thy seed, that the field bringeth forth year by year. 
And thou shalt eat before the LORD thy God, in the place which he shall choose to place his name there, the tithe of thy corn, of thy wine, and of thine oil, and the firstlings of thy herds and of thy flocks; that thou mayest learn to fear the LORD thy God always. 
And if the way be too long for thee, so that thou art not able to carry it; or if the place be too far from thee, which the LORD thy God shall choose to set his name there, when the LORD thy God hath blessed thee: 
Then shalt thou tu
814,em, Go again, buy us a little food. 
And Judah spake unto him, saying, The man did solemnly protest unto us, saying, Ye shall not see my face, except your brother be with you. 
If thou wilt send our brother with us, we will go down and buy thee food: 
But if thou wilt not send him, we will not go down: for the man said unto us, Ye shall not see my face, except your brother be with you. 
And Israel said, Wherefore dealt ye so ill with me, as to tell the man whether ye had yet a brother? 
And they said, The man asked us straitly of our state, and of our kindred, saying, Is your father yet alive? have ye another brother? and we told him according to the tenor of these words: could we certainly know that he would say, Bring your brother down? 
And Judah said unto Israel his father, Send the lad with me, and
801, Assyrian be beaten down, which smote with a rod. 
And in every place where the grounded staff shall pass, which the LORD shall lay upon him, it shall be with tabrets and harps: and in battles of shaking will he fight with it. 
For Tophet is ordained of old; yea, for the king it is prepared; he hath made it deep and large: the pile thereof is fire and much wood; the breath of the LORD, like a stream of brimstone, doth kindle it. 
Woe to them that go down to Egypt for help; and stay on horses, and trust in chariots, because they are many; and in horsemen, because they are very strong; but they look not unto the Holy One of Israel, neither seek the LORD! 
Yet he also is wise, and will bring evil, and will not call back his words: but will arise against the house of the evildoers, and against 
793,ted, that your sins may be blotted out, when the times of refreshing shall come from the presence of the Lord. 
And he shall send Jesus Christ, which before was preached unto you: 
Whom the heaven must receive until the times of restitution of all things, which God hath spoken by the mouth of all his holy prophets since the world began. 
For Moses truly said unto the fathers, A prophet shall the Lord your God raise up unto you of your brethren, like unto me; him shall ye hear in all things whatsoever he shall say unto you. 
And it shall come to pass, that every soul, which will not hear that prophet, shall be destroyed from among the people. 
Yea, and all the prophets from Samuel and those that follow after, as many as have spoken, have likewise foretold of these days. 
Ye are the c
853,ou, even my people Israel; and they shall possess thee, and thou shalt be their inheritance, and thou shalt no more henceforth bereave them of men. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because they say unto you, Thou land devourest up men, and hast bereaved thy nations: 
Therefore thou shalt devour men no more, neither bereave thy nations any more, saith the Lord GOD. 
Neither will I cause men to hear in thee the shame of the heathen any more, neither shalt thou bear the reproach of the people any more, neither shalt thou cause thy nations to fall any more, saith the Lord GOD. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, when the house of Israel dwelt in their own land, they defiled it by their own way and by their doings: their way was before me as the uncleanness of a removed woman. 
Wherefore I poured my fury upon them for the b
903, 
These shall ye eat of all that are in the waters: whatsoever hath fins and scales in the waters, in the seas, and in the rivers, them shall ye eat. 
And all that have not fins and scales in the seas, and in the rivers, of all that move in the waters, and of any living thing which is in the waters, they shall be an abomination unto you: 
They shall be even an abomination unto you; ye shall not eat of their flesh, but ye shall have their carcases in abomination. 
Whatsoever hath no fins nor scales in the waters, that shall be an abomination unto you. 
And these are they which ye shall have in abomination among the fowls; they shall not be eaten, they are an abomination: the eagle, and the ossifrage, and the ospray, 
And the vulture, and the kite after his kind; 
Every raven after his kind; 
And the owl, and the night hawk, and the cuckow, and the hawk after his kind, 
And the little owl, an
878,them up by the roots out of my land which I have given them; and this house, which I have sanctified for my name, will I cast out of my sight, and will make it to be a proverb and a byword among all nations. 
And this house, which is high, shall be an astonishment to every one that passeth by it; so that he shall say, Why hath the LORD done thus unto this land, and unto this house? 
And it shall be answered, Because they forsook the LORD God of their fathers, which brought them forth out of the land of Egypt, and laid hold on other gods, and worshipped them, and served them: therefore hath he brought all this evil upon them. 
And it came to pass at the end of twenty years, wherein Solomon had built the house of the LORD, and his own house, 
That the cities which Huram had restored to Solomon, Solomon built them, and caused the children of Israel to dwell there. 
And
1043,breast and as the right shoulder are thine. 
All the heave offerings of the holy things, which the children of Israel offer unto the LORD, have I given thee, and thy sons and thy daughters with thee, by a statute for ever: it is a covenant of salt for ever before the LORD unto thee and to thy seed with thee. 
And the LORD spake unto Aaron, Thou shalt have no inheritance in their land, neither shalt thou have any part among them: I am thy part and thine inheritance among the children of Israel. 
And, behold, I have given the children of Levi all the tenth in Israel for an inheritance, for their service which they serve, even the service of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
Neither must the children of Israel henceforth come nigh the tabernacle of the congregation, lest they bear sin, and die. 
But the Levites shall do the service of the tabernacle of the congregation, and they shall bear their iniquity: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations, that among the children of Israel they have no inheritance. 
But
887, if he will at all redeem it, then he shall add a fifth part thereof unto thy estimation. 
And when a man shall sanctify his house to be holy unto the LORD, then the priest shall estimate it, whether it be good or bad: as the priest shall estimate it, so shall it stand. 
And if he that sanctified it will redeem his house, then he shall add the fifth part of the money of thy estimation unto it, and it shall be his. 
And if a man shall sanctify unto the LORD some part of a field of his possession, then thy estimation shall be according to the seed thereof: an homer of barley seed shall be valued at fifty shekels of silver. 
If he sanctify his field from the year of jubile, according to thy estimation it shall stand. 
But if he sanctify his field after the jubile, then the priest shall reckon unto him the money according to the years that remain, even unto the year of the jubil
997,over us; 
That we also may be like all the nations; and that our king may judge us, and go out before us, and fight our battles. 
And Samuel heard all the words of the people, and he rehearsed them in the ears of the LORD. 
And the LORD said to Samuel, Hearken unto their voice, and make them a king. And Samuel said unto the men of Israel, Go ye every man unto his city. 
Now there was a man of Benjamin, whose name was Kish, the son of Abiel, the son of Zeror, the son of Bechorath, the son of Aphiah, a Benjamite, a mighty man of power. 
And he had a son, whose name was Saul, a choice young man, and a goodly: and there was not among the children of Israel a goodlier person than he: from his shoulders and upward he was higher than any of the people. 
And the asses of Kish Saul's father were lost. And Kish said to Saul his son, Take now one of the servants with thee, and arise, go seek the asses. 
And he passed through mount Ephraim, and passed through the land of Shalisha, but they foun
773,lt it; so will I gather you in mine anger and in my fury, and I will leave you there, and melt you. 
Yea, I will gather you, and blow upon you in the fire of my wrath, and ye shall be melted in the midst therof. 
As silver is melted in the midst of the furnace, so shall ye be melted in the midst thereof; and ye shall know that I the LORD have poured out my fury upon you. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, say unto her, Thou art the land that is not cleansed, nor rained upon in the day of indignation. 
There is a conspiracy of her prophets in the midst thereof, like a roaring lion ravening the prey; they have devoured souls; they have taken the treasure and precious things; they have made her many widows in the midst thereof. 
Her priests
729,iness, 
Looking for and hasting unto the coming of the day of God, wherein the heavens being on fire shall be dissolved, and the elements shall melt with fervent heat? 
Nevertheless we, according to his promise, look for new heavens and a new earth, wherein dwelleth righteousness. 
Wherefore, beloved, seeing that ye look for such things, be diligent that ye may be found of him in peace, without spot, and blameless. 
And account that the longsuffering of our Lord is salvation; even as our beloved brother Paul also according to the wisdom given unto him hath written unto you; 
As also in all his epistles, speaking in them of these things; in which are some things hard to be understood, which they that are unlearned and un
941,ht thee hither? and what makest thou in this place? and what hast thou here? 
And he said unto them, Thus and thus dealeth Micah with me, and hath hired me, and I am his priest. 
And they said unto him, Ask counsel, we pray thee, of God, that we may know whether our way which we go shall be prosperous. 
And the priest said unto them, Go in peace: before the LORD is your way wherein ye go. 
Then the five men departed, and came to Laish, and saw the people that were therein, how they dwelt careless, after the manner of the Zidonians, quiet and secure; and there was no magistrate in the land, that might put them to shame in any thing; and they were far from the Zidonians, and had no business with any man. 
And they came unto their brethren to Zorah and Eshtaol: and their brethren said unto them, What say ye? 
And they said, Arise, that we may go up against them: for we have seen the land, and, behold, it is very good: and are ye s
794,he children of Eber, the brother of Japheth the elder, even to him were children born. 
The children of Shem; Elam, and Asshur, and Arphaxad, and Lud, and Aram. 
And the children of Aram; Uz, and Hul, and Gether, and Mash. 
And Arphaxad begat Salah; and Salah begat Eber. 
And unto Eber were born two sons: the name of one was Peleg; for in his days was the earth divided; and his brother's name was Joktan. 
And Joktan begat Almodad, and Sheleph, and Hazarmaveth, and Jerah, 
And Hadoram, and Uzal, and Diklah, 
And Obal, and Abimael, and Sheba, 
And Ophir, and Havilah, and Jobab: all these were the sons of Joktan. 
And their dwelling was from Mesha, as thou goest unto Sephar a mount of the east. 
These are the sons of Shem, after their families, after their tongues, in their lands, after
731,but she shall be given up, and they that brought her, and he that begat her, and he that strengthened her in these times. 
But out of a branch of her roots shall one stand up in his estate, which shall come with an army, and shall enter into the fortress of the king of the north, and shall deal against them, and shall prevail: 
And shall also carry captives into Egypt their gods, with their princes, and with their precious vessels of silver and of gold; and he shall continue more years than the king of the north. 
So the king of the south shall come into his kingdom, and shall return into his own land. 
But his sons shall be stirred up, and shall assemble a multitude of great forces: and one shall certainly come, and over
787,e shall be for ever. 
They shall not be ashamed in the evil time: and in the days of famine they shall be satisfied. 
But the wicked shall perish, and the enemies of the LORD shall be as the fat of lambs: they shall consume; into smoke shall they consume away. 
The wicked borroweth, and payeth not again: but the righteous sheweth mercy, and giveth. 
For such as be blessed of him shall inherit the earth; and they that be cursed of him shall be cut off. 
The steps of a good man are ordered by the LORD: and he delighteth in his way. 
Though he fall, he shall not be utterly cast down: for the LORD upholdeth him with his hand. 
I have been young, and now am old; yet have I not seen the righteous forsaken, nor his seed begging bread. 
He is ever merciful, and lendeth; and his seed i
913,ve received their inheritance: 
The two tribes and the half tribe have received their inheritance on this side Jordan near Jericho eastward, toward the sunrising. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
These are the names of the men which shall divide the land unto you: Eleazar the priest, and Joshua the son of Nun. 
And ye shall take one prince of every tribe, to divide the land by inheritance. 
And the names of the men are these: Of the tribe of Judah, Caleb the son of Jephunneh. 
And of the tribe of the children of Simeon, Shemuel the son of Ammihud. 
Of the tribe of Benjamin, Elidad the son of Chislon. 
And the prince of the tribe of the children of Dan, Bukki the son of Jogli. 
The prince of the children of Joseph, for the tribe of the children of Manasseh, Hanniel the son of Ephod. 
And the prince of the tribe of the children of Ephraim, Kemuel the son of Shiphtan. 
And the prince of the trib
887,of his vision, when he hath prophesied; neither shall they wear a rough garment to deceive: 
But he shall say, I am no prophet, I am an husbandman; for man taught me to keep cattle from my youth. 
And one shall say unto him, What are these wounds in thine hands? Then he shall answer, Those with which I was wounded in the house of my friends. 
Awake, O sword, against my shepherd, and against the man that is my fellow, saith the LORD of hosts: smite the shepherd, and the sheep shall be scattered: and I will turn mine hand upon the little ones. 
And it shall come to pass, that in all the land, saith the LORD, two parts therein shall be cut off and die; but the third shall be left therein. 
And I will bring the third part through the fire, and will refine them as silver is refined, and will try them as gold is tried: they shall call on my name, and I will hear them: I will say, 
971,ise, and will bring evil, and will not call back his words: but will arise against the house of the evildoers, and against the help of them that work iniquity. 
Now the Egyptians are men, and not God; and their horses flesh, and not spirit. When the LORD shall stretch out his hand, both he that helpeth shall fall, and he that is holpen shall fall down, and they all shall fail together. 
For thus hath the LORD spoken unto me, Like as the lion and the young lion roaring on his prey, when a multitude of shepherds is called forth against him, he will not be afraid of their voice, nor abase himself for the noise of them: so shall the LORD of hosts come down to fight for mount Zion, and for the hill thereof. 
As birds flying, so will the LORD of hosts defend Jerusalem; defending also he will deliver it; and passing over he will preserve it. 
Turn ye unto him from whom the children of Israel have deeply revolted. 
For in that day every man shall cast away his idol
936,em from the wilderness of Paran: all those men were heads of the children of Israel. 
And these were their names: of the tribe of Reuben, Shammua the son of Zaccur. 
Of the tribe of Simeon, Shaphat the son of Hori. 
Of the tribe of Judah, Caleb the son of Jephunneh. 
Of the tribe of Issachar, Igal the son of Joseph. 
Of the tribe of Ephraim, Oshea the son of Nun. 
Of the tribe of Benjamin, Palti the son of Raphu. 
Of the tribe of Zebulun, Gaddiel the son of Sodi. 
Of the tribe of Joseph, namely, of the tribe of Manasseh, Gaddi the son of Susi. 
Of the tribe of Dan, Ammiel the son of Gemalli. 
Of the tribe of Asher, Sethur the son of Michael. 
Of the tribe of Naphtali, Nahbi the son of Vophsi. 
Of the tribe of Gad, Geuel the son of Machi. 
These are the names of the men which Moses sent to spy out the land. And Moses called Oshea the son of Nun Jehoshua. 
And Moses sent them to spy out the land of Canaan, and said unto them
772,ye say unto me, What aileth thee? 
And the children of Dan said unto him, Let not thy voice be heard among us, lest angry fellows run upon thee, and thou lose thy life, with the lives of thy household. 
And the children of Dan went their way: and when Micah saw that they were too strong for him, he turned and went back unto his house. 
And they took the things which Micah had made, and the priest which he had, and came unto Laish, unto a people that were at quiet and secure: and they smote them with the edge of the sword, and burnt the city with fire. 
And there was no deliverer, because it was far from Zidon, and they had no business with any man; and it was in the valley that lieth by Bethrehob. And they built a city, and dwelt therein. 
And they called the na
1073,ted, as it is written of him. 
And when he came to his disciples, he saw a great multitude about them, and the scribes questioning with them. 
And straightway all the people, when they beheld him, were greatly amazed, and running to him saluted him. 
And he asked the scribes, What question ye with them? 
And one of the multitude answered and said, Master, I have brought unto thee my son, which hath a dumb spirit; 
And wheresoever he taketh him, he teareth him: and he foameth, and gnasheth with his teeth, and pineth away: and I spake to thy disciples that they should cast him out; and they could not. 
He answereth him, and saith, O faithless generation, how long shall I be with you? how long shall I suffer you? bring him unto me. 
And they brought him unto him: and when he saw him, straightway the spirit tare him; and he fell on the ground, and wallowed foaming. 
And he asked his father, How long is it ago since this came unto him? And he said, Of a child. 
And ofttimes it hath cast him into the fire, and into the waters, to destroy him: but if thou canst do
900,st of her; be ye clean, that bear the vessels of the LORD. 
For ye shall not go out with haste, nor go by flight: for the LORD will go before you; and the God of Israel will be your rereward. 
Behold, my servant shall deal prudently, he shall be exalted and extolled, and be very high. 
As many were astonied at thee; his visage was so marred more than any man, and his form more than the sons of men: 
So shall he sprinkle many nations; the kings shall shut their mouths at him: for that which had not been told them shall they see; and that which they had not heard shall they consider. 
Who hath believed our report? and to whom is the arm of the LORD revealed? 
For he shall grow up before him as a tender plant, and as a root out of a dry ground: he hath no form nor comeliness; and when we shall see him, there is no beauty that we should desire him. 
He is despised and rejected of men; a man 
815,ther upon you: but tarry ye in the city of Jerusalem, until ye be endued with power from on high. 
And he led them out as far as to Bethany, and he lifted up his hands, and blessed them. 
And it came to pass, while he blessed them, he was parted from them, and carried up into heaven. 
And they worshipped him, and returned to Jerusalem with great joy: 
And were continually in the temple, praising and blessing God. Amen. 
In the beginning was the Word, and the Word was with God, and the Word was God. 
The same was in the beginning with God. 
All things were made by him; and without him was not any thing made that was made. 
In him was life; and the life was the light of men. 
And the light shineth in darkness; and the darkness comprehended it not. 
There was a man sent from God, whose name was John. 
The s
861,m. 
And the LORD said unto the children of Israel, Did not I deliver you from the Egyptians, and from the Amorites, from the children of Ammon, and from the Philistines? 
The Zidonians also, and the Amalekites, and the Maonites, did oppress you; and ye cried to me, and I delivered you out of their hand. 
Yet ye have forsaken me, and served other gods: wherefore I will deliver you no more. 
Go and cry unto the gods which ye have chosen; let them deliver you in the time of your tribulation. 
And the children of Israel said unto the LORD, We have sinned: do thou unto us whatsoever seemeth good unto thee; deliver us only, we pray thee, this day. 
And they put away the strange gods from among them, and served the LORD: and his soul was grieved for the misery of Israel. 
Then the children of Ammon were gathered together, and encamped in Gilead. And the ch
845,ot abhor you. 
And I will walk among you, and will be your God, and ye shall be my people. 
I am the LORD your God, which brought you forth out of the land of Egypt, that ye should not be their bondmen; and I have broken the bands of your yoke, and made you go upright. 
But if ye will not hearken unto me, and will not do all these commandments; 
And if ye shall despise my statutes, or if your soul abhor my judgments, so that ye will not do all my commandments, but that ye break my covenant: 
I also will do this unto you; I will even appoint over you terror, consumption, and the burning ague, that shall consume the eyes, and cause sorrow of heart: and ye shall sow your seed in vain, for your enemies shall eat it. 
And I will set my face against you, and ye shall be slain before your enemies: they that hate you shall reign over you; an
939,m the Zidonians, and had no business with any man. 
And they came unto their brethren to Zorah and Eshtaol: and their brethren said unto them, What say ye? 
And they said, Arise, that we may go up against them: for we have seen the land, and, behold, it is very good: and are ye still? be not slothful to go, and to enter to possess the land. 
When ye go, ye shall come unto a people secure, and to a large land: for God hath given it into your hands; a place where there is no want of any thing that is in the earth. 
And there went from thence of the family of the Danites, out of Zorah and out of Eshtaol, six hundred men appointed with weapons of war. 
And they went up, and pitched in Kirjathjearim, in Judah: wherefore they called that place Mahanehdan unto this day: behold, it is behind Kirjathjearim. 
And they passed thence unto mount Ephraim, and came unto the house of Micah. 
Then answered the five men that went to spy out th
903,ng, whose height reached unto the heaven, and the sight thereof to all the earth; 
Whose leaves were fair, and the fruit thereof much, and in it was meat for all; under which the beasts of the field dwelt, and upon whose branches the fowls of the heaven had their habitation: 
It is thou, O king, that art grown and become strong: for thy greatness is grown, and reacheth unto heaven, and thy dominion to the end of the earth. 
And whereas the king saw a watcher and an holy one coming down from heaven, and saying, Hew the tree down, and destroy it; yet leave the stump of the roots thereof in the earth, even with a band of iron and brass, in the tender grass of the field; and let it be wet with the dew of heaven, and let his portion be with the beasts of the field, till seven times pass over him; 
This is the interpretation, O king, and this is the decree of the most High, which is come upon my 
726,reover he made an altar of brass, twenty cubits the length thereof, and twenty cubits the breadth thereof, and ten cubits the height thereof. 
Also he made a molten sea of ten cubits from brim to brim, round in compass, and five cubits the height thereof; and a line of thirty cubits did compass it round about. 
And under it was the similitude of oxen, which did compass it round about: ten in a cubit, compassing the sea round about. Two rows of oxen were cast, when it was cast. 
It stood upon twelve oxen, three looking toward the north, and three looking toward the west, and three looking toward the south, and three looking toward the east: and the sea was set above upon them, and all their hinder parts were inward. 

845,thou art a stranger, all the land of Canaan, for an everlasting possession; and I will be their God. 
And God said unto Abraham, Thou shalt keep my covenant therefore, thou, and thy seed after thee in their generations. 
This is my covenant, which ye shall keep, between me and you and thy seed after thee; Every man child among you shall be circumcised. 
And ye shall circumcise the flesh of your foreskin; and it shall be a token of the covenant betwixt me and you. 
And he that is eight days old shall be circumcised among you, every man child in your generations, he that is born in the house, or bought with money of any stranger, which is not of thy seed. 
He that is born in thy house, and he that is bought with thy money, must needs be circumcised: and my covenant shall be in your flesh for an everlasting covenant. 
And the uncircumci
723,ll the Israelites passed over on dry ground, until all the people were passed clean over Jordan. 
And it came to pass, when all the people were clean passed over Jordan, that the LORD spake unto Joshua, saying, 
Take you twelve men out of the people, out of every tribe a man, 
And command ye them, saying, Take you hence out of the midst of Jordan, out of the place where the priests' feet stood firm, twelve stones, and ye shall carry them over with you, and leave them in the lodging place, where ye shall lodge this night. 
Then Joshua called the twelve men, whom he had prepared of the children of Israel, out of every tribe a man: 
And Joshua said unto them, Pass over before the ark of the LORD your God into the mid
798,rbid. 
For if I build again the things which I destroyed, I make myself a transgressor. 
For I through the law am dead to the law, that I might live unto God. 
I am crucified with Christ: neverthless I live; yet not I, but Christ liveth in me: and the life which I now live in the flesh I live by the faith of the Son of God, who loved me, and gave himself for me. 
I do not frustrate the grace of God: for if righteousness come by the law, then Christ is dead in vain. 
O foolish Galatians, who hath bewitched you, that ye should not obey the truth, before whose eyes Jesus Christ hath been evidently set forth, crucified among you? 
This only would I learn of you, Received ye the Spirit by the works of the law, or by the hearing of faith? 
Are ye so foolish? having begun in the Spirit, are ye 
893,Moreover concerning a stranger, that is not of thy people Israel, but cometh out of a far country for thy name's sake; 
(For they shall hear of thy great name, and of thy strong hand, and of thy stretched out arm;) when he shall come and pray toward this house; 
Hear thou in heaven thy dwelling place, and do according to all that the stranger calleth to thee for: that all people of the earth may know thy name, to fear thee, as do thy people Israel; and that they may know that this house, which I have builded, is called by thy name. 
If thy people go out to battle against their enemy, whithersoever thou shalt send them, and shall pray unto the LORD toward the city which thou hast chosen, and toward the house that I have built for thy name: 
Then hear thou in heaven their prayer and their supplication, and maintain their cause. 
If they sin against thee, (for there is no man that si
1072, king's wise men: but they could not read the writing, nor make known to the king the interpretation thereof. 
Then was king Belshazzar greatly troubled, and his countenance was changed in him, and his lords were astonied. 
Now the queen by reason of the words of the king and his lords came into the banquet house: and the queen spake and said, O king, live for ever: let not thy thoughts trouble thee, nor let thy countenance be changed: 
There is a man in thy kingdom, in whom is the spirit of the holy gods; and in the days of thy father light and understanding and wisdom, like the wisdom of the gods, was found in him; whom the king Nebuchadnezzar thy father, the king, I say, thy father, made master of the magicians, astrologers, Chaldeans, and soothsayers; 
Forasmuch as an excellent spirit, and knowledge, and understanding, interpreting of dreams, and shewing of hard sentences, and dissolving of doubts, were found in the same Daniel, whom the king named Belteshazzar: now let Daniel be called, and he will shew the interpretation. 
Then was Daniel brought in 
724,com the god of the children of Ammon, and have not walked in my ways, to do that which is right in mine eyes, and to keep my statutes and my judgments, as did David his father. 
Howbeit I will not take the whole kingdom out of his hand: but I will make him prince all the days of his life for David my servant's sake, whom I chose, because he kept my commandments and my statutes: 
But I will take the kingdom out of his son's hand, and will give it unto thee, even ten tribes. 
And unto his son will I give one tribe, that David my servant may have a light alway before me in Jerusalem, the city which I have chosen me to put my name there. 
And I will take thee, and thou shalt reign according to all that thy soul desiret
806,on, and bound him before their eyes. 
Then Joseph commanded to fill their sacks with corn, and to restore every man's money into his sack, and to give them provision for the way: and thus did he unto them. 
And they laded their asses with the corn, and departed thence. 
And as one of them opened his sack to give his ass provender in the inn, he espied his money; for, behold, it was in his sack's mouth. 
And he said unto his brethren, My money is restored; and, lo, it is even in my sack: and their heart failed them, and they were afraid, saying one to another, What is this that God hath done unto us? 
And they came unto Jacob their father unto the land of Canaan, and told him all that befell unto them; saying, 
The man, who is the lord of the land, spake roughly to us, and took us for spies of th
965, thy servants for ever. 
But he forsook the counsel which the old men gave him, and took counsel with the young men that were brought up with him, that stood before him. 
And he said unto them, What advice give ye that we may return answer to this people, which have spoken to me, saying, Ease somewhat the yoke that thy father did put upon us? 
And the young men that were brought up with him spake unto him, saying, Thus shalt thou answer the people that spake unto thee, saying, Thy father made our yoke heavy, but make thou it somewhat lighter for us; thus shalt thou say unto them, My little finger shall be thicker than my father's loins. 
For whereas my father put a heavy yoke upon you, I will put more to your yoke: my father chastised you with whips, but I will chastise you with scorpions. 
So Jeroboam and all the people came to Rehoboam on the third day, as the king bade, saying, Come again to me on the third day. 
And the king answered them roughly;
927,oneycomb, sweet to the soul, and health to the bones. 
There is a way that seemeth right unto a man, but the end thereof are the ways of death. 
He that laboureth laboureth for himself; for his mouth craveth it of him. 
An ungodly man diggeth up evil: and in his lips there is as a burning fire. 
A froward man soweth strife: and a whisperer separateth chief friends. 
A violent man enticeth his neighbour, and leadeth him into the way that is not good. 
He shutteth his eyes to devise froward things: moving his lips he bringeth evil to pass. 
The hoary head is a crown of glory, if it be found in the way of righteousness. 
He that is slow to anger is better than the mighty; and he that ruleth his spirit than he that taketh a city. 
The lot is cast into the lap; but the whole disposing thereof is of the LORD. 
Better is a dry morsel, and quietness therewith, than an house full of sacrifices with strife. 
A wise servant 
1054,ng for the tent of rams' skins dyed red, and a covering above of badgers' skins. 
And thou shalt make boards for the tabernacle of shittim wood standing up. 
Ten cubits shall be the length of a board, and a cubit and a half shall be the breadth of one board. 
Two tenons shall there be in one board, set in order one against another: thus shalt thou make for all the boards of the tabernacle. 
And thou shalt make the boards for the tabernacle, twenty boards on the south side southward. 
And thou shalt make forty sockets of silver under the twenty boards; two sockets under one board for his two tenons, and two sockets under another board for his two tenons. 
And for the second side of the tabernacle on the north side there shall be twenty boards: 
And their forty sockets of silver; two sockets under one board, and two sockets under another board. 
And for the sides of the tabernacle westward thou shalt make six boards. 
And two boards shalt thou make for the corners of the tabernacle in the two sides. 
And they shall be coupled together benea
1072,came to the brook Besor, where those that were left behind stayed. 
But David pursued, he and four hundred men: for two hundred abode behind, which were so faint that they could not go over the brook Besor. 
And they found an Egyptian in the field, and brought him to David, and gave him bread, and he did eat; and they made him drink water; 
And they gave him a piece of a cake of figs, and two clusters of raisins: and when he had eaten, his spirit came again to him: for he had eaten no bread, nor drunk any water, three days and three nights. 
And David said unto him, To whom belongest thou? and whence art thou? And he said, I am a young man of Egypt, servant to an Amalekite; and my master left me, because three days agone I fell sick. 
We made an invasion upon the south of the Cherethites, and upon the coast which belongeth to Judah, and upon the south of Caleb; and we burned Ziklag with fire. 
And David said to him, Canst thou bring me down to this company? And he said, Swear unto me by God, that thou wilt neither kill me, nor deliver me into the hands of 
1034,with him to battle, fell upon the cities of Judah, from Samaria even unto Bethhoron, and smote three thousand of them, and took much spoil. 
Now it came to pass, after that Amaziah was come from the slaughter of the Edomites, that he brought the gods of the children of Seir, and set them up to be his gods, and bowed down himself before them, and burned incense unto them. 
Wherefore the anger of the LORD was kindled against Amaziah, and he sent unto him a prophet, which said unto him, Why hast thou sought after the gods of the people, which could not deliver their own people out of thine hand? 
And it came to pass, as he talked with him, that the king said unto him, Art thou made of the king's counsel? forbear; why shouldest thou be smitten? Then the prophet forbare, and said, I know that God hath determined to destroy thee, because thou hast done this, and hast not hearkened unto my counsel. 
Then Amaziah king of Judah took advice, and sent to Joash, the son of Jehoahaz, the son of Jehu, king of Israel, saying, Come, l
849,t for the land, nor yet for the dunghill; but men cast it out. He that hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
Then drew near unto him all the publicans and sinners for to hear him. 
And the Pharisees and scribes murmured, saying, This man receiveth sinners, and eateth with them. 
And he spake this parable unto them, saying, 
What man of you, having an hundred sheep, if he lose one of them, doth not leave the ninety and nine in the wilderness, and go after that which is lost, until he find it? 
And when he hath found it, he layeth it on his shoulders, rejoicing. 
And when he cometh home, he calleth together his friends and neighbours, saying unto them, Rejoice with me; for I have found my sheep which was lost. 
I say unto you, that likewise joy shall be in heaven over one sinner that repenteth, more than over ninety and nine just persons, whic
851,er whom they have gone a whoring. This shall be a statute for ever unto them throughout their generations. 
And thou shalt say unto them, Whatsoever man there be of the house of Israel, or of the strangers which sojourn among you, that offereth a burnt offering or sacrifice, 
And bringeth it not unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, to offer it unto the LORD; even that man shall be cut off from among his people. 
And whatsoever man there be of the house of Israel, or of the strangers that sojourn among you, that eateth any manner of blood; I will even set my face against that soul that eateth blood, and will cut him off from among his people. 
For the life of the flesh is in the blood: and I have given it to you upon the altar to make an atonement for your souls: for it is the blood that maketh an atonement for the soul. 
Th
851,af shall not fade, neither shall the fruit thereof be consumed: it shall bring forth new fruit according to his months, because their waters they issued out of the sanctuary: and the fruit thereof shall be for meat, and the leaf thereof for medicine. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; This shall be the border, whereby ye shall inherit the land according to the twelve tribes of Israel: Joseph shall have two portions. 
And ye shall inherit it, one as well as another: concerning the which I lifted up mine hand to give it unto your fathers: and this land shall fall unto you for inheritance. 
And this shall be the border of the land toward the north side, from the great sea, the way of Hethlon, as men go to Zedad; 
Hamath, Berothah, Sibraim, which is between the border of Damascus and the border of Hamath; Hazarhatticon, which is by the coast of Hauran.
929,ames, and John, and Andrew, Philip, and Thomas, Bartholomew, and Matthew, James the son of Alphaeus, and Simon Zelotes, and Judas the brother of James. 
These all continued with one accord in prayer and supplication, with the women, and Mary the mother of Jesus, and with his brethren. 
And in those days Peter stood up in the midst of the disciples, and said, (the number of names together were about an hundred and twenty,) 
Men and brethren, this scripture must needs have been fulfilled, which the Holy Ghost by the mouth of David spake before concerning Judas, which was guide to them that took Jesus. 
For he was numbered with us, and had obtained part of this ministry. 
Now this man purchased a field with the reward of iniquity; and falling headlong, he burst asunder in the midst, and all his bowels gushed out. 
And it was known unto all the dwellers at Jerusalem; insomuch as that field is called in their proper tong
755,dah was too much for them: therefore the children of Simeon had their inheritance within the inheritance of them. 
And the third lot came up for the children of Zebulun according to their families: and the border of their inheritance was unto Sarid: 
And their border went up toward the sea, and Maralah, and reached to Dabbasheth, and reached to the river that is before Jokneam; 
And turned from Sarid eastward toward the sunrising unto the border of Chislothtabor, and then goeth out to Daberath, and goeth up to Japhia, 
And from thence passeth on along on the east to Gittahhepher, to Ittahkazin, and goeth out to Remmonmethoar to Neah; 
And the border compasseth it on the north side to Hannathon: and the outgoings thereof are in the valley of Jiph
747,n of Lamech, 
Which was the son of Mathusala, which was the son of Enoch, which was the son of Jared, which was the son of Maleleel, which was the son of Cainan, 
Which was the son of Enos, which was the son of Seth, which was the son of Adam, which was the son of God. 
And Jesus being full of the Holy Ghost returned from Jordan, and was led by the Spirit into the wilderness, 
Being forty days tempted of the devil. And in those days he did eat nothing: and when they were ended, he afterward hungered. 
And the devil said unto him, If thou be the Son of God, command this stone that it be made bread. 
And Jesus answered him, saying, It is written, That man shall not live by bread alone, but by every word of God. 
And the devil, taking him u
1010,w these my signs before him: 
And that thou mayest tell in the ears of thy son, and of thy son's son, what things I have wrought in Egypt, and my signs which I have done among them; that ye may know how that I am the LORD. 
And Moses and Aaron came in unto Pharaoh, and said unto him, Thus saith the LORD God of the Hebrews, How long wilt thou refuse to humble thyself before me? let my people go, that they may serve me. 
Else, if thou refuse to let my people go, behold, to morrow will I bring the locusts into thy coast: 
And they shall cover the face of the earth, that one cannot be able to see the earth: and they shall eat the residue of that which is escaped, which remaineth unto you from the hail, and shall eat every tree which groweth for you out of the field: 
And they shall fill thy houses, and the houses of all thy servants, and the houses of all the Egyptians; which neither thy fathers, nor thy fathers' fathers have seen, since the day that they were upon the earth unto this day. And he tu
1018,own thy life for my sake? Verily, verily, I say unto thee, The cock shall not crow, till thou hast denied me thrice. 
Let not your heart be troubled: ye believe in God, believe also in me. 
In my Father's house are many mansions: if it were not so, I would have told you. I go to prepare a place for you. 
And if I go and prepare a place for you, I will come again, and receive you unto myself; that where I am, there ye may be also. 
And whither I go ye know, and the way ye know. 
Thomas saith unto him, Lord, we know not whither thou goest; and how can we know the way? 
Jesus saith unto him, I am the way, the truth, and the life: no man cometh unto the Father, but by me. 
If ye had known me, ye should have known my Father also: and from henceforth ye know him, and have seen him. 
Philip saith unto him, Lord, shew us the Father, and it sufficeth us. 
Jesus saith unto him, Have I been so long time with you, and yet hast thou not known me, Philip? he that hath seen me hath seen the Father; and how sayest thou
923,ot afraid, nor rent their garments, neither the king, nor any of his servants that heard all these words. 
Nevertheless Elnathan and Delaiah and Gemariah had made intercession to the king that he would not burn the roll: but he would not hear them. 
But the king commanded Jerahmeel the son of Hammelech, and Seraiah the son of Azriel, and Shelemiah the son of Abdeel, to take Baruch the scribe and Jeremiah the prophet: but the LORD hid them. 
Then the word of the LORD came to Jeremiah, after that the king had burned the roll, and the words which Baruch wrote at the mouth of Jeremiah, saying, 
Take thee again another roll, and write in it all the former words that were in the first roll, which Jehoiakim the king of Judah hath burned. 
And thou shalt say to Jehoiakim king of Judah, Thus saith the LORD; Thou hast burned this roll, saying, Why hast thou written therein, saying, The king of Babylon shall certainly co
847,d cheer, and they also took some meat. 
And we were in all in the ship two hundred threescore and sixteen souls. 
And when they had eaten enough, they lightened the ship, and cast out the wheat into the sea. 
And when it was day, they knew not the land: but they discovered a certain creek with a shore, into the which they were minded, if it were possible, to thrust in the ship. 
And when they had taken up the anchors, they committed themselves unto the sea, and loosed the rudder bands, and hoised up the mainsail to the wind, and made toward shore. 
And falling into a place where two seas met, they ran the ship aground; and the forepart stuck fast, and remained unmoveable, but the hinder part was broken with the violence of the waves. 
And the soldiers' counsel was to kill the prisoners, lest any of them should swim out, and escape. 
Bu
1019,the flanks, and the caul above the liver, with the kidneys, it shall he take away, 
As it was taken off from the bullock of the sacrifice of peace offerings: and the priest shall burn them upon the altar of the burnt offering. 
And the skin of the bullock, and all his flesh, with his head, and with his legs, and his inwards, and his dung, 
Even the whole bullock shall he carry forth without the camp unto a clean place, where the ashes are poured out, and burn him on the wood with fire: where the ashes are poured out shall he be burnt. 
And if the whole congregation of Israel sin through ignorance, and the thing be hid from the eyes of the assembly, and they have done somewhat against any of the commandments of the LORD concerning things which should not be done, and are guilty; 
When the sin, which they have sinned against it, is known, then the congregation shall offer a young bullock for the sin, and bring him before the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And the elders of the congregation shall lay thei
968, pray, lest ye enter into temptation. The spirit truly is ready, but the flesh is weak. 
And again he went away, and prayed, and spake the same words. 
And when he returned, he found them asleep again, (for their eyes were heavy,) neither wist they what to answer him. 
And he cometh the third time, and saith unto them, Sleep on now, and take your rest: it is enough, the hour is come; behold, the Son of man is betrayed into the hands of sinners. 
Rise up, let us go; lo, he that betrayeth me is at hand. 
And immediately, while he yet spake, cometh Judas, one of the twelve, and with him a great multitude with swords and staves, from the chief priests and the scribes and the elders. 
And he that betrayed him had given them a token, saying, Whomsoever I shall kiss, that same is he; take him, and lead him away safely. 
And as soon as he was come, he goeth straightway to him, and saith, Master, master; and kissed him. 
And they laid their hands on him, and took
1036,ey shall fall under the slain. For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still. 
O Assyrian, the rod of mine anger, and the staff in their hand is mine indignation. 
I will send him against an hypocritical nation, and against the people of my wrath will I give him a charge, to take the spoil, and to take the prey, and to tread them down like the mire of the streets. 
Howbeit he meaneth not so, neither doth his heart think so; but it is in his heart to destroy and cut off nations not a few. 
For he saith, Are not my princes altogether kings? 
Is not Calno as Carchemish? is not Hamath as Arpad? is not Samaria as Damascus? 
As my hand hath found the kingdoms of the idols, and whose graven images did excel them of Jerusalem and of Samaria; 
Shall I not, as I have done unto Samaria and her idols, so do to Jerusalem and her idols? 
Wherefore it shall come to pass, that when the Lord hath performed his whole work upon mount Zion and on Jerusalem, I will punish the fruit of the stout heart of the k
746, house? And Hezekiah answered, All that is in mine house have they seen: there is nothing among my treasures that I have not shewed them. 
Then said Isaiah to Hezekiah, Hear the word of the LORD of hosts: 
Behold, the days come, that all that is in thine house, and that which thy fathers have laid up in store until this day, shall be carried to Babylon: nothing shall be left, saith the LORD. 
And of thy sons that shall issue from thee, which thou shalt beget, shall they take away; and they shall be eunuchs in the palace of the king of Babylon. 
Then said Hezekiah to Isaiah, Good is the word of the LORD which thou hast spoken. He said moreover, For there shall be peace and truth in my days. 
Comfort ye, comfort ye my people, saith your G
935,as as a man that heareth not, and in whose mouth are no reproofs. 
For in thee, O LORD, do I hope: thou wilt hear, O Lord my God. 
For I said, Hear me, lest otherwise they should rejoice over me: when my foot slippeth, they magnify themselves against me. 
For I am ready to halt, and my sorrow is continually before me. 
For I will declare mine iniquity; I will be sorry for my sin. 
But mine enemies are lively, and they are strong: and they that hate me wrongfully are multiplied. 
They also that render evil for good are mine adversaries; because I follow the thing that good is. 
Forsake me not, O LORD: O my God, be not far from me. 
Make haste to help me, O Lord my salvation. 
I said, I will take heed to my ways, that I sin not with my tongue: I will keep my mouth with a bridle, while the wicked is before me. 
I was dumb with silence, I held my peace, even from good; and my sorrow was stirred. 
My heart was hot within me, w
1024,the wicked is as a troubled fountain, and a corrupt spring. 
It is not good to eat much honey: so for men to search their own glory is not glory. 
He that hath no rule over his own spirit is like a city that is broken down, and without walls. 
As snow in summer, and as rain in harvest, so honour is not seemly for a fool. 
As the bird by wandering, as the swallow by flying, so the curse causeless shall not come. 
A whip for the horse, a bridle for the ass, and a rod for the fool's back. 
Answer not a fool according to his folly, lest thou also be like unto him. 
Answer a fool according to his folly, lest he be wise in his own conceit. 
He that sendeth a message by the hand of a fool cutteth off the feet, and drinketh damage. 
The legs of the lame are not equal: so is a parable in the mouth of fools. 
As he that bindeth a stone in a sling, so is he that giveth honour to a fool. 
As a thorn goeth up into the hand of a drunkard, so is a parable in the mouths of fools. 
The great God that formed all things both re
751,God that formed thee. 
And when the LORD saw it, he abhorred them, because of the provoking of his sons, and of his daughters. 
And he said, I will hide my face from them, I will see what their end shall be: for they are a very froward generation, children in whom is no faith. 
They have moved me to jealousy with that which is not God; they have provoked me to anger with their vanities: and I will move them to jealousy with those which are not a people; I will provoke them to anger with a foolish nation. 
For a fire is kindled in mine anger, and shall burn unto the lowest hell, and shall consume the earth with her increase, and set on fire the foundations of the mountains. 
I will heap mischiefs upon them; I will spend mine arrows upon them.
1017,on every man his weapons of war, ye were ready to go up into the hill. 
And the LORD said unto me, Say unto them. Go not up, neither fight; for I am not among you; lest ye be smitten before your enemies. 
So I spake unto you; and ye would not hear, but rebelled against the commandment of the LORD, and went presumptuously up into the hill. 
And the Amorites, which dwelt in that mountain, came out against you, and chased you, as bees do, and destroyed you in Seir, even unto Hormah. 
And ye returned and wept before the LORD; but the LORD would not hearken to your voice, nor give ear unto you. 
So ye abode in Kadesh many days, according unto the days that ye abode there. 
Then we turned, and took our journey into the wilderness by the way of the Red sea, as the LORD spake unto me: and we compassed mount Seir many days. 
And the LORD spake unto me, saying, 
Ye have compassed this mountain long enough: turn you northward. 
And command thou the people, saying, Ye are to pass through the coast of your brethren
871,nd branches of thick trees, to make booths, as it is written. 
So the people went forth, and brought them, and made themselves booths, every one upon the roof of his house, and in their courts, and in the courts of the house of God, and in the street of the water gate, and in the street of the gate of Ephraim. 
And all the congregation of them that were come again out of the captivity made booths, and sat under the booths: for since the days of Jeshua the son of Nun unto that day had not the children of Israel done so. And there was very great gladness. 
Also day by day, from the first day unto the last day, he read in the book of the law of God. And they kept the feast seven days; and on the eighth day was a solemn assembly, according unto the manner. 
Now in the twenty and fourth day of this month the children of Israel were assembled with fasting, and with
1079, Gileadites took the passages of Jordan before the Ephraimites: and it was so, that when those Ephraimites which were escaped said, Let me go over; that the men of Gilead said unto him, Art thou an Ephraimite? If he said, Nay; 
Then said they unto him, Say now Shibboleth: and he said Sibboleth: for he could not frame to pronounce it right. Then they took him, and slew him at the passages of Jordan: and there fell at that time of the Ephraimites forty and two thousand. 
And Jephthah judged Israel six years. Then died Jephthah the Gileadite, and was buried in one of the cities of Gilead. 
And after him Ibzan of Bethlehem judged Israel. 
And he had thirty sons, and thirty daughters, whom he sent abroad, and took in thirty daughters from abroad for his sons. And he judged Israel seven years. 
Then died Ibzan, and was buried at Bethlehem. 
And after him Elon, a Zebulonite, judged Israel; and he judged Israel ten years. 
And Elon the Zebulonite died, and was buried in Aijalon in the country of Zebulun. 
And after him Abdon the son of Hillel, a Pirathonite, judged Israe
958, eat no bread, nor drink water: for he mourned because of the transgression of them that had been carried away. 
And they made proclamation throughout Judah and Jerusalem unto all the children of the captivity, that they should gather themselves together unto Jerusalem; 
And that whosoever would not come within three days, according to the counsel of the princes and the elders, all his substance should be forfeited, and himself separated from the congregation of those that had been carried away. 
Then all the men of Judah and Benjamin gathered themselves together unto Jerusalem within three days. It was the ninth month, on the twentieth day of the month; and all the people sat in the street of the house of God, trembling because of this matter, and for the great rain. 
And Ezra the priest stood up, and said unto them, Ye have transgressed, and have taken strange wives, to increase the trespass of Israel. 
Now therefore make confession unto the 
1020,e? 
They are like unto children sitting in the marketplace, and calling one to another, and saying, We have piped unto you, and ye have not danced; we have mourned to you, and ye have not wept. 
For John the Baptist came neither eating bread nor drinking wine; and ye say, He hath a devil. 
The Son of man is come eating and drinking; and ye say, Behold a gluttonous man, and a winebibber, a friend of publicans and sinners! 
But wisdom is justified of all her children. 
And one of the Pharisees desired him that he would eat with him. And he went into the Pharisee's house, and sat down to meat. 
And, behold, a woman in the city, which was a sinner, when she knew that Jesus sat at meat in the Pharisee's house, brought an alabaster box of ointment, 
And stood at his feet behind him weeping, and began to wash his feet with tears, and did wipe them with the hairs of her head, and kissed his feet, and anointed them with the ointment. 
Now when the Pharisee which had bidden him saw it, he spake within himself, sayi
826,ed with blood. 
Thus were they defiled with their own works, and went a whoring with their own inventions. 
Therefore was the wrath of the LORD kindled against his people, insomuch that he abhorred his own inheritance. 
And he gave them into the hand of the heathen; and they that hated them ruled over them. 
Their enemies also oppressed them, and they were brought into subjection under their hand. 
Many times did he deliver them; but they provoked him with their counsel, and were brought low for their iniquity. 
Nevertheless he regarded their affliction, when he heard their cry: 
And he remembered for them his covenant, and repented according to the multitude of his mercies. 
He made them also to be pitied of all those that carried them captives. 
Save us, O LORD our God, and gather us from among the heathen, to gi
747,LORD, and come down: touch the mountains, and they shall smoke. 
Cast forth lightning, and scatter them: shoot out thine arrows, and destroy them. 
Send thine hand from above; rid me, and deliver me out of great waters, from the hand of strange children; 
Whose mouth speaketh vanity, and their right hand is a right hand of falsehood. 
I will sing a new song unto thee, O God: upon a psaltery and an instrument of ten strings will I sing praises unto thee. 
It is he that giveth salvation unto kings: who delivereth David his servant from the hurtful sword. 
Rid me, and deliver me from the hand of strange children, whose mouth speaketh vanity, and their right hand is a right hand of falsehood: 
That our sons may be as plants grown up in their
839,e are the names of the men which shall divide the land unto you: Eleazar the priest, and Joshua the son of Nun. 
And ye shall take one prince of every tribe, to divide the land by inheritance. 
And the names of the men are these: Of the tribe of Judah, Caleb the son of Jephunneh. 
And of the tribe of the children of Simeon, Shemuel the son of Ammihud. 
Of the tribe of Benjamin, Elidad the son of Chislon. 
And the prince of the tribe of the children of Dan, Bukki the son of Jogli. 
The prince of the children of Joseph, for the tribe of the children of Manasseh, Hanniel the son of Ephod. 
And the prince of the tribe of the children of Ephraim, Kemuel the son of Shiphtan. 
And the prince of the tribe of the children of Zebulun, Elizaphan the son of Parnach. 
And the prince of the tribe of the children of Issachar, Paltiel the son 
898,e of Israel, or of the strangers that sojourn among you, that eateth any manner of blood; I will even set my face against that soul that eateth blood, and will cut him off from among his people. 
For the life of the flesh is in the blood: and I have given it to you upon the altar to make an atonement for your souls: for it is the blood that maketh an atonement for the soul. 
Therefore I said unto the children of Israel, No soul of you shall eat blood, neither shall any stranger that sojourneth among you eat blood. 
And whatsoever man there be of the children of Israel, or of the strangers that sojourn among you, which hunteth and catcheth any beast or fowl that may be eaten; he shall even pour out the blood thereof, and cover it with dust. 
For it is the life of all flesh; the blood of it is for the life thereof: therefore I said unto the children of Israel, Ye shall eat the blood of n
825, ran to meet them from the tent door, and bowed himself toward the ground, 
And said, My LORD, if now I have found favour in thy sight, pass not away, I pray thee, from thy servant: 
Let a little water, I pray you, be fetched, and wash your feet, and rest yourselves under the tree: 
And I will fetch a morsel of bread, and comfort ye your hearts; after that ye shall pass on: for therefore are ye come to your servant. And they said, So do, as thou hast said. 
And Abraham hastened into the tent unto Sarah, and said, Make ready quickly three measures of fine meal, knead it, and make cakes upon the hearth. 
And Abraham ran unto the herd, and fetcht a calf tender and good, and gave it unto a young man; and he hasted to dress it. 
And he took butter, and milk, and the calf which he had dressed, and set it before them; an
802,ring; beside the continual burnt offering, his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the second day ye shall offer twelve young bullocks, two rams, fourteen lambs of the first year without spot: 
And their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and the meat offering thereof, and their drink offerings. 
And on the third day eleven bullocks, two rams, fourteen lambs of the first year without blemish; 
And their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the c
886,ear me, thou Jeroboam, and all Israel; 
Ought ye not to know that the LORD God of Israel gave the kingdom over Israel to David for ever, even to him and to his sons by a covenant of salt? 
Yet Jeroboam the son of Nebat, the servant of Solomon the son of David, is risen up, and hath rebelled against his lord. 
And there are gathered unto him vain men, the children of Belial, and have strengthened themselves against Rehoboam the son of Solomon, when Rehoboam was young and tenderhearted, and could not withstand them. 
And now ye think to withstand the kingdom of the LORD in the hand of the sons of David; and ye be a great multitude, and there are with your golden calves, which Jeroboam made you for gods. 
Have ye not cast out the priests of the LORD, the sons of Aaron, and the Levites, and have made you priests after the manner of the nations of other lands? so that whosoever 
1028,n I say unto the wicked, Thou shalt surely die; if he turn from his sin, and do that which is lawful and right; 
If the wicked restore the pledge, give again that he had robbed, walk in the statutes of life, without committing iniquity; he shall surely live, he shall not die. 
None of his sins that he hath committed shall be mentioned unto him: he hath done that which is lawful and right; he shall surely live. 
Yet the children of thy people say, The way of the Lord is not equal: but as for them, their way is not equal. 
When the righteous turneth from his righteousness, and committeth iniquity, he shall even die thereby. 
But if the wicked turn from his wickedness, and do that which is lawful and right, he shall live thereby. 
Yet ye say, The way of the Lord is not equal. O ye house of Israel, I will judge you every one after his ways. 
And it came to pass in the twelfth year of our captivity, in the tenth month, in the fifth day of the month, that one that had escaped out of Jerusalem came unto me, saying, The 
989,liah the son of Ahikam governor in the land, and had committed unto him men, and women, and children, and of the poor of the land, of them that were not carried away captive to Babylon; 
Then they came to Gedaliah to Mizpah, even Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and Johanan and Jonathan the sons of Kareah, and Seraiah the son of Tanhumeth, and the sons of Ephai the Netophathite, and Jezaniah the son of a Maachathite, they and their men. 
And Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan sware unto them and to their men, saying, Fear not to serve the Chaldeans: dwell in the land, and serve the king of Babylon, and it shall be well with you. 
As for me, behold, I will dwell at Mizpah, to serve the Chaldeans, which will come unto us: but ye, gather ye wine, and summer fruits, and oil, and put them in your vessels, and dwell in your cities that ye have taken. 
Likewise when all the Jews that were in Moab, and among the Ammonites, and in Edom, and that were in all the countries, hea
966,now shall mine head be lifted up above mine enemies round about me: therefore will I offer in his tabernacle sacrifices of joy; I will sing, yea, I will sing praises unto the LORD. 
Hear, O LORD, when I cry with my voice: have mercy also upon me, and answer me. 
When thou saidst, Seek ye my face; my heart said unto thee, Thy face, LORD, will I seek. 
Hide not thy face far from me; put not thy servant away in anger: thou hast been my help; leave me not, neither forsake me, O God of my salvation. 
When my father and my mother forsake me, then the LORD will take me up. 
Teach me thy way, O LORD, and lead me in a plain path, because of mine enemies. 
Deliver me not over unto the will of mine enemies: for false witnesses are risen up against me, and such as breathe out cruelty. 
I had fainted, unless I had believed to see the goodness of the LORD in the land of the living. 
Wait on the LORD: be of good courage, and he shall strengthen thine heart: wait, I s
985,had prepared. 
And the king said unto Esther at the banquet of wine, What is thy petition? and it shall be granted thee: and what is thy request? even to the half of the kingdom it shall be performed. 
Then answered Esther, and said, My petition and my request is; 
If I have found favour in the sight of the king, and if it please the king to grant my petition, and to perform my request, let the king and Haman come to the banquet that I shall prepare for them, and I will do to morrow as the king hath said. 
Then went Haman forth that day joyful and with a glad heart: but when Haman saw Mordecai in the king's gate, that he stood not up, nor moved for him, he was full of indignation against Mordecai. 
Nevertheless Haman refrained himself: and when he came home, he sent and called for his friends, and Zeresh his wife. 
And Haman told them of the glory of his riches, and the multitude of his children, and all the things wherein the king had promoted him, and how he had advanc
763, woman: these are the families of Simeon. 
And these are the names of the sons of Levi according to their generations; Gershon, and Kohath, and Merari: and the years of the life of Levi were an hundred thirty and seven years. 
The sons of Gershon; Libni, and Shimi, according to their families. 
And the sons of Kohath; Amram, and Izhar, and Hebron, and Uzziel: and the years of the life of Kohath were an hundred thirty and three years. 
And the sons of Merari; Mahali and Mushi: these are the families of Levi according to their generations. 
And Amram took him Jochebed his father's sister to wife; and she bare him Aaron and Moses: and the years of the life of Amram were an hundred and thirty and seven years. 
And the sons of Izhar; Korah, and Nepheg, and Z
927, I pray thee, wherewith thou mightest be bound. 
And he said unto her, If they bind me fast with new ropes that never were occupied, then shall I be weak, and be as another man. 
Delilah therefore took new ropes, and bound him therewith, and said unto him, The Philistines be upon thee, Samson. And there were liers in wait abiding in the chamber. And he brake them from off his arms like a thread. 
And Delilah said unto Samson, Hitherto thou hast mocked me, and told me lies: tell me wherewith thou mightest be bound. And he said unto her, If thou weavest the seven locks of my head with the web. 
And she fastened it with the pin, and said unto him, The Philistines be upon thee, Samson. And he awaked out of his sleep, and went away with the pin of the beam, and with the web. 
And she said unto him, How canst thou say, I love thee, when thine heart is not with me? thou hast mocked me these three times, and hast not told
963, side, clothed in a long white garment; and they were affrighted. 
And he saith unto them, Be not affrighted: Ye seek Jesus of Nazareth, which was crucified: he is risen; he is not here: behold the place where they laid him. 
But go your way, tell his disciples and Peter that he goeth before you into Galilee: there shall ye see him, as he said unto you. 
And they went out quickly, and fled from the sepulchre; for they trembled and were amazed: neither said they any thing to any man; for they were afraid. 
Now when Jesus was risen early the first day of the week, he appeared first to Mary Magdalene, out of whom he had cast seven devils. 
And she went and told them that had been with him, as they mourned and wept. 
And they, when they had heard that he was alive, and had been seen of her, believed not. 
After that he appeared in another form unto two of them, as they walked, and went into the country. 
And they went and told it unto the residue: neith
727,eturah. 
And Abraham begat Isaac. The sons of Isaac; Esau and Israel. 
The sons of Esau; Eliphaz, Reuel, and Jeush, and Jaalam, and Korah. 
The sons of Eliphaz; Teman, and Omar, Zephi, and Gatam, Kenaz, and Timna, and Amalek. 
The sons of Reuel; Nahath, Zerah, Shammah, and Mizzah. 
And the sons of Seir; Lotan, and Shobal, and Zibeon, and Anah, and Dishon, and Ezar, and Dishan. 
And the sons of Lotan; Hori, and Homam: and Timna was Lotan's sister. 
The sons of Shobal; Alian, and Manahath, and Ebal, Shephi, and Onam. and the sons of Zibeon; Aiah, and Anah. 
The sons of Anah; Dishon. And the sons of Dishon; Amram, and Eshban, and Ithran, and Cheran. 
The sons of Ezer; Bilhan, and Zavan, and Jakan. The sons of Dishan; Uz,
852,of Gad, one gate of Asher, one gate of Naphtali. 
It was round about eighteen thousand measures: and the name of the city from that day shall be, The LORD is there. 
In the third year of the reign of Jehoiakim king of Judah came Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon unto Jerusalem, and besieged it. 
And the Lord gave Jehoiakim king of Judah into his hand, with part of the vessels of the house of God: which he carried into the land of Shinar to the house of his god; and he brought the vessels into the treasure house of his god. 
And the king spake unto Ashpenaz the master of his eunuchs, that he should bring certain of the children of Israel, and of the king's seed, and of the princes; 
Children in whom was no blemish, but well favoured, and skilful in all wisdom, and cunning in knowledge, and understanding science, and such as had ability in them 
779,at it is he which was ordained of God to be the Judge of quick and dead. 
To him give all the prophets witness, that through his name whosoever believeth in him shall receive remission of sins. 
While Peter yet spake these words, the Holy Ghost fell on all them which heard the word. 
And they of the circumcision which believed were astonished, as many as came with Peter, because that on the Gentiles also was poured out the gift of the Holy Ghost. 
For they heard them speak with tongues, and magnify God. Then answered Peter, 
Can any man forbid water, that these should not be baptized, which have received the Holy Ghost as well as we? 
And he commanded them to be baptized in the name of the Lord. Then prayed they him to tarry certain days. 
And the apostles and brethren
723,ghed after his neighbour's wife. 
Shall I not visit for these things? saith the LORD: and shall not my soul be avenged on such a nation as this? 
Go ye up upon her walls, and destroy; but make not a full end: take away her battlements; for they are not the LORD's. 
For the house of Israel and the house of Judah have dealt very treacherously against me, saith the LORD. 
They have belied the LORD, and said, It is not he; neither shall evil come upon us; neither shall we see sword nor famine: 
And the prophets shall become wind, and the word is not in them: thus shall it be done unto them. 
Wherefore thus saith the LORD God of hosts, Because ye speak this word, behold, I will make my words in thy mouth fire, and this
1034, common salvation, it was needful for me to write unto you, and exhort you that ye should earnestly contend for the faith which was once delivered unto the saints. 
For there are certain men crept in unawares, who were before of old ordained to this condemnation, ungodly men, turning the grace of our God into lasciviousness, and denying the only Lord God, and our Lord Jesus Christ. 
I will therefore put you in remembrance, though ye once knew this, how that the Lord, having saved the people out of the land of Egypt, afterward destroyed them that believed not. 
And the angels which kept not their first estate, but left their own habitation, he hath reserved in everlasting chains under darkness unto the judgment of the great day. 
Even as Sodom and Gomorrha, and the cities about them in like manner, giving themselves over to fornication, and going after strange flesh, are set forth for an example, suffering the vengeance of eternal fire. 
Likewise also these filthy dreamers defile the flesh, despise dominion, and speak e
896,e a man of strife and a man of contention to the whole earth! I have neither lent on usury, nor men have lent to me on usury; yet every one of them doth curse me. 
The LORD said, Verily it shall be well with thy remnant; verily I will cause the enemy to entreat thee well in the time of evil and in the time of affliction. 
Shall iron break the northern iron and the steel? 
Thy substance and thy treasures will I give to the spoil without price, and that for all thy sins, even in all thy borders. 
And I will make thee to pass with thine enemies into a land which thou knowest not: for a fire is kindled in mine anger, which shall burn upon you. 
O LORD, thou knowest: remember me, and visit me, and revenge me of my persecutors; take me not away in thy longsuffering: know that for thy sake I have suffered rebuke. 
Thy words were found, and I did eat them; and thy word was unto me the joy an
907,: and the men of Jericho fought against you, the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and the Canaanites, and the Hittites, and the Girgashites, the Hivites, and the Jebusites; and I delivered them into your hand. 
And I sent the hornet before you, which drave them out from before you, even the two kings of the Amorites; but not with thy sword, nor with thy bow. 
And I have given you a land for which ye did not labour, and cities which ye built not, and ye dwell in them; of the vineyards and oliveyards which ye planted not do ye eat. 
Now therefore fear the LORD, and serve him in sincerity and in truth: and put away the gods which your fathers served on the other side of the flood, and in Egypt; and serve ye the LORD. 
And if it seem evil unto you to serve the LORD, choose you this day whom ye will serve; whether the gods which your fathers served that were on the other side of the flood, or the gods 
720,d yet thou never gavest me a kid, that I might make merry with my friends: 
But as soon as this thy son was come, which hath devoured thy living with harlots, thou hast killed for him the fatted calf. 
And he said unto him, Son, thou art ever with me, and all that I have is thine. 
It was meet that we should make merry, and be glad: for this thy brother was dead, and is alive again; and was lost, and is found. 
And he said also unto his disciples, There was a certain rich man, which had a steward; and the same was accused unto him that he had wasted his goods. 
And he called him, and said unto him, How is it that I hear this of thee? give an account of thy stewardship; for thou mayest be no longer steward. 
The
968, him, and he have cast them away for their transgression; 
If thou wouldest seek unto God betimes, and make thy supplication to the Almighty; 
If thou wert pure and upright; surely now he would awake for thee, and make the habitation of thy righteousness prosperous. 
Though thy beginning was small, yet thy latter end should greatly increase. 
For enquire, I pray thee, of the former age, and prepare thyself to the search of their fathers: 
(For we are but of yesterday, and know nothing, because our days upon earth are a shadow:) 
Shall not they teach thee, and tell thee, and utter words out of their heart? 
Can the rush grow up without mire? can the flag grow without water? 
Whilst it is yet in his greenness, and not cut down, it withereth before any other herb. 
So are the paths of all that forget God; and the hypocrite's hope shall perish: 
Whose hope shall be cut off, and whose trust shall be a spider's web. 
He shall lean upon his house, but it shall 
974,For my yoke is easy, and my burden is light. 
At that time Jesus went on the sabbath day through the corn; and his disciples were an hungred, and began to pluck the ears of corn and to eat. 
But when the Pharisees saw it, they said unto him, Behold, thy disciples do that which is not lawful to do upon the sabbath day. 
But he said unto them, Have ye not read what David did, when he was an hungred, and they that were with him; 
How he entered into the house of God, and did eat the shewbread, which was not lawful for him to eat, neither for them which were with him, but only for the priests? 
Or have ye not read in the law, how that on the sabbath days the priests in the temple profane the sabbath, and are blameless? 
But I say unto you, That in this place is one greater than the temple. 
But if ye had known what this meaneth, I will have mercy, and not sacrifice, ye would not have condemned the guiltless. 
For the Son of man is Lord even of the sabbath day. 
An
799, thou take away my son's mandrakes also? And Rachel said, Therefore he shall lie with thee to night for thy son's mandrakes. 
And Jacob came out of the field in the evening, and Leah went out to meet him, and said, Thou must come in unto me; for surely I have hired thee with my son's mandrakes. And he lay with her that night. 
And God hearkened unto Leah, and she conceived, and bare Jacob the fifth son. 
And Leah said, God hath given me my hire, because I have given my maiden to my husband: and she called his name Issachar. 
And Leah conceived again, and bare Jacob the sixth son. 
And Leah said, God hath endued me with a good dowry; now will my husband dwell with me, because I have born him six sons: and she called his name Zebulun. 
And afterwards she bare a daughter, and called her name
756,d into an image made like to corruptible man, and to birds, and fourfooted beasts, and creeping things. 
Wherefore God also gave them up to uncleanness through the lusts of their own hearts, to dishonour their own bodies between themselves: 
Who changed the truth of God into a lie, and worshipped and served the creature more than the Creator, who is blessed for ever. Amen. 
For this cause God gave them up unto vile affections: for even their women did change the natural use into that which is against nature: 
And likewise also the men, leaving the natural use of the woman, burned in their lust one toward another; men with men working that which is unseemly, and receiving in themselves that recompence of their error which was meet. 
And even as th
981, forth to the light, and I shall behold his righteousness. 
Then she that is mine enemy shall see it, and shame shall cover her which said unto me, Where is the LORD thy God? mine eyes shall behold her: now shall she be trodden down as the mire of the streets. 
In the day that thy walls are to be built, in that day shall the decree be far removed. 
In that day also he shall come even to thee from Assyria, and from the fortified cities, and from the fortress even to the river, and from sea to sea, and from mountain to mountain. 
Notwithstanding the land shall be desolate because of them that dwell therein, for the fruit of their doings. 
Feed thy people with thy rod, the flock of thine heritage, which dwell solitarily in the wood, in the midst of Carmel: let them feed in Bashan and Gilead, as in the days of old. 
According to the days of thy coming out of the land of Egypt will I shew unto him marvellous things. 
The nations shall see and be confounded at all their mi
1060,the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will send and take Nebuchadrezzar the king of Babylon, my servant, and will set his throne upon these stones that I have hid; and he shall spread his royal pavilion over them. 
And when he cometh, he shall smite the land of Egypt, and deliver such as are for death to death; and such as are for captivity to captivity; and such as are for the sword to the sword. 
And I will kindle a fire in the houses of the gods of Egypt; and he shall burn them, and carry them away captives: and he shall array himself with the land of Egypt, as a shepherd putteth on his garment; and he shall go forth from thence in peace. 
He shall break also the images of Bethshemesh, that is in the land of Egypt; and the houses of the gods of the Egyptians shall he burn with fire. 
The word that came to Jeremiah concerning all the Jews which dwell in the land of Egypt, which dwell at Migdol, and at Tahpanhes, and at Noph, and in the country of Pathros, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Ye have seen all the
781,h he covered. 
And the vision of all is become unto you as the words of a book that is sealed, which men deliver to one that is learned, saying, Read this, I pray thee: and he saith, I cannot; for it is sealed: 
And the book is delivered to him that is not learned, saying, Read this, I pray thee: and he saith, I am not learned. 
Wherefore the Lord said, Forasmuch as this people draw near me with their mouth, and with their lips do honour me, but have removed their heart far from me, and their fear toward me is taught by the precept of men: 
Therefore, behold, I will proceed to do a marvellous work among this people, even a marvellous work and a wonder: for the wisdom of their wise men shall perish, and the understanding of their prudent men shall be hid. 
Woe unto them t
793,of gave Joshua among their brethren on this side Jordan westward. And when Joshua sent them away also unto their tents, then he blessed them, 
And he spake unto them, saying, Return with much riches unto your tents, and with very much cattle, with silver, and with gold, and with brass, and with iron, and with very much raiment: divide the spoil of your enemies with your brethren. 
And the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the half tribe of Manasseh returned, and departed from the children of Israel out of Shiloh, which is in the land of Canaan, to go unto the country of Gilead, to the land of their possession, whereof they were possessed, according to the word of the LORD by the hand of Moses. 
And when they came unto the borders of Jordan, that are in the land of Canaa
1065,ions that are round about thee, in the sight of all that pass by. 
So it shall be a reproach and a taunt, an instruction and an astonishment unto the nations that are round about thee, when I shall execute judgments in thee in anger and in fury and in furious rebukes. I the LORD have spoken it. 
When I shall send upon them the evil arrows of famine, which shall be for their destruction, and which I will send to destroy you: and I will increase the famine upon you, and will break your staff of bread: 
So will I send upon you famine and evil beasts, and they shall bereave thee: and pestilence and blood shall pass through thee; and I will bring the sword upon thee. I the LORD have spoken it. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face toward the mountains of Israel, and prophesy against them, 
And say, Ye mountains of Israel, hear the word of the Lord GOD; Thus saith the Lord GOD to the mountains, and to the hills, to the rivers, and to the valleys; Behold, I, even I, will bring a sword upon you, and I will destroy your hi
782,ed themselves. 
And all the congregation of Judah, with the priests and the Levites, and all the congregation that came out of Israel, and the strangers that came out of the land of Israel, and that dwelt in Judah, rejoiced. 
So there was great joy in Jerusalem: for since the time of Solomon the son of David king of Israel there was not the like in Jerusalem. 
Then the priests the Levites arose and blessed the people: and their voice was heard, and their prayer came up to his holy dwelling place, even unto heaven. 
Now when all this was finished, all Israel that were present went out to the cities of Judah, and brake the images in pieces, and cut down the groves, and threw down the high places and the altars out of all Judah and Benjamin, in Ephraim also and Manasseh, unt
1025,ve, called Judas Iscariot, went unto the chief priests, 
And said unto them, What will ye give me, and I will deliver him unto you? And they covenanted with him for thirty pieces of silver. 
And from that time he sought opportunity to betray him. 
Now the first day of the feast of unleavened bread the disciples came to Jesus, saying unto him, Where wilt thou that we prepare for thee to eat the passover? 
And he said, Go into the city to such a man, and say unto him, The Master saith, My time is at hand; I will keep the passover at thy house with my disciples. 
And the disciples did as Jesus had appointed them; and they made ready the passover. 
Now when the even was come, he sat down with the twelve. 
And as they did eat, he said, Verily I say unto you, that one of you shall betray me. 
And they were exceeding sorrowful, and began every one of them to say unto him, Lord, is it I? 
And he answered and said, He that dippeth his hand with me in the dish, the same shall betray me. 
The Son of man goeth as it is wr
822,em take, and purify thyself with them, and be at charges with them, that they may shave their heads: and all may know that those things, whereof they were informed concerning thee, are nothing; but that thou thyself also walkest orderly, and keepest the law. 
As touching the Gentiles which believe, we have written and concluded that they observe no such thing, save only that they keep themselves from things offered to idols, and from blood, and from strangled, and from fornication. 
Then Paul took the men, and the next day purifying himself with them entered into the temple, to signify the accomplishment of the days of purification, until that an offering should be offered for every one of them. 
And when the seven days were almost ended, the Jews which were of Asia, when they saw him in the temple, stirred up 
907,ove with him. 
And they digged another well, and strove for that also: and he called the name of it Sitnah. 
And he removed from thence, and digged another well; and for that they strove not: and he called the name of it Rehoboth; and he said, For now the LORD hath made room for us, and we shall be fruitful in the land. 
And he went up from thence to Beersheba. 
And the LORD appeared unto him the same night, and said, I am the God of Abraham thy father: fear not, for I am with thee, and will bless thee, and multiply thy seed for my servant Abraham's sake. 
And he builded an altar there, and called upon the name of the LORD, and pitched his tent there: and there Isaac's servants digged a well. 
Then Abimelech went to him from Gerar, and Ahuzzath one of his friends, and Phichol the chief captain of his army. 
And Isaac said unto them, Wherefore come ye to me, seeing ye hate me, and have sent me a
858,ar thou their prayer and their supplication in heaven thy dwelling place, and maintain their cause, 
And forgive thy people that have sinned against thee, and all their transgressions wherein they have transgressed against thee, and give them compassion before them who carried them captive, that they may have compassion on them: 
For they be thy people, and thine inheritance, which thou broughtest forth out of Egypt, from the midst of the furnace of iron: 
That thine eyes may be open unto the supplication of thy servant, and unto the supplication of thy people Israel, to hearken unto them in all that they call for unto thee. 
For thou didst separate them from among all the people of the earth, to be thine inheritance, as thou spakest by the hand of Moses thy servant, when thou broughtest our fathers out of Egypt, O LORD God. 
And it was so, that 
777,thy to suffer shame for his name. 
And daily in the temple, and in every house, they ceased not to teach and preach Jesus Christ. 
And in those days, when the number of the disciples was multiplied, there arose a murmuring of the Grecians against the Hebrews, because their widows were neglected in the daily ministration. 
Then the twelve called the multitude of the disciples unto them, and said, It is not reason that we should leave the word of God, and serve tables. 
Wherefore, brethren, look ye out among you seven men of honest report, full of the Holy Ghost and wisdom, whom we may appoint over this business. 
But we will give ourselves continually to prayer, and to the ministry of the word. 
And the saying pleased the whole multitude: and they chose Stephen, a man
966,d will go all of you armed over Jordan before the LORD, until he hath driven out his enemies from before him, 
And the land be subdued before the LORD: then afterward ye shall return, and be guiltless before the LORD, and before Israel; and this land shall be your possession before the LORD. 
But if ye will not do so, behold, ye have sinned against the LORD: and be sure your sin will find you out. 
Build you cities for your little ones, and folds for your sheep; and do that which hath proceeded out of your mouth. 
And the children of Gad and the children of Reuben spake unto Moses, saying, Thy servants will do as my lord commandeth. 
Our little ones, our wives, our flocks, and all our cattle, shall be there in the cities of Gilead: 
But thy servants will pass over, every man armed for war, before the Lord to battle, as my lord saith. 
So concerning them Moses commanded Eleazar the priest, and Joshua the son of Nun, and the chief fathers of the tribes o
1046,, and hast eaten of the tree, of which I commanded thee, saying, Thou shalt not eat of it: cursed is the ground for thy sake; in sorrow shalt thou eat of it all the days of thy life; 
Thorns also and thistles shall it bring forth to thee; and thou shalt eat the herb of the field; 
In the sweat of thy face shalt thou eat bread, till thou return unto the ground; for out of it wast thou taken: for dust thou art, and unto dust shalt thou return. 
And Adam called his wife's name Eve; because she was the mother of all living. 
Unto Adam also and to his wife did the LORD God make coats of skins, and clothed them. 
And the LORD God said, Behold, the man is become as one of us, to know good and evil: and now, lest he put forth his hand, and take also of the tree of life, and eat, and live for ever: 
Therefore the LORD God sent him forth from the garden of Eden, to till the ground from whence he was taken. 
So he drove out the man; and he placed at the east of the garden of Eden Cherubims, and a flaming sword which turned every way, to keep
1061,y: for he shall come up, and shall become strong with a small people. 
He shall enter peaceably even upon the fattest places of the province; and he shall do that which his fathers have not done, nor his fathers' fathers; he shall scatter among them the prey, and spoil, and riches: yea, and he shall forecast his devices against the strong holds, even for a time. 
And he shall stir up his power and his courage against the king of the south with a great army; and the king of the south shall be stirred up to battle with a very great and mighty army; but he shall not stand: for they shall forecast devices against him. 
Yea, they that feed of the portion of his meat shall destroy him, and his army shall overflow: and many shall fall down slain. 
And both of these kings' hearts shall be to do mischief, and they shall speak lies at one table; but it shall not prosper: for yet the end shall be at the time appointed. 
Then shall he return into his land with great riches; and his heart shall be against the holy covenant; and he shall do exploits, and retu
939,that stood among the myrtle trees answered and said, These are they whom the LORD hath sent to walk to and fro through the earth. 
And they answered the angel of the LORD that stood among the myrtle trees, and said, We have walked to and fro through the earth, and, behold, all the earth sitteth still, and is at rest. 
Then the angel of the LORD answered and said, O LORD of hosts, how long wilt thou not have mercy on Jerusalem and on the cities of Judah, against which thou hast had indignation these threescore and ten years? 
And the LORD answered the angel that talked with me with good words and comfortable words. 
So the angel that communed with me said unto me, Cry thou, saying, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; I am jealous for Jerusalem and for Zion with a great jealousy. 
And I am very sore displeased with the heathen that are at ease: for I was but a little displeased, and they helped forward the affliction. 
Therefore thus
1049, sabbath was past, Mary Magdalene, and Mary the mother of James, and Salome, had bought sweet spices, that they might come and anoint him. 
And very early in the morning the first day of the week, they came unto the sepulchre at the rising of the sun. 
And they said among themselves, Who shall roll us away the stone from the door of the sepulchre? 
And when they looked, they saw that the stone was rolled away: for it was very great. 
And entering into the sepulchre, they saw a young man sitting on the right side, clothed in a long white garment; and they were affrighted. 
And he saith unto them, Be not affrighted: Ye seek Jesus of Nazareth, which was crucified: he is risen; he is not here: behold the place where they laid him. 
But go your way, tell his disciples and Peter that he goeth before you into Galilee: there shall ye see him, as he said unto you. 
And they went out quickly, and fled from the sepulchre; for they trembled and were amazed: neither said they any thing to any man; for they were afraid. 
Now when Jesus was risen e
1057,r become sin. 
Let his days be few; and let another take his office. 
Let his children be fatherless, and his wife a widow. 
Let his children be continually vagabonds, and beg: let them seek their bread also out of their desolate places. 
Let the extortioner catch all that he hath; and let the strangers spoil his labour. 
Let there be none to extend mercy unto him: neither let there be any to favour his fatherless children. 
Let his posterity be cut off; and in the generation following let their name be blotted out. 
Let the iniquity of his fathers be remembered with the LORD; and let not the sin of his mother be blotted out. 
Let them be before the LORD continually, that he may cut off the memory of them from the earth. 
Because that he remembered not to shew mercy, but persecuted the poor and needy man, that he might even slay the broken in heart. 
As he loved cursing, so let it come unto him: as he delighted not in blessing, so let it be far from him. 
As he clothed himself with cursing like as with his garment, so let it come into his bo
768,er, and brass, 
And blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine linen, and goats' hair, 
And rams' skins dyed red, and badgers' skins, and shittim wood, 
Oil for the light, spices for anointing oil, and for sweet incense, 
Onyx stones, and stones to be set in the ephod, and in the breastplate. 
And let them make me a sanctuary; that I may dwell among them. 
According to all that I shew thee, after the pattern of the tabernacle, and the pattern of all the instruments thereof, even so shall ye make it. 
And they shall make an ark of shittim wood: two cubits and a half shall be the length thereof, and a cubit and a half the breadth thereof, and a cubit and a half the height thereof. 
And thou shalt overlay it with pure gold, within and without shalt thou overlay it
830,uble heart do they speak. 
The LORD shall cut off all flattering lips, and the tongue that speaketh proud things: 
Who have said, With our tongue will we prevail; our lips are our own: who is lord over us? 
For the oppression of the poor, for the sighing of the needy, now will I arise, saith the LORD; I will set him in safety from him that puffeth at him. 
The words of the LORD are pure words: as silver tried in a furnace of earth, purified seven times. 
Thou shalt keep them, O LORD, thou shalt preserve them from this generation for ever. 
The wicked walk on every side, when the vilest men are exalted. 
How long wilt thou forget me, O LORD? for ever? how long wilt thou hide thy face from me? 
How long shall I take counsel in my soul, having sorrow in my heart daily? how long shall mine enemy be exalted over me? 
Consid
1067,ause to cease from thence man and beast? 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of Jehoiakim king of Judah; He shall have none to sit upon the throne of David: and his dead body shall be cast out in the day to the heat, and in the night to the frost. 
And I will punish him and his seed and his servants for their iniquity; and I will bring upon them, and upon the inhabitants of Jerusalem, and upon the men of Judah, all the evil that I have pronounced against them; but they hearkened not. 
Then took Jeremiah another roll, and gave it to Baruch the scribe, the son of Neriah; who wrote therein from the mouth of Jeremiah all the words of the book which Jehoiakim king of Judah had burned in the fire: and there were added besides unto them many like words. 
And king Zedekiah the son of Josiah reigned instead of Coniah the son of Jehoiakim, whom Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon made king in the land of Judah. 
But neither he, nor his servants, nor the people of the land, did hearken unto the words of the LORD, which he spake by the prophet Jeremiah. 
And Zedekiah the k
926,n the temple, praising and blessing God. Amen. 
In the beginning was the Word, and the Word was with God, and the Word was God. 
The same was in the beginning with God. 
All things were made by him; and without him was not any thing made that was made. 
In him was life; and the life was the light of men. 
And the light shineth in darkness; and the darkness comprehended it not. 
There was a man sent from God, whose name was John. 
The same came for a witness, to bear witness of the Light, that all men through him might believe. 
He was not that Light, but was sent to bear witness of that Light. 
That was the true Light, which lighteth every man that cometh into the world. 
He was in the world, and the world was made by him, and the world knew him not. 
He came unto his own, and his own received him not. 
But as many as received him, to them gave he power to become the sons of God, even to them that believe on his 
737,s with he goats. 
How is Sheshach taken! and how is the praise of the whole earth surprised! how is Babylon become an astonishment among the nations! 
The sea is come up upon Babylon: she is covered with the multitude of the waves thereof. 
Her cities are a desolation, a dry land, and a wilderness, a land wherein no man dwelleth, neither doth any son of man pass thereby. 
And I will punish Bel in Babylon, and I will bring forth out of his mouth that which he hath swallowed up: and the nations shall not flow together any more unto him: yea, the wall of Babylon shall fall. 
My people, go ye out of the midst of her, and deliver ye every man his soul from the fierce anger of the LORD. 
And lest your heart faint, and ye fear for the
774, of gold which Solomon had made. 
And king Rehoboam made in their stead brasen shields, and committed them unto the hands of the chief of the guard, which kept the door of the king's house. 
And it was so, when the king went into the house of the LORD, that the guard bare them, and brought them back into the guard chamber. 
Now the rest of the acts of Rehoboam, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah? 
And there was war between Rehoboam and Jeroboam all their days. 
And Rehoboam slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David. And his mother's name was Naamah an Ammonitess. And Abijam his son reigned in his stead. 
Now in the eighteenth year of king Jeroboam the son of Nebat reigned
1010,heir covetousness. 
And, lo, thou art unto them as a very lovely song of one that hath a pleasant voice, and can play well on an instrument: for they hear thy words, but they do them not. 
And when this cometh to pass, (lo, it will come,) then shall they know that a prophet hath been among them. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, prophesy against the shepherds of Israel, prophesy, and say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD unto the shepherds; Woe be to the shepherds of Israel that do feed themselves! should not the shepherds feed the flocks? 
Ye eat the fat, and ye clothe you with the wool, ye kill them that are fed: but ye feed not the flock. 
The diseased have ye not strengthened, neither have ye healed that which was sick, neither have ye bound up that which was broken, neither have ye brought again that which was driven away, neither have ye sought that which was lost; but with force and with cruelty have ye ruled them. 
And they were scattered, because there is no 
999,, and make a prey of thy merchandise: and they shall break down thy walls, and destroy thy pleasant houses: and they shall lay thy stones and thy timber and thy dust in the midst of the water. 
And I will cause the noise of thy songs to cease; and the sound of thy harps shall be no more heard. 
And I will make thee like the top of a rock: thou shalt be a place to spread nets upon; thou shalt be built no more: for I the LORD have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD to Tyrus; Shall not the isles shake at the sound of thy fall, when the wounded cry, when the slaughter is made in the midst of thee? 
Then all the princes of the sea shall come down from their thrones, and lay away their robes, and put off their broidered garments: they shall clothe themselves with trembling; they shall sit upon the ground, and shall tremble at every moment, and be astonished at thee. 
And they shall take up a lamentation for thee, and say to thee, How art thou destroyed, that wast inhabi
854,ny to him into his lodging; to whom he expounded and testified the kingdom of God, persuading them concerning Jesus, both out of the law of Moses, and out of the prophets, from morning till evening. 
And some believed the things which were spoken, and some believed not. 
And when they agreed not among themselves, they departed, after that Paul had spoken one word, Well spake the Holy Ghost by Esaias the prophet unto our fathers, 
Saying, Go unto this people, and say, Hearing ye shall hear, and shall not understand; and seeing ye shall see, and not perceive: 
For the heart of this people is waxed gross, and their ears are dull of hearing, and their eyes have they closed; lest they should see with their eyes, and hear with their ears, and understand with their heart, and should be converted, and I should heal them. 
Be it known therefore unto y
865, that he would deliver him: let him deliver him, seeing he delighted in him. 
But thou art he that took me out of the womb: thou didst make me hope when I was upon my mother's breasts. 
I was cast upon thee from the womb: thou art my God from my mother's belly. 
Be not far from me; for trouble is near; for there is none to help. 
Many bulls have compassed me: strong bulls of Bashan have beset me round. 
They gaped upon me with their mouths, as a ravening and a roaring lion. 
I am poured out like water, and all my bones are out of joint: my heart is like wax; it is melted in the midst of my bowels. 
My strength is dried up like a potsherd; and my tongue cleaveth to my jaws; and thou hast brought me into the dust of death. 
For dogs have compassed me: the assembly of the wicked have inclosed me: they pierced my hands and my feet. 
I may tell all my bones:
820,, he shall save the children of the needy, and shall break in pieces the oppressor. 
They shall fear thee as long as the sun and moon endure, throughout all generations. 
He shall come down like rain upon the mown grass: as showers that water the earth. 
In his days shall the righteous flourish; and abundance of peace so long as the moon endureth. 
He shall have dominion also from sea to sea, and from the river unto the ends of the earth. 
They that dwell in the wilderness shall bow before him; and his enemies shall lick the dust. 
The kings of Tarshish and of the isles shall bring presents: the kings of Sheba and Seba shall offer gifts. 
Yea, all kings shall fall down before him: all nations shall serve him. 
For he shall deliver the needy when he crieth; the poor also, and him that hath no helper. 
He shall
759,wn into Egypt, and have not asked at my mouth; to strengthen themselves in the strength of Pharaoh, and to trust in the shadow of Egypt! 
Therefore shall the strength of Pharaoh be your shame, and the trust in the shadow of Egypt your confusion. 
For his princes were at Zoan, and his ambassadors came to Hanes. 
They were all ashamed of a people that could not profit them, nor be an help nor profit, but a shame, and also a reproach. 
The burden of the beasts of the south: into the land of trouble and anguish, from whence come the young and old lion, the viper and fiery flying serpent, they will carry their riches upon the shoulders of young asses, and their treasures upon the bunches of camels, to a people that shall not profit them. 
For the Egyptia
815,the soldiers, 
Saying, Say ye, His disciples came by night, and stole him away while we slept. 
And if this come to the governor's ears, we will persuade him, and secure you. 
So they took the money, and did as they were taught: and this saying is commonly reported among the Jews until this day. 
Then the eleven disciples went away into Galilee, into a mountain where Jesus had appointed them. 
And when they saw him, they worshipped him: but some doubted. 
And Jesus came and spake unto them, saying, All power is given unto me in heaven and in earth. 
Go ye therefore, and teach all nations, baptizing them in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Ghost: 
Teaching them to observe all things whatsoever I have commanded you: and, lo, I am with you alway, even unto the end of the world. Amen. 
757,m; and he shall be diverse from the first, and he shall subdue three kings. 
And he shall speak great words against the most High, and shall wear out the saints of the most High, and think to change times and laws: and they shall be given into his hand until a time and times and the dividing of time. 
But the judgment shall sit, and they shall take away his dominion, to consume and to destroy it unto the end. 
And the kingdom and dominion, and the greatness of the kingdom under the whole heaven, shall be given to the people of the saints of the most High, whose kingdom is an everlasting kingdom, and all dominions shall serve and obey him. 
Hitherto is the end of the matter. As for me Daniel, my cogitations much troubled me, and my countenance chan
979, the Levites: both Jeshua the son of Azaniah, Binnui of the sons of Henadad, Kadmiel; 
And their brethren, Shebaniah, Hodijah, Kelita, Pelaiah, Hanan, 
Micha, Rehob, Hashabiah, 
Zaccur, Sherebiah, Shebaniah, 
Hodijah, Bani, Beninu. 
The chief of the people; Parosh, Pahathmoab, Elam, Zatthu, Bani, 
Bunni, Azgad, Bebai, 
Adonijah, Bigvai, Adin, 
Ater, Hizkijah, Azzur, 
Hodijah, Hashum, Bezai, 
Hariph, Anathoth, Nebai, 
Magpiash, Meshullam, Hezir, 
Meshezabeel, Zadok, Jaddua, 
Pelatiah, Hanan, Anaiah, 
Hoshea, Hananiah, Hashub, 
Hallohesh, Pileha, Shobek, 
Rehum, Hashabnah, Maaseiah, 
And Ahijah, Hanan, Anan, 
Malluch, Harim, Baanah. 
And the rest of the people, the priests, the Levites, the porters, the singers, the Nethinims, and all they that had separated themselves from the people of the lands unto the law of God, their wives, their sons, and their daughters, every one having knowledge, and having understanding; 
They clave to their brethren, their nobles, and en
971,r hand, to bring them to the house of the LORD. 
And Ishmael the son of Nethaniah went forth from Mizpah to meet them, weeping all along as he went: and it came to pass, as he met them, he said unto them, Come to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam. 
And it was so, when they came into the midst of the city, that Ishmael the son of Nethaniah slew them, and cast them into the midst of the pit, he, and the men that were with him. 
But ten men were found among them that said unto Ishmael, Slay us not: for we have treasures in the field, of wheat, and of barley, and of oil, and of honey. So he forbare, and slew them not among their brethren. 
Now the pit wherein Ishmael had cast all the dead bodies of the men, whom he had slain because of Gedaliah, was it which Asa the king had made for fear of Baasha king of Israel: and Ishmael the son of Nethaniah filled it with them that were slain. 
Then Ishmael carried away captive all the residue of the people that were in Mizpah, 
1072,and put it upon thy loins, and put it not in water. 
So I got a girdle according to the word of the LORD, and put it on my loins. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me the second time, saying, 
Take the girdle that thou hast got, which is upon thy loins, and arise, go to Euphrates, and hide it there in a hole of the rock. 
So I went, and hid it by Euphrates, as the LORD commanded me. 
And it came to pass after many days, that the LORD said unto me, Arise, go to Euphrates, and take the girdle from thence, which I commanded thee to hide there. 
Then I went to Euphrates, and digged, and took the girdle from the place where I had hid it: and, behold, the girdle was marred, it was profitable for nothing. 
Then the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD, After this manner will I mar the pride of Judah, and the great pride of Jerusalem. 
This evil people, which refuse to hear my words, which walk in the imagination of their heart, and walk after other gods, to serve them, and to worship them, shall even be as this girdle, which is good for n
727,l manner of workmanship; 
And to devise curious works, to work in gold, and in silver, and in brass, 
And in the cutting of stones, to set them, and in carving of wood, to make any manner of cunning work. 
And he hath put in his heart that he may teach, both he, and Aholiab, the son of Ahisamach, of the tribe of Dan. 
Them hath he filled with wisdom of heart, to work all manner of work, of the engraver, and of the cunning workman, and of the embroiderer, in blue, and in purple, in scarlet, and in fine linen, and of the weaver, even of them that do any work, and of those that devise cunning work. 
Then wrought Bezaleel and Aholiab, and every wise hearted man, in whom the LORD put wisdom and understanding to know how to
1055,ur of the LORD. 
But he that sinneth against me wrongeth his own soul: all they that hate me love death. 
Wisdom hath builded her house, she hath hewn out her seven pillars: 
She hath killed her beasts; she hath mingled her wine; she hath also furnished her table. 
She hath sent forth her maidens: she crieth upon the highest places of the city, 
Whoso is simple, let him turn in hither: as for him that wanteth understanding, she saith to him, 
Come, eat of my bread, and drink of the wine which I have mingled. 
Forsake the foolish, and live; and go in the way of understanding. 
He that reproveth a scorner getteth to himself shame: and he that rebuketh a wicked man getteth himself a blot. 
Reprove not a scorner, lest he hate thee: rebuke a wise man, and he will love thee. 
Give instruction to a wise man, and he will be yet wiser: teach a just man, and he will increase in learning. 
The fear of the LORD is the beginning of wisdom: and the knowledge of the holy is understanding. 
For by me thy days shall be multiplied, and the years of thy life
987,d of Israel. 
They also that erred in spirit shall come to understanding, and they that murmured shall learn doctrine. 
Woe to the rebellious children, saith the LORD, that take counsel, but not of me; and that cover with a covering, but not of my spirit, that they may add sin to sin: 
That walk to go down into Egypt, and have not asked at my mouth; to strengthen themselves in the strength of Pharaoh, and to trust in the shadow of Egypt! 
Therefore shall the strength of Pharaoh be your shame, and the trust in the shadow of Egypt your confusion. 
For his princes were at Zoan, and his ambassadors came to Hanes. 
They were all ashamed of a people that could not profit them, nor be an help nor profit, but a shame, and also a reproach. 
The burden of the beasts of the south: into the land of trouble and anguish, from whence come the young and old lion, the viper and fiery flying serpent, they will carry their riches upon the shoulders of young asses, and their treasures upon th
1024,es, and said, (the number of names together were about an hundred and twenty,) 
Men and brethren, this scripture must needs have been fulfilled, which the Holy Ghost by the mouth of David spake before concerning Judas, which was guide to them that took Jesus. 
For he was numbered with us, and had obtained part of this ministry. 
Now this man purchased a field with the reward of iniquity; and falling headlong, he burst asunder in the midst, and all his bowels gushed out. 
And it was known unto all the dwellers at Jerusalem; insomuch as that field is called in their proper tongue, Aceldama, that is to say, The field of blood. 
For it is written in the book of Psalms, Let his habitation be desolate, and let no man dwell therein: and his bishoprick let another take. 
Wherefore of these men which have companied with us all the time that the Lord Jesus went in and out among us, 
Beginning from the baptism of John, unto that same day that he was taken up from us, must one be ordained to be a witness with us of his r
1073,vid, Thus saith the LORD of hosts, I took thee from the sheepcote, even from following the sheep, that thou shouldest be ruler over my people Israel: 
And I have been with thee whithersoever thou hast walked, and have cut off all thine enemies from before thee, and have made thee a name like the name of the great men that are in the earth. 
Also I will ordain a place for my people Israel, and will plant them, and they shall dwell in their place, and shall be moved no more; neither shall the children of wickedness waste them any more, as at the beginning, 
And since the time that I commanded judges to be over my people Israel. Moreover I will subdue all thine enemies. Furthermore I tell thee that the LORD will build thee an house. 
And it shall come to pass, when thy days be expired that thou must go to be with thy fathers, that I will raise up thy seed after thee, which shall be of thy sons; and I will establish his kingdom. 
He shall build me an house, and I will stablish his throne for ever. 
I will be his father, and he shall be my son: and I will not ta
801, his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still. 
For the people turneth not unto him that smiteth them, neither do they seek the LORD of hosts. 
Therefore the LORD will cut off from Israel head and tail, branch and rush, in one day. 
The ancient and honourable, he is the head; and the prophet that teacheth lies, he is the tail. 
For the leaders of this people cause them to err; and they that are led of them are destroyed. 
Therefore the LORD shall have no joy in their young men, neither shall have mercy on their fatherless and widows: for every one is an hypocrite and an evildoer, and every mouth speaketh folly. For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still. 
For wickedness burneth as the fire: it shall devour the briers and thorns, and s
960, Balaam had spoken; and Balak and Balaam offered on every altar a bullock and a ram. 
And Balaam said unto Balak, Stand by thy burnt offering, and I will go: peradventure the LORD will come to meet me: and whatsoever he sheweth me I will tell thee. And he went to an high place. 
And God met Balaam: and he said unto him, I have prepared seven altars, and I have offered upon every altar a bullock and a ram. 
And the LORD put a word in Balaam's mouth, and said, Return unto Balak, and thus thou shalt speak. 
And he returned unto him, and, lo, he stood by his burnt sacrifice, he, and all the princes of Moab. 
And he took up his parable, and said, Balak the king of Moab hath brought me from Aram, out of the mountains of the east, saying, Come, curse me Jacob, and come, defy Israel. 
How shall I curse, whom God hath not cursed? or how shall I defy, whom the LORD hath not defied? 
For from the top of the rocks I see him, and from the hills I behold him: 
786,t on their way by the church, they passed through Phenice and Samaria, declaring the conversion of the Gentiles: and they caused great joy unto all the brethren. 
And when they were come to Jerusalem, they were received of the church, and of the apostles and elders, and they declared all things that God had done with them. 
But there rose up certain of the sect of the Pharisees which believed, saying, That it was needful to circumcise them, and to command them to keep the law of Moses. 
And the apostles and elders came together for to consider of this matter. 
And when there had been much disputing, Peter rose up, and said unto them, Men and brethren, ye know how that a good while ago God made choice among us, that the Gentiles by my mouth should hear the word of the gospel, 
894,e king took his ring from his hand, and gave it unto Haman the son of Hammedatha the Agagite, the Jews' enemy. 
And the king said unto Haman, The silver is given to thee, the people also, to do with them as it seemeth good to thee. 
Then were the king's scribes called on the thirteenth day of the first month, and there was written according to all that Haman had commanded unto the king's lieutenants, and to the governors that were over every province, and to the rulers of every people of every province according to the writing thereof, and to every people after their language; in the name of king Ahasuerus was it written, and sealed with the king's ring. 
And the letters were sent by posts into all the king's provinces, to destroy, to kill, and to cause to perish, all Jews, both young and old, little children and women, in one day, even upon the thirteenth day of the twelfth month,
795,vers, and all the fish of thy rivers shall stick unto thy scales. 
And I will leave thee thrown into the wilderness, thee and all the fish of thy rivers: thou shalt fall upon the open fields; thou shalt not be brought together, nor gathered: I have given thee for meat to the beasts of the field and to the fowls of the heaven. 
And all the inhabitants of Egypt shall know that I am the LORD, because they have been a staff of reed to the house of Israel. 
When they took hold of thee by thy hand, thou didst break, and rend all their shoulder: and when they leaned upon thee, thou brakest, and madest all their loins to be at a stand. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will bring a sword upon thee, and cut off man and beast out of thee. 
And the land of Egypt shall be desolate and
906,g, thou shalt not go into his house to fetch his pledge. 
Thou shalt stand abroad, and the man to whom thou dost lend shall bring out the pledge abroad unto thee. 
And if the man be poor, thou shalt not sleep with his pledge: 
In any case thou shalt deliver him the pledge again when the sun goeth down, that he may sleep in his own raiment, and bless thee: and it shall be righteousness unto thee before the LORD thy God. 
Thou shalt not oppress an hired servant that is poor and needy, whether he be of thy brethren, or of thy strangers that are in thy land within thy gates: 
At his day thou shalt give him his hire, neither shall the sun go down upon it; for he is poor, and setteth his heart upon it: lest he cry against thee unto the LORD, and it be sin unto thee. 
The fathers shall not be put to death for the children, neither shall the children be put to death for the fathers: every man shall be
772,m ready to come to you; and I will not be burdensome to you: for I seek not your's but you: for the children ought not to lay up for the parents, but the parents for the children. 
And I will very gladly spend and be spent for you; though the more abundantly I love you, the less I be loved. 
But be it so, I did not burden you: nevertheless, being crafty, I caught you with guile. 
Did I make a gain of you by any of them whom I sent unto you? 
I desired Titus, and with him I sent a brother. Did Titus make a gain of you? walked we not in the same spirit? walked we not in the same steps? 
Again, think ye that we excuse ourselves unto you? we speak before God in Christ: but we do all things, dearly beloved, for your edifying. 
For I fear, lest, when I come, I shall n
